I am feeling hungry so I would like to find a place to eat.
Do you have a specific which you want the eating place to be located at?
I would like for it to be in San Jose.
Is there a specific cuisine type you enjoy, such as Mexican, Italian or something else?
I usually like eating the American type of food.
I see that at 71 Saint Peter there is a good restaurant which is in San Jose.
Can you give me the address of this restaurant.
If you want to go to this restaurant you can find it at 71 North San Pedro Street.
Can you give me the phone number that I can contact them with?
If you want to phone them you can at 408-971-8523.
Is there some other restaurant which you can suggest?
How would you like Bazille restaurant which is situated in San Jose.
Do you have another restaurant matching my needs? For example a restaurant which is economical and is located in Palo Alto.
I see that 7 restaurants suit to what you requested. Bird Dog seems as a good restaurant and is located in Palo Alto.
Alright, that seems good. I would like to make a booking at this restaurant.
For which time do you want the booking to be?
I will be eating there at 11:30 am so make it for then.
Can you please confirm that you want to book a table for 2 at 11:30 am at the Bird Dog restaurant in Palo Alto for today.
That suits me well. Can you tell me if they feature live music?
Your booking has been made without errors, but unfortunately they do not have live music.
Will I be able to find liquor there? Can you give me the address of their location?
The restaurant is located at 420 Ramona Street. Unfortunately they do not serve alcohol at the restaurant.
I appreciate it very much. That would be all.
Have a good time!
Hi i need a help, i am very hungry, I am looking for a restaurant
Sure, I will help you, What type of food are you looking for? Which city should i search in?
Some Punjabi kind of foods in milpitas
I found a good restaurant in Milpitas, The restaurant name is Anjappar Chettinad Restaurant
Ok, What is the address? How pricey are they?
Price range is moderate, The address is Milpitas Square
Ok, Find me another restaurant?
I found another restaurant for you, Aria Dining & Banquets Fine Indian Cuisine Restaurant at Milpitas
No, suggest me another Restaurant, Some Take-out type of food will be perfect
I found 2 Restaurants, Olive garden Italian Restaurant at Milpitas
Yes, it seems good for me
shall i reserve a table here for you?
Yes, I want it on the 11th
please tell me what time is the reservation for?
at afternoon 1:30
Please confirm the following details: Booking a table at Olive Garden Italian Restaurant at Milpitas on March 11th reservation time is 1:30 pm, The reservation is for 2 people
No, time change to twelve in the afternoon for one people
Please confirm the following details: the reservation time is 12 pm, The reservation is for 1 people
Yes
Congrats, your reservation is confirmed
What is the Restaurant address, Do they have live music, I love it
Sorry, They don't have live music, The restaurant address is 1350 Great Mall Drive
Thank you very much for your help
Shall i help you with anything else?
No, Thanks
You are welcome, have a great day
Help me find a good restaurant.
In which city are you looking for the restaurant and do you have any preferred cuisine?
Find me Ethiopian cuisine in Berkeley.
Of the 4 Ethiopian restaurants in Berkeley, Addis Restaurant is a good one.
Do they have live music?
I'm sorry. They do not have live music.
That's okay. I'd like to reserve a table for the 4th.
At what time will you be arriving at the restaurant?
Reserve the table for the 2nd of this month at 17:15.
Please confirm that you want to reserve a table for 2 at the Addis Restaurant in Berkeley for tomorrow at 5:15 pm.
That's right. Do they serve alcohol? And how expensive is the place?
Sorry the reservation was not successful. Is there anything else I can assist you with?
Can you check if a table is available at 17:30?
Okay.Please confirm that you want to reserve a table for 2 at the Addis Restaurant in Berkeley for tomorrow at 5:30 pm.
That's correct.
Your table has been reserved.
Thank you. That's all I need for now.
Have a great day!
I'm looking for a place to eat.
Which city should I search in? What kind of food are you looking for?
Some Freshwater fish kind of food in Palo Alto would be perfect.
I found 4 restaurants. Odori Japanese Cuisine is a nice restaurant in Palo Alto.
Could you suggest any other restaurant?
P.f. Chang's is another nice restaurant in Palo Alto.
Yes, that works for me.
Would you like to reserve a table here?
Yes, I want to make a reservation for one. Make it at half past 6 in the evening.
Please confirm: Booking a table for 1 at P.f. Chang's at 6:30 pm today in Palo Alto.
Yes, that works for me. How pricey are they? What is their contact number?
Your reservation is successful. Their price range is moderate and their phone number is 650-330-1782.
Thank you very much.
Can I help you with anything else?
No, thank you very much.
Have a good day.
I'd like to find a place to eat.
Where should I look? What kind of food are you in the mood for? You can say things like Mexican, Italian or any other kind of food.
Lobster sounds great. Please search in San Mateo.
I have found 9 restaurants. Andes Cafe San Mateo is a great restaurant in San Mateo.
What's their phone number?
Their number is 650-581-1305.
Any other suggestions?
Fuji Sukiyaki is another great choice in San Mateo.
Do they have live music?
They do not.
Any other suggestions?
Golden Wok would be a great choice in San Mateo.
That would work great. I would like to make a reservation there at evening 5:30 on March 14th.
Please confirm the following: You want to eat at Golden Wok in San Mateo on March 14th starting at 5:30 pm. The reservation would be for 2 people.
Yes, that would be great. Do they serve liquor or have live music?
Your reservation was successful. They do not play live music or serve alcohol.
Thanks so much!
Is there anything else today?
Nope, that'll be all. Thanks!
Have a great day!
I'm looking for a Filipino place to eat.
Which City are you looking at?
I want to eat in San Bruno
I have 3 restaurants, Cabalen is a nice one in San Bruno.
Any other suggestions?
What about Isla Restaurant in San Bruno?
How cheap is it and how much does it cost?
It is moderate pricing and they are at 448 San Mateo Avenue
Please can you make the reservation
What time for?
On the 12th at six pm
Please confirm: Booking a table for 2 at Isla Restaurant in San Bruno. It is on March 12th at 6 pm.
That's good. Do they serve liquor and what is there number?
Reservation made.The number is 650-588-6078 and they do serve alcohol.
Thanks a lot
Have a great day.
Can you help find a place to eat?
What kind of food like Indian or Chinese?
I would like Freshwater fish.
Do you have a city?
The city is San Jose.
I have one in San Jose called Ariake.
Yes that is fine.
Would you like a reservation?
Yes make it for March 10th.
What time would you like?
Reserve for six in the evening.
Please confirm Ariake in San Jose for 6 pm on March 10th for 2.
Yes what is the address and do they have live music?
The address is 1008 Blossom Hill Road and they do not have live music but your reservation is confirmed.
Thank you for all.
Is there anything else I can do?
No, that is all.
Thanks and have a good day.
My friend and I are looking for a place to eat.
Please tell me what type of food you are looking for just say Mexican, Chinese or anything else. Also what city would you like me to search int.
My family and I are in San Jose and the perfect place would have pizza and pasta. We don't have a price preference.
San Jose has a restaurant called Al Castello Ristorante that is nice.
Is there any other restaurant that you can suggest?
There is also a nice restaurant called Angelo's Italian Restaurant in San Jose.
Can I please have the address and contact number?
408-227-5502 is their phone and it is located at 436 Blossom Hill Road.
Is there any other restaurant that you can suggest?
There is another nice restaurant called Antonella's Ristorante in San Jose.
That restaurant will work can you please make a reservation for 12:30.
I will be booking a table at Antonella's Ristorante in San Jose. The reservation will be set at 12:30 pm for today. And it is for 2 people is this correct.
Yes, thank you that is correct.
I have successful made your reservation.
Thank you so much for setting that up.
Is there anything else that I can help you with.
That is all thank you so much.
Have a good day thank you.
Can you find me something economical to eat in Pleasanton.
Are you looking for Italian, Indian or something else?
I would like some Italian food.
Found 5 restaurants for you out of which De La Torre's Trattoria seems a great from Pleasanton.
Can you provide the address and do they have live music?
No, they do not have live music and its address is 6025 West Las Positas Boulevard.
Any other recommendation?
Forno Vecchio also seems nice and its located n Pleasanton as well.
Can you provide more options?
Another good restaurant in Pleasanton in Gay 90's Pizza Co.
That sounds like a good choice for me.
Is there anything else?
Yes, make a reservation at the restaurant.
What time do you want me to make the reservation?
I'll reach there at 1:30 pm.
Please confirm that you want to make a reservation at Gay 90's Pizza Co. which is located in Pleasanton for 2 people. The reservation is for today at 1:30 pm.
No, change the time to 7 pm and for one person only.
Alright, please confirm that the reservation is at 7 pm for 1 person.
No, change it on next friday.
Sure. Please confirm that the date is now next Friday and for 1 person.
Yes. Sounds good.
Your reservation is booked.
What is the address of the restaurant and do the have live music?
The address is 288 Main Street and No, they don't have live music either.
Alright, Thank you.
Have a great day.
I am looking to eat somewhere
What city would you like to go? Do you want American or Italian?
I want some breakfast in Fairfield
I recommend Mimi's cafe in fairfield
Do they have live music with liquor
They do not have live music but they do have alcohol
ok that works
Do you want me to reserve a table for you
Yes, please make reservation for one people this evening 4:45
Please confirm your booking at mimi's cafe in Fairfield for 1 people today at 4:45 pm
thats correct. What is their phone number what how expensive are they
Sorry, they are fully booked. Shall i try to make reservation for 1 people today at 5 pm? The price range is Moderate at mimi's cafe and their phone number is 707-421-0835
yes thats fine
your seat is booked
thanks
anything else i can help you with?
no thats it
have a nice day
I'm starving! Can you help me find a restaurant that serves Breakfast in Fairfield?
There is 1 restaurant that meets your needs. Mimi's Cafe in Fairfield serves breakfast.
Is there a band playing there?
No, unfortunately, they don't offer live music.
That's okay. It will work anyway.
Do you wish to make a reservation?
Yes, I'll need to make a reservation for a table for 2.
What time will you be visiting?
Please make it for half past 5 in the evening.
You'd like a table for 2 today at Mimi's Cafe in Fairfield at 5:30 pm. Is this correct?
I'm sorry, I need to change that. I'd like it on the 9th and it will be for 3 people.
Let's review those changes. You'd like the reservation on March 9th for 3. Have I got it right?
I'm sorry. I need to make it on Monday next week at half past 12 in the afternoon.
You'd like your reservation for 3 next Monday at 12:30 pm. Is that correct?
Yes, I'm sorry for the confusion. Can you tell me their phone number please?
The phone number is 707-421-0835. Your reservation is confirmed.
Great! Thank you so much for your help.
You're welcome. Have a nice day!
Can you help me find a place to eat at?
Which city are you looking in?
Cupertino, please.
What kind of food would you like? American, Indian, or something else?
Malaysian sounds good right now.
I've found 2 Malaysian restaurants in Cupertino. Merlion Restaurant & Bar is one.
What's the other one?
Rasa Sayang is also is Cupertino.
Does the restaurant have live music?
No, they do now.
Sounds fine to me. Can you help me make a reservation?
At what time?
A quarter past 5 in the evening, please.
So you'd like a reservation for 2 at 5:15 pm today, at Rasa Sayang in Cupertino?
No, I'd like it on March 13th.
So you'd like a reservation at 5:15 pm on March 13th?
No, I'd like it at half past 12 in the afternoon.
So you'd like a reservation at 12:30 pm on March 13th?
Yes, sounds good.
Your reservation is confirmed.
Does the restaurant serve alcohol?
No, the restaurant does not serve alcohol.
Thank you, that's all I need.
Have a nice day.
Hello, could you help me search for a place to dine in?
Sure thing, which area are you interested in and what is your preferred cuisine, such as Italian and Indian?
I would prefer a restaurant which serves up Cambodian food in SF.
I have managed to find a nice restaurant called Anh Hong which is located in San Francisco.
Are there any alternative restaurants?
Yes there is, Aux Delices is also a nice restaurant located in San Francisco.
Sure, that sounds great!
Would you like me to make a reservation?
Yes, please do so.
What time would you like dine in at the restaurant?
I would prefer to dine in at 19:15.
Please confirm your reservation for 2 people at Aux Delices in San Francisco at 7:15 pm today.
Sorry, could you change the booking to 18:30 for 3 people?
Sure, please confirm your reservation at 6:30 pm for 3 people.
That's fine for me. May I know where they are located at?
They are located at 2327 Polk Street. Unfortunately, I was unable to make the reservation for you. Would you prefer a reservation at Aux Delices today for 3 people at 7 pm instead?
No, thank you anyway.
No problem, have a great day ahead!
I have a plan to eat out side for which I need some best places, can you search one for me?
Do you have any interested type of food to eat and in which city?
Asian kind of food will be good for me and please search it in Fremont City.
Found 3 results, Asian pearl Seafood Restaurant is the best one in Fremont city, hope you like it.
Yes, I like the same.
Shall I make a reservation at this restaurant?
Yes, make it at half past 1 in the afternoon that will be the perfect time to eat.
Please confirm to book a table for 2 persons in Asian Pearl Seafood REstaurant in Fremont at 1:30 pm on today.
change it to March 10th.
Please confirm to book for 2 persons on March 10th.
Yes, confirmed. continue with reservation.
Your booking was confirmed.
Thanks for your help.
Any other help you need?
No, thanks. that's all.
Have a great day.
I want to find a restaurant in Albany.
What type of restaurant would you like
Barbecue is the best.
I have 2 options. Cafe Eugene in Albany is a good choice.
What is the other option?
Juanita & Maude in Albany is great.
Yes that sounds good.
Would you like a table?
Yes please reserve me a table for the 13th of March.
What time would you like?
5 o"clock in the evening please.
Making a dinner reservation for 2 people at Juanita & Maude on March 13th at 5 pm in Albany. Is that Correct?
Yes is great.
Your reservation is successful.
Thanks for your help.
Is there anything else?
No that will be all.
Have a great day.
Can you pull up a list of places to eat?
Sure, what city should I search? And what kind of food would you like?
Search San Francisco for Asian Fusion food
Sure, I found 8 Immortals Restaurant in San Francisco
Is there live music?
Unfortunately no.
Do they serve alcohol? And what's their phone number?
No alcohol. The phone number is 415-731-5515
Okay great. Please make a reservation for a party of six.
Sure, what time?
half past 5 in the evening please.
Okay, got it. I will book a table at 8 Immortals Restaurant in San Francisco for 5:30 pm today, for 6 people.
That's correct. What's the address?
Apologies, I was unable to make this reservation. Can i help with with anything else?
I want a reservation at this restaurant. Can you make it for twelve pm? For four people.
Certainly, please confirm: Reservation at 8 Immortals Restaurant in San Francisco is for 12 pm today for 4 people.
Yes, thank you. How's the pricing? Low priced?
Great, reservation complete. The prices are inexpensive.
Thank you, that is all.
Have a great day
I'm looking for a good place to get something to eat, can you help?
Sure. What kind of food do you want? You can ask for Mexican, American, Sushi, or anything else. And also, what city should I search in?
Oh, I'm in Oakland. Please find an American restaurant.
I'd recommend Chop Bar in Oakland.
Are their prices extravagant? How can I contact them.
No, their prices are moderate. Their phone number is 510-834-2467.
Okay, that sounds good. Can you reserve a table for me?
What time would you like it?
Please reserve it for six pm.
Sure, please confirm that you'd like to book a table for 2 at Chop Bar in Oakland from 6 pm today.
Yes that's perfect. What's their address? Do they have a live band?
Your table is booked. You can find them at 247 4th Street. Unfortunately they don't do live music.
Okay thanks. That'll be all.
Okay, have a good night.
I'm looking for somewhere to eat.
Where should I search?
In Oakland.
What type of cuisine? For example, Chinese, American, or something else?
I want pizza and pasta.
I found 8 places. A16 is a nice restaurant in Oakland.
Do they have liquor?
Yes, they do.
Okay, that works for me.
Would you like to reserve a table there?
Yes, for two people please.
What time?
I want it at half past 5 in the evening.
Just to confirm, you want a table today at A16 in Oakland for 2 people at 5:30 pm?
Yes.
It was successful.
Thanks.
Can I help you with anything else?
No, that's okay.
Have a good day.
I'm looking for a restaurant.
In what city are you located and what type of food.
Asian Fusion in Concord.
Ozora Sushi is a restaurant in Concord.
Yes, that is good.
Would you like to reserve a table?
Yes, any date works.
What time would you like?
5 o"clock in the evening.
Ozora Sushi in Concord today for 2 people at 5 pm.
Yes, that is good.
Your reservation has been made.
What is the address and is there music?
It's at 785 Oak Grove Road and no music.
Thank you for your assistance.
Can I help with anything else?
No, that is all thank you.
Have a good day.
Are there any Mexican places in Rohnert Park?
Chili's Grill & Bar is in Rohnert Park.
Is it an inexpensive restaurant?
It is a moderate priced place.
What's their phone number?
It is 707-585-9069.
Are there any other restaurants? Something like Ramen would be good. I want something that is not very costly.
1 restaurant named Kyoto fits that description. It's in Rohnert Park as well.
That would be great!
Is there anything else I can do?
Make a reservation this morning 11:15 for three people.
Just to confirm: I am booking a table for 3 today at 11:15 am at the Rohnert Park location of Kyoto.
That's correct. What's their address?
Your reservation has been made. They are located at 5 Padre Parkway.
Is their music live?
No.
Okay. That was all I needed.
Have a great day.
I'm getting pretty hungry and need to find a place to eat.
What are your preference for a dining location?
I would like something that I can pick-up in San Fran at any price range.
There is a restaurant called Golden Gate Indian Cuisine & Pizza that is located in San Francisco.
Do they have music or entertainment? Can I have their phone number?
Sorry, they do not have live music. Their phone number is 415-564-5514.
I am on a budget so I would like something that is inexpensive but serves alcohol. Can you suggest another restaurant with these qualities?
I was able to locate 1 other nice restaurant called Hunan Empire Restaurant located in San Francisco.
Yes, that sounds like what I'm looking for.
Would you like for me to reserve a table here for you?
Yes, can you make the reservation for two people?
Sure, what time would you like me to set the reservation for?
Please make the reservation for the 13th of this month at afternoon 12.
Great, I have a dining reservation for 2 people, located at the Hunan Empire Restaurant in San Francisco, on March 13th at 12 pm. Does that sound correct?
Yes that sounds great. What is the address of the restaurant?
I've successfully made your reservation. The address for the restaurant is 2001 Union Street.
Thank you for all your help.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, that was all I needed but thank you.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you help me find a restaurant?
Yes, which city shall I search?
I prefer Redwood City.
Do you have a preference regarding the type of food?
I would like Spanish food, economical pricing preferred.
Redwood City has 1 Spanish restaurant, Estampas Peruanas Restaurant.
That sounds good.
Shall i reserve a table?
Yes please make a reservation for four.
What time would suit you best?
Early evening 5:45 pm.
Please confirm: You would like to book a table, today at 5:45 pm, for 4 at Estampas Peruanas restaurant in redwood City?
Yes that is correct. Do you have their phone number?
Reservation has been placed successfully. Their contact number is 650-368-9340.
Thank you. That is all for now.
Have a lovely day.
I am looking for a place to eat. Can you find restaurants specializing in Singaporean cuisine near me?
Okay, where would you like to eat?
I am looking for restaurants located in Millbrae.
I found 1 result, Ipoh Garden Malaysian Cuisine located in Millbrae.
Great, thanks. What is their phone number? Do they serve alcohol?
No, alcohol is not served. Here's their phone number: 650-487-8737
Okay, sounds good.
Do you want to make a reservation?
Sure, that would be great.
Okay. What time should I make your reservation?
Eleven in the morning, please.
Okay. I have an 11 AM reservation for 2 people today, at Ipoh Garden Malaysian Cuisine in Millbrae. Is that correct?
Yes- that's perfect.
Okay! Your reservation is confirmed.
Wonderful. Thanks for your help.
My pleasure. Have a great day.
Can you help me find an afforadable place to eat?
What city do you want me to look in?
Please look for a place in Calistoga.
Is there any particular type of food you want, like Chinese, Mexican, or anything else?
I'm in the mood for Cambodian food.
There's a nice place called Calistoga Thai Kitchen in Calistoga.
Do you have any other suggestions? Actually, I think I'd prefer Barbecue.
I've found 1 restaurant that could work. It's Lovina in Calistoga.
Yeah, that does work for me.
Do you want me to reserve you a table?
Yeah, please make me a reservation.
What time would you like it to be?
It should be half past 12 in the afternoon. Oh, and make it for two.
Okay, so it's a reservation at Lovina in Calistoga at 12:30 pm today for 2 people?
Wait no, it's just 1 person.
Okay, so it's 1 person at 12:30 pm?
Yeah, also do they have live music and liquor there?
There is no live music or liquor, sorry. But I've made the reservation for you.
Okay, thanks. I don't need any more help.
Then you have a good day, take care.
I will be going to eat with a friend what expensive restaurants do you recommend?
What type of cuisine do you want? Mexican, Chinese or which one?
I want something with Fish but make it an average priced restaurant.
In what city do you want to look for?
I want to eat in Burlingame.
There are 2 possible restaurants. One of them is Grand Harbor located in Burlingame.
That sounds great. Please make a reservation.
At what time do you want to go?
At quarter to 1 in the afternoon.
Please confirm: Booking a table for 2 people at 12:45 pm for today at the Grand Harbor in Burlingame.
Yes, that is correct. Do you have the phone number?
The restaurant has been booked. Their phone number is 650-347-9988.
Thanks a lot, that would be all.
Have a great day.
I am tired of eating my cooking. I want to eat out tonight.
What type of cuisine would you like?
I am in the mood for Izakaya cuisine.
Which city would you like me to look in?
I want something in Rohnert Park
There is a lovely restaurant in Rohnert Park called Hana
That does not seems close by. Where is it located?
It is located on 101 Golf Course Drive.
Is there anything else? I want to go somewhere close to Pleasant Hill.
There are 2 options available in Pleasant Hill. I would like to recommend Matsu Sushi Japanese Restaurant.
Where is it located?
It is located on 1914 contra costa boulevard
It is closer and would work out perfectly for me.
Should I go ahead and reserve a table?
Yes, reserve it for me.
For what time?
8 in the night, for 1 person
I would like to confirm the following information: reservations for 1 for 8 pm today at the Matsu Sushi Japanese Restaurant at Pleasant Hill.
Great. Is there live music? Is it a costly restaurant?
I apologies, but I was not able to reserve a table for you. Is there anything else I can assist you with?
Try again to book a table for 2
I would like to confirm the following information: a table for 2 today at 8 pm at the Matsu Sushi Japanese Restaurant in Pleasant Hill.
I would like a table for 11:45 in the morning.
I would like to confirm the following information: reservations for 2 at 11:45 am
That would be great.
I apologies but I was not able to make the reservation. Should I try for 12 pm today for 2 persons at Matsu Sushi Japanese Restaurant?
That would be great.
I was able to make the reservation.
I appreciate your assistance.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
No, you have be most helpful.
Enjoy your day.
I am looking for an inexpensive place to eat that has live music.
Which city would you like to search? And what type of food would you prefer such as Mexican, Italian or something else?
I'd like some soup, and I'm looking in San Ramon.
Noodles And Company is a nice resturant in San Ramon.
What is their address and contact number?
Their phone number is 925-275-8105, and their address is 3141 Crow Canyon Place.
Yes, that would work.
Would you like me to make a reservation for you?
Yes, please make the reservation for 7:30 pm.
I have booked a table at Noodles And Company in San Ramon at 7:30 pm today for 2 people. Is that correct?
Yes, that's great. Do they serve liquor?
Your reservation is booked. No, they do not serve alcohol.
Thank you, that is all I need.
Have a great day!
Can you help me find somewhere to eat?
Sure, what kind of food are you in the mood for, and in which city?
Search in Cupertino for Dumplings.
Cupertino has a dumpling restaurant called A Plus Cafe.
Is it expensive, and do they serve alcohol?
It's inexpensive, and yes, they serve alcohol.
Can you look for another place to eat in Santa Clara?
There's a nice place in Santa Clara called Chef Ming's.
Can you suggest something in the moderate price range?
How about China Stix in Santa Clara?
Great, can you make a reservation on the 7th of this month?
Yes, what time should I make it?
How about 7:30 pm.
Can you confirm the details for me? You're booking a table for 2 next Thursday at 7:30 pm at China Stix in Santa Clara.
Yes, that's right. Do they serve alcohol?
Your reservation has been confirmed. They don't serve alcohol.
Great, thanks, that's all I need.
Have a great day.
Hey! Today feeling so tired... Wish to have some food outside in a good restaurant... Can you find me one?
Yup! What kind of food do you like to have - Chinese, American, Italian etc? Which city you would prefer to have your lunch?
I would love to taste some Seafood in San Mateo. Please find some good hotels.
Please give me a moment. There are 9 restaurants with good rating and the top among them is Andes Cafe San Mateo located in San Mateo. Would you prefer to have your lunch here?
How much they charge? Can I have their street address?
They are located at 2317 South El Camino Real and their price range is neither costlier nor cheap, but only moderate.
Yup, that works. Please can you reserve at this restaurant?
Sure! At what time you wish to make your reservation?
Probably at quarter past 1 in the afternoon.
Okay! Confirm me the details that you wish to book a table at Andes Cafe San Mateo in San Mateo at 1:15 pm by today and the reservation would be for 2 persons, right?
Yup! sounds good. I've a question... Did liquor is provided at this restaurant?
Nope, they don't serve alcohol. You are all set. Successfully done with your reservation.
Thanks for your time.
Do you wish to know any other information?
Nope, thanks a lot.
Have a fantastic day.
I'm looking for somewhere in Dublin to have a meal and a drink.
What kind of food do you want to eat?
I feel like a burger.
I found 2 restaurants. One is the Black Angus Steakhouse in Dublin.
Do you have anything else?
Hot Crab is also located in Dublin.
Do they have live music? What's the price range?
The price range is moderate, there are no live music options.
Oh okay. Yeah sure that's fine.
Is there anything else?
I'd like to make a reservation.
Sure, what time?
5 pm please. There's 3 people in the group.
Okay. Please confirm that you'd like a booking for 3 at Hot Crab in Dublin today at 5 pm.
Yeah that works fine. What's their address and phone number?
You can call them on 925-999-9580 and their address is 4288 Dublin Boulevard #101-102. Your reservation has successfully been completed.
Thanks a lot!
Do you need anything else?
No thanks, that's all.
Okay, enjoy your meal.
I am bored of eating food from home , i need a change . Will you find me a place to eat? It can be costly priced and i am very fond of it
Which type of food you need whether Indian, Chinese or Anything other variety and In which city i should look for?
I need Pizza kind of food and i wish to eat in city Napa.
I found 1 Restaurant named as Bistro Don Giovanni which is located in Napa
Will you specify restaurant address and whether they have live music ?
Please note the address ,it is 4110 Howard Lane and they don't have Live music.
Ok its fine , i prefer the same.
Whether i need to reserve a table for you?
Yes sure, Please make a reservation and number of people is 2
At what time reservation to be?
Please fix it at 11:30 am
ok here are the details please check or review it . Table booked at Bistro Don Giovanni which is in city Napa. Reservation time is 11:30 am for 2 people and the date is today.
sorry make the reservation time as Morning 11:45
ok, please once again check the details. Reservation time for the table is at 11:45 am and for 2 people.
ok its great and sounds good .Please inform me the contact number of that restaurant?
Phone number is 707-224-3300 and your reservation is confirmed.
Whether they serve liquor?
sorry they do not serve alcohol .
ok thanks a lot for your kind help
Take care have a great day.
I'm starting to get hungry. I want to go eat at a nice restaurant.
Sure. What city would you like to eat in?
Milpitas.
Do you have a particular type of food you are craving? Mexican? American? Something else?
I feel like Cambodian tonight.
There is a Cambodian restaurant in Milpitas called Anh Hong.
That's exactly what I'm looking for.
Do you want me to make a reservation for you?
Yes, I'd like to try this place out.
Okay. At what time would you like to eat there?
6:30 pm. Please make the reservation for four people.
Sure. A reservation at Anh Hong in Milpitas for 4 at 6:30 pm today. Is that correct?
Perfect. What are the prices at Anh Hong like?
They have moderate pricing. Your reservation has been made.
Thanks. You've been a big help.
Have a nice day.
I'm planning on going out to eat later on. Can you help me find a place to eat at?
What sort of food do you want to eat and which city should I look in?
I'd like to go to a restaurant in Martinez that serves Thai food.
Okay, I found 1 nice restaurant in Martinez called Lemongrass Bistro.
What's their phone number and do they serve alcohol?
Their number is 925-387-0388 and they don't serve alcohol.
Okay, great. I want to make a reservation please.
When should I make it for?
Make the reservation for 7 pm.
Alright, please confirm that you'd like me to book a table for 2 at Lemongrass Bistro in Martinez for today at 7 pm.
No, make it for 1 person on next Monday please.
Okay, so you'd like a reservation for 1 person on next Monday, right?
Yup, that's right. Can you tell me if they have a live band?
Great, your reservation was made. And no, they don't have live music.
Do you know if their menu is inexpensive and what their address is?
Their address is 501 Main Street and their prices are moderate.
Great, thanks!
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No thanks. That's all I needed help with.
Have a nice day!
I am looking for an intermediate priced eating place in the nearby area.
What is your preference in regards to city and type of cuisine? You can say something like Italian, American or anything else.
Any place in Pleasanton which serves Ramen kind of food and also alcohol will be ideal.
There is a nice restaurant called Meiko Sushi in Pleasanton.
That is good a good choice. Please make a reservation for six people for 3rd of March.
What is the time for Reservation?
Reserve it for Twelve pm.
So, a table reservation at Meiko Sushi in Pleasanton will be for 12 pm on the day after tomorrow for 6 people. Please confirm the aforementioned details.
Yes that is good.
The reservation is successful.
Thank you.
Do you need any further assistance from me?
No. This should be enough for now.
Have a good day.
I would like to it in a place in Pleasanton.
What food would you like to eat?
I would love some Noodles
I have for you 3 option .One is a nice restaurant located in Pleasanton named Andy & Yu's.
Can you tell me the phone number?
925-750-8888 is the phone number
Sounds good
Would you like to make a reservation?
Yes make it for 2 people
At what time you want to be?
I want to be at 6:45 in the evening
Book a table at Andy & Yu's in Pleasanton at 6:45 pm today for 2 person is correct?
No make it please at 12:45 for 4 people
Reservation at 12:45 pm for 4 people Is OK?
Yes is good.Tell me please if they serve Liquor and if they have a price range average priced
Sorry the reservation was unsuccessful.Price range is moderate and they dont serve alcohol.Andy & Yu's is a nice place shall I try to meke a reservation for 4 person today at 12:30 pm?
Yes is ok
Reservation was successful made.
Thank you very much that s all I need
Have a great day!
I'd like to find a place to eat.
What city would you like to eat in and what kind of food do you like?
I'd like a Barbecue food restaurant in Campbell.
THere are 3 restaurants located in Campbell. Effie's Restaurant & Bar is nice.
Is Liquor available? Where are they located?
The address is 331 West Hacienda Avenue and they don't serve alcohol.
Do you have any other suggestions that are also affordable?
There are 2 restaurants in Campbell. Flights Restaurant Campbell is nice.
I'd like another kind of restaurant. I'd like Sushi.
Furusato in Campbell is a nice restaurant.
That's great.
Do you want to make a reservation?
Yes I'd like to make a reservation.
What time are you looking to book?
Please can you book it for 7:15 pm.
OK so you would like to book a table for 2 today at Furusato in Campbell for 7:15 pm.
No, I'd like to book for March 14th.
So to confirm, you would like a table at Furusato on March 14th.
Perfect.
Your booking has been confirmed.
Do they serve alcohol? what is their phone number?
Their number is 408-370-1300 and they don't serve alcohol.
That's great. I don't need anything else right now.
Enjoy your day.
Will you find me a place to eat?
Which city?
Palo Alto.
What kind of food?
Brazilian.
I found Pampas in Palo Alto.
Great. Please make a reservation.
What time?
Quarter past 5 in the evening.
Please confirm a table at Pampas in Palo Alto at 5:15 pm for 2 people today.
No, change it to evening 6:15.
Okay. A table at Pampas at 6:15 pm.
Great. How pricey? What's their number?
I've made your reservation. It's expensive. Phone number is 650-327-1323.
Thanks.
Anything else?
No, thanks.
Have a wonderful day.
Will you find me somewhere to eat?
Sure, what style are you in the mood for? How about Chinese or Mexican?
I really need good pasta, I'm underweight.
Of course, where do you want to go?
Campbell please, thanks.
You have 5 options: The top choice is A Bellagio Italian Restaurant in Campbell.
I need someplace cheaper. I want to eat a lot for not very costly.
Try Buca Di Beppo Italian Restaurant. It's in Campbell.
Where are they located?
1875 South Bascom Avenue is their street address.
What's the situation with live music there?
Sorry, no live music.
Please give a better choice.
Try Dicicco's Ristorante Italiano Autentico. It's in Campbell.
You have found a winner.
Can I get you a table?
Please do that.
What time do you want to show up there?
5:30 pm should be prime pasta time.
Ok, Let's be clear: 2 people for Dicicco's Ristorante Italiano Autentico. Today at 5:30 pm. in Campbell.
Do they have been and liquor?
I have your appointment set up. They do serve alcohol.
Great, I want to toast the victory of the team.
What else would you like?
Nothing much. I'm good.
Enjoy your pasta.
I want to eat out at an intermediate priced location, can you find me some options?
What food do you fancy? Is there anywhere you particularly want to go?
I want to go to Milpitas. Spicy Indian food sounds perfect.
I found 4 restaurants- how about Anjappar Chettinad Restaurant in Milpitas?
Is there live music? What's the contact number?
The contact number is 408-435-5500, but they don't have live music.
Well, it works for me, can you make a reservation for 4 people at 1 o"clock in the afternoon?
So I'll book a table for 4 at Anjappar Chettinad Restaurant in Milpitas for 1 pm today. Is that okay?
No, actually I want it for 3 people, and at evening 7:45.
I've updated the reservation for 3 people, at 7:45 pm. Is that okay?
Yes, that sounds good.
I'm sorry, but the reservation was unavailable. Shall I try something else?
No, thanks a lot.
Have a good day!
I am planning to go out for dinner. Can you find me restaurants nearby?
Do you have a specific area in mind where you would like to eat.
I would like to eat in Milpitas and the restaurant should be in the moderate price range.
Is there a particular cuisine you would like?
I am looking for restaurants that offer Take-out.
There are 2 restaurants in Milpitas I have found. The Olive Garden Italian Restaurant meets your criteria.
What is the other restaurant you mentioned?
The other restaurant in Milpitas is Red Chillies The Malabar Cuisine.
Where are they located?
They are located at 167 South Main Street.
I like that location. I would like to make a reservation at Red Chillies The Malabar Cuisine.
At what time would you like the reservation?
The reservation needs to be at 11 am.
The reservation is for today at Red Chillies The Malabar Cuisine at 11 am in Milpitas. The reservation is for 2 people. Is this correct?
The reservation should be for March 14th.
The reservation is in Milpitas on March 14th. Is this correct?
Please make the reservation for 18:00.
The reservation is for March 14th and 6 pm. Is this correct?
Yes, that is correct.
Your reservation has been made.
Does the restaurant have any live entertainment? Is their contact information available?
They do not have live entertainment. The restaurant's phone number is 669-213-9385.
I greatly appreciate your time.
May I assist you with anything else?
No. Thank you again.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
I'm feeling hungry, do you know of any places that average priced?
Is there any particular food you're looking for, such as Italian, American, or anything else?
I'm feeling a craving for Noodles.
What city would you like me to look in?
Look for a place in Dublin.
There are 7 restaurants that could work. There's a nice one called China Paradise Restaurant in Dublin.
Yeah, I like the sound of that.
Do you want me to reserve you a table.
Yeah, reserve me a table for one person please.
And what time would you like this reservation.
I want it on the 7th of March at 13:00.
Your reservation will be for 1 person next Thursday at 1 pm at China Paradise Restaurant in Dublin. Is that correct?
Sorry, it's actually for the 8th of March.
So China Paradise Restaurant next Friday, is that right?
Yeah, you got it. Do they have liquor over there?
I'm sorry, they don't serve alcohol. I've made the reservation for you.
Thank you, you're great. That'll be all.
Very well, take care.
I'm looking for somewhere to eat with my girlfriend, do you know of any good restaurants?
What city should I search for the best restaurants?
I want something with a moderate priced in Petaluma. It also needs to serve alcohol.
What type of food do you want to eat?
Some type of curry would be great, so Indian or Thai maybe.
I found 1 restaurant, Shree Indian Cuisine. It's a nice restaurant in Petaluma.
Yeah, that's great!
Do you want to make a reservation here?
Yes, I'd like to book a table.
What time would you like the reservation?
How about 11 in the morning?
Okay, making a reservation for 2 people Shree Indian Cuisine in Petaluma at 11 am today. Is that correct?
No, just for 1 person.
Okay, making the reservation for 1 person at Shree Indian Cuisine in Petaluma.
Yep, that's perfect. What's the restaurant's address?
Your reservation has been booked. The restaurant is located at 220 Western Avenue.
Thanks so much!
Can I help with anything else?
No thank you.
Have a great day!
I'm on a budget and I am looking for a cafe that is not very costly.
What type of food are you in the mood for? How about Italian, Indian, something else?
I am really hungry for Pizza and Pasta.
Where would you like to eat at, what city?
I have to have something in San Francisco.
I have a good option, try 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano in San Francisco.
Yes, please get me a reservation there.
when would you like to eat?
Please reserve at quarter past 5 in the evening.
Let me clarify your plans: You want a table at 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano in San Francisco at 5:15 pm. today for 2?
Yes, exactly please.
I apologize, I was unable to process this. how about trying a reservation for 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano for 2 today at 5:30 pm instead?
No, I don't want that.
What else can I help with?
Nothing, you've done quite enough.
Have a good day.
I'm hungry. Find places to eat please.
Sure thing. Which city would you like to eat in?
Let's go with Foster City please.
Sure. What kind of food are you hungry for?
Spicy Indian sound really good.
One moment. I found a great restaurant called Pastries N Chaat in Foster City.
Give me other suggestions as well
How about, Tabla Indian Restaurant in Foster City?
Can you find out if they are average priced?
sure. The price range would be inexpensive.
Perfect. That works
Should I reserve for you?
Yes, go ahead and do that.
No problem. What time would you like a reservation for?
How about this afternoon 1:45.
One moment. Please confirm a reservation for 2 people, at Tabla Indian Restaurant in Foster City. At 1:45 pm today. Does this sound right?
No it doesn't. Change to 5:45 pm on the 4th of this month please.
One moment. Just to confirm: Your reservation is for 5:45 pm for next Monday. Does this sound right?
Yes. that is perfect.
Just to confirm, your reservation is successfully booked.
Thanks, that is all i needed.
Your welcome. Have a great day.
Can you find a place to eat?
What kind of food are you looking for? An example can be Chinese, American or anything else.
Some Sichuan food would be good.
Which city should I search in?
Look in Mountain View.
I found 3 restaurants. One of them is China Wok located in Mountain View.
Is the restaurant inexpensive?`
The price range is moderate.
Can you suggest a restaurant with inexpensive pricing?
Hunan Chili is an inexpensive restaurant in Mountain View.
What is the address? Do they have live music?
The street address is 102 Castro Street. They do not have live music.
Yes, that's perfect. I want to reserve a table for 4.
What time should I reserve for?
6 in the evening.
Ok, I will reserve a table for 4 at Hunan Chili in Mountain View. The reservation is today at 6 pm.
That works for me. What is the restaurant's phone number?
Your reservation is successful. Their phone number is 650-969-8968.
Do they serve alcohol?
Yes, they serve alcohol.
Thanks. That's all I need.
You're welcome. Have a good day.
I would like to find a Chinese food restaurant.
In which city?
Search in San Mateo.
There are 5 restaurants, Gau Poang is a nice restaurant located in San Mateo.
How expensive are they?
The price range is moderate.
Can you suggest other restaurants in SF?
Alice's restaurant is located in San Francisco.
Can you suggest another restaurant?
Bamboo Restaurant is located in San Francisco.
What is the address?
The address is 1441 Polk Street.
Ok, make a reservation at 12 o"clock in the afternoon.
Please confirm you are booking a table for 2 at Bamboo Restaurant, located in San Francisco today at 12 pm.
Yes, how expensive are they?
Your reservation has been made. The price range is inexpensive.
Thank you, that's everything.
Have a nice day.
Can you find me place to eat?
What kind of food would you like to have and where would you like me to search in?
Food kind of California will be perfect in SF.
There are 10 restaurants, Al's Place is one of the good restaurant in San Francisco.
Can you look for any other restaurant?
Alta Msp is one of the good restaurant in San Francisco.
Can you find me the address?
The street address of the restaurant is 1275 Minnesota Street.
Can you find me any other restaurant?
Aq is one of the good restaurant in San Francisco.
Do they play live music and is the price range low-cost?
They do not play live music and the price range is very expensive.
Okay. That sound good to me.
Do you want my help with anything else?
Can you help me in making a reservation at the restaurant?
What time should i make the reservation for?
The timing will be half past 7 in the evening.
Please confirm the details: You want me to make a reservation at Aq in San Francisco for today at 7:30 pm for 2 people.
Yes, that sounds great to me.
Your reservation is successfully made.
That will be all. Thank you.
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day.
I am searching for a eating place with a intermediate priced
Which city you are interested and what is the type of food you are searching for like American, Mexican etc
Some Izakaya kind of food good in Foster City
I have found out 2 restaurant for you and one of them is Tokai Japanese Restaurant located in Foster city is a nice one.
Can you tell me other restaurant names?
The restaurant Tokyo Village Grill & Sushi located in Foster City is a nice one.
Are there any live music?
There is no live music.
Ok. that is perfect for me and want to reserve that restaurant on March 4th.
What is the reservation time?
Do the reservation at evening 6:30
please give the confirmation details:Booking the table at Tokyo Village Grill & Sushi at Foster City and the reservation is for 2 people at 6:30 pm on next monday
This is perfect. what is the address and contact number?
Your booking is done and their address is 1221 Chess Drive with phone number 650-341-6888
Thanks a lot. That is all i want.
have a great Day.
i am meeting my friend after a long time and i wish to eat along with him. Will you find a place to eat and i don't have a price preference.
Fine, Its sounds good. What type of food are you looking for ? whether American, Indian or anything else. Which city do you prefer?
I like Pizza and Pasta kind of food and the place should be in San Francisco.
There are 10 restaurants. One among is 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano which is a nice restaurant located in San Francisco
I need their contact number? Please provide me
Their Phone Number is 415-543-5100
Ok, that great and sound good to me.
Whether i need to reserve a table here?
Yes i wank to make a reservation at 6 in the evening.
Ok Please check and verify the following details so that i will confirm. Table has been booked at 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano in the city San Francisco and the reservation time is at 6 pm for 2 people and the date is today.
Ok, very perfect. Book it. Do they have live music?
Reservation is confirmed. They don't have live music.
Tell me their address?
Their address is 16 Mint Plaza
Thanks a lot and thanks for your help
Whether i need to find any other thing?
No, thank a lot
Take care have a great day
Can you help me locate a place to eat?
Which city should I look in and what type of food would you like? Please say Chinese, American or anything else.
Some Punjabi food would be great. Please look in Pleasanton.
I found 7 restaurants in Pleasanton. The first one is Aappakadai.
Do they have live music?
No, they do not.
That is fine. Please make a reservation.
What time would you like the reservation for?
Please make if at 12:15.
Please confirm the following details: Booking a table for 2 at Aappakadai in Pleasanton for today at 12:15 pm.
Yes, that is correct. What is their address and phone number?
Sorry, I was unable to make the reservation. The phone number is 925-750-7709 and the address is 4555 Hopyard Road. Aappakadai is a nice restaurant. Shall I try for a reservation for 2 at 12 pm today?
No thank you.
Have a good day.
I'm looking for somewhere to eat.
Where should I look? And what type of cuisine?
I'd like pizza and somewhere in Sunnyvale.
I found 3 places. Gumba's is a good place in Sunnyvale.
What's their number?
It's 408-737-8384
Do they serve alcohol? What's their address?
yes they do. they are located on 176 South Murphy Avenue.
That works. I want to reserve a table.
What time?
Make it in the evening 7:15.
Just to confirm, you want a table at Gumba's in Sunnyvale for 2 people today at 7:15 pm?
No, make it in the afternoon 12:30.
Okay, so a reservation for 2 at 12:30 pm?
No, I want it to be for next tuesday, and only for one person.
Okay, a table for 1 next tuesday?
Yes.
It was successful.
Thanks, that's everything.
Have a good day.
I'm getting a craving for Diner food, can you help me look for a place?
What's the city I should look in?
Look in San Fran.
There are 10 restaurants that fit what you're looking for. 1760 is a nice restaurant that's in San Francisco.
Okay, that sounds good.
Do you want me to make a reservation?
Yeah, please make a reservation.
What time do you want the reservation for.
I want it for the evening 4:45.
Okay, I'll you want a reservation at 1760 in San Francisco for 2 people, today at 4:45 pm, is that correct?
No, it's just for one person. And on second though, can you make it at 6 pm.
So the reservation is for 1 person at 6 pm, correct?
Yeah, that's correct. Can you tell me their address?
They're located at 1760 Polk Street. I've successfully made your reservation.
Thanks so much.
Do you need any further help?
No, thanks again.
Okay then, take care.
I'd like to find somewhere to eat. Someplace intermediate priced.
What kind of food are you interested in, and in which city should I conduct my search?
Something Southern in the San Jose area would be great.
There's a nice restaurant by the name of 71 Saint Peter in San Jose.
Do you have any other suggestions? Maybe someplace with live music that also serves alcohol.
Hukilau is another nice restaurant in San Jose that meets that criteria.
What's their number?
The number for Hukilau is 408-279-4888.
And their address?
The address for Hukilau is 230 Jackson Street.
Do you have anymore restaurant suggestions?
Another nice restaurant in San Jose is Rosie Mccann's Irish Pub & Restaurant.
Sounds great.
Would you like me to make a reservation for you there?
Yes. Make it for a quarter to 12 in the morning.
To confirm: You'd like me to make a reservation for today a 11:45 am for 2 guests at Rosie Mccann's Irish Pub & Restaurant in San Jose, correct?
Yes, that's perfect. What's their address and phone number again?
Your reservations has been made. The address is 355 Santana Row #1060, and the phone number is 408-247-1706.
Thank you so much for all of your help.
Enjoy your day.
Please search for an economical priced place to eat that serves alcohol.
What kind of food do you prefer? Which city should the search use?
I prefer it in Oakland. I am craving Pizza.
Your search found 4 restaurants. One is Belotti Ristorante E Bottega which is located in Oakland.
Do they happen to have live music? What is their phone number?
Their number is 510-350-7619. They do not happen to have live music.
Are there other restaurant options?
Contrasto is a nice restaurant and located in Oakland.
That will do.
Is there anything else you needed help with?
I want to make a restaurant reservation.
What time did you prefer?
I would like it to be half past 11 in the morning.
Please say yes to confirm the following. Booking a table at Contrasto in Oakland with a reservation at 11:30 am today. The reservation is a party of 2.
Its actually a party of 4.
Please say yes to confirm the following. The city is Oakland, and the reservation is for a party of 4.
That will do.
Your reservation has been made.
Can you tell me what their address is?
Thier address is 388 Grand Avenue.
Thank you. That is all.
Have a pleasant day.
I want a good place to eat that is fancy priced
what kind of food do you want? There is Mexican, Indian or anything else. What city do I need to search in?
I need it in SFO. French food will be perfect.
Bistro Aix is a good restaurant in San Francisco
Yes that works. I want a reservation at a nearby restaurant.
what time for the reservation?
I want it at 13:15
Confirm Bistro Aix and the city is San Francisco. Reservation os 1:15 pm and for 2 people today
Is there live music?
No live music at Bistro Aix but I shall try a reservation for 2 people today at 1:30 pm.
Yes that works
The reservation was a success
Thanks that is all
Have a good one
I would like to look for a place where I could eat.
What kind of food do you prefer to eat? Which city are you located now?
Please look in Dublin, a burger is perfect to have now.
I have found 1 restaurant that you might like, maybe you like McDonald's in Dublin?
I want a restaurant with music.
Yes, they have live music.
Alright, please make a reservation for me at this evening 7:15.
Please do confirm the following details: book seats at McDonald's in Dublin at 7:15 pm for 2 people today.
Please make it at 7 pm.
Please do confirm the following details: book seats at McDonald's in Dublin at 7 pm.
Actually its for 3 people on 14th of March.
Please do confirm the following details: book seats at McDonald's in Dublin for 3 people on March 14th.
Yes, that's right. How about the price range, is it very fancy?
The reservation has been successful. Price range is inexpensive.
Thank you, that's all for now.
Have a wonderful day!
My husband and I want to have dinner out. Are there any good places to eat around here?
What city are you interested in?
I would like to stay around Milpitas.
What kind of cuisine would you prefer?
I would really like some Latin American food.
There is a great restaurant called Baja Cactus in Milpitas.
That's great, are there any other restaurants, maybe in Santa Clara?
Santa Clara has a nice restaurant named El Amigo Burrito.
How expensive are they?
Their prices are inexpensive.
Do you have any other suggestions?
Santa Clara also has a great restaurant called La Paloma.
Great, that's the one I want.
Should I reserve a table for you?
Yes, please. I want to eat there.
What time is best for you?
How about 12:30 in the afternoon?
Please confirm your reservation. I have booked a table for 2 at La Paloma in Santa Clara at 12:30 pm today. Is that correct?
Yes, that is correct? Can you tell me their address and if they are having live music?
Great, I have booked your reservation. They will not have live music this evening, and the address is 2280 El Camino Real.
Thank you so much! That's everything.
Have a wonderful day!
Do you know of any places to eat in San Francisco?
Is there a specific food you're looking for, for example Indian, Italian, or anything else?
American food would really hit the spot.
There's a nice restaurant called 1760 in San Francisco.
Do you have any other suggestions? I would prefer something with a moderate price range.
There are 10 restaurants that match. There's a nice restaurant called Academy Bar and Kitchen that's in San Francisco.
Do you have their phone number? And do they serve liquor?
You can call them at 415-775-1800. And they do not serve alcohol.
Okay, that works. Please make me a reservation for 12:45 pm.
So you'd like a 12:45 pm reservation today at Academy Bar and Kitchen in San Francisco for 2 people, is that right?
Yeah, that's it.
I've made the reservation.
Thanks so much.
Do you need any further help with anything?
No, thanks a lot.
Okay, have a good rest of you day.
I'm looking for restaurants.
In which city?
In Oakland.
Which cuisine? Maybe Mexican or Indian?
I like Fish best.
I found 7 restaurants matching this query. One is Alamar Kitchen & Bar in Oakland.
Any other options?
There's Judoku Sushi in Oakland.
Any others? I want something afforadable.
I found 4 restaurants to match. One is Lake Chalet in Oakland.
Do they have liquor and live music?
They do have liquor and live music.
That works. I want to make a reservation.
For what time?
For two people, 10:30 in the morning.
Please confirm: Table for 2 at Lake Chalet, 10:30 am today in Oakland.
That works. What's their address and number?
Sorry, I couldn't make that reservation. Can I help with something else
Try booking again, for 1 person at 12:30.
Please confirm: Table for 1 at Lake Chalet, 12:30 pm today in Oakland.
That's perfect.
Reservation complete.
Thanks, that's all I need.
Have a nice day.
I would like to find a place to eat.
What kind of food are you wanting? And where should I search?
Find me a sushi place in Alameda.
I have found a restaurant called Angel Fish in Alameda.
That works for me. I would like to make a reservation.
What time should the reservation be?
I would like it at afternoon 1:15.
Please confirm the following: You want a table at Angel Fish in Alameda at 1:15 pm today for 2 people.
Yup, that's correct.
Your reservation has been made.
Thanks so much. That's all for today.
Have a wonderful day.
Hi I'm hungry and also need to let loose tonight. Can you find me a place to eat that serves alcohol?
Sure, what city would you like to dine in and what kind of cuisine are you looking for?
I'm in the mood for some Chinese food tonight, preferably in Millbrae.
I managed to find 1 restaurant in Millbrae, it's called Tai Wu Restaurant. I think you'd like it.
That sounds good to me.
Should I reserve a table for you?
Yes, that would be great. Please make a reservation.
What time would you like to dine at?
I'd like to be there at evening 7:30.
So you'd like a table for today at Tai Wu Restaurant for 2 people at 7:30 pm in Millbrae. Is that correct?
That sounds great.
Your reservation has been booked!
What is the address of the restaurant?
The restaurant is located at 300 El Camino Real.
Thanks for everything, that's all I needed.
Enjoy your day!
I'd like to find a place to eat in this city.
What kind of restaurants are you interested in? Which city should I search?
Look for burger restaurants in Campbell.
There's a good restaurant in Campbell called Effie's Restaurant & Bar
What is Effie's address and do they serve drinks?
They don't serve drinks but their address is 331 West Hacienda Avenue.
I'd like to make a reservation there.
What time would you like your reservation?
Make it on the 4th of this month please in the evening 6:30.
Please confirm your request: You'd like to book a table for 2 at Effie's Restaurant & Bar in Campbell at 6:30 pm for next Monday.
No I'd like a reservation on the 1st.
Please confirm the city you're booking in is Campbell and the date is for today.
No the reservation is for 3 people.
Please confirm: the reservation you want is for 6:30 pm for 3 people.
Yes, sounds good.
Great, I made the reservation.
Do they play live music and what is their phone number?
Their phone number is 408-374-3400 and they don't have live music.
Thanks, that's all.
Have a great day.
What would be a good place to eat?
What sort of food are you looking for? Mexican, American, etc? And which city should I search in?
I want some Noodles, and search in Berkeley.
Upon searching I have found 6 restaurants. There's one called Crave Asia which is pretty nice and situated in Berkeley.
Do you have their number? And do they have live music?
Unfortunately no, they do not have live music, however here is the number: 510-558-8367.
I think that works out, make a reservation at the restaurant.
What time should the reservation be for?
11:30 in the morning seems good.
Okay, please confirm the details one more time: Booking a table for 2 people at Crave Asia in Berkeley, the reservation should be for 11:30 AM and the date is today, correct?
Yeah, that's good. Do they serve liquor, and what is their address?
Your reservation is successful. Their address is 1301 San Pablo Avenue and no, they do not serve alcohol.
Okay, thank you very much.
Is there anything else you want help with?
No, I do not. Thank you.
Have a great day.
I am looking for somewhere to eat? Do you know of any good places?
What kind of food do you have a taste for? Are you looking for somewhere near by?
I was thinking in Petaluma. Preferably a Pizza place.
I've found 4 in Petaluma, Brixx Pizzeria is a nice restaurant.
Are there any others?
Cucina Paradiso is also a nice one in Petaluma.
Any other suggestions?
Risibisi is another nice restaurant in Petaluma.
Is it an inexpensive restaurant? What is the address?
Their prices are moderate. The address is 154 Petaluma Boulevard North.
That sounds like a good choice.
Would you like me to make a table reservation?
Yes. Reserve it for half past 1 in the afternoon.
Please confirm that you are booking a table at risibisi in Petaluma. Your reservation will be at 1:30 pm. Set for today for 2 people.
That works for me. Do they serve alcohol?
Your table is reserved. Yes they serve alcohol.
What number can I reach them at? Do they have live music?
The phone number is 707-766-7600. They do not have live music.
Thanks. That is all.
Have a great day.
I need a place to eat.
In which city should I search and what type of food are you interested in. Please specify if you want American, Mexican or something else.
I'm looking for brunch in San Fran.
There is a nice restaurant named 1300 On Fillmore located in San Francisco.
Is there a different restaurant you can suggest.
There is another nice restaurant named the Absinthe Brasserie & Bar in San Francisco.
Is there any other restaurant you can suggest?
Aperto is another nice restaurant in San Francisco.
Is there live music there?
No. Sorry,there is not live music.
Where are they located?
They are located at 1434 18th Street.
Yes. I would like to book a table.
What time would you like me to reserve?
I need it for 11:00.
Please confirm you want me to reserve a table for 2 people at 11 am at Aperto in San Francisco today.
Yes, perfect. Is it in the very fancy price range?
Your reservation was a success. The restaurant is in the moderate price range.
Can I have their contact phone?
The restaurant's phone number is 415-252-1036.
Thanks. That's all.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
I need to find somewhere to get a good meal in Pleasanton, can you help?
Sure, what kind of food do you want? You can request American, Mexican, or anything else.
I want Japanese food, my girlfriend is from Osaka, I'm trying to impress her.
Okay, I found 4 good Japanese places. How about Meiko Sushi in Pleasanton?
Is there anything else? I want something a bit more afforadable.
I found 2 affordable places in Pleasanton. How about P.f. Chang's?
Do they serve liquor and play live music?
They do serve liquor, but they don't play live music.
Okay, that'll be fine.
Would you like to book a table?
Yes thanks, please book it.
What time would you like to book?
7:45 in the evening please.
Okay, please confirm that you'd like to book a table for 2 at P.F. Chang's in Pleasanton for 7:45 pm today.
Yes, that's perfect.
Sorry, I couldn't book the table. How about booking the table at P.F. Chang's for 2, today at 7:30 pm instead?
Yeah, that's okay.
Okay, it's booked for you.
Thanks. Where are they? How can I call them?
They're at 1330 Stoneridge Mall Road and you can call them on 925-224-9916.
Okay, thanks. That's all for today.
Okay, see you.
Do you know a place to eat?
Which city are you looking?
Do you know a place to eat in Petaluma?
What kind of food?
I am looking for an Italian restaurant.
In Petaluma there are 4 restaurants. Brixx Pizzeria is a nice one.
What's the number of the restaurant? Is there live music?
They do have live music. The number is 707-664-1418.
I would like to make a reservation for six at a restaurant.
What time do you want the reservation?
At 5 pm.
You want to make a reservation at 5 pm today for 6 people at Brixx Pizzeria in Petaluma?
Yes that's right. What's the address?
Done. The address is 16 Kentucky Street.
That's all. Thanks.
Good day.
Hello! I am looking for a place to eat.
Which city would you like to eat at?
I would prefer to eat at Pleasanton.
Do you have any food preferences, such as American, Indian or some other cuisine?
I would like something on the lines of Izakaya food.
There is a nice restaurant called Meiko Sushi located in Pleasanton.
Sure, that sounds great!
Would you like me to make a reservation there?
Sure! Please reserve a table for me at 12:30 pm.
Please confirm your reservation for 2 at Meiko Sushi in Pleasanton at 12:30 pm today.
Yes, that's fine for me.
Sorry, I was not able to make the reservation due to certain issues. Can I further assist you?
How about placing a reservation at 19:15 instead?
Sure! Please confirm your reservation for 2 at Meiko Sushi in Pleasanton at 7:15 pm today.
That is fine for me. What is their address and do they serve liquor?
My apologies, I was not able to make the reservation. Alternatively, would you like a for 2 at Meiko Sushi in Pleasanton at 7:30 pm today instead? They are located at 4301 Valley Avenue B.
Sure, that sounds great!
Your reservation has been made.
Thank you, that's all the help I need.
No problem! Have a great day ahead!
I'm looking for restaurants to dine in.
What city and what kind of cuisine are you interested in?
I'd like to try Punjabi food, somewhere in SFO.
I've found 10 possible options - Amber in San Francisco has 4.2 stars.
Does that restaurant serve alcohol?
Amber restaurant does not serve liquor.
Alright, that works for me.
Would you like to reserve a table in this restaurant?
I think so, yes.
What time would you like to arrive at?
I'd like to reserve the table for lunch, so 11 o"clock in the morning, for 2 people.
To review: You'd like to make an 11 am reservation at Amber restaurant in San Francisco for 2 people, today.
That sounds right, yeah.
Your table has been reserved.
That's all I need today, thanks.
Have a great day.
I have a friend visiting from out of town and need to find somewhere good for us to eat. Can you look up restaurants in San Jose?
Sure, what kind of food are you interested in?
Some kind of Freshwater fish would be great.
I found 10 possible options in San Jose. How about Ariake?
How expensive is it?
Looks like it's in the moderate range.
Ok, that sounds good.
Did you want to go ahead and make a reservation?
Yes, please do.
What time would you like it at?
Can you make it on the 10th of this month at a quarter to 7 in the evening?
Sure. Just to confirm, you'd like to make a reservation for 2 people at Ariake in San Jose on March 10th at 6:45 pm. Is that right?
Yes, that's perfect.
Sorry, the reservation won't go through for some reason. Is there anywhere else you'd want to go?
Can you try making the reservation for 1 in the afternoon?
Sure. Just to confirm, you'd like to make a reservation for 2 people at Ariake in San Jose on March 10th at 1 pm. Is that right?
No, actually, change that to Tuesday next week.
Ok, just to confirm, I'm making the reservation at Ariake for next Tuesday.
Yes, that's perfect.
Ok, I've made your reservation.
Great, thank you!
Anything else I can help with?
No, thank you.
Have a good day.
I think dining out will be a wonderful thing. Look for a suitable place please.
Do you prefer any city and what should be the menu?
It will be fine at San Francisco and pizza and pasta will cherish me.
Then 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano in San Francisco will be the right one.
Great, make a reservation for me.
When you would like to dine at?
5:30 in the evening.
Please confirm, Today at 5:30 pm in San Francisco, table 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano for 2 people.
Please make it on March 3rd for 3 people.
It is ok, now verify for 3 people on day after tomorrow.
will you make it at 11:30 am on 7th of March?
The details of reservation are, time 11:30 am on next Thursday.
Ok, its fine. thank you.
Reservation is successful, good luck.
Grateful, thank you.
Have a wonderful day.
I am meeting a friend for food later. Can you find me a pricey place nearby?
Are you looking for Mexican, American, or some other type of food?
A place with pasta will be perfect?
What city are you meeting in?
We are meeting in San Francisco.
There is a nice restaurant in San Francisco called Ala Romana.
Are there any other nice restaurants in the area?
Che Fico is another nice restaurant in San Francisco.
Do they serve liquor?
They do not serve liquor.
Can you suggest any Mexican food restaurants?
There are 3 Mexican restaurants in the area. Cala is a nice one in San Francisco.
Do they serve liquor?
Yes, they serve liquor.
I want to make a reservation for Cala.
What time would you like to make the reservation for?
Make it for one in the afternoon on March 7th.
To confirm, the reservation is at Cala in San Francisco at 1 pm next Thursday for 2 people.
Please change it to a quarter past 12 in the afternoon.
To confirm, the reservation is at 12:15 pm for 2 people.
Yes, that is good. Do they have live music?
They do not have live music. I was unable to make the reservation at Cala, shall I try to reserve next Thursday at 12 pm for 2?
Yes that works.
Your reservation was successful.
Thank you very much.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that is all.
Have a good day.
I want to go out to eat in Milpitas.
Alright, what type of food would you like?
I'm looking for take-out.
I found 2 possibilities. There is an Olive Garden Italian restaurant in Milpitas.
Alright, what is their number? Do they have live music?
The number is 408-935-8176. No, they do not have live music.
Alright, that works.
Would you like to go ahead and reserve a table?
Yes, make a reservation for three people.
What time would you like the reservation?
At 1 pm, please.
Please confirm the following: You want a table for 3 at Olive Garden Italian Restaurant in Milpitas today at 1 pm?
Yes that's right.
Sorry, I was unable to confirm your reservation. Can I assist you with anything else?
Can you try booking again for 4 people?
Please confirm the following details: You want a table for 4 at Olive Garden Italian Restaurant in Milpitas today at 1 pm?
No, actually make it half past 6 in the evening.
Alright, please confirm the following, you want a table at Olive Garden Italian Restaurant at 6:30 pm.
Yes that works. Can I have the address? Also how expensive are they?
Your reservation is complete. The address is 1350 Great Mall Drive. The price range is moderate.
Thanks, that's all I needed.
Enjoy your evening!
I would like to eat at outside, can you find some nice place?
Do you like any particular kind of food like Italian, Chinese or any other?
Yes, some salad type food with low-cost will be perfect. Also I need live music there.
Any preferred City , do I search for?
If I got any place in San Jose then it will be nice for me.
found 1 result, a restaurant in San Jose and its name is Mcdonald's.
What is the address of that restaurant?
It is 777 story Road.
Do they have any liquor supply?
No, they do not.
That's okay, can you make me a reservation at this restaurant for day after tomorrow.
at what time?
11:30 in the morning will be perfect.
Please confirm to book a table for 2 persons at Mcdonald's in San Jose at 11:30 am on day after tomorrow.
Make it for one person.
Please confirm to book the table for 1 person in San Jose.
Sorry, please change it to 3 persons and the date will be 2nd of March.
Please confirm to book the table for 3 persons on tomorrow.
Yes, that is correct. continue.
Your booking was confirmed.
Thanks, that's all I want.
Have a great day.
I am trying to find fancy place to eat. I'm willing to pay more for a nice meal.
What type of food would you like to eat? Which city will you be dining in?
I'm looking to have Korean Barbeque. I'm looking in Santa Clara.
There is 1 restaurant that matches that. There's a nice restaurant called Restaurant Chungdam in Santa Clara.
Do they have alcohol?
Yes, they do serve alcohol.
That sounds great.
Excellent. Would you like me to reserve a table for you?
Yes. I would like to make a reservation for 20:00.
Great. Please verify that the following is correct: one table to Restaurant Chungdam in Santa Clara at 8 pm today for 2 people.
That's correct. Will there be live music? Also, where is the restaurant?
I couldn't make that reservation for then, I apologize for the inconvenience. Is there anything else I can help you with?
Yes, I'd like to make the reservation at 7 in the evening.
Great. Please verify that the following is correct: one table to Restaurant Chungdam in Santa Clara at 7 pm today for 2 people.
That sounds good.
I've made that reservation successfully.
Thank you!
Anything else I can do for you?
Nope. That's all.
Enjoy the rest of your day!
I want to find somewhere to eat. It needs to serve alcohol and it doesn't matter if it's pricey.
What type of food do you want? How about Mexican or Italian? What city should I search in?
Look in SFO. I'm feeling Japanese food.
I've found 4 potential restaurants for you. How about Izakaya Sushi Ran in San Francisco?
What's the address and number?
The address is 2223 Market Street. The number is 415-655-3738.
That sounds good.
Should I reserve a table for you?
Yes. Make it for evening 5:45.
Okay, please confirm: Table for 2 at Izakaya Sushi Ran in San Francisco today at 5:45 pm.
No, it's for 1 person. Let's do it on the 8th.
Okay, please confirm: reservation for 1 next Friday.
No. Make it for 3 people at 11:15.
Please confirm: reservation for 3 people at 11:15 am.
Yes, that's right. Do they have live music?
The reservation has been made. They do not have live music.
Thanks. That's it for now.
Have a great day.
Where can I go to eat that also serves alcohol?
Are you looking for American or Chinese food, or something else?
I want to go somewhere where I can get a reasonably priced burger.
What city would you like to eat in?
I'd like to eat somewhere in Berkeley.
The B&b Kitchen & Wine Bar is a great restaurant in Berkeley and a local favorite.
Okay, please make a reservation.
When would you like the reservation for?
Half past 1 in the afternoon will be fine.
I have booked a table for 2 at B&b Kitchen & Wine Bar for today at 1:30 pm in Berkeley. Is this correct?
That sounds great. Is there live music and where are they located.
There were no reservations available. Do you need anything else?
Make a seven pm reservation at a restaurant.
I have booked a table for 2 at B&b Kitchen & Wine Bar for today at 7 pm in Berkeley. Is this correct?
Yes, thanks.
The reservations has been made.
Ok, thank you.
Hope you have a great day.
Could you suggest a place to eat?
Do you want American, Indian or what type of food?
I think I'm craving Mexican food.
Where should I search for?
I want to eat in San Mateo.
There's a nice restaurant in San Mateo called Celia's.
That sounds great.
Do you want to make a reservation?
Yes, I want to make one.
At what time do you want it?
11:30 am is fine.
Please confirm: Making a reservation for 2 people at Celia's in San Mateo for today at 11:30 am.
Correct. What is the phone number of the place and does it have live music?
The reservation was made. The phone number is 650-349-0165 and the do not have live music.
Thank you. That's all.
Good day.
I am looking for a place with good breakfast.
Which city?
SFO
I found 10 restaurants. One of them is Baker Street Bistro in San Francisco.
Is there anything else?
Blue Mermaid in San Francisco.
Sounds great.
Do you want to make a reservation?
Yes. At evening 5:30, please.
Please confirm Blue Mermaid in San Francisco at 5:30 pm for 2 people today.
Sounds good.
I've made your reservation.
Where are they located? Do they serve alcohol?
They are located at 471 Jefferson Street. They do serve alcohol.
Thanks, that's all for now.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you recommend me somewhere to eat?
What city do you want me to look in?
It should be in SFO.
Okay, what type of cuisine do you want?
I'd like to get some Middle eastern food in Oakland.
There's a good restaurant in Oakland called Dyafa.
How about something else? I'm looking for a meal on a budget.
I found 1 that might work for you. It is called Marhaba Indian & Pakistani Halal Cuisine and it is in Oakland.
What is the address?
It is located at 1437 Franklin Street.
Okay, that sounds good.
Should I reserve you a table there?
Yeah, make a reservation please.
What time should I make the reservation for?
I'd like it to be at 13:30.
Okay, so you would like to reserve at table at Marhaba Indian & Pakistani Halal Cuisine in Oakland, for 2 people today at 1:30 pm. Is that correct?
No, it is just for 1 person.
Okay, so you'd like to make a reservation for 1 person today?
Yes, that sounds good.
Okay, your reservation was completed successfully.
Okay great, thanks.
Is there anything else you need?
No, that's all thanks.
Okay, have a nice day.
I would like to eat out side this time, can you search for a nice place?
Yes, of course, which City do you like to eat? any preference?
Ya, I like to eat at some nice place in Calistoga.
Is there any preferred food specially liked by you?
I like Taiwanese food so much, can you find something?
I got details about 1, Soo Yuan Restaurant is the best one which is located in Calistoga as per your wish.
Is there any liquor supply? and let me know the address.
Yes they supply alcohol and the address is 1354 California 29.
That's fine, please make reservation for 4 including me.
at what time?
1:30 in the afternoon will be fine.
Please confirm: Booking for a table for 4 persons at Soo Yuan Restaurant in Calistoga at 1:30 pm today.
Yes, that will be fine.
Your booking was confirmed.
Thanks for your help, that's enough to me.
Have a great day.
I have a date later and I am looking for a good place to eat.
What type of cuisine are you in the mood for? Which city will you be going to eat?
I will be in Berkeley and am in the mood for some Breakfast type of food.
I found 1 match called the Venus Restaurant in Berkeley.
Can you give me their address?
You can find them at 2327 Shattuck Avenue.
That works out great.
Would you like to go ahead and make a reservation?
Yes please. Go ahead and place the reservation.
What time did you have in mind?
It is for 1 person at 12:15 in the afternoon.
You would like to book a table for 1 at 12:15 pm today at the Venus Restaurant in Berkeley. Is that correct?
Actually I changed my mind, make it at evening 6:45.
You would like a reservation for 1 at 6:45 pm, is that correct?
Yes that is what I want. Can I have a contact number?
I apologize but I was unable to confirm the reservation. You can reach them at 510-540-5950. Should I try a reservation for 1 person today at 7 pm at the Venus Restaurant?
Yes please.
Your table was successfully booked.
I'm a little concerned about price. Would you say that the price range is not very costly.?
I would say they have moderate pricing.
Thank you so much for your time.
Is there anything else I can do for you today?
No, that is all. Thank you again.
It was my pleasure. Have a great day.
Can you recommend a restaurant where I can go for a meal.
Would you like me to search by any particular type of cuisine and city?
I would like a reasonably priced restaurant that serves Sushi in San Rafael.
There is a great restaurant called Sushi To Dai For in San Rafael.
Can you tell me their exact location.
They are located on 816 4th Street.
Can you tell me the phone number for the restaurant? And I would like to know if they have live music as well.
I am sorry, but they do not have live music. However, the phone number for the restaurant is 415-721-0392.
I would like the name of another restaurant, one that serves Sichuan food, please.
There is a great restaurant that serves Sichuan cuisine in San Rafael called Yet Wah Restaurant.
Sure, that sounds good. I would like to go ahead and make a reservation for that restaurant.
What time would you like me to make the reservation for?
I would like to reserve for 7 in the evening for Monday next week.
Excellent. Can you make a reservation at Yet Wah Restaurant in San Rafael for 7 pm next Monday for 2 people?
Sure, that's perfect.
Your reservation has been confirmed.
Great. Thanks
Would you like help with anything more?
No, all set. Thanks.
I hope you enjoy the rest of your day.
Please book me a restaurant in Cotati.
What kind of food would you like to eat? Perhaps Chinese, American, or another?
I would like to eat tacos, if available.
There is a restaurant called Mi Pueblo in Cotati that has good tacos.
Can you find me another restaurant in Cotati with live music?
There's 1 restaurant in Cotati that fits your criteria. It is called Mi Ranchito.
Please tell me the address of the restaurant and their general prices.
Their address is 7600 Commerce Boulevard and their prices are moderate.
That seems like a good fit.
Please indicate whether or not you wish to reserve a table.
I would like to reserve a table for two people tonight.
What time would you like to make the reservation for?
I would like to reserve a table at half past 6 in the evening.
Please verify the following details. You would like to reserve a table for 2 today at 6:30 pm at Mi Ranchito in Cotati.
Yes, I confirm those details.
The reservation has been successfully made.
Can you tell me if they serve alcohol, and their phone number?
Their phone number is 707-795-7600 and they do not serve alcohol.
Thank you for your assistance.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
I am looking for a place to eat. I don't have a price preference.
What city should I search in?
Show me places to eat in San Francisco. I am looking for something afforadable priced.
What kind of food would you like to eat.
Some Pizza and Pasta would be perfect.
I found 10 restaurants that serve pizza and pasta. 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano is a nice restaurant located in San Francisco.
Yes, that works for me.
Would you like to reserve a table?
Yes, I would like to make a reservation. Make a reservation for Sunday this week for 4 people.
What time is the reservation for?
Mate it at 17:30.
Please confirm the following details: You are booking a table at 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano, the city is San Francisco, the reservation is at 5:30 pm, the date is the day after tomorrow, and the reservation is for 4 people.
No, I want it on Thursday next week.
Please confirm these updated details: The date is next Thursday, and the reservation is for 4 people.
No make it at 19:30 and make the reservation for five poeple.
Please confirm the updated details: the reservation is at 7:30 pm and it is for 5 people.
Yes that works for me. Do they have live music.
Your reservation is successful. They do not have live music.
Do they serve liquor? What is the address of the restaurant.
They serve alcohol. Their address is 16 Mint Plaza.
Thank you very much!
Can I help you with anything else?
No. Thank you very much.
Have a good day.
Can you find me a place to eat please?
Where at? And what kind of cuisine are you craving?
Somewhere in SF, and I am really craving Thai food at the moment!
I found a bunch of restaurants, there's actually 10 that you might like in San Francisco, one of them being Baan Thai House & Wine Bar
How can I reach them? And what's their address?
You can reach them by phone at 415-379-4505 and visit them at 534 Irving Street
Great, that restaurant sounds good
Want me to book a table?
Yes book me a table
What time do you want the reservation?
Let's do dinner at 6 in the evening
Confirming your 6 pm booking today for 2 people at Baan Thai House & Wine Bar in San Francisco.
Actually let's just do it for one person
Confirming your 6 pm reservation for 1 then?
Yes that's right
I was able to book it
Thanks so much
Can I do anything else for you?
No that's it for now, thanks
You're welcome, enjoy your dinner
Give me a place to eat at.
Which city should I search? Is there a specific food type you would like to eat, such as American or Italian?
San Bruno, I am looking for low priced, Taiwanese food.
China Garden fits your preferences in San Bruno.
Whats the address?
586 San Mateo Avenue
Do they serve liquor?
They do not serve alcohol.
Could you suggest another similar restaurant that serves alcohol?
Dumpling Era in San Bruno serves alcohol.
Could you suggest another restaurant without the price limitation?
I found 1 restaurant: Ming's in San Bruno.
That works. I'd like to make a reservation at half past 12 in the afternoon for 6 people.
Please confirm: I am booking a table at Ming's, in San Bruno. The reservation is for 6 people, today at 12:30 pm.
Correct. What is their address?
Sorry, I was unable to make a reservation. Can I do anything else?
Make the reservation at eleven am.
Please confirm: I am booking a table at Ming's in San Bruno, the reservation is at 11 am today for 6 people.
Make the reservation for four people.
Confirm: The reservation is at 11 am for 4 people.
Yes! Do they have live music and serve liquor?
Your reservation is successful. They do not serve alcohol or have live music.
Thank you very much.
Can I help you with anything else?
No, thank you.
Have a good day
I am looking for a Greek place to eat please.
Which city should I search in?
Please locate one in San Carlos.
I found 2 Greek restaurants. Agora is a nice one located in San Carlos.
Can you suggest any other restaurants? One that serves Spicy Noodles would be perfect.
I located 2 restaurants. Asya Restaurant is nice and located on San Carlos.
Could you suggest any other ones? I'd like one that serves alcohol.
I found 1, Thai Time is nice and located in San Carlos.
Yes, that sounds good. Please make a reservation.
What time would you like?
Please make if for 12:45.
Please confirm the following: Booking a table for 2 today at Thai Time in the city of San Carlos for 12:45 pm.
Yes, that is correct. Can you please provide me their phone number and address?
Your reservation is confirmed. The phone number is 650-596-8433 and the address is 1240 El Camino Real.
Thank you very much, that is all I need.
Have a good day.
Please help me find a restaurant.
Please name the city I should search.
I am looking for a restaurant in Petaluma.
What type of food do you prefer? Please say Indian, Chinese, or something similar.
Somewhere similar to Asian Fusion would be nice.
How about Flowering Tea House in Petaluma?
Yes, please make a reservation for 5:15 in the evening, next Friday.
Please confirm your reservation details: Reservation for 2 next Friday, at 5:15 PM, in Petaluma at the Flowering Tea House.
No, it's only for 1 person. Please make the time quarter past 1 in the afternoon.
Please confirm your reservation details: Reservation for 1 person at 1:15 pm.
Actually, no. Make it the 13th of this month for 3 people.
Please confirm your reservation details: March 13th for 3 people.
Yes, that's correct. Does this restaurant serve liquor?
Sorry, I was unable to process that request. Flowering Tea House does not serve alcohol. Shall I make a reservation for 3 people on March 13th at 1 pm?
No, that will not work.
May I be of assistance another way?
No, that will not be necessary.
Thank you, have a nice day.
I want to go out to eat.
Where are you located? What kind of food do you like? I can find Chinese restaurants, American restaurants, and others.
I am in Campbell. I am looking for pizza and pasta with a moderate price.
There are 5 of those restaurants locally, including A Bellagio Italian Restaurant in Campbell.
That sounds good.
Do you want to make a reservation?
Yes please!
When do you want to go?
I want the reservation for 11:30.
Please confirm you want to make a reservation at 11:30 am today for 2 people at A Bellagio Italian Restaurant in Campbell.
Yes that is perfect. What is the address and phone number?
The reservation is confirmed successfully. The phone is 408-370-7705 and they are located at 33 South Central Avenue.
Thanks for your help.
May I further assist you?
No, that will be all.
See you soon!
I would like to find a restaurant please.
Which city would you like to eat in and what kind of food would youn like to eat?
I would like a restaurant that serves alcohol in San Francisco. I'd like to eat in a Burgers restaurant please.
There were 8 matches to your inquiry. 5a5 Steak Lounge is a nice place that's in San Francisco.
Can you please make another suggestion?
Alexander's Steakhouse is also a nice place in San Francisco.
I'd like another suggestion please.
There's another restaurant in San Francisco that's called Bourbon Steak Restaurant.
Yes, I'm interested in that one.
You like me to make a reservation for you?
Yes, please. I would like a 13:30 reservation.
Can you confirm the reservation details please? I am booking a table at Bourbon Steak Restaurant in San Francisco. The reservation is for 1:30 pm for today and is for 2 people.
Yes that sounds wonderful.
I was able to book the reservation successfully.
I appreciate it very much. That's all I need right now.
Be sure to have a great day!
I want to get something to eat, something that's pricey, help me look for a place.
What city would you like me to search in?
Search in Pleasanton.
What type of cuisine are you looking for, for example American, Indian, or anything else?
I'm looking for Barbecue, that would hit the spot.
There are 2 restaurants I've found. There's a nice restaurant called Baci Bistro And Bar in Pleasanton that might interest you.
What's their phone number? And is there live music there?
You can call them at 925-600-0600. And I'm sorry, but there's no live music there.
Okay, that's fine. Make me a reservation for the restaurant.
What time would you like the reservation for?
I want it to be at 13:45.
Okay, I'll make you a reservation for 2 at Baci Bistro And Bar in Pleasanton at 1:45 pm today, is that correct?
Yeah, that's correct. Also, what's their address, and do they serve liquor there?
They're located at 500 Main Street, and they don't serve alcohol, sorry. I'm sorry but that time is all booked. Would you like a reservation for 2 at Baci Bistro And Bar for 1:30 pm today instead?
Yeah, that's fine.
Okay, I made you the reservation.
Thanks a lot, that's all the help I need.
Okay, have a good rest of your day.
I'm hungry, do you have any recommendations on where to eat?
Where are you looking for to eat? What type of food do you want? Do you want American, Indian, or some other cuisine?
I'm craving some Sushi in San Francisco if possible.
There a good restaurant in San Francisco that sells sushi it is called 2g Japanese Brasserie.
Do you know the price range of the restaurant?
Their prices are moderate.
That sounds great. I want to make a reservation.
For when do you want to make it?
Make a reservation for one person at afternoon 12.
Please confirm: Making a reservation for 1 person today at 12 pm at 2g Japanese Brasserie in San Francisco.
No, I'm sorry. It's for three people.
Please confirm: Making a reservation for 3 people today at 12 pm at 2g Japanese Brasserie in San Francisco.
In second though I want it to be at 12:30 in the afternoon.
Making a reservation for 3 people today at 12:30 pm at 2g Japanese Brasserie in San Francisco.
That is correct. What is the address of the restaurant?
The reservation has been done. The address is 601 Van Ness Avenue.
Do you know the phone number?
Their number is 415-292-9997.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else you need?
No, that would be all.
Have a good day.
Is there a place to eat?
Which city?
Antioch would be great.
What kinds of foods besides American and Mexican or you interested in?
I would love to eat some lobster.
There's a place in Antioch call Okawa Japanese Restaurant.
That's great and it'll work for me.
Do you want to reserve a table?
I would love to make an appointment for one myself at 4:30 pm.
Just to be correct, you're booking a table at Okawa Japanese Restaurant today in Antioch and it will be for 1 your self at 4:30 pm.
That will be great. Also, I just wanted to now pricey is it.
Unfortunately there are no tables available. Can I help you with anything else?
Instead of the previous time, can you make it at 18:00?
Just to be correct, you're booking a table at Okawa Japanese Restaurant in Antioch at 6 pm. That will be today and that will be for 1.
That works and fits my schedule.
Your reservation is all set.
Thanks. That will do it for me.
Have a great day.
What's a good place to grab a bite?
What type of food. Italian? Indian?
I'm in the mood for a burger.
Where should I look?
Find a place in Vallejo with live music.
How about Mcdonald's in Vallejo?
Yes. Please book a table.
For what time?
1 in the afternoon.
Mcdonald's in Vallejo for 2 at 1 pm today. Correct?
Yes, that is correct.
Done. I booked you a table.
Thanks. I'm done for now.
You are welcome.
I'm searching for a place to dine at.
What metropolis should I look in, and what types of food do you want?
I'd like for a moderate costing meal in Mountain View, preferably French.
La Fontaine is a lovely diner situated in Mountain View.
Can you give me their phone number?
The restaurant's number is 650-968-2300.
What is the restaurant's location?
The restaurant's location is 186 Castro Street.
Is there any other restaurant you recommend, preferably in SF?
I discovered 10 restaurants. There is a wonderful diner called Amelie San Francisco located in San Francisco.
Yeah, that's the one for me. I'd like to book a spot at that restaurant.
When would you like the booking for?
Put it for morning 10:30.
Please verify the following information: Reserve a table for 2 people at Amelie San Francisco for 10:30 am today in San Francisco.
Yeah, that's what I want. Can you give me their phone number?
I apologize, but I could not book the restaurant. Could I assist you with something else?
I'd like to try making a reservation once more. Put it for eleven in the morning.
Please verify the following information: reserving a table for 2 people at Amelie San Francisco at 11 am today in San Francisco.
Yeah, that's perfect for me. Do they possess live music?
Your booking was successful. They do not possess live music.
Thank you for your assistance.
Could I assist you with something else?
No. Thank you for your assistance.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
I'm looking for a place to eat.
I can help you. In what city?
I am in San Francisco.
What kind of food would you like to eat?
Something Russian would be great.
I have 1 restaurant you may like. Red Tavern is a nice place located in San Francisco.
Do they have live music?
They do not, sorry.
Do they serve alcohol? What's the address?
The street address is 2229 Clement Street. They do not serve alcohol.
That sounds good. I'd like that one.
Would you like to reserve a table now?
Yes, please. I want to make a reservation for next Thursday.
What time would you like to eat?
Please reserve me at 6:15 in the evening.
Please confirm these details: I'm reserving a table for 2 people at Red Tavern in San Francisco, for next Thursday at 6:15 pm.
Yes, that's perfect.
Your reservation has been made.
What is their contact number? Also, how expensive is their menu?
Their phone number is 415-750-9090. Their price range is moderate.
Thanks very much.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, that's it. Thanks.
Have a good day!
what can I have for breakfast
There is American, Chinese, or anything else what do you want to eat?
Anyone that is burger like in nature
which city should I search from
San francisco is okay
There is a nice returant called 1760 in San francisco
Yes that is okay with me, I need a reservation at 1760
when do u want it booked?
evening 4:45 is perfect
booking table at 1760, city San francisco, time 4:45 pm, date today, reservation for 2 people. Confirm the details above
That is okay with me
the reservation is booked
Thanks, thats all I want
Have a great day
I would like to find a place to eat in Santa Rosa.
What kind of food would you like?
Please find me a ramen restaurant.
I have found 4 options. Hikuni is a great choice in Santa Rosa.
Do they play live music? And what's their phone number?
Their number is 707-539-9188. And unfortunately, they don't have live music.
Could you suggest a not very costly option?
Osake is a great choice in Santa Rosa.
That would work great.
Would you like a table?
Yes, please make a reservation for me.
What time would you like me to schedule it at?
Please make it at 10:45 in the morning on the 4th of this month.
Please confirm the following: You want a table for 2 people at Osake in Santa Rosa at 10:45 am next Monday.
Yes, that would be great. What's their address? And do they have live music?
Unfortunately, the reservation failed. Their address is 2446 Patio Court and they don't have live music. Osake is a great choice. Shall I attempt to make a reservation for 2 next Monday at 11 am?
Yes, that would be great.
Your reservation has been made.
Thanks so much! That's all for now.
Have a great day!
I am looking for a restaurant.
What kind of food do you want? What city are you in?
I am looking for asian food in SFO.
I found 10 restaurants in San Francisco including 8 Immortals Restaurant.
What other restaurants are there? I want to buy a drink.
There is a nice restaurant in San Francisco called Butterfly Restaurant.
Do they have live music? Where are they located?
They do not have live music. They are at 33 The Embarcadero.
What other restaurants are there?
There is a nice restaurant in San Francisco called Chaat Corner.
I want to make a reservation there.
What time do you want to go?
I want the reservation at half past 7 in the evening.
Please confirm you want a reservation for 2 people at Chaat Corner in San Francisco today at 7:30 pm.
No, I actually want to go on March 14th.
Please confirm you want the reservation in San Francisco on March 14th.
Actually, we are going as a group of three.
Please confirm you want a reservation for 3 people on March 14th.
That is correct.
The reservation is successful.
Thank you!
May I further assist you?
No, that will be all.
See you soon!
I am looking for a place to grab a bite to eat.
What do you think you're hungry for?
I'm looking for Mediterranean in Redwood City.
There is only 1 restaurant I could find in Redwood City, name Rocknwraps And Kabobs.
Do they have alcoholic drinks?
This restaurant doesn't serve liquor.
Ok, I will go with that restaurant.
Would you like me to reserve a table there for you?
Yes, can you please make a reservation for 17:30?
Ok, to confirm; you would like to eat at Rocknwraps And Kabobs in Redwood City at 5:30 pm today. I should make that reservation for 2 people?
Yes, that is correct.
I have made your reservation.
Thank you for helping me.
I hope your day is good.
I am wondering if you find me a good dining to have my food.
Which category are you looking for - Thai, Chinese, Mexican, Italian, American ..? Where you wish to find a place?
I would love to have some kind of American food. Fairfield would be suitable to me.
Give me a moment ... There is a top-rated American restaurant in Fairfield and the restaurant name is Chuck E. Cheese's. Would you prefer this one?
Do they have bar? I would prefer one which serves alcohol too. Please can you find me some restaurant offering alcohol in addition to serving American food.
Yup! Here, you go!!! Red Lobster, an American casual dining restaurant is nice one located in Fairfield. Do you like to have your food here?
Might be.... If you don't mind, still do you have suggestions for any other restaurant?
Fortunately I can find one more for you. Texas Roadhouse, an American restaurant specializing in steaks is a very nice restaurant located in Fairfield.
Is it a costlier restaurant or a cheaper one? What's their prices? What's the street address of the restaurant?
Nope, they are in mid-range. Their prices are moderate. They are located in 3333 North Texas Street.
Awesome... I would like to have my food there. Please can I make a reservation for the table at the restaurant?
Why not? Sure. I can help you on that. At what time you wish to reserve the table?
Please reserve in the morning at 11:15 am.
Please confirm me that you are booking a table at Texas Roadhouse located in Fairfield for 2 people today at 11:15 am. Is that right?
Nope, please book it on 13th of this month.
Sure, I can do that. So, your booking would be at Texas Roadhouse on March 13th, right?
Yup! That's works. Do you have phone number to reach out?
Yup! You can reach them at 707-422-7623 and your reservation is successful.
Thank you so much.
Do you need any other assistance?
Nope, thanks a lot.
Have a wonderful day.
I am looking for somewhere to eat.
Which should city should I search?
I want a economical place that serves alcohol in Oakland.
What kind of food are you looking for? Italian, American, what?
Gastrobar food will be perfect.
I found 1 Umami Burger Oakland restaurant in Oakland.
Do you know if they have live music? If so, where?
They don't have live music on 2100 Franklin Street.
Ok, that works for me!
Do you want to reserve a table?
Sure! I want to make a reservation for the 11th of March.
What time do you want to make the reservation?
Make it for 6 o"clock in the evening, for two people.
A table at Umami Burger Oakland, in Oakland, at 6 pm, on March 11th, for 2 people.
Great, works for me! What is their number?
Reservation reserved, their number is 510-899-8626.
Thanks so much, that's all I needed!
Have a good day!
I would like to find a restaurant in Oakland
Do you have a specific type of cuisine in mind? Feel free to choose American, Mexican, or any other cuisine.
Fish would be great
There is a restaurant called Alamar Kitchen & Bar in Oakland that meets your preferences
Can you tell me if the prices are inexpensive?
The prices are moderate
And is alcohol available there? May I also have their phone number?
They do not provide alcohol. The phone number is 510-907-7555
Excellent, that's perfect.
Should I make a reservation for you at this restaurant?
Yes please. I would like to reserve a table.
When would you like the reservation to begin?
I would like it for 6:15 pm
So to confirm, you would like a 6:15 pm reservation for 2 today at Alamar Kitchen & Bar in Oakland.
Yes, that sounds great. Can you tell me if there is live music at the venue?
Your reservation was not successful. Would you like assistance with anything further?
I would like to attempt a reservation for evening 5:30.
To confirm, you would like a reservation for 2 for 5:30 pm today at Alamar Kitchen & Bar in Oakland
Sure, that's perfect. May I also have the exact address for the venue?
The reservation has been successfully confirmed. The restaurant is located at 100 Grand Avenue #111
Great, thanks for your help.
Is there anything additional that I can assist you with?
No, all set. Thanks again
Have a nice day.
Can you find me a restaurant?
Of course. What city? Any type of cuisine you're interested in?
Look in Santa Clara. Any Southern restaurants?
I found 4 matches. There's Bennigan's in Santa Clara.
Oh I've been meaning to try that
Would you like to book a reservation?
Yes, book it
What time?
Do they have room for two at 18:45?
Please confirm: a table for 2 at Bennigan's in Santa Clara at 6:45 pm today
No. Let's try 11:30 am on the 8th instead
Please confirm: 11:30 am next Friday?
Yes that's right. Where are they? Any chance they have live music?
Your reservation has been confirmed. Find them at 4150 Great America Parkway. Sadly, there's no live music.
Thanks.
Anything else I can do to hope.
Nope not now
Take care
I am looking for a place to eat.
Would you prefer a certain city?
I want in Burlingame.
Are you looking for Mexican, Indian or anything else?
Some Barbecue will be prefect.
Sure. I found 4 restaurants. In Burlingame 37 North is a nice.
Do they serve liquor? How pricey are they?
The price range is moderate but they don't serve alcohol.
Yes that sounds good. Make a reservation for me.
What time is the reservation for?
Make it at 1:15 pm
Please confirm. Booking a table in Burlingame 37 North restaurant today at 1:15 pm for 2 people.
Do they have live music? What is the contact number?
Sorry, I was unable to make reservation. The phone number is 650-373-2237 and they don't have live music. Shall i book a table in Burlingame 37 North restaurant today at 1:30 pm for 2 people?
No. That doesn't work for me
Can i help you with anything else?
No. Thanks a lot
Have a great day
Will you find me a place to eat?
Which city? What kind of food?
Italian food in Pleasanton.
I found De La Torre's Trattoria in Pleasanton.
Anything else?
Forno Vecchio in Pleasanton.
What's the address and contact number?
680 Main Street. 925-425-0099.
Any other suggestions? Something affordable?
Gay 90's Pizza Co. in Pleasanton.
Great.
Do you want to reserve a table?
Yes, please, on 10th of this month.
What time?
Afternoon 1:15.
Please confirm table at Gay 90's Pizza Co. for 2 in Pleasanton at 1:15 pm on March 10th.
Sounds good. What's the address?
I've made the reservation. It's located at 288 Main Street.
Thanks.
Anything else?
No, that's it. Thanks.
Have a wonderful day.
I'm looking for a place to eat
Which city are you located in, and what kind of food would you like to eat?
I'd like some Taiwanese food in SFO
There is a nice restaurant named Alice's in San Francisco
Can you suggest some more restaurants, I no preference on price.
I've found 9 restaurants in San Francisco, Bamboo restaurant is a nice one.
Does that restaurant server liquor?
yes, they serve alcohol.
May I have their contact number and address?
Sure, their phone number is 415-775-3679. They are located at 1441 Polk Street.
Can you suggest other restaurants?
Bei Fang Style is another nice restaurant in San Francisco
That one would be great!
Would you like to reserve a table?
Yes I'd like to make a reservation.
What time would you like to make a reservation for?
I'd like a reservation for three people at Half past 1 in the afternoon.
Please confirm if the following is correct: reservation at Bei Fang Style in San Francisco for 3, today at 1:30 pm.
Yeah that sounds great.
Your reservation has been successfully placed.
Thanks.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thats all thanks.
Have a wonderful day.
I'd like to find a place to eat in Oakland.
What kind of food would you like to eat?
I would love to eat some African food.
I have found 2 different options. Cafe Eritrea D'afrique is a great choice in Oakland.
Could you give another suggestion? I would love a place with live music.
I have found 1 place called Miliki Restaurant in Oakland.
Where are they located? And do they serve liquor?
They do serve alcohol, and are located at 3725 MacArthur Boulevard.
That works for me. I'd like to make a reservation on the 12th.
At what time would you like me to schedule the reservation?
Please schedule it at 11:15 in the morning.
Please confirm the following: You want a table at Miliki Restaurant in Oakland at 11:15 am for 2 people on March 12th.
That would be great.
I'm sorry, I couldn't make the reservation. Is there anything else I could help you with?
I want to try booking again, but this time on the 3rd of this month.
Please confirm the following: You want a table for 2 people at Miliki Restaurant in Oakland at 11:15 am on the day after tomorrow.
Never mind, make it for 12:30.
Please confirm the following: You want a reservation at 12:30 pm for 2 people.
Yup, that would be great. Are the prices above average?
I was able to reserve you a table. Their prices are in the moderate range.
Thanks so much. That'll be all for today.
Have a great day!
I need somewhere to have dinner, can you find me a reasonably priced place to eat?
Sure, what kind of food do you want?
I want something to-go.
Okay sure, what city are we searching in?
I'm in Walnut Creek at the moment, please search there.
Okay, I found 3 restaurants in Walnut Creek. How about Panera Bread?
Do they have live music? Where can I find them?
They're at 1140 Locust Street and they do have live music.
Okay, that sounds great.
Would you like to book a table?
Yes thanks, please do it.
What time would you like to go?
6 o"clock in the evening thanks.
Okay sure, please confirm that you want a table for 2 at Panera Bread in Walnut Creek from 6 pm today.
Yes that's perfect, thanks.
Okay, your booking is complete.
Thanks a lot homie.
No worries, is there anything else?
No, nothing at all.
Great, see you then.
I want something not very costly priced
what city do I need to look in?
I need it in San Mateo
are you looking for Indian, Italian or anything?
A Diner kind of food will be good
Central Park Bistro is a good place in San Mateo
what is the address?
The address is 181 East 4th Avenue
Yes that is good and I want a reservation at a restaurant
what time is the reservation for?
I want it at 5:45 in the evening
Book a table at Central Park Bistro in San Mateo for 5:45 pm for 2 people today.
yes that is good
Central Park Bistro works and that will be for 2 people today at 6 pm
No that is all
Have a great one
I would like to go to a restaurant.
What type of food and in which city?
I want some Indian food, preferable curry. Is there any place in Newark.
There are 4 places available. Biryani Pot in Newark has an excellent cuisine.
That would be fine. I would like you a reservation.
For what time?
I prefer 7:30 in the evening.
I would like to confirm the following: you would like to reserve a table for 2 persons for today at 7:30 pm at the Biryani Pot in Newark.
That sounds like a good plan.
I have made the reservation.
Great. You have been helpful. I do not need anything else.
Enjoy your day.
I'm looking for somewhere to eat.
Which city should I search in? What kind of food are you looking for? You can say Italian, Mexican, or anything else.
Somewhere to eat in San Bruno. Some Latin American food is what I'm looking for.
Celia's Mexican Restaurant is a nice restaurant located in San Bruno.
Any other suggestions? Specifically places that serve alcohol.
I found 1 restaurants. Chili's Grill & Bar is a nice restaurant located in San Bruno.
That's good.
Would you like to reserve a table here?
Yes I would. Next Friday for six people.
What time is the reservation for?
I want it on the 9th at 5:30 in the evening.
Please confirm the following details: Booking a table at Chili's Grill & Bar. The city is San Bruno. The reservation is at 5:30 pm. The date is March 9th. The reservation is for 6 people.
Change the time to 6:30 in the evening.
Please confirm the following details: The city is San Bruno. The reservation is at 6:30 pm.
Yes that's right. Is the restaurant low priced with live music?
Sorry, I was unable to make a reservation. Can I help you with anything else?
I want to make a reservation for 2 people.
Please confirm the following details: Booking a table at Chili's Grill & Bar. The city is San Bruno. The reservation is at 6:30 pm. The date is March 9th. The reservation is for 2 people.
Yes that's good.
Your reservation is successful.
Thank you, that's all I need.
Have a good day.
I am looking for a not very costly place to get a bite to eat and an alcoholic drink.
Would you prefer Mexican, Chinese, or something else?
Thai food would be great.
In what city would you like to dine?
I want Oriental food in Berkeley.
Mount Everest Restaurant in Berkeley is the number 1 hit.
I would like a reservation for 1.
What time should the reservation be?
I want a reservation on the 13th at 12:30.
I have one reservation at Mount Everest Restaurant in Berkeley on March 13th at 12:30 pm for 1 person. Is that correct?
Yes that is correct.
Your reservation was accepted.
Will there be live music?
Live music not an option at Mount Everest Restaurant.
What's the number and address?
The address is 2598 Telegraph Avenue and the phone number is 510-843-3951.
Thanks! I appreciate at it!
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No thanks, I'm good.
Have a nice day.
Hey, can you help me find a place to eat?
Sure, where abouts?
I want to eat in SF.
What type of food do you fancy? Chinese, Indian?
I'm feeling some Szcheuan.
Okay, I've found 10 restaurants that could be good. How does Alice's in San Francisco sound?
Sounds good. What's their number and address?
Their number is 415-282-8999. The address is 1599 Sanchez Street.
That's great, thanks.
Would you like me to make a reservation for you?
Yes, please. On the 1st of this month.
And for what time?
For around 11:45.
Sure thing, please confirm: reservation for 2 people at Alice's in San Francisco at 11:45 am today.
Yes that's good. Are they expensive? Is there live music?
I'm sorry, I was unable to make a reservation at that time. Shall I try for a reservation at Alice's for 2 people today at 12 pm? Their pricing is inexpensive and they do not have live music.
Yes, that's good.
The reservation has been made.
Thanks a lot. That's everything.
Have a great day.
I need somewhere to get a bite to eat, can you hook me up?
Sure, where are we looking? What kind of food do you like?
I want some ramen, I'm really craving it. Can you find me an afforadable place in Morgan Hill?
Hanami Sushi does ramen in Morgan Hill. Is that okay?
Nah, I'd rather somewhere else. Do you have another one?
Sushi Nara is another place that does ramen in Morgan Hill.
Yeah, that'll be good for me.
Great, do you want a table?
Yes, please book a table for two.
What time would you like to eat?
I'd like the table for afternoon 12:30 thanks.
Please confirm that you'd like to book a table for 2 at Sushi Nara in Morgan Hill from 12:30 pm today.
No actually, I want it for three people on the 12th instead.
Okay sure, please confirm that you'd like a table for 3 on March 12th.
Yeah that's perfect. Do they serve alcohol? Do they have live music?
They don't do either, unfortunately. Your table has been booked.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else?
No thanks, that's all.
Okay, see you.
i want to eat at a place in mountain view preferably one that serves alcohol.
what type of food do you want? indian, chinese ?
something cafe like, i want some reasonably priced food.
i found 2 restraunts, Bajis cafe is a restraunt located in mountain view
yes that works, place reservation next wednesday
at what time?
1 pm
Please confirm: A table at bajis cafe in mountain view at 1 pm on next wednesday for 2 people ?
no make it 19:00 on march 9th
Confirm: Reservation at 7 pm march 9th
yes that works for me. is there live music? what is their number?
Reservation succeful. Yes, live music included. Their phone number is 650-967-7477
thank you, that will be it.
no problem, have a great day.
I'm looking for a restaurant to go to. I'd prefer a place that specializes in fish.
What city should I search in?
The location is Fremont, please.
I found 4 restaurants in Fremont. Aniki's Sushi is a nice one.
What is their address and contact number?
Their phone number is 510-797-3474 and their address is 3810 Mowry Avenue.
That sounds good. I need a reservation made there for one person.
What time would you like the reservation for?
12:30 would be good, please.
Please confirm that you'd like a table for 1 today at 12:30 pm at Aniki's Sushi in Fremont.
No. Actually I need it for three people on the 14th of March.
Please confirm that you need the reservation for 3 people on March 14th.
No. Can you change it to 1 pm on the 9th?
Please confirm that you want the reservation for 1 pm on March 9th.
Yes. Can you tell me if the restaurant is costly and do they offer live music?
Their price range is moderate and they do not have live music. Your reservation has successfully been made.
Thank you very much.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, I'm all set. Thank you.
Have a good day.
I would like to find somewhere to eat, preferably Asian food.
In which city should I search?
Please search in San Mateo, price is not an issue.
I have found a restaurant in San Mateo called Izakaya Ginji.
Do they have a liquor license and also do they have any live music?
They do serve alcohol, they do not have live music
That sounds perfect for me.
Would you like me to make a reservation for you?
I would like a reservation made for 1:30 pm. for 1 person please.
Can you confirm the following details: Reservation at Izakaya Ginji in San Mateo, for 1:30 pm today for 1 person.
Yes that is correct, do you have their phone number?
I have made your reservation their phone number is 925-408-4891
Thank you.
Is their anything else I can help you with today?
No, that is all, thank you.
Have a nice day.
I would like to find a place to eat.
In which city should I search?
I want to find one in South San Francisco.
What kind of food are you looking for? You can search for Italian, Mexican or anything else.
Sushi would be perfect.
There are 3 restaurants. Amami San is a restaurant in South San Francisco.
Can you find another restaurant? I am looking for some thing with afforadable prices in San Mateo.
I have found 7 restaurants. Daiki Sushi is a restaurant located in San Mateo.
Do you have any other sugggestions?
Dash Japanese Tapas And Sushi is a restaurant located in San Mateo.
Yes, that restaurant works for me. I would like to make a reservation for 2 people.
What time would you like a reservation at?
Place a reservation for 12:15.
Please confirm: You would like to book a table for 2 at Dash Japanese Tapas And Sushi in San Mateo at 12:15 pm today.
No it is for 1 person at 10:45.
Please confirm: The reservation is for 1 person at 10:45 am.
Yes, that sounds good.
Sorry, I was unable to place a reservation at Dash Japanese Tapas And Sushi. Should I try one for 1 person today at 11 am?
No. That was all I needed.
Have a good day.
I am in SFO for business and looking for a place to eat.
Are you looking for Mexican or Italian food?
Are there any Pakistani places?
There are 4 restaurants that serve Pakistani cuisine in San Francisco. Aslam's Rasoi is a nice restaurant.
Sounds good, what is their address and do they have live music?
Their address is 1037 Valencia Street, but they do not have live music.
ok, I guess that would work for me. I'd like to make a reservation, please.
For what time?
March 14th at 17:30, please.
Ok, I am booking a table at Aslam's Rasoi in San Francisco on March 14th at 5:30 pm for 2 people. Is that correct?
Please make the reservation for three people.
Ok, I changed your reservation at Aslam's Rasoi in San Francisco to 3 people. Is that correct?
Thank you, that's perfect. Do they serve liquor?
I have successfully placed your reservation, no, they do not serve alcohol.
What is their phone number?
The phone number for Aslam's Rasoi in San Francisco is 415-695-0599.
Thank you very much for the help. That is all I need.
You are welcome, have a good day.
I need somewhere to take a friend out for dinner. I would prefer if it was To-go
What city will this be in?
I'd like it to be in San Jose
I found 4 restaurants in the San Jose area. I would recommend 4th St Pizza Co
Is there anywhere else? I will be drinking so I'd prefer a place that serves alcohol
I would recommend a nice restaurant in San Jose called Mimi's Cafe
Does the restaurant have live music?
There is no live music, sorry
That's perfect! I need to book a reservation for 5 people on the 7th of March.
What time would you like me to book the reservation for?
Book it for four people at 6 pm
Is this correct? I'm booking a table for 4 people at Mimi's Cafe in San Jose at 6 pm for next Thursday.
No, I actually want it on the 12th of this month at twelve pm.
Is this correct? The reservation is on March 12th at 12 pm.
Yes that's great
Your reservation has been booked
Thanks so much!
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No that's everything, thank you.
Have a great day.
I want to go out to eat, looking for Parisian food.
Where would you like me to look?
In San Francisco.
I found 10 possible restaurants. One is Amelie San Francisco, in San Francisco.
Yes, that would work. Can you go ahead and make a reservation?
What time would you like the reservation for?
How about quarter past 11 in the morning.
Please confirm the following: You want a table for 2 at 11:15 am today at Amelie San Francisco in San Francisco.
Yes, that's it.
Sorry, I was unable to complete your reservation. Is there anything else I can assist with?
Try booking again, but at evening 6.
Please confirm the following: You want a table for 2 at 6 pm today at Amelie San Francisco in San Francisco.
Yes, that's it. Do they serve alcohol?
Your reservation was successfully completed. Yes, they serve liquor.
Thanks for the help.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
Nope, that's all thanks.
Enjoy your day!
Hi. I'd like to find a place to eat.
Fantastic! What kind of food would you like to eat: Indian, Italian, etc.? Also, what city would you like to eat in?
I'd like the restaurant to be in Pleasanton. I'm in the mood for some Taiwanese food.
Great! Andy & Yu's is a great restaurant in Pleasanton. Does that interest you at all?
That's pretty expensive. I'm looking for a restaurant that's not very costly.
No problem. China Lounge Restaurant & Bar in Pleasanton is a great place. Does that interest you at all?
I went there once and it sucked. Is there anything else?
There is! I recommend Hunan Chef Chinese Restaurant in Pleasanton. Does that interest you at all?
Do they serve liquor?
Unfortunately, they do not serve alcohol.
What's their address?
Their address is 4285 Valley Avenue.
All right, I'm willing to try them.
Would you like me to make a reservation for you?
Yes, please.
All right. What time would you like me to make the reservation for?
12 in the afternoon.
Perfect. Can you confirm the following details, please? You have a table for 2 people at Hunan Chef Chinese Restaurant in Pleasanton at 12 pm today.
No, it's for one person on the 6th.
Okay, no problem. Can you confirm the following details, please? Your reservation is for 1 person next Wednesday.
Oh, darn. My friends want dinner with me. Can we make it three people at 5:15 pm?
Yes, that's no problem. Can you confirm the following details, please? Your reservation is for 3 people at 5:15 pm.
Yes, great! What's their phone number? Also, do they play live music?
Unfortunately, I was unable to make the reservation. Can I help you with anything else?
Wow, what a waste. No, that'll be all.
Have a good day!
Can you find me a place to eat?
Do you have any type of food in mind?
I'd love some Izakaya type food.
Which city should I search in?
I'd like something in a moderate price range. How about Gastrobar type food, in St. Helena.
St. Helena has a nice restaurant called Cook Tavern & Pizzeria.
Do you have an address for the restaurant?
Their street address is 1304 Main Street.
That would work for me.
Would you like to make a reservation there?
Yes, make the reservation.
What time would you like the resevation?
Half past 12 in the afternoon would be good.
Please confirm that you would like to book a table for 2 people at the Cook Tavern & Pizzeria, in St. Helena, at 12:30 pm today.
No, make it for 4 people, at 17:00.
Please confirm that the reservation is for 4 people at 5 pm.
No. I want the reservation on the 12th of March, for 6 people.
Please confirm the reservation is for 6 people, on March 12th.
Yes. That is what I want.
I'm sorry, I was unable to make a reservation. Can I help you with anything else?
No. Thank you.
Have a nice day.
I'll be out of town for a business conference and am looking for a place to eat while I'm there.
What city are you in? Would you like American, Italian, or some other kind of food?
I'd like to find a Burger in San Francisco.
I found about 10 restaurants in San Francisco. What about 1760?
Do they serve liquor? What's the address?
Their address is 1760 Polk Street, and they do not serve alcohol.
That works.
Would you like to make a reservation?
Yes, make it for Tuesday next week at evening 5.
Please confirm: reservation for 2 people next Tuesday at 5 pm at 1760 restaurant in San Francisco.
That works.
Your reservation has been made.
Thanks, that's all I needed.
Have a good day.
Can you find me somewhere to eat in Dublin?
Do you have a preference for the type of food?
Chinese food and not very costly, please.
Here are 7 options, one of which is China Paradise Restaurant in Dublin.
Where is it located?
At 4580 Dublin Boulevard.
Do bands play there?
No, bands don't play there.
That sounds good.
Do you want a reservation?
Yes, on the 7th for four people.
At what time?
Please reserve the table for 14:00.
I am making a reservation for 4 at China Paradise Restaurant in Dublin next Thursday at 2 pm. Is that correct?
Yes, that is perfect.
I couldn't make a reservation. Do you need anything else?
Can you make a restaurant reservation for 2 people?
I am making a reservation for 2 people at China Paradise Restaurant in Dublin next Thursday at 2 pm. Is that correct?
Yes. What is the phone number? Can I buy alcohol there?
I couldn't make a reservation. Do you need anything else?
Can you make a reservation at a restaurant for March 9th?
I am making a reservation for 2 people at China Paradise Restaurant in Dublin on March 9th at 2 pm. Is that correct?
Can you change it to afternoon 1:45?
I am making a reservation for 2 people at China Paradise Restaurant in Dublin on March 9th at 1:45 pm. Is that correct?
Yes that isperfect.
The reservation has been made.
Thank you, I'm done.
Enjoy your day.
I am planning to eat in some nice place outside, can you help me to search for one place that suits me?
Can you say which type of food that you liked most like Italian, chinese or anything else that you preferred to eat? Also let me know in which city do I search for you?
Ya, I prefer Asian food which I am always dreaming to eat and please search for me in Pleasant Hill.
China Chef Restaurant is best for Asian foods which is located in Pleasant Hill, can you confirm whether this is convenient to you?
Let me know the phone number and address of that restaurant, so that I can confirm.
Phone number is 925-288-0999 and the address is 1200 Contra Costa Boulevard # K.
Yes, that is fine, please make me a reservation on Tuesday next week.
at what time?
18:45 will be fine.
Please confirm: Booking a table for 2 persons at China Chef Restaurant located in Pleasant Hill at 6:45 pm on next Tuesday.
yes, confirmed. Please check whether they offer any live music and also get the price details.
Sorry, I can't reserve at that time, can I book at 6:30 pm on next Tuesday for the same 2 people in China Chef Restaurant. The price is inexpensive, and they do not offer live music.
No, not necessary. thanks. That's all.
Have a great day.
I'm looking for a place to eat.
What are you in the mood for: Mexican, Chinese, or something else?
Sushi sounds good right now.
Which city do you want to eat in?
Somewhere affordable, that sells alcohol in SF.
2g Japanese Brasserie is a nice sushi restaurant in San Francisco.
Can I call them? Is there live music?
There is no live music, and their phone number is 415-292-9997.
Are there any other restauarnts nearby?
Akira Japanese Restaurant is also a sushi restaurant in San Francisco.
That sounds good.
Would you like to make a reservation?
Yes I would like to make a reservation.
What time would you like the reservation?
Lets eat at five pm.
Can you confirm the details: Booking a table for 2 people, at Akira Japanese Restaurant in San Francisco, today at 5 pm.
Actually is is for six people.
Okay. Can you confirm the details: Booking a table for 6 people, at Akira Japanese Restaurant in San Francisco, today at 5 pm.
Yes that's right. What is thier address and phone number?
Your reservation has been confirmed. The restaurant is located at 1634 Bush Street and their number is 415-800-8498.
Thanks
Is there anything else I can help with?
No, thanks thats all.
Have a nice day.
I am looking for a restaurant.
What kind of food do you want? Examples include Chinese and Italian.
I am looking for affordable priced African food.
What city are you looking in?
I am in Oakland.
There is a restaurant called Cafe Eritrea D'afrique in Oakland.
That is perfect, and I want to make a reservation.
What time do you want to make the reservation?
There will be four of us eating at afternoon 12:30.
Please confirm you want to make a reservation for 4 people today at 12:30 pm at Cafe Eritrea D'afrique in Oakland.
Actually, I need the reservation on the 3rd of this month for three people.
Please confirm you want to make the reservation for 3 people on the day after tomorrow.
Actually, I want to make the reservation for the 14th of March at evening 5:30.
Please confirm you want to make the reservation at 5:30 pm on March 14th.
That is correct. Do they have alcohol?
I was unable to make the reservation. May I further assist you?
No, that will be all.
See you soon!
I'm looking for a place to eat
What kind of food would you like?
I want it in SFO. Japanese food would be great.
I found 10 restaurants. 2g Japanese Brasserie is a nice restaurant located in San Francisco.
Yes, that works. I want to make a reservation there.
What time?
Make it half past 12 in the afternoon. I want it on Saturday this week. It is for one person.
Please confirm the following details: Booking a table at 2g Japanese Brasserie. The city is San Francisco. The reservation is for 12:30 PM. The date is tomorrow. The reservation is for 1 person.
Yes that works for me. Do they have live music? How pricey is it?
Your reservation was successful. They do not have live music. Their prices are moderate.
Thank you!
Can I help with anything else?
No thank you.
Have a good day.
I would like to find a place to eat.
What kind of food would you like? Which city should I search in?
I want Izakaya food in Santa Rosa.
I found 4 restaurants. Hikuni is a good choice in Santa Rosa.
Could you suggest another?
Osake is a nice restaurant located in Santa Rosa.
Could you suggest another?
Toyo Restaurant is a nice choice in Santa Rosa.
Yes, that sounds good.
Would you like to reserve a table?
Yes, I would like to reserve a table for today.
What time?
Reserve it for 7 o"clock in the evening.
Please confirm the following: you are booking a table at Toyo Restaurant in Santa Rosa for 2 people. The reservation is at 7 pm today.
No, it is for 3 people at 1 pm.
Please confirm the following: the reservation is at 1 pm today for 3 people.
No, it is for four people on the 9th.
Please confirm the following: the reservation is for 4 people on March 9th.
Yes that works.
The reservation has been successfully made.
Thank you, that is all I needed.
Have a nice day.
I'm looking for an Oriental resturant in San Anselmo.
Auryn Thai Cuisine is the 1 oriental restaurant in San Anselmo.
Is there live music?
No there isn't live music?
Okay that works for me.
Would you like to make a reservation?
Yes I would.
What time should I make the reservation for?
Make the reservation for one in the afternoon.
Please confirm I have everything correct: A table for 2 people at Auryn Thai Cuisine in San Anselmo for 1 pm today.
No it is for five people and on the 14th of this month.
How is this: A table for 5 people at Auryn Thai Cuisine in San Anselmo for 1pm on March 14th.
Thats right. Is it affordable? Do they serve liquor?
Your reservation is confirmed. They de serve alcohol and their price is moderate.
Thanks.
Anything else I can help with today?
No thats all.
Have a nice day.
I'm literally starving to death right now. Find me a place that serves like fries and maybe a burger.
Where would you like me to search?
Danville. And hurry up.
I've found 4 restaurants nearby. Blackhawk Grille is a good restaurant that is located in Danville. Would this suite your needs?
What else is there.
Dana's is also a nice restaurant located in Danville.
Yea, gotta love Dana's. Make me a reservation for just one.
What time would you like me to make the reservation for?
Make it for quarter past 12 in the afternoon.
Please confirm the following: table for 1 at Dana's in Danville at 12:15 pm today.
Actually, I think i'll just make something at home for lunch. Make the reservation for 6:30 pm at March 9th.
Please confirm the following changes: table for 1 at 6:30 pm on March 9th.
Oops, did I say March 9th earlier? Make it March 8th.
Please confirm the following changes: table for 1 at Dana's in Danville at 6:30 pm next Friday.
Yea, that sounds great. Is Dana's expensive?
Your reservation has successfully been made. It has been noted that their price range is considered to be moderate.
I'm not even sure where they're located, I might need that info. Also do you know if they have live music?
Unfortunately, they do not have live music. Their address is 416 Sycamore Valley Road.
Great, thanks a bunch.
Would there be anything else that I could assist you with?
No, but thanks I guess.
Okay, let me know if you need anything.
I am looking for a place to eat.
What type of food do you feel like eating? Do you want Mexican food, Indian food, or something else? Also, what city would you like to eat in?
I want something in SFO. Some seafood sounds good.
I found 10 restaurants in SFO. Akiko's Sushi Bar is a restaurant in San Francisco with great ratings.
Yes, that works for me.
Would you like to reserve a table here?
Yes, I want to make a reservation.
What time is the reservation for?
I'd like a reservation for one person at 17:15.
Please confirm that this is what you'd like me to do: Book a table at Akiko's Sushi Bar in San Francisco for 1 person at 5:15 pm today.
Yes, that works for me
Your reservation is successful
Thank you very much.
Can I help you with anything else?
No. Thank you very much.
Have a good day.
Can you find me a restaurant?
What kind of food do you want? Which city should I look in?
I am looking for Indian food in Oakland.
A good restaurant in Oakland is Annapurna Restaurant & Bar.
That is good for me.
Do you want a reservation here?
Yes, I'd like a reservation for 17:30.
Please confirm these details. The booking is for one table at Annapurna Restaurant & Bar in Oakland. The reservation is for 2 people. This reservation is for today at 5:30 pm.
Please change it to half past 7 in the evening.
Please confirm that the reservation will be at 7:30 pm for 2 people.
Make it the 7th of March instead.
Please confirm these things. The booking is for Annapurna Restaurant & Bar for next Thursday.
Yes, that is good. Is alcohol served? What is their phone number?
No, no alchohol is served. Your reservation was a success. The phone number is 510-250-9696.
That is it. Thank you so much.
Enjoy your day.
I'm searching for Italian food.
Sure, which city?
Santa Rosa, please.
Basilico is a wonderful restaurant in Santa Rosa.
What's their number and is liquor available?
They do not serve alcohol and it's 707-539-0260.
Great, make a reservation for the 11th of March.
What time?
afternoon 2.
Please confirm your restaurant reservation: 2 people for Basilico in Santa Rosa at 2 pm on March 11th.
Correct.
Sorry, this reservation did not go through. Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, I need to rebook. Make it for six pm.
Confirm the details: A 6 pm reservation at Basilico in Santa Rosa for 2 people on March 11th.
No, that's not right. I need it for the 4th of this month.
Please confirm the details: A 6 pm reservation next Monday.
Perfect, that works. Where is this located and how much?
Your reservation is complete. The price range is moderate and address is 4776 Sonoma HIghway.
Perfect, thanks for your help. That's all.
Have a wonderful day.
Let's search places to eat please.
Sure, which city should I search? What kind of food are you in the mood for?
Search in Albany for take-out food please.
How about Nizza La Bella? This is located in Albany.
Find out if they have live music. Also how expensive is this restaurant?
Unfortunately they do not have live music. The price range is moderate.
Yeah, that will do just fine.
Should I reserve this for you now?
Yes go ahead and make reservations.
Sure thing. For what time should I make the reservations for?
Please make it for seven pm.
No problem. Please confirm: Reserving 1 table at Nizza La Bella in Albany. The reservation will be at 7 pm for 2 people. I reserved this for today.
No wait. This is for 1 person. Also update it to the 13th of March.
Sure I can do that. Please confirm: Reservation is for 1 person on March 13th. Does this sound right?
No, Make it for four people on the 10th please.
one moment. Please confirm: The reservation is for 4 people on March 10th. Did I get that right?
Yep. What's the phone number of the restaurant please?
Unfortunately I was not able to confirm your reservation. Could I help with anything else?
Lets try a different time to book the reservation. Try for five in the evening.
One moment. Please confirm: Reservation for 4 people on March 10th at Nizza La Bella in Albany at 5 pm. Does this sound right?
Yes, perfect. Go ahead and book it
One moment. Your reservation is successful
Thanks. that will be all.
Your welcome, can i help with anything else?
No. thats it!
Have a wonderful day
I'd like to find a place to eat.
What kind of food were you looking for and in what city should I look in?
I'd like to find a place in Sunnyvale for non meat food.
I found 1 restaurant in Sunnyvale. Merit Vegan Restaurant sounds nice.
Great. I'd like to make a reservation.
What time did you want the reservation for?
I'd like the reservation at one pm.
Please confirm you're booking a table for 2 at Merit Vegan Restaurant in Sunnyvale at 1 pm today.
It's actually for 1 person.
Please confirm you're booking a table at Merit Vegan Restaurant for 1 person.
Sure, sounds good. Do they have live music?
Sorry, your reservation could not be completed. Is there anything else I could help you with?
No, thank you.
Have a nice day.
I would like to find a place to eat
Is it indian, Italian that you are looking for
Some Freshwater fish would be good in san francisco
In San Francisco there is a nice restaurant called Akiko's sushi bar
I am looking for a pricey price place, can u recommend something else
Yes I have 9 places in San Francisco. One is Anchor & Hope
Do they have live music? What is there address
No they don't, the address is 83 Minna Street
Can i make a reservation for it
Ok what time?
Can i make it half past 5 in the evening
Can u confirm your booking for today at 5:30 pm for 2 people in San Francisco at Anchor & Hope
No can u make it at 19:00
Ok can u confirm your booking at 7 pm at Anchor & Hope
No can i get it on the 5th of this month for five people
Can u confirm the date next Tuesday for 5 people
Do they serve liquor?
Sorry they do not serve alcohol and I couldn't make a reservation till 6:30 pm for 5 people for next Tuesday at Anchor & Hope
No
Can i help u with something else
No thank u
Have a good day
I do not want to step into the kitchen today. Can you recommend somewhere nice to eat out?
Are you in the mood for Indian or Mexican? Which city would you like me to look in?
I am in San Francisco. Burmese found seems appealing to me now.
There are 5 such restaurants in San Francisco. B Star would be an excellent choice.
Where is it located? Does it cost a lot?
The cost is moderate. It is located at 127 Clement Street.
Is there anything else you might recommend?
Burma Love is also an excellent restaurant in San Francisco.
That would be fine.
Should I go ahead and book a table?
Yes, I want a reservation.
For what time?
7 pm on Thursday next week.
I would like to confirm the following information: reservation for 2 for 7 pm next Thursday at Burma Love in San Francisco.
I want a reservation for 4 persons.
I would like to confirm the following: table for 4 at Burma Love.
That's would be excellent.
I have made the reservation.
I almost forgot to ask, but where is the restaurant located?
It is on 211 Valencia Street.
I appreciate your assistance.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, you have been most helpful already.
Enjoy your day.
I'd like to go to a place to eat, I love live music, do you have any suggestions?
Where should I search?
I'd like to go to Oakland.
What kind of food would you like?
I think a breakfast & brunch place would be perfect.
I found 1 restaurant, the Eve's Waterfront is found in Oakland
Is it pricy? What's their address?
The price range is moderate, and their address is 15 embarcadero west.
That sounds great!
Should I make a reservation?
Yes I'd love one.
What time should i make it for?
Make it for 12:30 in the afternoon.
Please confirm the following: You'd like a reservation at eve's waterfront in Oakland, at 12:30 pm today for 2?
Yes, do they serve liquor?
The reservation is secured. They do serve alcohol.
Thank you very much! That's all I need.
Have a nice day
I want to find a Japanese restaurant.
What city would you like?
In San Francisco
I have 10 options for you. 2g Japanese Brasserie located in San Francisco is nice.
Yes that is awesome.
Would you like to make a reservation.
Yes please do.
What time would you like?
12:15 in the afternoon this Saturday for one person.
Making a reservation for 1 person at 2g Japanese Brasserie located in San Francisco tomorrow at 12:15 pm.
Yes do they sere Alcohol
They do server alcohol. Sorry i was unable to make the resvation for that time. Will a reservation for 1 person at 2g Japanese Brasserie located in San Francisco tomorrow at 12 pm work?
yes that works.
Your reservation is confirmed
What is their number? DO they have live music.
Their number is 415-292-9997. They do not have live music.
Thank you for your help.
Is there anything else.
No that will be all.
have a great day.
Can you tell me a four star restaurant nearby?
What style of restaurant would you like me to find? Which city should I search?
Malaysian in Burlingame would be great.
Coconut Bay Thai Restaurant in a highly rated eatery in Burlingame
What is the contact info? Will there be live music?
The number is 650-558-8268. They do not have live music unfortunately.
That'll work just fine
Would you like to make a reservation?
Yes please, make a reservation
For what time shall I reserve your table?
I'd like a table at 11 in the morning on the 9th.
Confirm these details please: Coconut Bay Thai Restaurant in Burlingame at 11 am on march 9th, 2 people.
Yep that works
Reservation successful!
What is the price range and address?
The pricing is moderate and they are located on 1107 Howard Avenue.
Thanks, that's perfect
Have a nice day and enjoy your reservation.
I would like to look for a place where I could eat in Vacaville.
Do you have any kind of food as preference? Like Mexican, American or anything else.
I think I am craving for sushi.
I have found 2 restaurants and one of it is Hisui | Japanese Restaurant that is nicely located in Vacaville.
I prefer a restaurant with a live music and by the way how's the price?
Unfortunately they do not have live music and the price is range is moderate.
Okay, I still make it a go. Please make a reservation for me at 13:30.
Please do confirm the following details; reservation in Hisui | Japanese Restaurant at Vacaville will be made at 1:30 pm for 2 persons today.
Confirming all the details are correct. But how about the contact number, do you have it? and one more question, please. Are they serving alcoholic beverages?
Reservation is successful. And for the last question, they are not serving alcoholic beverages. Their contact number is 707-448-4002.
Alright, thank you.
Do you need help with anything else?
No, thank you!
Have a wonderful day.
I'd like to find somewhere to eat.
What type of food would you like to eat?
I want some kind of Southern food in Sausalito.
A great restaurant in Sausalito is the Barrel House Tavern.
Is there liquor? What is the budget like?
The price range is expensive and they do serve alcohol.
Sounds good. Make a reservation at 13:30 at the restaurant.
Please confirm: Reservation for 2 today at 1:30 pm at the Barrel House Tavern in Sausalito.
Yes, that sounds fine.
No reservations were available. Anything else I can help with?
Please make a reservation at a restaurant for one in the afternoon.
Please confirm: A table for 2 today at 1 pm at the Barrel House Tavern in Sausalito.
Yes, that sounds good. What is the phone number?
The reservation has been made. They can be reached at 415-729-9593.
Okay, thank you.
Is there anything else I can help with?
No, that will be all.
Okay, have a great day.
I would like to find a restaurant in Oakland.
Would you like Indian food, Mexican or anything else?
I would like some Pasta.
There is 8 restaurant, One is A16 located in Oakland.
What is another restaurant?
Belotti Ristorante E Bottega is located in Oakland.
What is another restaurant?
Contrasto is located in Oakland.
Yes, reservation for two people please.
What time would work?
Make it at 11:45 in the morning.
Booking a table at Contrasto in Oakland for today at 11:45 am for 2 people.
Yes, that works thank you.
I was not able to reserve a table for 2 at Contrasto at that time, would you like to go at 12 pm today?
Yes, that time works.
Your reservation was made.
Can I have their phone number?
Yes, it's 510-918-3205.
What is their location?
Their address is 388 Grand Avenue.
Thank you very much.
Can I help with anything else?
No, thank you very much.
Have a good day.
I'm taking a friend out to dinner. Can you recommend a place to eat nearby?
What kind of restaurant would you like to eat at?
The perfect place would serve Parisian food.
Where should I find a place to eat?
I would like to eat in San Francisco.
There are 10 highly recommended restaurants near you in San Francisco, including Amelie San Francisco.
What is the price range there? Can you find their number?
Their prices are in the moderate range and their phone number is 415-292-6916
That's perfect! I would like to make a reservation.
What time would you like to eat?
We want to eat in the morning 11.
So you are saying you would like me to make a reservation for 2 people at 11 am today at Amelie San Francisco in the city of San Francisco.
Yes, thank you.
Your reservation has been made.
Do they have a bar there?
Yes, they have a bar that serves alcohol.
Where is the restaurant located? Is there live music scheduled to play?
There is no live music there. They are located at 1754 Polk Street.
Thanks!
Is there anything else I can do for you today?
No, thank you.
Enjoy your day!
I want to take my boss out to eat so I can pitch my proposal to him away from all my other co-workers.
It would be my pleasure to help you. What location should I narrow my search to and what type of cuisine do you prefer? You can say things like American, Indian, or any other type of cuisine.
I would like it close to the office in SF and I think my boss likes burgers.
There is a total of 10 restaurants that match your criteria. The closest one is 5a5 Steak lounge in San Francisco.
What is their price range and do they serve alcoholic beverages?
They are in the expensive range and they do serve alcohol.
That sounds like a nice place. Please set the reservations for that restaurant at 17:30.
Great, so you would like a table for 2, today at 5:30 pm at 5a5 Steak Lounge located in San Francisco. Is that correct?
That's right. Can you give me their phone number in case I have to cancel and do they have live music or any other kind of entertainment?
Sorry, no live music that I can see. Their phone number is 415-989-2539.
Thanks, that will be all.
Have a god day and enjoy your meal.
Please find me a restaurant at which I can eat.
What kind of restaurant would you like to eat at? I've found Chinese, American, and several others in your location. What area would you like to have dinner?
I want to have Taiwanese food in San Fran.
There are 10 restaurants in San Francisco that meet your requirements. One is Alice's restaurant, it has good reviews.
Please find other restaurants.
There is another restaurant in San Francisco called Bamboo Restaurant that has good reviews.
Please suggest other restaurants.
There is another restaurant in San Francisco called Bei Fang Style that has positive reviews.
That sounds like a good choice.
Would you like to book a table there?
Yes, I want to book a table.
Please tell me at which time you'd like the reservation.
I would like to reserve a table at 14:00.
Please verify the following details. You would like to reserve a table for 2 pm today at Bei Fang Style in San Francisco.
Yes, please reserve the table.
I apologize, but I was unable to make the reservation.
Please try reserving again at 11:45.
Please verify the following details. You would like to reserve a table at 11:45 am today for 2 diners at Bei Fang Style in San Francisco.
Yes. Please reserve the table.
I apologize, but I was unable to reserve a table. Do you require any further assistance?
No thank you.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Find me a good restaurant.
In which city are you planning to dine and what cuisine are you interested in?
If like to have a light meal in Benicia.
There's 1 restaurant. Lucca Bar & Grill in Benicia is a good place.
Do they have live music?
Yes, they do.
What's their location? Do they serve liquor?
They're located at 439 1st Street and they serve alcohol.
That's great. I'd like to reserve a table there.
At what time will you be arriving there?
My plan is to be there by 1:30 in the afternoon.
Please confirm that you need a table for 2 at the Lucca Bar & Grill in Benicia at 1:30 pm today.
Hold on. Make it 11:30 in the morning and it is for just 1 person.
Okay. So you want a table for 1 at 11:30 am. Correct?
That's absolutely right.
The reservation was not successful. Shall I try to reserve a table for 1 at Lucca Bar & Grill at 11 am today?
Yes. That works for me.
Your table has been reserved.
Thank you. That's all I need for now.
Have a great day!
I want to find a place to eat.
What city are you looking for? What kind of food? Mexican, Indian, etc.
I want to find Asian Fusion in San Francisco.
There is a nice restaurant called 8 Immortals Restaurant in San Francisco.
Is liquor served?
No, alcohol is not served.
Are there any other restaurants?
Bai Thong Thai is a restaurant in San Francisco.
What is the address and phone number?
The address is 298 Gough Street and the phone number is 415-863-9335.
Yes, sounds good.
Did you want to make a reservation?
Yes, make a reservation, please.
What time do you want to make the reservation for?
Make it for 7:30 pm.
Please confirm: A table for 2 at Bai Thong Thai in San Francisco today at 7:30 pm.
Yes, that sounds great.
Sorry, your reservation was unsuccessful. Anything else I can help with?
Try again for a reservation at 18:00.
Please confirm: A table for 2 at Bai Thong Thai in San Francisco today at 6 pm.
Yes, sounds great. Do they serve liquor at the restaurant?
They do not serve alcohol, unfortunately. Your reservation was successfully made.
Thanks so much.
Anything else I can do for you?
No. That will be all.
Have a great day.
What places are there to eat around here?
What food are you looking to purchase?
I am craving some Mediterranean food!
Okay, which city would you like me to search?
Preferably in SF.
I have found a nice restaurant named Barcha located in San Francisco, CA.
Perfect, that works for me!
Would you like me to reserve a table for you?
Yes I would like to make a reservation.
What time would you like your reservation?
11:15 would be ideal.
Just to confirm...you would like me to book a table for 2 at Barcha in San Francisco at 11:15 am for today.
Yeah that will work.
The table has been successfully reserved.
Thank you for your help, that is all that I need!
No problem, have a good day.
I'd like to find a place to eat please.
Sure, what type of cuisine would you like? Indian, Mexican, something else?
Mexican food sounds good.
Ok, which city will you be dining in?
I will be in San Mateo.
Ok, Celia's is a fine Mexican restaurant in San Mateo.
Do you know if they have live music?
No, they do not offer live music.
Ok, that will be fine.
Can I reserve you a table?
Yes, please.
What day and time will you be dining out?
On the 8th, at 11 in the morning if possible.
Sure, so that's next Friday at 11 am for 2 people at Celia's in San Mateo?
Yep, sounds good!
Ok, you're all set!
Perfect, thank you so much!
Absolutely, have a wonderful time.
I am looking to eat in SFO
Do you prefer American or Chinese food?
I want some Persian food
I found 10 persian food restaurant. I suggest Barcha in San Francisco
ok that works, please reserve a seat for two people on March 3rd
What time would you like to go
Book it 10:45 in the morning
Please confirm your booking with Barcha in San Francisco on the day after tomorrow at 10:45 am for 2 people
Thats correct. do they have liquor? what is their intermediate priced
This restaurant serve alcohol and the price range is expensive. Your reservation is confirmed
Thanks
Have a nice day
I want to find a restaurant.
What type of food would like? You can say Italian, Chinese, BBQ, o something else?
Asian Fusion sounds nice.
What city are you located?
Santa Clara
I have 7 options for you. Beijing Restaurant in Santa Clara is nice.
That sounds good. I want to reserve a table.
What time would you like for your reservation.
at 18:45 for 2 people/
Making a 6:45 pm dinner reservation for 2 people at Beijing Restaurant today in Santa Clara. Is that correct?
Yes it great.
Your reservation is successful.
Where is it located?
It is located at 1460 Halford Avenue.
Do they have live music and serve Alcoholic drinks?
Sorry they do not.
Thanks that will be all.
Have a great day!
Do you know a place where I can get some food?
Which city should I search in? What kind of food do you want to eat?
I'd like to eat some Afghan food in Oakland.
I found 1 restaurant in Oakland, Kamdesh Afghan Kabab House.
Can you give their contact number and address?
You can call Kamdesh Afghan Kabab House at 510-286-1900. They are located at 332 14th Street.
Yes, that will work for me.
Do you want to make a reservation at this restaurant?
Yes, I'd like to make a reservation.
What time do you want to place your reservation?
Reserve me a place for 5:30 in the evening.
Please confirm the following details: I will book a table for 2 at Kamdesh Afghan Kabab House in Oakland at 5:30 PM today.
Yes, that works for me. Do they play live music? Is the price range lavish?
I have placed your reservation. They have no live music and their price range is moderate.
Thank you, that will be all.
Have a good day.
I am looking for a place to eat in Oakland.
I can help you with that. What kind of food are you interested in?
I would like Jamaican if you can find any place. Also, I want somewhere that has live music.
I have 1 that you may like. Kingston 11 Cuisine is located in Oakland.
How expensive is their menu?
Their price range is moderate.
Yes, that works for me.
Would you like to reserve a table now?
Yes, please.
What time would you prefer?
Please make it at twelve pm.
Please confirm: You are reserving a table for 2 people today at 12 pm, at Kingston 11 Cuisine in Oakland.
No, sorry, change of plans. I would like the 3rd of March instead.
Please confirm this update: you are reserving a table at 12 pm on the day after tomorrow.
No, sorry, please make it March 4th instead.
OK, please confirm: You want a reservation for 2 people on next Monday.
Yes, that works for me. What is their address? Do they serve alcohol?
Sorry, I was not able to make that reservation. Can I help you with anything else?
I want to try booking again. Is there anything available at 7:30 pm?
Please confirm: you would like to reserve a table for 2 people at Kingston 11 Cuisine in Oakland. The reservation is next Monday at 7:30 pm.
Yes, please.
Sorry, there are no tables available at that time. Can I help you with anything else?
No, thanks. That's all.
Have a good day.
I'd like to find a place to eat with Szcheuan food.
Where should I search?
I would like Santa Rosa.
There are 3 restaurants I found including Gary Chu's in Santa Rosa.
Tell me the address.
The address is 611 5th Street.
That works for me and I'd like to make a reservation at the restaurant.
Tell me the time for the reservation.
Make the reservation at 5:30 pm.
Please let me know if these details are confirmed. I'd like to book a table for 2 today at Gary Chu's in Santa Rosa for 5:30 pm.
That will work. Is there live music and liquor?
The reservation is successful having live music and alcohol.
Thanks so much. That's all that is needed.
Have a great day.
I am looking for somewhere to eat in Alamo.
What kind of food do you want?
I want some American food that is moderate priced.
I have 1 restaurant. Xenia Bistro is a nice restaurant in Alamo.
Yes, that sounds good. Can you reserve it for March 8th?
What time do you need the reservation?
Make the reservation at seven pm.
Please confirm that you want a table for 2 at Xenia Bistro in Alamo for 7 pm on next Friday.
No, make it at one in the afternoon.
So please confirm that you want to book a table at Xenia Bistro at 1 pm.
No, make it for three people on the 14th of this month.
Please confirm that you want to reserve for 3 people on March 14th.
That should work.
Your reservation was a success.
Thank you. That is all the help I needed.
Have a great day.
I have a meeting and we plan to get food together. Can you help me to find a place to eat?
What type or restaurant do you like? Do you prefer classic American or something like a Mexican type? Do you want to eat here or in another city?
We will eat in Alameda, and I am looking forward to eat some tacos.
Okay, so I know 2 very good restaurants in Alameda, one of them is names Acapulco.
Perfect, so I want to make a reservation, then.
At what time do you want to eat?
We will go at five pm.
Okay perfect, so confirm me that you 2 will be at the restaurant Acapulco in Alameda today at 5 pm, please.
Yes, that's okay.
Okay, then your reservation is made.
Thank you very much.
Do you need anything else?
No, I'm good. Thanks.
Have a nice day. Bye.
Could you help me find a place to eat?
Of course. What city did you want to start looking in?
Look for something in San Francisco.
Did you have any particular kind of food in mind?
I'd definitely like something affordable. Actually, some Shabu-shabu sounds great right now.
There's a spot in San Francisco called Shabu Club. How about that?
Do they serve alcohol?
They do not I'm afraid.
Okay, then are there any other restaurants that'll work?
How about Shabu House? That's another option in San Francisco
Do they have any liquor there?
No, they don't serve it either.
Okay, let's keep looking then. Let's look at pricey restaurants now. How about a Barbecue place?
There's a good barbecue place in San Francisco called 1760.
Alright, let's go with that.
Did you want to make a reservation now?
Yes, I would. Set one for a quarter past 5 in the evening.
Alright, to be clear, you want a table reserved at 1760 in San Francisco at 5:15 pm today? Do you want to reserve it for 2 people?
Actually, no, let's make the reservation for 7 pm.
Sure. So, the reservation is at 7 pm at 1760 in San Francisco?
Yup, that'll be perfect.
Okay, your reservation has been made.
Thank you. That's all I need for now.
Enjoy the rest of your day then.
I am searching for a place to eat.
What kind of food are you looking for? For example, you can say American, Indian, or anything else. And what city should I search in?
I want to order food in San Jose, specifically Spicy Indian food which would be perfect.
There is a nice restaurant named 8elements in San Jose.
What other restaurants are available?
There is another nice restaurant in San Jose called Amber India.
I am looking for a suggestion for a restaurant with moderate pricing.
There are 4 restaurants In San Jose, one of them being a nice restaurant called Caspian Village.
The address is what?
2881 The Villages Parkway is the correct address.
What number can they be reached at?
They can be reached at 408-528-8500
That works, I would like to book a reservation.
The reservation is for what time?
I would like it on March 11th, morning 11.
The following details need to be confirmed. I am booking a table at Caspian Village in San Jose. It is for 2 people on March 11th at 11 am.
That works for me.
You reservation has been successfully placed.
That is all I needed, thank you very much.
Have a good day.
Can you help me to find an affordable place to eat out?
Any particular city?
I want to go to El Cerrito.
What kind of food do you fancy? Chinese, Mexican, anything else?
I'd like to try some Korean food.
I found 1 option- Ancient Szechuan in El Cerrito.
Can you tell me the contact number and address?
The phone number is 510-524-8772, the address is 10675 San Pablo Avenue.
That sounds good.
Shall I reserve a table?
Yes please, make it at 12:45.
So I'll book a table for 2 people at Ancient Szechuan in El Cerrito, for 12:45 pm today. Is that okay?
Yes, that sounds good.
The reservation was successful!
Thanks a lot, that's all for now.
Have a good day!
I am meeting a friend later and we plan to get food together. Can you find me a restaurant nearby?
What kind of food would you like the restaurant to serve?
Can you find me a restaurant that serves freshwater fish that's close by?
Of course. Which city should I look for this restaurant in?
I would like it to be in Half Moon Bay, please.
Great. I found a nice restaurant named Flying Fish Bar & Grill that is located in Half Moon Bay. It has very good ratings.
Does this restaurant happen to serve liquor? If so, what is their address?
They do indeed serve alcohol. Their address is 211 San Mateo Road.
Great, that works perfectly.
Would you like me to reserve a table for you here?
Yes I would like to make a reservation for 4 people at 11:00, please.
Perfect. You're almost set. If I can kindly ask you to confirm the following details: You are booking a table today at Flying Fish Bar & Grill in Half Moon Bay, for 4 people at 11 am.
Yes, works for me. Can I ask for their contact number as well?
I'm so sorry, it looks as though this restaurant has no available bookings at the time you were looking for. Can I help you with anything else?
I want to make a reservation at this restaurant for another time. Let's try five pm this time.
Fantastic, I'll need you to confirm the updated details: Booking a table at Flying Fish Bar & Grill in Half Moon Bay. The reservation is for today at 5 pm, and it is for 4 people.
Yes, sounds good. All of the details are correct.
I was able to successfully book your reservation. Thanks for your patience.
Thank you very much. That will be all for today, I appreciate it.
Have a wonderful day, and a great dining experience.
Can you help me choose a place to eat?
What are you in the mood for?
I like French cuisine best.
What town will you eat in?
I think I want San Fran.
A nice French option in San Francisco is Amelie San Francisco.
I don't like that place, they have bad reviews, is there somewhere else?
Try Aquitaine Wine Bar & Bistro. They are also in San Francisco.
How about liquor? Is it reasonably priced?
Prices there are moderate, but they don't have alcohol.
I think that'll work anyway. Can you reserve a table for me for three?
I can sure try, what time do you want to eat?
How about a nice lunch? Will 12:45 in the afternoon work?
Please let me know if I have this right? A table for 3 at Aquitaine Wine Bar & Bistro in San Francisco. Today at 12:45 pm?
That is the exact thing I want.
You have a table.
How can I reach them?
I have a phone number of 415-402-5290.
Can you tell me if there is any live music there? What is their street number?
They are on 175 Sutter Street but they don't have any music.
Ok, Thanks. That'll do. That'll do.
Enjoy your lunch.
I want to find a restaurant.
What city or town?
I want a restaurant in Mountain View, preferably something low-cost, but with good reviews.
Do you have a preference for type of food? You can say Indian, American, Italian, or something else.
I've heard there are some good Ramen places.
In Mountain View, Momoya Sushi has a good rating.
That sounds pretty good.
Should I reserve a table for you?
Yes, please, for today.
What time would you like to arrive?
It should be as close to 6 in the evening as possible.
Please confirm the following details: Reservation for 2 people at Momoya Sushi in Mountain View, for today at 6 pm.
Yes, that's exactly what I want.
The reservation has been confirmed at Momoya Sushi in Mountain View for today at 6 pm.
Could you give me their address?
The address for Momoya Sushi in Mountain View is 570 North Shoreline Boulevard J.
Great. Thanks so much.
May I assist you with anything else?
No, I think that was all.
Enjoy your dinner at Momoya Sushi.
I feel I need to eat outside in a nice place, can you help me?
Do you prefer any special kind of food like Indian, Chinese or any other food?
Yes, I prefer some Curry variety and it will be on affordable price.
Any particular City, do I need to search for?
Yes, search it in Oakland, that is convenient for me.
found 1 and it is Annapurna Restaurant & Bar located in Oakland. How about your opinion?
any Liquor supply is available there? get me the contact number.
The phone number is 510-250-9696 and sorry, they do not serve alcohol.
It's okay, make me a reservation.
at what time?
Make it at evening 6.
Please confirm to book a table at Annapurna Restaurant & Bar in Oakland City at 6 pm for 2 people on today.
Yes, that is perfect, shall I know the address?
Sorry, I could not make the reservation as you required and can I help you in any other way?
Yes, can you change the time to 7 o"clock in the evening?
please confirm to book a table at Annapurna Restaurant & Bar in Oakland City at 7 pm for 2 people on today
Yes, that's fine, Are they offering any live music there?
No, they don't offer it and your reservation is confirmed.
Thanks, that's all
Have a great day.
I'm hungry! Can you find me a restaurant?
Sure? Please tell me which city would you like to find a restaurant in and also if you prefer a specific type of food.
Szcheuan in South San Francisco would be perfect!
There are 3 restaurants matching your criteria out of which I'd recommend King Sun Buffet, located in South San Francisco.
Anything else, budget priced?
Maybe New Golden Wok, located in South San Francisco as well?
Are there any other restaurants?
In South San Francisco there's also The Night Market.
Do you know their contact number and if they serve liquor?
Unfortunately they do not serve liquor. You can reach them at 650-634-8388.
That sounds perfect!
Do you want me to place a reservation for you?
Yes, if possible.
For what time do you want the reservation?
Please make it for 11:15.
Can you please confirm that you want a reservation for a table for 2 at The Night Market in South San Francisco, today at 11:15 am.
Yes, that's correct.
Unfortunately I was unable to book the table for you at The Night Market. Do you want me to try to get you a table for 2 today at 11:30 am?
Yes, that's also fine.
I've managed to place your reservation.
Thanks so much for everything! That will be all for now.
Have a good one!
I would like to eat out.
In what city would you like to eat?
I want a place to eat in Berkeley.
What style of food would you like? Chinese and Italian are a few options of many.
I really want some Freshwater fish.
Fresh fish can be found at Akemi Japanese Restaurant in Berkeley.
What is their phone number?
You can reach them at 510-524-1286.
Give me their address. Is the menu pricey?
They are located at 1695 Solano Avenue. Their prices are moderate.
I would like to make a reservation at Akemi.
What time would you like?
6:30 pm please.
I will book a table for 2 at Akemi Japanese Restaurant in Berkeley at 6:30 pm today. Is that correct?
Yes that is good.
I have made the reservation.
Thank you very much.
Until we meet again.
I'm hungry. Can you find me a place to eat nearby?
What kind of restaurant would you like? Maybe American, Chinese, or anything else?
Please find me a Izakaya restaurant in Fremont.
Just found 4 in Fremont. I would recommend Satomi Sushi.
Can you suggest an afforadable restaurant in SFO?
In San Francisco you can go to 2g Japanese Brasserie.
Can you suggest anything else?
Ace Wasabi Rock-n-roll Sushi is also a good choice for Izakaya in San Francisco.
Do you know if they serve alcoholic drinks and, also, can you give me their address.
They don't serve liquor and their address is 3339 Steiner Street.
Sounds OK. Can you book me a table there for 11:30 am?
Sure. Please confirm that you want me to book you a table to Ace Wasabi Rock-n-roll Sushi in San Francisco for today at 11:30 am for 2 persons.
Yep, that's perfect!
Perfect. I've booked your table.
Do you know if they have live music? Also, please give me their number.
Unfortunately they don't have a live band. You can reach them at 415-567-4903.
Thanks for your help!
My pleasure. Can I be of further assistance?
Nope. Thanks a lot!
Have a good one!
I would like to fins restaurant that serves Spicy Indian cuisine.
What city would you like for me to look in?
Close to Dublin
I have 3 options for you. Chaat Bhavan located in Dublin is rated really good.
That sounds good.
Would you like to reserve a table here?
Yes please do.
What time would you like?
5 pm would be best.
Going to Chaat Bhavan in Dublin today at 5 pm for 2 people. Is that Correct?
Yes is perfect.
Your reservation is confirmed
Thanks for your help.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
Nor. That will be all.
Have a great day!
I will eat later, please find me a place.
What kind of food are you planning to eat?
I don't know, some Sushi would be perfect, I guess.
In which city should I be looking for Sushi food?
I want to eat in Danville.
I found one nice place: Akira Bistro, located in Danville, as you want it.
I'm in the mood for live music, do they have it there?
No, they don't.
Can you suggest me any other restaurant?
There is another nice one in Danville, the Blue Gingko Blackhawk.
Can you give me more options? I want it in Milpitas now.
Ok. I found 2 nice restaurants in Milpitas, one of them is the My No.1 Sushi & Tofu.
Do they serve liquor there? Tell me their address, please.
Yes, they do serve alcohol, and their street address is 1747 North Milpitas Boulevard.
Yep, that is good for me. Please make one reservation for me on 11th of March.
What time do you want the reservation?
1 pm.
Please confirm the details: you want to book a table at My No.1 Sushi & Tofu in Milpitas at 1 pm on March 11th, for 2 people. Is that correct?
Yes, it is. What's their contact number? And how pricey are they?
Your reservation was sucessful. Their phone number is 408-946-5100. Their price range is moderate;
Thanks.
Do you still need help with anything?
Not anymore. Thank you very much.
Have a good day.
I'm looking for a restaurant.
In which city? And which type of cuisine, like Chinese or Indian, etc.
I want Pizza and Pasta in Santa Rosa.
I found 10 restaurants that match this. There's Basilico in Santa Rosa.
Any other places?
Ca'bianca is in Santa Rosa.
Do they have live music and serve alcohol?
They don't have live music or alcohol.
That works.
Would you like to book a table?
Yes, for one.
For what time?
For 7:30 pm.
Please confirm: Table for 1 at Ca'bianca, 7:30 pm today in Santa Rosa.
That works.
I was unable to reserve a table. Can I help with something else?
Try booking it again, for 4 people.
Please confirm: Table for 4 at Ca'bianca, 7:30 pm today in Santa Rosa.
That's great.
I couldn't make that reservation. Anything else I can help with?
Try booking again, afternoon 12:30.
Please confirm: Table for 4 in Ca'bianca, today at 12:30 pm in Santa Rosa.
Yes. What's their phone number?
Reservation complete. The number is 707-542-5800.
Thank you.
Anything else I can do?
No, thank you.
Have a nice day.
I want to eat something that is not very costly.
In what city?
Alameda
What kind of food? Chinese, Indian, or something else?
Something like Freshwater fish.
Pier 29 matches your search, it's located in Alameda.
Ok, make a reservation at Pier 29 for today.
What time will the reservation be for?
6 in the evening.
Confirm that you want to book a table at Pier 29 in Alameda for 6 pm today for 2 people.
No I want it on the 3rd of this month and for six people.
Confirm that the date is the day after tomorrow and for 6 people.
Yes I confirm and do they serve liquor?
Reservation successful and they do not serve alcohol.
How about live music?
No live music.
Thank you, that's all I need.
Have a good day.
I'm looking for an affordable place to eat.
Are you looking for Chinese food? Italian food? Some other kind of food? Which city are you planning on eating in?
I want to eat in Hercules and I'm in the mood for freshwater fish.
A nice restaurant in Hercules is Claws And Craws.
That'll work. I'd like a reservation there.
What time should the reservation be?
I'm gonna say 1:30 PM
Okay so a reservation for 2 at Claws And Craws in Hercules for 1:30 pm today?
Actually instead make it 6:30 in the evening.
Okay so a table at Claws and Craws at 6:30 pm?
That'll work. Will liquor be available at the restaurant?
I've made the reservation. They don't serve alcohol.
Thanks. That'll be all.
Have a good day!
Search eateries in San Fran. please
Sure, no problem. What kind of eateries are you interested in today?
I think Korean Barbeque sound wonderful.
May i suggest Aato in San francisco, this is a great restaurant.
Sure, that really sounds great. Let's make reservations for 2 people please.
Sure, for what time?
Let's say 1 pm, please.
No problem. Please confirm: Reservation for 2, at Aato in San Francisco at 1 pm today. Does this sound correct?
No, please change it to 7:30 in the evening. Let's also change it to tomorrow.
Sure, please confirm: Reservation for 7:30 pm tomorrow?
Perfect. Find out if they have live music please.
Unfortunately, they do not have live music. I did confirm your reservation for you.
Thanks your a big help.
Your welcome. Can I help with anything else?
No. That will be all.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you help me find a place to eat?
You like Chinese , Mexican food or anything else and in what city would you prefer to be?
I would like to be in Milpitas.I would prefer to be reasonably priced and some Quick meal.
I found in Milpitas a nice restaurant named Olive Garden Italian Restaurant.
Can you tell me if they have live music and the contact number?
No they do not have live music,their contact phone is 408-935-8176.
Another restaurant can you recommend?
In Milpitas a nice restaurant is located, named Red Chillies The Malabar Cuisine.
I think it would fit me perfectly
You want to make for you a reservation?
Yes will be perfect
At what time would you like to go?
At 11:15 am will be good for me
Book a table at Red Chillies The Malabar Cuisine in Milpitas today at 11:15 am for 2 person.This is true?
Yes perfect.Can you tell me if they have live music available and the address
Sorry, reservation failed.They are locaded at 167 South Main Street and don t have live music.If you want I can make one for 2 people at 11 am today for Red Chillies The Malabar Cuisine.
Yes will be ok for me
Reservation was successful made.
Thanks ,that is all that I needed
Have a great day!
Find places to eat please.
Sure. What kind of food? Which city would you prefer I search?
Let's look in Concord. I am thinking Sushi sounds good.
Sure, one moment. I have located 3 restaurants. May I suggest Benihana's it's located in Concord.
What's the address and phone number please?
Their phone number is 925-827-4220. They are located at 1989 Diamond Boulevard.
Give me other recommendations please.
How about Kamrai Sushi & Thai Grill, this is a nice restaurant as well located in Concord.
Could you please give me suggestions for other restaurants that are budget friendly please.
Sure thing. I have found 1 restaurant, Sushi Momoyama located Concord.
Yes that will do. I'll need reservations please.
Sure, What time is good for you?
How about this evening 4:45 for 1 person please.
One moment. Please confirm: Reservation for 1 at Sushi Momoyama in Concord at 4:45 pm for today. Does this sound correct?
yes. That is right.
Ok. Your reservation is successfully made.
Thanks. your a big help.
your welcome. will there be anything else, I can assist with?
No. That will be all.
Have a great day.
Can you search for a place where Coffeehouse kind of food is available.
Which city do you want me to look in?
Search for the place around Pleasanton.
There is 1 Mcdonald's restaurant located in Pleasanton.
Yes, That sounds great.
DO you want me to reserve a table there?
Yes please! Make a reservation for a table.
What time do you want me to make the reservation at?
Make the reservation at quarter past 1 in the afternoon.
Please confirm the following details: You want me to make a reservation for 2 people at Mcdonald's for today at 1:15 pm in Pleasanton.
No. Change the time to 6 pm and date to March 2nd.
Please confirm the details again: You want me to make a reservation at 6 pm tomorrow.
Okay that sounds good to me. Find me the address and search weather the price is lavish?
Your reservation is made successfully. The address is 3001 Bernal Avenue and the price range is inexpensive.
Okay. Thank you for your help.
Do you want me to help you with anything else?
No. That will be all. Thank you.
I am glad I could help. Have a great day.
Can you help me find a low priced restaurant in the area?
Yes, I can help. What type of food are you hungry for?
I'd like to find some Punjabi food in Foster City.
There is 1 restaurant that meets your needs in Foster City. May I suggest Tabla Indian Restaurant?
That's fine. I'd like to make a reservation for two at 13:45.
Let me review that with you. You'd like a reservation for 2 at Tabla Indian Restaurant in Foster City today at 1:45 pm. Is this correct?
Perfect. Can you tell me the address of the business?
Their address is 1088 Shell Boulevard c. I'm sorry but there are no reservations available for 1:45. I can make a reservation for 2 at Tabla Indian Restaurant today at 1:30 pm instead if that works for you.
That would be fine.
Great. Your reservation has been confirmed.
Thank you so much for your help.
Is there anything else I can assist you with today?
No, that will be all. Thank you again.
You're welcome. Enjoy your meal!
I am interested in eating place
Which city and what type of food you are interested in like Chinese , Indian or any other thing
I am looking for Asian Fusion kind of food in Fairfield
I have found out 1 restaurant Sticky Rice Chinese Bistro & Bar in Fairfield and it is very good
This is perfect for me and i need a reservation on March 11th
What time you want me to make reservation?
I want you to make reservation at half past 6 in the evening
Please give confirmation details: Table booking at Sticky Rice Chinese Bistro & Bar in Fairfield city reserved for 2 people at 6:30 pm on March 11th
This is perfect for me
Reservation is done for you
Thanks for the help
Is there any other help from me?
No, thanks for now
Have a nice day
I need a place to get a meal, can you help?
Yeah, sure, where am I looking?
Please search in SFO.
Okay. What kind of food do you want?
I want Pizza and Pasta, anything Italian really.
Sure, 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano is available in San Francisco. Is that okay?
Yeah, that sounds great.
Cool, would you like to book a table?
Yes thanks, please do it.
What time do you want it for?
evening 5, thanks.
Please confirm that you'd like a table for 2 at 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano in San Francisco today from 5 pm.
No, it's meant to be for three people on Sunday this week.
Oh, okay. You want a table for 3 on the day after tomorrow.
No, it's for four people.
Okay, please confirm that you want a table at 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano for 4 people.
Yes that's perfect. Do they serve alcohol? Is it a budget restaurant?
No their price is moderate, they do serve alcohol though. Your booking is complete.
Thanks a lot!
That's okay. Anything else?
No thanks, that's all.
Okay, have a great day.
I want to find a restaurant in San Fran.
What type of food would you?
Mediterranean would be great.
Barcha located in San Francisco is nice.
IS there live music and is it price rage moderate?
There is no live music and it is in the expensive range.
Do you have another option?
Boulibar Located in San Francisco is nice.
What is another option?
Goood Frikin chicken located in San Francisco is nice.
Yes that sounds awesome.
Can I make a reservation for you?
Yes please do.
What time would like the reservation for?
5:30 in the evening please.
You would like a 5:30 pm dinner reservation today for 2 people at Goood Frikin chicken in San Francisco. Is that correct?
Yes that sounds ok.
Your reservation is made.
What is the address and do they serve Alcohol?
They are located at 10 29th Street and they do not serve alcohol.
Thank you.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No that will be all.
Have a great day!
Im searching for a place to eat.
Which city you want?
I want it in Richmond.
What kind of food do you wish like Chinese, Indian or anything else.
Some Ramen kind of food will be great for me
I could see 1 restaurant named Tokyo Shabusushi Restaurant which is a good restaurant in Richmond.
How pricey will it be. Does they play live music?
Their prices are moderate, which do not have live music.
Yes thats perfect for me.
Would you like to book a table?
Yes I want to make a booking. Make it at 18:00
Please confirm this : Booking a table at Tokyo Shabusushi Restaurant in Richmond at 6 pm for 2 people today
No. Make it for 4 people.
Please confirm this : The reservation is at 6 pm for 4 people.
No. Make it on next Friday for 3 people
Please confirm this : The booking is for 3 people on next Friday
Yes thats great for me
Your booking is successful
Thanks a lot. Thats all I want.
Have a great day
I am looking for somewhere to eat Lobster.
Which city?
I want to eat in Hayward.
I found Sapporo Restaurant in Hayward.
Yes, that will work for me. Please make me a reservation for 5 in the evening.
I have a reservation for Sapporo Restaurant in Hayward at 5 pm for 2 people today.
Yes perfect. Do they serve liquor or have live music?
Sorry I was unable to make a reservation. The do not have live music or serve alcohol at Sapporo Restaurant. Shall I Try to make a reservation for 2 people today at 5:30 pm?
That would be great.
Your reservation is made.
Thank you!
May I help you with anything more?
No, thank you.
Have a wonderful day!
I'm looking for a place to eat, that's also economical in price. Some Persian food sounds perfect.
I can definitely help you. What city should I search in?
Great! I am looking for food in Oakland.
I actually found 3 great restaurant choices for you. I found Dyafa, which is a very nice restaurant, and is in Oakland.
Alright, could you actually suggest any other restaurants for me? But in San Fran this time.
I found 6 more restaurants for you in San Francisco. One of them is La Marsa which is a very nice restaurant.
Sound great. What is their contact number? Do you know if they serve liquor?
Their phone number is 415-872-9767 and they do serve alcohol!
Perfect! That sounds great. Can I make a reservation for two people?
Okay! What time did you want the reservation for?
Go ahead and make it at 1:15 pm.
Alright, and just to confirm: We are making a reservation for 2 people at La Marsa, in San Francisco, for 1:15 pm today.
Actually I would like the reservation for only one person for the 2nd of this month.
No problem! Just to confirm: We are making a reservation for 1 person, tomorrow, at La Marsa.
Actually, can we make it for 7:30 pm on March 12th?
Absolutely. Just to confirm: We are making a reservation for 1 person at La Marsa, on 7:30 pm March 12th.
Yes, that is perfect. Do they have live music?
Great, I went ahead and made that reservation for you, and unfortunately, they do not have live music.
That's alright, thank you very much.
Was there anything else I can help you with?
No, that's all. Thanks, again!
You're welcome and have a great day!
Find me a place to eat that also serves alcohol.
Are you looking for a specific cuisine like Italian or Indian?
Something like a Diner should do.
In which city are you looking for the restaurant?
Find me something in Pleasanton that is priced above average.
There's 1 such restaurant. It is Sabio On Main in Pleasanton.
Do they play live music?
Sorry, they do not have live music.
Where are they located?
Their address is 501 Main Street.
That sounds good to me.
What else would you like me to do?
I'd like to reserve a table at the restaurant.
At what time will you be dining?
I think 6 in the evening should be okay.
Please confirm that you want to reserve a table for 2 at Sabio On Main in Pleasanton at 6 pm, today.
That sounds perfect!
Your table has been reserved successfully.
Thank you for the help.
Anything else I can do for you?
No. Thank you. That's all for now.
Have a great day!
I am looking for a place to eat that serves Pizza.
What location do you want?
Find me a place in Occidental.
Search revealed 1 place. What about Negri's Original Occidental in Occidental.
That is perfedt.
Do you want to make a reservation?
Make a reservation for two people.
What time do you want?
I want it at one pm.
You want a reservation for 2 people today at 1 pm at Negri's Original Occidental in Occidental. Is that right?
Yes, that is right. Do you know of there is live music?
They do not have live music, but your reservation has been successfully made.
What is their physical address and do you know if they serve liquor?
They do not serve alcoholic beverages and they are loated at 3700 Bohemian Highway.
Thanks a lot.
Do you need anything more?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a wonderful day.
I want to eat!
In which city?
In San Jose. And keep it reasonably priced.
What kind of food? You can say Indian, Italian, or something else.
To-go please.
I found 4 restaurants. 4th St Pizza Co is San Jose.
Could you recommend another place. I want a place that serves booze.
I found 3 restaurants. Mimi's cafe is nice and located in San Jose.
Yes, that works.
Would you like to make a reservation?
Yes, please.
What time is it for?
11 in the morning please.
Please confirm the reservation details: a reservation for 2 at Mimi's Cafe in San Jose for today at 11 am.
That is perfect!
Your reservation was successful.
Do they have a number and do they have live music?
Their number is 408-378-0778 and they don't have live music.
Thank you
May I assist you with something else?
No thanks.
Have a nice day.
Hi, i am hungry, I need to find a hotel
Sure, Which place should i search for?
please search in Petaluma
Ok, Which type of food are you looking for? Can you say Chinese, italian or any other languages?
I need some curry, that type of food will be perfect
I found a result in petaluma, Shree indian Cuisine is Good restaurant
Yes, that seems good for me, i want make a reservation at 11:15
Please confirm the following details: Booking a table at Shree indian Cuisine at petaluma on 11:15 am today, The reservation for 2 people
yes
Sorry, I Couldn't make reservation, Shall i try a reservation for 2 people on 11:30 am today at Shree Indian Cuisine restaurant
yes, Reserve for me
Congrats, your reservation is confirmed
Thank you very much for your help, that's all i need
You are welcome, have great day
I'm hungry, help me find some average priced grub
Where are you looking to eat?
Somewhere in San Leandro
Are you looking for any kind of cuisine? Chinese? Maybe American?
Actually I think I want some Persian food
There's a great Persian place in San Leandro called Moussaka Mediterranean Kitchen
Yes that works for me!
Would you like to reserve a seat?
Yes please do
What time do you plan on stopping by?
Lunch time, twelve in the afternoon
Making sure you need a table for 2 today at Moussaka Mediterranean Kitchen in San Leandro 12 pm right?
Make it for four people instead
Ok so a table for 4 at Moussaka Mediterranean Kitchen yes?
Yes that's good. Is there live music there? And where are they located?
Sorry I actually wasn't able to book that, can I do something else?
Try to book again, but just for one, and make it dinner time at 7:30 pm
OK I'll try to book for 1 today at 7:30 pm at the Moussaka Mediterranean Kitchen in San Leandro
Yes, please do
I was able to book it!
Great, that's it for now
Gotcha, take it easy!
I am looking for a place to eat in Fremont.
Do you have a preferred cuisine?
I love cantonese food.
How about B K's Bistro in Fremont?
Do you have something else?
How about Boiling hot pot in Fremont?
Does live music play there?
No, live music isn't available there.
That's okay. Book me a table there.
What time should I make the booking for?
Evening 6:45 works fine for me.
Cool, here are the details. Booking a table for 2 at boiling hot pot Fremont at 6:45 pm today.
Actually, change that to march 8th instead at 12:00
Making the reservation for next friday at 12 pm
cool. Do they serve liquor and whats their contact number?
Booking confirmed. Alcohol isn't served and their contact number is 510-226-1588
Thanks a ton.
Can I assist you with something else?
No, thanks again.
Have a great day ahead.
Hello, I am looking for a place to eat.
Where would you like to eat? Do you have any preference for the type of cuisine, such as Chinese or American?
I would prefer something located in San Jose and on the lines of Punjabi cuisine.
There is a nice restaurant called 8elements in San Jose.
May I have their contact number?
Sure, you can contact them at 408-270-2578.
Are their prices expensive?
Not really, they are moderate priced.
Could you suggest alternative restaurants?
Sure, there is a nice restaurant called Amber India located in San Jose too.
Any alternatives? I would prefer one which serves alcohol.
Yes, I have managed to find 3 restaurants, one of which is called Caspian Village which is located in San Jose.
That sounds great!
Would you like me to make a reservation for you?
Yes, that will be great.
What time should I make the reservation for?
Could you make it at 11:15 please?
Sure, please confirm your reservation today for 2 people at 11:15 am at Caspian Village in San Jose.
That is fine, may I have their address? Do they play live music at their venue?
Your reservation has been made! They are located at 2881 The Villages Parkway, and unfortunately, they do not play live music.
No issues, thank you very much.
Do you require further assistance?
No, that's all the help I need.
Thank you very much and have a great day!
I want to eat somewhere in San Mateo, can you give me a recommendation?
What types of food are you interesting in eating?
Anywhere that serves fish would be perfect.
In San Mateo, I can recommend you he Andes Cafe San Mateo as a place to eat fish.
Can you recommend me another restaurant, that is preferably more afforadable?
How about Fuji Sukiyaki, also located in San Mateo?
That sounds great, can you make me a reservation for the 7th?
At what time should I make the reservation for?
Set the reservation at 12:45 pm.
You want to make a reservation for 2 at 12:45 pm for next Thursday at the Fuji Sukiyaki restaurant in San Mateo, was that all correct?
That's all correct, however can you tell me their address and contact number?
Their phone number is 650-348-7810, they are located at 428 East 3rd Avenue, and your reservation was successfully made.
That is all, thank you very much.
No problem, have a good day.
I would like to find a restaurant in Santa Rosa
Are you interested in any specific type of cuisine? Feel free to say Mexican, Italian, or other kinds of foods.
Barbecue would be excellent
There is a good restaurant fitting your tastes called Belly Left Coast Kitchen & Taproom in Santa Rosa
Can you tell me if they have alcohol and live music?
The restaurant does not have live entertainment nor do they have alcohol
Are there any additional restaurants that have alcohol available?
There are 4 restaurants meeting your criteria. There is Bruno's On Fourth in Santa Rosa
Are there any more places?
There is also Earth's Bounty Kitchen & Wine Bar in Santa Rosa
Great, that's perfect!
Should I reserve a table for you there?
Yes please, go ahead and book a table
What time would you like to book a table for?
I would like a 19:00 reservation
So to confirm, you want a reservation for 2 today at 7 pm at Earth's Bounty Kitchen & Wine Bar in Santa Rosa.
That is incorrect. I would like the table for Friday next week
Again, confirming a reservation for 2 for next Friday
That is not correct. I would like a reservation for 1 person on the 6th.
To be clear, you want a reservation for 1 for next Wednesday
Sure, that works perfectly!
Your table has been successfully reserved
Excellent. Thanks, that's it for me
Have a nice day.
I am feeling hungry so I need to find a place to eat and also for the place to be serving alcohol.
Do you have a specific city in mind where you would like for the place to be?
I will be walking around Healdsburg so I want for it to be there.
Can you tell me the type of food you would like for the place to have?
I like eating Ramen sometimes so that kind of food would be nice.
I see that 1 restaurant fits with what you want called The Taste of Tea. The restaurant can be found in Healdsburg.
Can you tell me the phone number which I can use to contact them?
If you want to phone them you can through 707-431-1995.
Can you tell me if they feature live music there? How much do the things cost in general there?
The price of the products they offer is moderate. Unfortunately I see that they do not have a live music.
Alright, that is nice for me.
Do you want to book a table at this restaurant?
Yes, I would like to eat there, so I want to make a reservation for afternoon 1:15.
Can you please confirm to me that you want to make a reservation for 2 people at The Taste Of Tea in Healdsburg? You want the reservation to be for today at 1:15 pm ?
That's not what I want. I forgot about a couple that will join us so the reservation should be for four people and on the 8th.
Can you confirm again to me that you want the booking of table at the restaurant to be for 4 people, and for next Friday.
It's wrong. I would like to eat there in evening 7:15.
Consider the following updated details and confirm to me that your reservation is for 7:15 pm, and it is for next Friday.
That suits me well.
Your booking has been made without errors.
I appreciate it very much. That would be all.
Have a good time!
I'm looking to find a restaurant in the area. I'm taking my wife out to celebrate our anniversary, and I want it to be a nice place, something pricey. Also she loves fish so if they serve Freshwater fish they would be perfect.
I can definitely help you with that. In which city would you like me to search?
In SFO.
I've found a restaurant you might like, it's called Akiko's Sushi Bar and it is located in San Francisco.
Eh, I've heard the food isn't too great there. How about something else?
Okay. How about Anchor & Hope, which is also located in San Francisco?
Hmm, what is their number?
Their telephone number is 415-501-9100.
Okay yeah, sounds good to me. Make me a reservation there please.
What time would you like to make the reservation for?
Make the reservation for 5 o"clock in the evening.
You would like to make a reservation for 2 at Anchor & hope in San Francisco at 5 pm today. Is that all correct?
Yes, that is all correct. Can you also tell me if they serve liquor or have live music?
Your reservation has successfully been made. As well, i'm unfortunate to inform you that they do not serve alcohol or have live music.
Okay, thank you very much for your assistance.
You're very welcome. Can I help you with anything else?
No, that is all.
Okay. Have a nice day.
Find me a place to east in Santa Clara.
Do you have a food preference such as Indian, Chinese, or something else?
I am in the mood for Ramen food.
Amakai Japanese Cuisine serves ramen food and is in Santa Clara.
Is liquor served there?
They don't serve any kind of alcohol.
Do they have live music and what is their phone number?
They do not showcase live music and their phone number is 408-988-2555.
That will work.
Do you want make a reservation there?
Yes, make a reservation.
What time do you want?
I want a reservation for 2 people at 2 in the afternoon.
You want a reservation for 2 people today at 2 pm at Amakai Japanese Cuisine in Santa Clara. Is that right?
Yes, that is correct.
I can't make a reservation. Do you need something else?
Try to make a reservation for a quarter past 6 in the evening.
You want a reservation for 2 people today at 6:15 pm at Amakai Japanese Cuisine in Santa Clara. Is that right?
It is for 1 person.
You want a reservation for 1 today. Is that right?
Yes, that is correct. How expensive is this place?
Your booking is confirmed and they have moderate prices.
Thanks a lot. That is all.
Have a great day.
I am searching for a place to eat at San Fran.
What is your preferred food?
I prefer Peruvian type of food.
I searched and found 5 restaurants. Destino is a great restaurant at San Francisco.
Yes. It is good for me. Please make a reservation on 8th of March.
Which is your preferred time?
Book it at 12:15.
Kindly ensure that, on next Friday at 12:15 pm, the reservation is done at Destino in San Francisco. It is for 2 persons.
Nope. Book it at quarter to 8 in the evening.
Kindly ensure that, reservation at Destino on 7:45 pm.
Yes. It is good for me.
Your booking has been successfully made.
Thank you. That is what I want.
Have a wonderful day.
I'm trying to find a restaurant.
What kind of food?
I would like Izakaya cuisine.
In what city please?
I'm looking for a place in Pacifica.
How about 8 Sushi in Pacifica?
Where are they located and what is the price range?
Their address is 2470 Skyline Boulevard and they are in the moderate price range.
What else do you have?
Also in Pacifica, I have Ocean Fish Sushi & Grill.
That sounds good. Please make me a reservation on the 13th.
For what time?
I would like it at 1 o"clock in the afternoon.
Confirming the following, reservation in Pacifica at 1 PM on March 13th for 2 people at Ocean Fish Sushi & Grill.
Sounds good. What's the phone number and do they have live music?
I'm sorry, they don't have live music. The phone number is 650-355-1886. The reservation is confirmed.
Thank you, I'm all set.
You're welcome, goodbye.
I need to find a place to dine.
What type of food do you want?
I enjoy Szcheuan food.
What city would you like to dine in.
I would like to dine in Sausalito at a place that serves alcohol
I found 1 restaurant in Sausalito name Tommy's Wok Chinese Cuisine.
What is the location and price range?
It is located at 3001 Bridgeway H and the price range is moderate.
Yes, that sounds good.
Do you want me to make a reservation.
Yes I would like a reservation for this Saturday.
What time would you like for the reservation?
I would like to make it at 4:45 pm and it is for 3 people.
You want a reservation for 3 at 4:45 pm tomorrow at Tommy's Wok Chinese Cuisine in Sausalito. Can you confirm?
Actually lets make it at 7:15 in the evening on the 7th.
You want the reservation for next Thursday at 7:15 pm. Please confirm?
I need the reservation for 2 people
So you want the reservation for 2 at 7:15 pm. Can you confirm?
Correct, that is what i need.
I was not able to make the reservation. May I help you with anything else.
No thank you.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Hello! I am looking for a place to have a nice meal.
Which city would you like to eat at?
I would prefer eating in Newark.
Do you have any food preferences, such as Chinese or Italian?
I would prefer some Filipino food which is affordable and not too expensive.
There is a nice restaurant called Isla Filipino Restaurant located in Newark.
May I have their contact number?
Sure, you can contact them at 510-445-1602.
That sounds great! Could you help me make a reservation there?
At what time would you like the reservation to be made?
You can set the reservation at 17:30.
Sure, please confirm your reservation for 2 at Isla Filipino Restaurant in Newark at 5:30 pm today.
Sure, that sounds great!
Your reservation has been made.
Do they serve liquor there?
No, they do not serve alcohol there.
May I have their address please? Do they play live music there?
They are located at 5720 Mowry School Road. Unfortunately, they do not have live music there.
That sounds great! Thank you.
Can I further assist you with anything else?
No, thank you very much!
Sure, have a great day ahead!
I need a restaurant reservation.
Any specific city?
It has to be in San Fran.
For what time?
It'll be afternoon 12.
Any particular restaurant preferences?
I'd like Palmer's.
Just to make sure, you want a reservation for 2 at Palmer's Tavern in San Francisco for today at 12 pm.
Perfect. What's their cuisine type and number?
Your American cuisine reservation is all set. You can reach them at 415-732-7777.
Thanks, a lot. That'll do it, for now.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
On March 2nd we are going to celebrate my wedding anniversary. So please check for a reservation at a restaurant.
That sounds great. Are you particular with any restaurant and what time you are looking for?
Yes, I prefer jannah restaurant at 4:30 pm
Any city preferred?
It must be in SFO
Ok, please verify, Tomorrow at 4:30 pm reservation for 2 people at Jannah in San Francisco
Sorry, Please change it the 8th at 11:30
Its alright, now please confirm, reservation on the next Friday at 11:30 am
Great, thank you
Fine, your reservation is done.
Thank you very much.
Have a wonderful day sir.
id like to make a reservation for friday next week.
do you have a restaurant in mind?
yes, its called marnee in San Francisco.
what time would you like the reservation?
id like it for 19:00.
okay, just to confirm. im reserving a table for you at Marnee thai in san francisco at 7 pm next friday for 2 people.
yes thats right, do they have live music? how expensive it the menu?
your reservation was made, they have a moderate price range and they do not have life music.
thank you that's all for now.
have a nice day.
I would like to make a reservation at the restaurant Eric's.
Which city is that located in?
It's in the SF area.
What time would you like the reservation for?
I was thinking 17:45, for two guests.
Sounds great. Can you please confirm the reservation for 2 people today at Eric's Restaurant in San Francisco at 5:45 pm?
Yes that is perfect.
Unfortunately, I am unable to make the reservation at your scheduled time. Eric's Restaurant is a great place though, should I try a reservation for 2 today at 6 pm?
Absolutely, thank you.
I was able to reserve your table at Eric's.
Thank you very much for your efforts.
Would I be able to help you with anything else?
No, that will be all. Thank you very much.
Have a great day.
I want to make a reservation at a restaurant.
Do you have a preferred restaurant? What time do you want it reserved?
I want a reservation at Mcdonald's at 4:45 pm.
Which city should I search in?
I want it in SF.
Just to confirm, you want to make a reservation at Mcdonald's today for 2 people at 4:45 pm in San Francisco.
Yes, that's works for me.
Your reservation is a success.
Thanks you very much much. That's all I need.
Have a good day.
Hey! I would like to have dining today in the restaurant Clementine's. Please can you reserve me a table?
Okay! In which city you would prefer to reserve?
Please can you make it in San Ramon.
Sure! When will you be available for your dining?
I would be available at 16:45.
Okay! Here are the details. For 2 persons, a table is booked for dining at the hotel Clementine's in San Ramon at 4:45 pm today. Please can you confirm me.
Nope, Please can you reserve at Sunnyvale.
Sure! No Problem! I've booked a table for you at the restaurant Clementine's in Sunnyvale. Please can you confirm me.
Yup! perfect!
Sorry, the system crashed and I couldn't do your booking. Anything else, you want me to help you?
Please can you try the booking again for 1:15 in the afternoon.
Sure! I've booked again a table for 2 people at the restaurant Clementine's in Sunnyvale at 1:15 pm for today. Please can you confirm the details.
Yup! that would work.
Oh! Pardon me! Again the system crashed. Sorry that I couldn't make your reservation. Do you need any other help?
Nope, thanks much.
Have a wonderful day.
I'm taking a client out to dinner and I want to make a dinner reservation.
Sure! What city are you in? Do you have a preferred place and time?
I want a reservation for Hisui in Vacaville at, say, quarter to 8 in the evening.
All right. Let me confirm the details with you. You would like a reservation for 2 at Hisui | Japanese Restaurant in Vacaville at 7:45 pm today.
Yes, that's what I want.
Ok! I've made your reservation.
Thank you very much.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thanks.
You're welcome. Have a good day!
I want to book a reservation at a restaurant.
Okay, which city are you looking in?
Look in San Fran.
Okay, any restaurant in particular? And what time do you want to go?
Book a table for four at Kusakabe for later today. Make the reservation for evening 6:45.
Please confirm that I'm booking a table for 4 at Kusakabe in San Francisco at 6:45 pm today.
Actually change it to March 5th in El Cerrito.
Okay, please confirm that I'm booking in El Cerrito for next Tuesday.
No, I want you to book at Yoshio and make it for three people instead.
Got it. Please confirm that I'm booking a table for 3 at Yoshio Sushi.
Yes, that sounds right. What's their number, and do they serve alcohol?
Sorry, that reservation time and date didn't work. Should I try again?
Yes, try to make it for 18:30.
Okay, please confirm that you'd like a table for 3 at Yoshio Sushi in El Cerrito for next Tuesday at 6:30 pm.
Yup, that's right.
Your reservation is made.
Thanks, that's all.
Have a great day.
It's my friend's birthday and I want to take them to Aquitaine in SF, can you book me a reservation?
What time would you like the reservation to be?
Book the reservation for 12 o"clock in the afternoon
Is this correct? I will be booking a reservation for 2 people at Aquitaine Wine Bar & Bistro for 12 pm today. It is in the city of San Francisco.
That's incorrect, I was it to be on the 14th of this month.
Please tell me if this is correct. The reservation is on March 14th at 12 pm
Yes that works great
Your reservation has been booked
Will there be live music? What is their phone number?
There is no live music and you can contact them at 415-402-5290
Thank you!
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No that will be all, thank you.
Have a wonderful day
I want to get a reservation in Berkeley.
is there a specific resturant you are looking for. what time is good for you?
6:15 in the evening at Bistro liaison.
please confirm, a table for 2 at Bistro liaison in Berkeley for today 6:15 pm
yeah. what do they serve?
sorry I could not make a reservation at that time. They are a French Restuarant. Shall I try to book a reservation for 2 today at 6 pm at Bistro Liaison?
yes that's fine
you're reservation is booked
thanks
is there anything else I can do for you?
no. I'm good.
have nice day.
I want to reserve a table at a restaurant.
In which city and at what time would you like to dine? Do you have any preferred restaurants?
I'd prefer the Lark restaurant in San Fran at five in the evening.
Okay. Shall I go ahead and reserve a table for 2 at the Lark restaurant in San Francisco at 5 pm today?
That sounds great. Can I know their address? Do they serve Spicy Indian food?
Sorry, the reservation was not successful. They serve Mediterranean cuisine and their address is 4068 18th Street. Should I try to book a table for 2 at Lark, at 5:30 pm, today?
Yes, let's try that.
The reservation was successful. Please plan to arrive at the Lark by 5:30 pm.
Thank you very much. That is all I need for now.
Have a great day!
I want to book the Taste of Burma restaurant for 2 persons. Can you help me?
When and where should I search for?
I need to book it at quarter past 7 in the evening in Daly City.
Please confirm to book a table in Hotel Taste of Burma located in Daly City at 7:15 pm today for 2 people.
Yes, that is correct. Please make it.
Sorry, I could not make it at that time, shall I search for the same reservation at 7:30 pm for 2 persons in Taste of Burma today?
Yes, please check.
Your reservation was confirmed.
Thanks, that's all.
Have a great day.
Can you help me make a reservation at 1:15 pm in Concord?
Any preferred restaurant?
Agave Grill please, for March 10th
So you want a reservation for 2 people at Agave Grill & Cantina in Concord at 1:15 pm on March 10th right?
Yes that's fine
I have made he reservation
Thanks for your help
Anything else I can help with?
No that's all for now
Have a good day
Can you reserve a table for me?
When and what city? Do you know a particular restraunt you want?
I want SF. I want to eat at Crazy Pepper. Schedule fo night 8.
Ok, I think I have it: Crazy pepper in San Francisco at 8 pm today. You have 2 people?
No. I have 3 people.
Ok. San Francisco, 3 people?
Got it. That's what I want.
I apologize. It's so busy they don't have a table.
Ok, well try Taste of the Himalayas.
Ok, lets see: 3 People dining at Taste of the Himalayas in San Francisco 8 pm today.
Yes, correct. Can you tell if they have Taiwanese food?
I am so sorry. That date doesn't work. Any other options for you?
No, that's quite enough.
Sorry, thanks so much.
I'd like to book a spot at a diner.
What metropolis do you want me to look in, and what time is the booking for?
I'd like to have it in Hayward at evening 5.
Is there a diner you prefer?
The diner is called Paya.
Please verify the following information: reserve a table a Paya Thai in Hayward at 5 pm today for 2 people.
Nope, I'd like to have it in Cotati, and the diner is China Chef.
Please verify the following information: reserve a table at China Chef in Cotati.
Yeah, that's perfect for me.
Your booking is complete.
Thank you for your assistance.
Could I assist you with something else?
No, thank you for your assistance.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
I would like to make reservations for 2 at Pescatore.
What tinme would you like the reservation for?
A quarter to 1 in the afternoon, please.
What city shall I make this reservation?
I would like the reservation in SFO.
Ok let me confirm this with you. I have a reservation for 2 at Pescatore, today, in San Francisco at 12:45 pm. Is that correct?
Yes, that is correct.
I was unable to make the reservation for that time. Should I try again at Pescatore for today at 12:30 pm for 2 people?
Yes, that will be fine.
Your reservation was successful.
Do they have live music and could you provide me with their contact number?
No live music and the number is 415-561-1111.
Thank you so much.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that is all. Thank you.
My pleasure. Have a great day.
Please make me a reservation on 9th of this month, at seven pm
Any city in particular, and restaurant?
Yes, the State Bird in SFO
Please confirm the following booking: reservation at 7 pm on March 9th for 2 at State Bird Provisions San Francisco
Yes that fine
The reservation is done
Thats all i want, thanks
Have a great day!
I want to make a reservation at a restaurant on 10th of march in san fran.
do you have a preferred restaurant? what time for?
The restaurant is thanh long at 1:15 in the afternoon.
Please confirm the following: booking a table at thanh long restaurant in san francisco, the reservation at 1:15 pm on march 10th, the reservation is for 2 people.
yes, that works for me
sorry i was unable to make reservation . thanh long restaurant is a nice restaurant shall i try reservation for 2 people on march 10th at 1:30 pm?
yes that works for me.
your reservation is successful.
thanks a lot
have a nice day. cheers
Can you find me a restaurant so that I can make a reservation?
Which place should I look? Do you have any restaurant in mind and may I know the time?
The place is Cupertino. Make a reservation at Yayoi and the time is quarter to 8 in the evening.
Please confirm this: Booking a table at Yayoi Cupertino. The city is Cupertino. The reservation is at 7:45 pm. The date is today. the reservation is for 2 people.
Yes that's correct. Do they serve liquor?
Sorry, the reservation failed. May I help you with anything else?
Please try booking again in The Mexican restaurant at 18:45
Please confirm this: Booking a table at The Mexican Restaurant & Bar. the city is Cupertino. the reservation is at 6:45 pm. the date is today. the reservation is for 2 people.
Can you change the city to Hayward?
Please confirm this: The city is Hayward. The reservation is at 6:45 pm.
Yes perfect.
The booking is made successfully
Thanks a lot
Have a nice day
My Anniversary is coming up. Can you find me a restaurant has reservations available on the 10th of this month?
What City would you like the restaurant to be in? What time would you like to make your reservation for? Do you know what restaurant you would like to eat at?
We would like to make reservations for two at 18:00, at the Pub Republic in Petaluma.
Just to confirm, We will be making a reservation for 2 at 6 pm on March 10th at the Pub Republic in Petaluma?
Yes, thank you, Can you give me the address to the restaurant? I was wondering what kind of prices do they have?
You reservation is all set. The street address to the restaurant is 3120 Lakeville Highway. The prices are moderate at this restaurant.
Thank you so very much.
Is there anything I can help you with?
No. Thank you very much.
Have a good day.
I would like to make a restaurant reservation.
In which city would you like to reserve a restaurant? Also, do you have any special preferences?
I would like to search in Alameda. The restaurant's name is Angel Fish. Please reserve it for twelve pm.
Please confirm the following: Reserving a table for 2 at Angel Fish in Alameda for today at 12 pm.
Yes, perfect!
The reservation has been made.
May I know their address?
Their address is 883 Island Drive C-2.
Does the restaurant play live music? And does it serve Burger types of food?
The restaurant serves japanese food, and they do not have live music.
Thank you, that it all.
Have a great day!
I need a restaurant reservation.
Do you have a specific restaurant you want to go to?
Yes, it's called Juerga.
Where is it located? What time would you like your reservation?
It's in San Jose. Make the reservation for 10:45 in the morning.
Alright, please confirm the following: A table for 2 today at 10:45 am at Juerga Tapas & Wine in San Jose.
Actually, I want to go to Lotus Cuisine in San Rafael.
Alright, please confirm these details: You want a reservation for Lotus Cuisine of India in San Rafael?
Yes, that's it.
I'm sorry, I was unable to reserve that. Is there anything else I can help with?
No, that's it.
Enjoy your day.
Hi, I'm interested in making a restaurant reservation.
Sure, what time would you like this reservation for?
Please reserve it for 7 in the evening.
Is there a particular restaurant you would like?
Yes, I'm interested in a restaurant called Maruya and this will be for three people.
Please state the city you're interested in.
I'm looking in SFO in particular and I have open availability for the date.
Can you please confirm the details for your reservation: A reservation for 3 people at the Maruya restaurant in San Francisco is booked for March 13th at 7 pm.
No, that's not correct it's for four people.
Please confirm the change in details: The reservation is for 4 people at the Maruya.
No, please reschedule for 2nd of March.
Sure, please confirm the updated details: The reservation is set for tomorrow at 7 pm.
Perfect, all set.
Sorry for the inconvenience, but I was unable to make the reservation. Is there anything else I can help you with?
Yes, I want a reservation for twelve pm at a restaurant.
Can you please confirm the books details: A reservations for tomorrow is set for 4 people at 12 pm at the Maruya restaurant in San Francisco.
Correct, thanks.
Great, your reservation is set.
Perfect, that's all for now.
Have a wonderful day.
Listen up, my friend. My co-worker and I want to celebrate the end of this tough project. Please use your magic to help me make a reservation for two at a nice restaurant.
Certainly. What is the city you are looking for?
Let's go for Fairfield, please?
Do you have a particular restaurant in mind, and what time do you want for the reservation?
Let's do Mcdonald's at six in the evening on any day coming up.
I can reserve a table for 2 at McDonald's in Fairfield. The time would be today at 6 pm. If that's good for you, shall I confirm it?
Yes, that's great to set up. But, tell me, is this going to be kind of over-priced? And, what is the phone number there?
Their prices are considered on the low end, so it's inexpensive. Your reservation is now confirmed. The phone number is 707-864-1001.
Nice. Your assistance is highly appreciated.
Do you need any other assistance at this time?
I think not. Thanks for your diligence.
My pleasure. Enjoy your day.
I would like to make a restaurant reservation.
Do you have a preferred restaurant and time
I like the restaurant Kampai Bar. I would like the reservation on the 13th of this month at 6:30 in the evening.
Do you have a preferred location?
San Jose is my preferred location.
Can you confirm the following details. One table at Kampai Bar And Grill in San Jose at 6:30 pm on March 13th for 2 people
That is correct. Can you give me the restaurant address? Also, do they have live music.
I have made the reservation. The restaurant address is 519 West Capitol Expressway and they do not have live music.
Thanks for the assistance.
Do you need assistance with anything else?
No thank you.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
I wish to make a reservation at a restaurant in Pleasant Hill.
Is there a specific restaurant that you wish to make the reservation at?
I want the restaurant to be Kobe for Saturday this week at afternoon 1:30.
You wish to book a reservation at Kobe Japan Restaurant in Pleasant Hill for 2 people tomorrow at 1:30 pm?
That is not correct. I want the reservation to be at Homestead in Oakland.
You wish to book a table at Homestead in Oakland correct?
That is correct. Can you tell me what the address is and if they serve Burger dishes?
You reservation has been confirmed. The street address for Homestead if 4029 Piedmont Avenue and they serve Coffeehouse style dishes.
Thank you for providing me with that information. That's all the help I need.
You're welcome. Have a great day.
Please make me a reservation at the Bear Republic restaurant
Which city should I choose and what time do you want the reservation for?
In Rohnert Park for 19:00 hours
Okay, to confirm you would like a table at the Bear Republic Brewing Co. in Rohnert Park for 2 at 7 pm today
Yes that's right
Your reservation has been made
Thank you!
You're welcome, have a great day!
Hello, Good morning!!! I wish to go out for dinner today. Can you make a dinner reservation at a good restaurant?
At what time you wish to make the reservation?
Probably by 6:30 pm.
Do you have any preference for specific category restaurant like Thai, Chinese, American, Italian etc?
Yup! I would prefer a Mexican restaurant, the Crab House.
In which location you are looking for?
I would prefer SF.
Okay! Give me a moment... I will book the reservation for you... Here you go!! So, you wish to have your dinner at Crab House At Pier 39 in San Francisco at 6:30 pm, today combined together for 2 people. Is that right?
Nope, sorry please can you make it on the 13th in Sunnyvale?
Sure! Please confirm me the details that you wish to have your dinner at Sunnyvale on March 13th.
Yup! sounds good.
uh-ch! Sorry the system crashed and I couldn't make your reservation. Do you need any other details?
Nope, thanks a lot.
Have a wonderful day.
Make me a reservation at a restaurant please
What city do you want and at what time? Do you have any particular preference for the restaurant?
Yes I would like to be in Oakland at restaurant Sukho on the 8th at 17:00
Book a table at Sukho Thai in Oakland at 5 pm on next Friday for 2 people.Is OK?
Yes perfect.Liquor they serve?
Reservation was successful,alcohol is not served.
Thank you for your help.
Can I still help you now?
No.Thanks.
Have a great day!
I would like to make a 4:45 pm restuarant reservation.
Do you have a preferrred restaurant in a particular city?
Yes, please look for the Burma Ruby restaurant in Palo Alto.
I have a table for 2 people today at 4:45 pm at the Burma Ruby Burmese Cuisine in Palo Alto.
That is correct. What is the restaurant's adddress and what is the price range?
This restaurant is considered to moderate in price. Your reservation has been confirmed and it is located at 326 University Avenue.
Thank you for your assistance.
Do you need any further help?
Not at this time.
Have a great day!
I want to reserve a table at 7:45 in the evening, in a restaurant.
In which city are you planning to dine and do you have a preferred restaurant?
I need a table for one at the El Rancho restaurant in Concord.
Shall I book a table for 1 at the El Rancho Restaurant in Concord at 7:45 pm today?
Yes, please. Can I have their contact number?
Your table has been booked successfully. Their phone number is 925-685-5582.
Do they have live music?
Yes, they do have live music.
Thank you for your help.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
No. Thank you. That's all I need for now.
Have a great day!
Make a reservation in Dynasty restaurant for two people.
Would you prefer a certain city?
In San Jose on 12th of March at quarter past 7 in the evening.
Ok. Please confirm. Booking a table in San Jose Dynasty restaurant for 2 people on March 12th at 7:15 pm.
Yeah exactly.
Sorry unable to reserve. Shall i book a table in Dynasty restaurant for 2 people on March 12th at 7:30 pm?
No, that doesn't work for me
Can i help you with anything else?
No. Thank you very much
Have a nice day.
i want to booking a restaurant for 2 people
which city should i search in? what time is the reservation for? do you have a preferred restaurant
i want san jose in village at 11:30 in the morning
are you sure. do you want booking a table at village california bistro and wine bar in san jose on today at 11:30 am for 2 people
no. it is for three people
your reservation is done. i booking a table at village california bistro and wine bar for 3 people
yes that works for me. how pricey are they, do they serve liquor
they serve alcohol and price range is moderate
thanks you very much
can i help you with anything else
no. thank you for your help
have a great day
Can I make a restaurant reservation? I want it on March 12th.
What time is it for? Do you have a preferred restaurant?
The restaurant is Tao San Jin. Please make it for 2 o"clock in the afternoon.
What area would you like to search in?
I want it in Antioch.
Please confirm the details: A table at Tao San Jin for 2 people. The city is in Antioch for a reservation at 2 pm on March 12th.
Yes that works for me. What is the address?
Sorry I was unable to make the reservation. Anything else I can help with?
I want to try again. The restaurant is Khana Peena.
Please confirm the details: A table at Khana Peena for 2 people. The city is in Antioch for a reservation at 2 pm on March 12th.
No. Can I change it to the 9th of March in Berkeley.
Please confirm the details: The city is in Berkeley with a date of March 9th.
No. Make it at 12 in the afternoon.
Please confirm the new details: Booking a table at Khana Peena for a reservation at 12 pm.
Yes that works for me.
The reservation is made!
Thank you!
Can I help with anything else?
No, that is all thank you.
Have a great day!
I'd like to make a restaurant reservation at quarter to 7 in the evening.
Is thee a city or restaurant you prefer?
I want to go to Sushi Omakase in Gilroy.
So you would like to book a table at Sushi Omakase in Gilroy. The booking is for 2 people and 6:45 pm today.
Sounds right. What kind of food do they have there?
I was not able to make the reservation but they serve Japanese food. Sushi Omakase is a good restaurant. DO you want to try the reservation for 2 today at 6:30 pm?
No, not right now.
Have a good one.
I'd like to book a spot at a diner. I'd like to have it on the 8th of this month for 1 person.
What metropolis do you want me to look in, and when do you want the booking?
I'd like to have it in Milpitas at 1:30 in the afternoon.
Is there a diner you prefer?
The diner is Darda.
Please verify the following information: A reservation at Darda Seafood in Milpitas at next Friday 1:30 pm for 1 person.
Yeah, that's perfect for me. Do they offer alcohol and Spicy Indian food?
Your booking is complete. They don't offer liquor, but they do offer Halal food.
Thank you for your assistance; that's all.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
I won't have time to make dinner after my big meeting so I would like to make a dinner reservation.
I can help you with that, let's gather some specifics first. Do you have a particular restaurant in mind, if not what area would you like me to look in, and what time do you need the reservation set for?
Can you make the reservation for 1 at Katsu, located in Los Gatos, for six in the evening, on the 12th of this month?
I can do that but before I do lets just confirm the information I have. You would like a reservation for 1, at Katsu Los Gatos, located in Los Gatos, on March 12th, at 6 pm. Would you like me to make the reservation with this information?
Yes, that sound great. I can't wait.
I was able to successfully confirm those reservations for you and you should be all set with them.
Thanks, that's one less thing I have to do.
Was there anything else you would like me to do or look into for you?
No, that will be all and thank you again.
No problem, have a good day.
I want to make a reservation for this evening 7.
At which restaurant would you like to make this reservation?
Make it at Mister Jiu's in SFO. Also, it should be noted the reservation is only for 1 person.
Please confirm the following: Book a table for 1 person at Mister Jiu's in San Francisco at 7 pm today.
Yes, I don't necessarily need a whole table but I think they will understand.
I'm sorry to say that I was unable to make a reservation at Mister Jiu's for 1 person at that time. Shall I make the reservation for today at 6:30 pm instead?
Yeah, I guess that will work.
Your reservation has been successfully made, enjoy your meal.
I will. Thank you very much.
You're welcome.
I'd like to make a booking at a restaurant.
Sure, where are you eating? Is there a preferred restaurant? And what time shall we book for?
I want to book a table at Khana Peena in Berkeley at afternoon 1:30.
Okay, please confirm that you'd like to make a booking for 2 people today at Khana Peena in Berkeley at 1:30 pm.
Yeah that's perfect. Where is the restaurant? What type of food do they serve?
Your reservation is complete. They serve Indian food and you can find them at 1889 Solano Avenue.
Thanks a lot, that'll be all.
Okay, have a nice day.
I want booking at a restaurant on the 7th in SF
Are you thinking on any of your liking restaurant and what is the time required for booking?
I am interested in Oneup at quarter to 5 in the evening
Please give confirmation details: Booking a table at Oneup at 4:45 pm in the city of San Francisco next Thursday and the reservation will be for 2 people
No the restaurant should be Bombay to Goa at 17:30
Please give confirmation details: Booking a table at Bombay to Goa at 5:30 pm
That is perfect. Do they provide liquor and live music?
Sorry your reservation could not be done.Can i help you in any other thing?
Please try reserving again on the 7th
Please give confirmation details: Booking a table at Bombay to Goa at 5:30 pm in the city of San Francisco on next Thursday for 2 people
This is good for me
Sorry your booking could not be done.Can i help you in any other thing?
No thank you
Have a great day
Can you help me make a reservation for a restaurant for a date?
What restaurant did you want to go to?
I'm looking for Anchor & Hope.
What city and what time will this reservation be for?
I want to make it for two people at one in the afternoon in San Francisco.
Please confirm: reservation today for 2 people at 1 pm at Anchor & Hope in San Francisco.
That works for me.
Your reservation has been made.
Thank you!
Can I do anything else for you?
No, thanks a lot.
Have a good day.
I'd like to make reservations at a restaurant.
Which city should I search in?
In San Rafael for the 5th of this month.
What time would you like the reservation?
At 1 pm please.
Is there a restaurant you prefer?
A restaurant called Rangecafe.
Please confirm the following details: Booking a reservation for 2 people at Rangecafe Bar and Grill in San Rafael, next Tuesday at 1 pm.
Yes, that works for me.
Your reservation has been made.
Do they serve liquor or have live music?
They do serve alcohol but there is no live music.
Thank you very much.
Can I help you with anything else?
No. Thank you.
You're welcome. Have a good day.
I would like to make a restaurant reservation in San Jose.
Is there a specific restuarant?
The restaurant is Spencer's.
What time would you like your reservation.
Please make it on the 3rd of MArch at quarter past 1 in the afternoon.
I have a table for 2 at Spencer's for Steaks and Chops in san Jose the day after tomorrow at 1:15 pm.
Yes. Are they considered intermediate priced?
They are expensive. Your reservation has been conifrmed.
Thank you for your assitance.
Is there anything else today?
No, thank you for your help.
Have a great day.
I want to make a reservation at restaurant Hisui 2.
At what time you want to be the reservation?
I would like to be at 8 o"clock in the night.
In what city should I search?
In Vacaville I want to be
In city Vacaville for 2 people today at 8 pm at restaurant Hisui 2 is that correct?
No.Red Jade is the restaurant.
Confirm me please :Booking today a table at Red Jade.
Yes is good .Tell me please their address
Soory,reservation has failed.Can I still help you?
Try please make the booking again at 7:45 in the evening
Reservation for 2 people today at 7:45 pm in city Vacaville at Red Jade is that correct?
Yes is perfect.You can tell me please what type of food is available and if they have live music?
Sorry the reservation was failed.Can I help you with something else?
No,it s ok.Thnak you!
Have a nice day!
I would like to make a reservation to a restaurant for 5 pm.
Is there a preferred restaurant you are looking to make reservations at and what city will this be in?
Yes, the restaurant is called Sociale and it will be for the one located in San Fran.
Could you please confirm the following details? Reservation for 2 guests today at 5 pm at Sociale in San Francisco.
Yes, that sounds great. Could I also have their contact number, please?
I was unable to make the reservation for 2 guests today at 5 pm. Would you like me to try 5:30 pm? The contact number for Sociale is 415-921-3200.
No, not at this time.
Is there anything else I can help you with.
No, Thank you for your help.
My pleasure. Have a great day.
I'm going out tonight and need to make a restaurant reservation.
What time would you prefer? And which city?
Make the reservation in SF at 11:30 in the morning.
Do you have any restaurant in mind?
It is called Will. I only need a reservation for one.
I'm making a reservation for 1 at Will Sushi in San Francisco. It is at 11:30 am today.
Actually change it to eleven in the morning.
I am booking the reservation for 11 am today.
No, I'd like it next Monday.
I am making a reservation for 1 person for next Monday.
Yes that's fine.
I'm sorry, the reservation could not be booked. Will Sushi is a nice establishment. Should I try to make another reservation for 1 on next Monday at 11:30 am instead?
Yes that's ok.
I have booked your reservation.
Can you check it they have live music?
It looks like they do not.
How expensive is the restaurant? And can you find their phone number?
Will's has moderate prices and their phone number is 415-566-8088.
Thanks, that will be all.
Have a nice day!
I need help with making a restaurant reservation.
What restaurant would you like to make a reservation for? And what time is it for?
It's a restaurant called Yum Yum, and it's for six pm.
What city is the restaurant located in?
It's in San Fran.
You would like a reservation at Yum Yum Hunan in San Francisco for 2 people at 6 pm today. Is that correct?
Yeah, that's correct. Are the prices costly there?
The prices are inexpensive. I've made the reservation.
Thanks a lot, I won't be needing any more help.
Okay, take care now.
I want to make reservations at Stella Alpina Osteria
When would you like to reserve your reservation
I would like my reservation for the 12th at half past 7 in the evening
In which city do I need to make the reservation
I want to dine at Stella in Burlingame
A table is being booked at Stella Alpina Osteria is Burlingame on March 12th at 7:30 pm for 2 people
Yes thanks so much
I have successfully made the reservation
Can I please get the address and is it average priced
The restaurant is expensive and their address is 401 Primrose Road
Thanks for all of that. That is it for me
Have a great day
Please help me to make a reservation at a place to eat.
I'll need more details to assist you. Which city would you like me to search, and for what time will you be making the reservation? Is there a preferred restaurant or type of food you prefer?
We want to eat at the Claw Shack in San Jose. Please make the reservation for 11:30 am.
Please confirm that you would like to book a 11:30 am reservation for today at the Claw Shack in San Jose for a party of 2.
I'd prefer to eat at the 3rd Cousin, and the reservation will need to be for four people.
Please confirm you'd like me to book a table for 4 people at the 3rd Cousin.
Yes, that would be very helpful.
Sorry, but there are no reservations for that time. May I help you with something else?
No, but thank you.
It was my pleasure to assist you. Have a good one.
I hear Hunan Impression has great food. I'd like to make a reservation for it.
At what time and what city do you want to make the reservation?
I'd like my reservation to be in San Jose, and at morning 11.
So you want to book a table for 2 at Hunan Impression in San Jose? And the time will be 11 am today?
Actually, I need some more time to prepare. I instead want it in SFO on the 14th of this month.
I see. So you'd rather book it in San Francisco on March 14th?
Yes, that is correct.
Unfortunately, I could not make the reservation. How else can I help?
Let me attempt to book Hunan Impression again. Let's instead for with the 5th of this month, at evening 5:30.
So, you will instead book a table for 2 at Hunan Impression in San Francisco, at 5:30 pm next Tuesday?
Indeed, that all sounds good.
I'm so sorry! I couldn't reserve that table either. Can I continue to try to help?
I'll give up on booking a table for now. Thanks for the help, though.
Enjoy your day.
I want to make a restaurant reservation please.
What time would you like it for?
I'm thinking 5:15 pm.
What city should I look in?
I would like it in Danville.
Do you have a favorite restaurant?
I like Luna Loca and I would like it for the 6th of this month.
Please confirm the details: Booking a table at Luna Loca Mexican Restaurant in Danville. The reservation is for 2 people at 5:15 pm next wednesday.
Yes that is perfect. How expensive is the restaurant?
Your reservation is successful their price range is moderate.
Thank you so much.
Can I help with anything else?
No. Thank you.
Have a great day!
Hi, I'd like to go out and eat with some friends. Can you book a restaurant reservation for 6:30 pm?
Sure, what city should I look in? Is there a particular restaurant you prefer?
I'd like to go to Golden Harvest in St. Helena.
So you'd like a reservation for 2 people at Golden Harvest in St. Helena today. You will be seated at 6:30 pm. Is that correct?
Yes, that's perfect.
Your table has been booked!
Thanks for everything, that will be all.
Have a pleasant evening.
I want to reserve a table at Cafe Vitale at 19:00.
In which city is Cafe Vitale located?
It's in Los Altos.
Ok. So you would like to reserve a table for 2 at Cafe Vitale in Los Altos at 7 pm, today. Is that correct?
Yes, that sounds perfect.
Your table at Cafe Vitale has been successfully booked.
Thank you for the assistance.
Is there anything else you would like me to help with?
No. Thank you. That'll be all.
Have a great day!
I need to reserve a table.
For what time?
The evening 6:45.
What restaurant you got in mind?
I could go for some Taco Bell.
Which Taco Bell?
Try the one in Pleasanton.
Table for 2 6:45 pm today at the Taco Bell in Pleasanton. Do I have that right.
You got it. Hey, do they have Noodles? What's the price range?
Can't get a rez. Taco Bell has Burrito type of food. It's inexpensive. Should I give them a shot for 6:30 pm today, table for 2.
No, don't bother. I'm set.
No problem. See you around.
Hi, I would like to make a restaurant reservation for 3 people.
OK, do you have a preferred restaurant? What time and city are you interested in?
Please make a reservation at six pm in San Fran, at La Laguna.
Please confirm: I'm booking a table for 3 people, today at 6 pm, at La Laguna in San Francisco.
Yes, that works for me.
Your reservation has been made.
Thanks very much. That's all I needed!
Have a great day!
I would like to make a reservation at the restaurant Anar.
Which city would you like me to make the reservation for?
San Fran.
What time should I make the reservation?
Make it for 12 pm.
Please confirm you would like me to book a reservation at Anar in San Francisco at 12 pm today for 2 people.
No, I would like the reservation to be for three people.
Please confirm you would like me to book a reservation at Anar in San Francisco at 12pm for 3 people.
No, the name of the restaurant is El Amigo and it is for 1 person.
Please confirm you would like me to book a reservation at El Amigo for 1 person.
Yes that is correct. Are the prices inexpensive and do they have live music?
Sorry, I could not make that reservation. Is there anything else I can do for you?
I want to make a reservation at a restaurant for 17:00.
Please confirm you would like me to book a reservation at El Amigo in San Francisco at 5 pm today for 1 person.
Yes that is correct.
Sorry, I could not make that reservation. Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, thank you.
Have a great day.
I'd like to make a reservation for 2 at Milpitas.
What time would you like the reservation to be?
How about 17:30?
Is there a restaurant that you prefer?
I like Ta restaurant.
So you want a reservation for 2 at Ta Restaurant in Milpitas? The reservation is for today at 5:30 pm.
Yes, that sounds good. Where is the restaurant located? Can I get their phone number?
I made your reservation and the phone number is 408-719-9998. In case you need the address, it is 90 South Abel Street.
Thanks! That is all I need for now.
Have a good one.
Please help me make a restaurant reservation for later today.
I can do that. Which city are you interested in? What time would you prefer?
I need something in Petaluma for 3 people, at six in the evening.
Is there any particular restaurant you prefer?
Please make it at Lemongrass.
Please confirm: I am booking a table for 3 people at Lemongrass Thai Cuisine in Petaluma. The reservation will be for today at 6 pm.
Yes, that's it. What is the street address for Lemongrass? Also, what type of food is on their menu?
I've made your reservation. The street address is 109 North McDowell Boulevard. That's a Thai restaurant.
Thanks, that is all I needed.
Have a great day.
I'l like to reserve a table at a restaurant for 6 people.
where is the restaurant located? what time are you looking to make a reservation? Do you have a particular restaurant in mind?
I'd like to make a reservation for the 14th of this month at Mendoza's in San Jose for 7:30 in the evening.
Ok, so to confirm: You would like a reservation for 6 people at Mendoza's restaurant in San Jose. The date and time of the booking is March 14th at 7:30 pm.
That's fine. How expensive is the restaurant?
I can confirm that your booking has been made. The restaurant cost is moderate.
Thanks, that's everything for now.
Enjoy your day.
I would like to make a restaurant reservation for three people.
What time would you like to make the reservation for and what city would you like me to search in? Do you have any restaurant preferences?
Can you make me a reservation at Carnitas Michoacan in Gilroy at 11:15 am. Any day will work for me.
Please confirm the following: Reservation is to be booked for 3 people at Carnitas Michoacan in Gilroy at 11:15 am today.
Yes that works for me. Do you know if they serve liquor? Also, can i get the contact number please?
I am terribly sorry but i was unable to make the reservation. The phone number is 408-847-8812. They do not serve alcohol. Would you like me to reserve a seat for 3 people at Carnitas Michoacan for next Thursday at 11:30 am?
No thanks, that will be all.
Thank you, have a great day!
I need a restaurant reservation.
What city should I search? Do you have a particular time in mind?
I want a restaurant in Mountain View about half past 1 in the afternoon.
Do you have a particular restaurant preference.
I like the restaurant Paul Martin's.
So you would like a table at Paul Martin's America Mountain View in Mountain View for 2 people at 1:30 pm today. Can you confirm?
Yes, that is great. Can you give me the restaurant address.
I have successfully made the reservation. The restaurant address is 545 San Antonio Road Suite 31.
What is the restaurant's price range? Do they serve alcohol?
They do serve alcohol and the price range is moderate.
Thanks for the assistance.
Your welcome. Enjoy your day.
I'd like to make a reservation for a restaurant.
Did you have a preferred restaurant and time?
I'd like to make a reservation for 4 at Sumac in Belmont at half past 5 in the evening.
Please confirm you're booking a table for 4 at Sumac Mediterranean Grill in Belmont at 5:30 pm today.
Sure that sounds good.
Your reservation has been confirmed.
How pricey is the place?
It's moderate price range.
Thanks, that's all i need.
Have a great day.
I need a reservation to a restaurant.
Do you have a preferred city and place?
Yes, El Cerrito and make it for Katana-ya for 11:15 in the morning.
Please confirm Yes, El Cerrito and make it for Katana-ya for 11:15 am for today for 2.
It is for 1 and change to 1:15 pm.
Please confirm change to 1:15 pm for 1.
Yes and do they have live music and liquor?
You are confirmed and they do not have live music or alcohol.
Thank you for the help.
Do you need anything else?
No that is all today.
Have a great day.
I would like to book a reservation for a place to eat.
Please provide location and time, and let me know if you have a specific restaurant in mind.
Cetrella restaurant in Half Moon Bay. Book it for 1 o"clock in the afternoon.
Please confirm that you are requesting a reservation for a table for 2 at Cetrella in Half Moon Bay at 1 pm today.
Actually, scratch that. Make it Celia's and at 5:30 pm.
Please confirm that you are requesting a reservation for Celia's at 5:30 pm.
That is correct. Could you give me an idea of their price range?
I am sorry, but I was unable to book the reservation. Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. Thanks anyway.
Enjoy your day.
I was thinking about going to the restaurant, can you help me with the reservation process?
Sure, I can do that for you. Do you have a special restaurant you would like to visit? Maybe, you can tell me the city I should look into? Do you have any idea about the time you want to be there?
Yes, I do have a special place indeed, it's called Nick's Cove and it's in Marshall. Set a table at evening 7:30.
Confirm me all the info. You want me to reserve a table at Nick's Cove for 2 people in Marshall. I'll make the reservation for today at 7:30 pm.
Sounds great. Do you know if they cook Taiwanese food?
The procedure is complete. I know they cook Seafood.
Thank you, you helped me a lot.
Enjoy your dinner.
Can you make a reservation 1t 12:30 in the afternoon at a restaurant?
What city should I look in?
I want it in SFO, a restaurant called Kabuto, just for one please
So I'll be booking a table for 1 at Kabuto Sushi in San Francisco at 12:30 pm for today.
Yes that's good. Do they serve liquor there?
They don't serve alcohol unfortunately. also. Sorry I failed to make a reservation, but I still think we can book Kabuto Sushi, should I try for today 1 pm for one again?
No need it's ok
Can I help with something else?
No that's all thanks
Have a good day
I wanna make a reservation at a restaurant.
Do you have any preference on the restaurant? Which city should I search in?
I want it in San Jose. The restaurant name is Ma's.
What time is the reservation for?
Make it at 6 o"clock in the evening.
Please, confirm the following details: book a table at Ma's Restaurant, in San Jose, at 6 pm. The date is today, and the reservation is for 2 people.
No, I want it in Sunnyvale. Make it at 12:30 pm.
Please, confirm the following details: the city is Sunnyvale, and the reservation is at 12:30 pm.
No. The restaurant is Siam Taste.
Please, confirm the following details: book a table at Siam Taste, in Sunnyvale.
Works for me. How pricey are they?
Your reservation has been successful. Their price range is moderate.
Thanks a lot.
Can I help you with anything else?
No, thanks a lot.
Have a good one.
I want to make a reservation at a restaurant called Dong Que.
Where is the restaurant?
It's in San Jose.
What time do you want the reservation for?
You make make the reservation for twelve pm.
Please confirm the following details: You are booking a table at Dong Que Restaurant in San Jose today, for a reservation at 12 pm for 2 people.
Yes, that works for me.
Great, your reservation has been placed.
Thank you very much.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you very much.
Have a good day.
I am hungry and want to make a restaurant reservation.
What time is it for? Which city should I search in and do you have a preference?
The time is 13:30 and the city is Alameda. I prefer Applebee's; they have great food.
Please confirm the following details: a reservation for 2 people at Applebee's Grill + Bar, today, at 1:30 pm, in Alameda.
No, it is only for one. And I change my mind, actually, I want to go to the Barrel Head.
Please confirm the following: a reservation for 1 at Barrel Head Brewhouse.
Yes, that works.
Sorry, the reservation did not go through. May I help you with something else?
No. Thanks for your help.
Have a great day.
My friend and I would like to make a reservation for 2 at restaurant.
Is there a particular location you would like to dine in? And do you have a preferred restaurant in which you would like to place a reservation?
The restaurant I would like to place a reservation at is called Bj's and I would like to place the reservation at the San Jose location of this restaurant.
What time would you like to make a reservation for?
I would like to make the reservation for 19:30 tonight.
Okay! To confirm, the reservation is for a party of 2 at Bj's Restaurant & Brewhouse in San Jose. It will be at 7:30 pm today. Is this correct?
Yes, that is perfect. I was wondering if this location will have live music? Also what is the address of this restaurant?
Sorry, but I was unable to get a reservation at this particular time. Is there another time in which you would like to make the reservation for or anything else I could help with?
I would like to make a different time which would be at half past 4 in the evening.
To confirm, the reservation would be for a party of 2 at Bj's Restaurant & Brewhouse in San Jose. It would be at 4:30 pm today. Is this correct?
No, I would actually like to make the reservation at a different restaurant. I would like it at Mazzat in San Fran.
To confirm, you would like a table for 2 at Mazzat in San Francisco for a party of 2 at 4:30 pm today?
Yes that is exactly what I would like.
Sorry but there is no availability for 4:30 pm at Mazzat in San Francisco today. Is there anything else I could assist you with?
No, that is fine. Thank you very much for your help!
No problem, Have a good day!
I'd like to book a spot at a diner.
What metropolis do you want me to look in? Is there a diner you prefer, and what time is the booking for?
I'd like to have it in Antioch at evening 5:30, and the diner is Chili's Grill.
Please verify the following information: A booking for 2 people at Chili's Grill & Bar in Antioch for 5:30 pm today.
Yeah, that's good for me. Do they play live songs?
Your booking is complete. They do not play live songs.
Thank you for your assistance.
Could I assist you with something else?
No, thank you for your assistance.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
I would like to make a reservation at a restaurant for three people.
What time would you like the reservation?
Make it at half past 11 in the morning please.
In which city and do you have a preferred restaurant?
In San Mateo the restaurant is Sushi Yoshizumi.
Booking a table at Sushi Yoshizumi in San Mateo today at 11:30 am for 3 people.
Yes that works, do they serve liquor?
I was unable to make that reservation. Can I help with anything else?
Yes, I would like to book a table for 2 people.
Booking a table for today at Sushi Yoshizumi in San Mateo at 11:30 am for 2 people.
What is their phone number and are they above average in pricing?
Your reservation is made and their phone number is 650-437-2282. Their price range is usually very expensive.
Thank you for your assistance.
Have a good day.
I would like to take my wife to dinner at her favorite restaurant, Allegro Romano.
What city is the restaurant located in and at what time would you like a table?
Let's make it an evening 7:30 reservation and you should look in San Francisco.
Okay, can you verify for me that you want a reservation for 2 at Allegro Romano located in San Francisco today at 7:30 pm?
Can you tell me if they serve Punjabi, I've been wanting to try that. I will also need the address for my GPS.
The address of the establishment is 1701 Jones Street. They serve Italian cuisine. I was successful in reserving a table for you at the requested date and time.
Thanks for all your help. That will be all for now.
It was my pleasure, have a great day !
I want to make a reservation at a restaurant for 11:15.
Which city should I search for?
Pleasant Hill please.
Is there a preferred restaurant you like?
Wence's is the restaurant I want.
Please confirm these details: Booked a table at Wence's Restaurant. It is in Pleasant Hill city. The time of the reservation is 11:15 am. The date is today, and the reservation is for 2 people.
That works for me. What type of food and liquor do they serve?
I could not make the reservation. They serve California style food. They don't serve liquor. Wence's restaurant is very nice, should I try a reservation for 2 people today at 11:30 am?
No thank you.
Can I help with anything else?
Nope. Thank you.
Have a good one.
I would like to make a reservation at a restaurant at 6 pm.
Is there a particular restaurant you have in mind?
The restaurant is called Zaoh. I'd like to make a reservation for 6 people.
Which city should I search?
Can you find a restaurant in San Fran?
Please confirm: The reservation is today at 6 pm for 6 people for a table at Zaoh in San Francisco.
Yes. What is the address?
Sorry, I was unable to make a reservation. Is there anything else I can help you with?
I want to make a reservation at Mcdonald's for five people.
Please confirm: I'm booking a table at Mcdonald's for 5 people at 6 pm today in San Francisco.
Yes that's perfect
Your reservation was successful.
Thanks, that's all I need.
Have a good day.
I'd like to make a restaurant reservation please.
What time please?
For 12:45 please.
Do you have a restaurant in mind?
Yes, the name of the restaurant is Bikaner.
What is the city?
In San Carlos, the restaurant I'd like to find is West Park.
Confirming a booking at West Park Bistro in San Carlos at 12:45 PM today for 2 people.
Actually that should be tomorrow for 3 people.
Confirming a reservation tomorrow for 3 people.
Did they serve liquor and what kind of food do they serve?
I'm sorry, I couldn't make the reservation. They don't serve alcohol and they have a brunch menu. Would you like me to try to make a reservation tomorrow for 3 people at 1 PM at West Park Bistro?
Yes, please try to do that.
The reservation was successful.
Thanks, I'm all set.
You're welcome, thank you.
I want to make a reservation at a restaurant.
What city should I search in?
I want a restaurant in Hayward for the 11th.
Do you have a preferred restaurant? What time is the reservation for?
I want a reservation at Buon Appetito at 1:30 pm.
Okay, I have a reservation at Buon Appetito in Hayward for 1:30 pm on March 11th for 2 people, is this correct?
No, I want it on the 12th of this month at 13:00.
Okay, the reservation is at 1 pm on March 12th.
Yes, that is correct.
I have successfully made the reservation.
Thank you very much!
Is there anything else I can help with?
No, thank you.
Have a great day.
Can you get me dinner reservations for 6 in the evening?
Sure. What restaurant and location do you want reservations for?
Kufu-ya restaurant in San Fran.
I will book you a table for 2 at Kufu-ya in San Francisco for 6 pm today. Is that correct?
Yes, that will be perfect.
Your reservation is set.
Thank you!
Anything else?
No, thank you for your help.
Your welcome. Have a nice day. Goodbye.
I would like to make a reservation at a restaurant for the 1st of this month.
Which city are you looking for a restaurant in?
It will be in Burlingame. The restaurant I would like to make a reservation for is Steelhead, for one person.
What time would you like the reservation to be?
I would like it for 18:30.
Please confirm the following details of the reservation: Booking a table for today at Steelhead Brewing Company in Burlingame at 6:30 pm. The reservation will be for 1 person.
Yes, all of those details are correct.
Your reservation was successful, anything else I can do for you?
Thank you very much. That is all I need for today.
Have a great day.
I'd like to reserve dinner at a restaurant in Santa Rosa
Is there a particular restaurant you like? And what time do you want to book?
Yes, I'd love to go to La Vera. Can you book for 5 in the evening?
okay, confirming you want to book for 2 people at La Vera Pizza in Santa Rosa today at 5 pm?
Yes thank you
I've reserved a table for you.
Can you tell me if they have live music, oh and also the address?
There's no live music at the restaurant. They are located at 629 4th Street.
Thanks so much, that's it for now.
Enjoy your meal!
Hi! I'm meeting a date today! Could you make a reservation at seven in the evening tonight?
Congratulations! Do you have any particular restaurant in mind?
Yes! The Old Siam, it's my favorite. Could you book it for 4 people please?
Sure thing! What city is it located in?
It's in San Francisco.
Great, so just to confirm, I'm booking a table at the Old Siam in San Francisco at 7 pm today for 4 people, correct?
Actually, could you make it for five people?
Definitely. So with the new details we'll book it for 5 people at the Old Siam in San Francisco, correct?
That's perfect!
Great, the reservation is done.
Thank you so much!
Not a problem! Is there anything else I could help out with?
That's it! Thank you!
Great, have a good day!
Make a reservation at the restaurant Navin.
What time and location would you like to make the reservation for?
I want the one in San Francisco for 12:15 pm.
Booking a table at Navin Thai Restaurant in San Francisco for today at 12:15 pm for 2 people. Is that correct?
Yes, that's good. How pricey are they? Do they have live music?
Your reservation has been successfully made. Their price range is moderate but there is no live music.
Thanks.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you.
Have a good day.
I need you to make reservations st Koh Samui & The Monkey for three please
Where are they located? What time do you want to eat?
Make the reservation in San Francisco for 7 in the evening on Wednesday next week.
You would like reservations for 3 in San Francisco at Koh Samui & The Monkey next Wednesday at 7 pm. Is that information correct?
No, I forgot, my mother-in-law canceled, so I only need reservations for two and I need those at the Crouching TIger.
You want a table for 2 at the Crouching Tiger Restaurant, is this right?
Yes, exactly, I will need the address. Are they in the low priced category?
I could not get an available table. Do you have something else I can do?
No, not at this moment. Thank you.
Have a wonderful day then.
I want to make a reservation at Broderick Roadhouse.
What is your preferred city?
I want the reservation in Walnut Creek for 1 person.
What time would you like?
I'd like it in the evening 5:30.
So, you'd like a reservation for Broderick Roadhouse in Walnut Creek at 5:30 pm today for 1 person.
No, I changed my mind. I want to go to Egg Roll King in Daly City.
Should I book a table at Egg Roll King in Daly City?
Yes, that's right.
The reservation is successful.
What type of food can I eat there?
They're an Asian restaurant.
Thanks, that's all I need today.
Have a good day.
I need to make a restaurant reservation.
Which restaurant in which city and for what time?
The restaurant is in Berkeley and it's called House of Curries. I would like a reservation for 1 person at quarter past 5 in the evening.
Confirming a table for 1 at House of Curries in Berkeley at 5:15 PM today.
Sounds great, thank you.
Sorry, the reservation was unsuccessful. What else may I do for you?
Please try to book it again at 13:15.
Confirming a table for 1 at House of Curries in Berkeley at 1:15 PM today.
That sounds good.
I was unable to book that for you. Would you like me to try a reservation for 1 person today at 1:30 PM at the House of Curries?
I don't think so.
Is there anything else I could do for you?
Not right now.
Thank you, goodbye.
I'd like to make a dinner reservation.
What time do you want to dine? What city are you in, perhaps you have a preferred restaurant?
Yes, can you book me a table at Bob's Steakhouse in San Francisco at 5:15 pm on the 8th?
Okay, making sure I've got all the details: you want a table for 2 at Bob's Steak & Chop House in San Francisco next Friday at 5:15 pm?
Yeps that's right. What's the price range?
I've booked you in. Other customers have rated them as very expensive.
Okay good to know.
Happy to help.
Can you help me make a restaurant reservation?
Sure I just need some additional information. What city should I search in and at what time do you need the reservation?
Search for restaurants in Morgan Hill. The reservation is for a party of 2 and make it for half past 1 in the afternoon.
Do you have a specific restaurant in mind?
Please make the reservation at Odeum.
To confirm, you want a reservation for a party of 2 at Odeum restaurant in Morgan Hill at 1:30 pm today.
No, actually I want the reservation at Celia's in SFO.
To confirm, you want a reservation for Celia's By The Beach in San Francisco.
Yes that's perfect, thanks. What's their price range?
I have made your reservation as requested. Their prices are moderate.
Thank you, that's all I needed.
Happy to help. Have a great day.
I need to make a reservation for a date on the 2nd.
Okay. Which restaurant and what city should it be in?
I'm looking for a reservation to Amami in San Bruno.
What time do you wish for this reservation?
It should be around 5:30 in the evening.
Let me double check. This is a reservation for a table at Amami Sushi in San Bruno at 5:30 pm tomorrow for 2 people.
Scratch that. Make it the 8th of March.
So, it's next Friday for 2 people?
Yeah. Do they serve Pizza and Pasta styles of food? Is the price range lavish?
Your reservation has been accepted. They serve Seafood and their price range is quite moderate.
Thank you for all your help. That's all.
Have a wonderful day!
Can you find me a reservation at a restaurant in San Jose?
Can you specify the time of your reservation?Which restaurant would you prefer?
I would like a reservation in Flames Eatery at 19:00
You need to confirm the details which are as follows.You have reserved a table at Flames Eatery & Bar in San Jose at 7 pm.The booked table is for 2 people today.
No.Its book for 1 person.
Please confirm the details again.The city of reservation is in San Jose.The booking is for 1 person.
Yes, That's it.May I know the price ?
Your booking is successful.Price is moderate.
Thank you so much..That's all.
Have a great day.
I want a reservation for a restaurant.
Where should I search for it?
The restaurant is Jing-jing Szechwan in Palo Alto.
At what time do you want the reservation?
I want it for 12:15 pm next Friday.
To confirm: I'm booking a reservation for 2 people at Jing-Jing Szechwan & Hunan Gourmet in Palo Alto next Friday at 12:15 pm.
Please make the reservation for 1 person.
Okay. To confirm: I'm booking the reservation for Jing-jing Szechwan & Hunan Gourmet for 1 person.
Correct. What is their phone number?
I'm sorry, but I was not able to make that reservation. Their phone number is 650-328-6885. Should I try to book a reservation for 1 person next Friday at 12:30 pm. Jing-jing Szechwan & Hunan Gourmet is quite nice.
Sure, that's fine.
The reservation was made.
Thanks, that will be all.
Have a good one!
I would like to make a reservation at a restaurant.
Do you have a preferred restaurant in mind?
Yes, make the reservation for Broadway on March 12th at 12:30.
What City is the restaurant located in?
The restaurant is located in Burlingame.
You would like me to reserve a table for 2 at Broadway Grill on March 12th at 12:30 pm. The Restaurant is located in Burlingame. Is this information correct?
Yes, the information is correct. Is the restaurant very expensive? Do they have live music?
Your reservation is successful. It is a moderate restaurant. They have live music.
Thank you very much.
My pleasure. Have a good day.
Hello, I'd like to make a reservation at My No.1 Sushi for 1.
Which city are you looking for? And what time?
Milpitas. In the morning 10:45.
Ok. I'm going to make a reservation for 1 at 10:45 am today at My No.1 Sushi & Tofu in Milpitas.
Yes, please.
Unfortunately My No.1 Sushi & Tofu is all booked at that time. Would a table for 1 at 11 am today work instead?
Yes, that's fine too.
Alright that worked and you're booked.
Do they Tacos there? What's the phone number?
No, they serve Japanese food. The number is 408-946-5100.
Thanks for everything.
Anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you, that's all.
Have a good one.
I want to reserve a restaurant in Walnut Creek
At what time do you want this reservation? Any preferences?
Make it a eleven am at Kana for two people
Please confirm this reservation, 11 am at Kana Sushi in Walnut Creek for 2 people today.
Confirmed, what is the address?
Reserved successfully, address is 1280 Newell Avenue.
Is there live music?
No live music
Thanks a lot
Anything else I can do?
No thank you.
Have a good one!
I'd like to make a reservation at China Villa.
What time would you like the reservation?
18:00 on the 4th of this month.
What city is the restaurant in?
Actually, make the time 1 in the afternoon. The city is San Fran.
A reservation at China Villa in San Francisco at 1 pm for 2 people next Monday. Is this correct?
No. The restaurant is now Wooden Charcoal Barbecue on March 9th.
A reservation at Wooden Charcoal Korean Village Barbecue House on March 9th. Is that correct?
Yes.
Your reservation was scheduled successfully.
Thank you.
Is there anything else you would like help with?
No, that is all.
Have a nice day.
I would like to make a reservation for The View on the 2nd of this month.
What city please?
It's in San Fran.
What time?
Do you have anything for quarter to 7 in the evening?
Yes. I found a table for The View Lounge in San Francisco at 6:45 pm for tomorrow for 2 people.
That's great.
I was unable to make the reservation at The View Lounge at that time. How about a reservation for 2 tomorrow at 7 pm?
No, I am fine.
Anything else?
No, thanks.
Enjoy your day.
Can I make a reservation at this restaurant?
What time would you like to place a reservation?
I want it at six in the evening.
In which city would you like to make a reservation? Do you have a restaurant in mind?
I want a restaurant in SF. The restaurant I want to go to is called Khamsa.
Please confirm the following information: The city is San Francisco. The reservation is at Khamsa restaurant at 6 PM today. The number of people in your party is 2.
Yes, that is excellent.
Apologies. I was unable to book this reservation. Is there anything else that I may help you with?
I want to try booking another reservation. The restaurant is Mimi's.
Please confirm the following information: The city is San Francisco. The restaurant is Mimi's Cafe. The reservation is for today at 6 pm. There are 2 people in your party.
Yes, that sounds good. Is this restaurant expensive or affordable?
Apologies. I was unable to book this reservation. Is there anything else that I may help you with?
No, thank you.
Have a wonderful day.
I want to reserve a spot at a table tonight.
Where would you like to eat?
Somewhere in Union City.
Do you know where you would like to eat? What time will you arrive?
I'm craving Mexico Lindo. I will be there at half past 1 in the afternoon.
Let me get this straight: I am reserving a table for 2 at Mexico Lindo located in Union City for 1:30 pm today. Did I get that right?
Actually I'll need a table for 4 at 1:45 pm.
Alright, so that's a table for 4 at 1:45 pm?
Oh and can you make it The Van's in Belmont?
You want a table for The Van's Restaurant in Belmont?
That's the one.
I've got your table set.
Thanks!
Was there something else I could assist with?
Nah, that will do for now.
Have a good one!
I want a reservation at the Santa Rosa restaurant.
Do you have a restaurant you prefer? Can you tell me the time of the reservation?
Let's meet at 7 pm at the Jojo Restaurant.
Today I want to book a table for 2 people at the Jojo Restaurant & Sushi Bar in the Santa Rosa city. at 7 pm.
That is fine with .me. Do they serve liquor?
Your reservation was booked. Please note they do not serve alcohol.
Thanks a lot.
Can I help you in anything?
Thanks, but no.
I hope you have a great day.
I would like to set up a reservation at a restaurant please.
Okay, what time would you like to go out to eat?
I would like to make the reservation for four people. It will be in the morning 11:30. It will be in San Fran.
Okay, what is your preferred restaurant?
Sushi Hashiri, please.
Okay, I am going to book a table at Sushi Hashiri in San Francisco. Your reservation will be for 11:30 am today for 4 people. Is this correct?
No, make it for two people.
Okay, we are all set for 11:30 am for 2 people. Does this work?
No it does not. I would like to change the restaurant to El Amigo in Santa Clara.
Okay. I will change the restaurant to El Amigo Burrito in Santa Clara. Does this work
Yes, this works great. Are the prices very expensive? Is there live music?
The reservation has been confirmed. The price range is inexpensive and they do not have live music.
Okay, thanks!
Enjoy your reservation!
I would like to make a reservation.
What time is the reservation?
Please, make it at quarter past 5 in the evening.
What restaurant do you prefer?
Please, make it at 7:15 pm. The restaurant is Hikari Sushi in San Fran.
Can you confirm? The booking table is at Hikari Sushi & Bar, the city is in San Francisco, the reservation is at 7:15 pm, and there are two seats for 2 people. And lastly, it's today.
No, it's for 1 person. I want to book it for March 12th.
Confirm, please: The reservation is for 1 person and the date would be for March 12th.
Yes, that's correct. Do they have live music, by the way?
I have registered your reservation. And no, there's no live music.
Thanks, that's all I need.
You're very welcome!
I want to make a reservation at Cassava restaurant.
In which city is Cassava restaurant and what time would you like the reservation?
I would like a reservation for the SF restaurant for 6 people at eleven am.
Please confirm the reservation at Cassava in San Francisco for 6 people at 11 am for today.
It's for 5 people, not 6.
Please confirm the following reservation for 5 people at 11 am.
Yes. That works for me.
Your reservation is has been confirmed.
Thank you.
Can I help you with anything else?
No. Thank you.
Have a good day!
I would like to make a reservation.
What restaurant and time?
Evening 7:15 at Mcdonald's.
What city?
Hayward.
Please confirm a 7:15 pm reservation at Mcdonald's in Hayward today for 2 people.
Great.
I was unable to make that reservation at Mcdonald's. Is today at 7:30 pm for 2 people okay?
No, thanks.
Anything else?
No, that's all for now.
Have a great day.
I want to make a reservation at a restuarant
What city? Any preferred place?
I want it in SF on the 2nd of this month at half past 11 in the morning. The restaurant I want is Pampalasa
Booking a table at Pampalasa in San Francisco at 11:30 am for 2 people for tomorrow
Make it at 5:30 pm for 1 instead.
Confirming your 5:30 pm reservation for 1
Actually I want it in Healdsburg at a place called Willi's
Confirming a table at Willi's | Seafood & Raw Bar in Healdsburg
Yes that's good. What's their number?
Your reservation is confirmed. Their number is 707-433-9192
Thanks so much
Can I do anything else?
No, that's all thanks
Have a good day
I want to go to a restaurant on March 2nd. Can you make a reservation?
Tell me your desired restaurant, city and time
A reservation for two at All Spice in San Mateo at afternoon 1:30
So you want a table for 2 for tomorrow 1:30 pm at All Spice in San Mateo. Is it correct?
Yes. Can you get me a number to contact them?
It is 650-627-4303. Your reservation has been confirmed.
That is enough. Thanks a million.
You're welcome. Good bye.
I would like to make a reservation at a restaurant in Half Moon Bay.
Do you have a restaurant in mind?
I would like a reservation for two people at Shiki at one in the afternoon.
You would like a reservation for 2 people at Shiki Japanese Cuisine in Half Moon Bay, today at 1 pm. Is that correct?
Yes, that sounds great.
Your reservation is made.
Does this restaurant serve Tacos?
No, they serve Japanese food.
How expensive is this restaurant?
They're prices are moderate.
Thank you for all your help. That is everything.
Have a great day.
My old college roommates are visiting me soon, and I would like to make a reservation at an upscale restaurant to impress them. Do you know of any such places nearby?
What time did you tell the hostess we would be there for? In it in your hometown?
I am having a get together on the 14th in Livermore, most likely at around a quarter past 1 in the afternoon.
Do you have a favorite restaurant?
I would like to go to Walia in San Jose.
Please confirm these details for me: you would like to book a table at Walia in San Jose on March 14th at 1:15 pm for 2 people?
No, can you please change the reservation to 7:30 pm.
Please confirm the following details so I am not mistaken: you would like a reservation for 2 people at 7:30 pm?
Thats perfect.
We have recorded your reservation and look forward to seeing you soon.
What number do I contact to make a reservation?
The contact number for reservations is 408-645-5001.
I think I am all set. Thank you!
Have a great rest of your day.
I'd like to make a reservation at a restaurant please.
Do you have a preference as to which restaurant the reservation is made?
I would like the reservation to be made at the Parkside restaurant and I will need the reservation to be the 7th of this month please.
What time would you like the reservation to be for and which city is the restaurant located in?
please make the reservation for 1:30 in the afternoon in Portola Valley.
I would like to confirm the reservation details. I am booking a table at the Parkside Grille restaurant in Portola Valley. The reservation is at 1:30 pm next Thursday and is for 2 people.
Yes that's right. What is the phone number for the restaurant and what is their price range?
The reservation has been booked successfully. They are in the moderate price range and their phone number is 650-529-9007.
Thank you. I don't need anything else.
Be sure to have a good day!
I want to make a reservation at La Panotiq restaurant at 12:00
which city do you want?
I want it in Livermore.
Please confirm the following details: booking a table at La Panotiq Bakery Cafe livermore. the city is livermore at 12 pm,, reservation for 2 people today.
Yes that works for me
Your reservation done.
Thanks a lot
Have a nice day.
I'd like to make a reservation on the 12th of March for three people.
Where would you like to go? Did you have a specific restaurant in mind?
Actually, I'd like to make the reservation for the 13th of March instead. I'd like it for Mua in Oakland.
Okay, got it. And what time were you thinking?
7:15 in the evening would be great.
So you would like to book a reservation at Mua Oakland in Oakland for 3 people at 7:15 pm on March 13th, right?
Yep. Also, do you have their phone number? And do you know if they serve Punjabi food?
Their phone number is 510-238-1100, and they only serve American food. It seems like there aren't any reservations available for 7:15 pm. Would you like me to try to book a reservation at Mua Oakland for 3 people on March 13th at 7:30 pm instead?
Sure, that works too.
I have successfully booked your reservation!
Great, thank you! That's all I needed.
Have a nice day, and enjoy your meal!
I want to eat out today, and would like a reservation at a restaurant.
Please tell me the city in which to search.
Please search in SF, for 4 people.
Any preferred restaurant? What time should I reserve it for?
Please make a reservation at Limon for the 13th at morning 11:45.
Please confirm that the reservation is for 11:45 am on March 13th, at Limon Rotisserie in San Francisco. It is for 4 people.
Yes, that's perfect. Do you have their address, as well as contact number?
Your reservation has been made. They are on 1001 South Van Ness Avenue. You can reach them on 415-821-2134.
Much appreciated.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Nothing else, thanks a lot.
Wishing you a good day.
I need a restaurant reservation
Do you have a restaurant in mind? Which city and at what time?
I'd like it for four at 12:00 at Lark Creek in San Jose
I have a table for 4 today at 12 pm at the Lark Creek Kitchen in San Jose. Please confirm
Yes, sounds good!
Your reservation is confirmed
Thanks, that's it
Have a good day.
I am planning to go to dinner with some friends and I would like to choose a restaurant and secure a reservation.
What location would you like me to find a restaurant in? And do you have a preference in terms of cuisine? What time would you like the reservation made for?
I am looking for a morning 11:30 reservation at McDonald's in Berkeley.
I would like to have a reservation made for 11:30 am today for 2 people at McDonald's restaurant in Berkeley. Can you confirm this?
I am fine with that. Can you tell me what kind of food they serve and if they have live music?
I have confirmed your reservation. They do have live music and the food they serve is Salad.
Excellent. Thank you.
Is there anything more you need help with?
No. I am all set. Thanks again.
Great. Take care.
I want to make a reservation at Asya
What city is Asya in? What time would you like the reservation for?
Asya is in San Carlos. The reservation is for three people at 7 in the evening.
So you would like me to book a table at Asya Restaurant, in San Carlos, for today at 7 PM, for 3 people correct?
That works for me.
Sorry I was unable to make the reservation. Can I help with anything else?
Make the reservation for 13:15.
So you would like me to book a table at Asya Restaurant, in San Carlos, for today at 1:15 PM, for 3 people correct?
Yes. What is the address and the contact number?
Your reservation is confirmed. Their phone number is 650-596-9828, and the address is 773 Laurel Street.
Thank You
Can I help you with anything else?
No thanks.
Have a good day.
I would like to make a reservation at a restaurant
Are there any restaurants that you prefer?
The restaurant is named Foreign Cinema. I want to reserve it for later today.
At what time do you want to reserve the restaurant?
Reserve it for this evening 7 pm for 6 people.
Which city is this restaurant located in?
Please search in SFO.
Please confirm your reservation. Reserving a table at Foreign Cinema in San Francisco at 7 pm for 6 people today.
This is incorrect. The restaurant is Black Angus.
Please confirm your reservation. Reserving a table at Black Angus Steakhouse at 7 pm.
Yes this is correct.
I apologize. A table could not be reserved. Is there anything else I can help you with?
I would like to make a reservation at a restaurant. Please reserve it for half past 7 in the evening.
Please confirm your reservation. Reserving a table at Black Angus Steakhouse in San Francisco at 7:30 pm for 6 people today.
Yes this is good. What is the address of this restaurant? Does it serve American food?
I apologize. A reservation could not be made. Do you need help with anything else?
No, thank you.
Have a good day.
I want to book a table
What time for?
I think 7:30 in the evening would be good
Where would you like me to book a table for?
There's a place in San Jose called Pearl River - can you just book it for one please
Ok, I'll book a table for 1 at the Pearl River Restaurant in San Jose. I'll book it for 7:30 pm today. Is that ok?
Actually can you make it for 2?
No problem. I'll book a table for 2 at the Pearl River Restaurant
Perfect! Is it a budget place? And do they have live music?
All booked for you. No live music, unfortunately. I've checked online and the price is moderate.
Lovely, thank you. I don't need anything else.
You're welcome, have a great day
I would like to make a reservation for the 4th of March.
Where would you like to eat?
It's called the Alembic.
When did you make the reservation for?
Our reservation is at 11:30 for four people.
For what city should I look?
Search in San Francisco.
Someone needs to confirm the reservation at The Alembic in San Francisco for 4 people at 11:30 am next Monday.
No, the reservation is at Paradise Sushi.
Please confirm the 11:30 am reservation at Paradise Sushi & Grill.
It's supposed to be on the 2nd.
Confirm the reservation tomorrow for 4 people.
That works!
Unfortunately the reservation could not be made. Is there anything else I can do?
I need a 1:30 pm reservation.
Can you confirm a table at Paradise Sushi & Grill in San Francisco for 4 people tomorrow at 1:30 pm.
Yes! Can I see a menu and drink list?
Unfortunately the reservation could not be made. Is there anything else I can do?
No thank you.
Have a nice day.
I want to make a reservation at a restaurant. I want it in Oakland.
Do you have a preferred restaurant? What time is the reservation for?
The restaurant is Shakewell. Make it at 11:30 in the morning.
Please confirm the following details: Booking a table at Shakewell. The city is Oakland. The reservation is at 11:30 am. The date is today. The reservation is for 2 people.
No. The restaurant is Villa D'este. I want it in San Francisco.
Please confirm the following details: Booking a table at Villa D'este. The city is San Francisco.
No. Make it at 4:30 pm.
Please confirm the following details: Booking a table at Villa D'este. The reservation is at 4:30 pm.
Yes that works for me.
Sorry, I was unable to make a reservation. Can I help you with anything else?
No. Thank you very much.
Have a good day.
i want to make a reservation at restaurant
what time is the reservation for? which city i should search in? do you have a preferred restaurant?
the restaurant is la traviata.i want it in san fran.make it at 6:30 pm
please confirm the following details:booking a table at la traviata. the city is san francisco.the reservation is at 6:30 pm.the date is today. the reservation is for 2 peoples.
yes that works for me.do they have live music?
your reservation is successful.they do not have live music.
thank you very much.that is all i need.
have a good day
I'm meeting a friend soon, and we'd like to make a reservation at a restaurant.
Which restaurant do you have in mind, and what time is the reservation for?
I'm thinking about Rice Bowl, at morning 11:30
Which city should I search in?
Antioch please, on the 7th of this month.
I'm booking a table for 2 at Rice Bowl in the city of Antioch next Thursday at 11:30 am. IS that correct?
Yes, that's correct. What is their address?
Your reservation was successful. Their address is 3436 Deer Valley Road
What's their phone number? Do you know if they serve pasta?
Their phone number is 925-777-0888. They serve Chinese food.
Thank you very much?
Can I help you with anything else?
No. Thank you
Have a good day
I need to make a reservation for a lunch date
What time should the reservation be for and what city?
Look in San Bruno for a reservation at quarter past 11 in the morning
What is the name of the restaurant you prefer?
Bj's is my first choice
Bj's restaurant & Brewhouse in San Bruno at 11:15 am today for 2 guest. Is that correct?
Yes that is correct.
The 11:15 am reservation is unavailable at Bj's Restaurant & Brewhouse. Shall I check for a open reservation for 2 today at 11:30 am .
Please check that for me.
You have reservations at 11:30 am for 2 today confirmed
Thank you for suggesting another time. That is all for now
Have a good lunch.
I would like to make a restaurant reservation.
In which city should I search and at what time? Do you have a preferred restaurant?
I would like to make a reservation at the Firehouse Grill in Sunnyvale at 6:45 pm on the 12th of this month.
Please confirm you would like to book a table for 2 at the Firehouse Grill & Brewery in sunnyvale at 6:45 pm on March 12th.
Yes. Do they serve Pizza and Pasta, and also liquor?
Your reservation is confirmed. They serve American food and they do serve alcohol.
Thank you very much!
May I help you with anything else?
No. Thank you.
Have a good day!
I want to go out to dinner next week. Can you make me a reservation for 7 o"clock in the evening?
Are you still in LA, if not where should I search?
No I left LA yesterday, find restaurants in Lafayette please.
Do you have a place in mind?
Yes, I really want to try The Park. See if it's available on the 6th.
The Park Bistro & Bar in Lafayette has one table for 2 available at 7 pm next Wednesday. Does that work?
Yes that's perfect. Do you know if a band is playing that night? Also do they serve Burrito food at the bar?
You're all set! There's no live music. However, they do serve the Bistro menu at the bar.
Awesome, thank you!
No problem. Anything else?
No that's it, thanks again.
Anytime, enjoy your day!
I want to make a reservation at a restaurant.
Which city should I search in? What time is the reservation for? Do you have a preferred restaurant?
I want a reservation at El Tesoro at 7:45 in the evening, in SFO.
Please confirm: Table reserved for 7:45 pm today for 2 people, at El Tesoro Taqueria & Grill in San Francisco.
Yes that works for me.
Sorry that time is not available, shall I reserve a table for 2 today at 7:30 pm at El Tesoro Taqueria & Grill?
Yes, that works for me.
Your reservation is successful.
What's their phone number? How pricey are they?
Their phone number is 415-202-0530, and their price range is inexpensive.
Thank you very much.
Can I help you with anything else?
No, thank you.
Have a good day.
I want to make a reservation at a restaurant.
Which city should I search in?
I want it on the 4th day of the month. I want the city of SFO.
What time is the reservation for? Do you have a preferred restaurant?
The restaurant is called Mission Beach Cafe. Make the reservation at 18:45.
Please confirm the following details: Booking a table at the restaurant Mission Beach Cafe located in the city of San Francisco. The dinner reservation is at 6:45 pm. The date of the reservation is next Monday and it is for 2 people.
That is incorrect, the restaurant is Hisui 2.
Please confirm the following details: The reservation is for booking a table at Hisui 2 for 2 people.
Yes that works for me.
Sorry, I was unable to make a reservation. Can I help you with anything else?
I want to make a reservation at the restaurant, and I want it to be Sunday this week.
Please confirm the following details: Booking a table at the restaurant Hisui 2 located in the city of San Francisco. The dinner reservation is at 6:45 pm. The date of the reservation is the day after tomorrow and it is for 2 people.
Yes that works, is the price intermediate priced or expensive?
Sorry, I was unable to make a reservation. Can I help you with anything else?
No. Thank you very much.
Have a good day.
I'd like to make a reservation at a restaurant.
Which city, and do you have a preferred restaurant?
The restaurant is Coupa Cafe in Palo Alto.
What time would you like the reservation?
Please make it for 4:45 pm.
Please confirm your reservation: A table for 2 at Coupa Cafe - Ramona in Palo Alto at 4:45 pm today.
Yes that works for me. Is it in the bargain price range?
It is in the moderate price range. Your reservation is successful.
What is their contact number?
Their phone number is 650-322-6872.
Thank you.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you.
Have a good day.
I would like to reserve a table at a restaurant.
Which city are you located in, and do you have a restaurant in mind?
The name of the restaurant is Marche Aux Fleurs. The location is in Ross, and the date is on the 10th.
What time would you like me to make the reservation?
I would like it to be a eleven am.
Please confirm the following information: I am booking a table for 2 at Marche Aux Fleurs in Ross. It is on March 10th at 11 am.
Yup sounds great to me.
The reservation has been booked successfully.
Thanks a ton!
Anything else I can assist you with?
Nope, that's it, thanks!
Have a good one.
I need to make a dinner reservation.
I need to know what city you want me to search, what time you want the reservation for, and if you have a particular restaurant in mind.
I need the reservation to be made for eleven in the morning at the Station House restaurant in Point Reyes Station.
Pleas confirm that you wish me to book a table for 2 at 11 am, today, at the Station House Cafe in Point Reyes Station.
It should be for 4 people.
Okay, for 4 people at 11 am; is this correct?
Yes, thank you.
I am unable to book a reservation at this time, sorry, is there something else I can help you with?
No thanks.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
I'd like to eat at Rivoli
Where is it? When should I book?
It's in Berkeley. Let's book for March 7th at 12 o"clock in the afternoon
Perfect. Can you check if i understood correctly? A table for 2 at Rivoli Restaurant in Berkeley for next Thursday at 12 pm?
yes, All correct
I've booked your table
Thank you
Is there anything else I can do?
No, I'm alright
Have a nice day
I would like to reserve a table at a restaurant.
At what restaurant and time would you like to dine?
I'd like to eat at Little Nepal, evening 6:30.
And in which city is that located?
I would like the reservation on the 7th; it's in SF.
All set. Just to confirm, I have reservations for 2 at Little Nepal in San Francisco next Thursday at 6:30 PM.
Yes, that would be great. Do they serve liquor? What's the exact address?
The reservation is successful. They do not serve alcohol. They are located at 925 Cortland Avenue.
Thanks a lot!
Can I assist you with anything further?
No. Thanks a lot.
Have a good day.
I'd like to make a restaurant reservation.
In which city? Do you have a restaurant you prefer?
I'd like Rubio's in Cupertino, if possible.
At what time?
17:30, please.
Please confirm a reservation at Rubio's Coastal Grill in the city of Cupertino today for 2 people at 5:30 pm.
Yes, that's perfect.
Your reservation is made.
What's Rubio's address? Do they serve Taiwanese food?
Their address is at 20688 Stevens Creek Boulevard, and their cuisine type is Seafood.
Thank you!
Will there be anything else?
No, thank you.
Have a great day!
Hi, I am going out with my friend soon. I would like to make a reservation at a restaurant.
What city would you like to make a reservation?
I would like a reservation for March 11th in San Rafael at 18:00.
Do you have a restaurant in mind?
I would like to go to Bj's.
I can book the restaurant now. Can you confirm a few things? I am booking a table at Bj's Restaurant & Brewhouse in San Rafael for 6 pm. The reservation is for 2 on March 11th.
Actually, can you make the reservation for twelve in the afternoon.
Can you confirm that the reservation will be from 12 pm for 2 people?
Yes that works. What is the address?
Your reservation has been made. The address is 5800 Northgate Mall Suite 159.
What is the price range? What is the phone number?
The price range is moderate. The phone number is 415-755-6250.
Thank you!
You're welcome! Do you need help with anything else?
No. Thank you !
Have a great day!
I am looking for a restaurant in San Ramon.
For what time?
For the 4th of March at 18:45 in the restaurant Yayume.
Can you confirm the following reservation at Yayume Sushi in San Ramon. Next Monday at 6:45 pm for 2 people.
Yes, that's good. Are they pricey?
I booked your reservation. Their prices are moderate.
Does the restaurant also serve Szcheuan food?
They have sushi.
Thank you.
Anything else i can help you with?
No. That was it, thanks.
Have a nice day.
I would like to reserve a table for dinner.
Where are you located? Are there any restaurants that you like specifically?
I like Babu Ji, in SFO. There will be four of us
What time would like to go to the restaurant?
At 5:30 in the evening.
Let's make sure all is correct. You want to make a reservation for 4 people at Babu Ji SF in San Francisco for today at 5:30 pm.
Yes, that's right!
The table has been reserved.
Is there live music at that restaurant?
No, there is not.
Ok, thank you, that will be all.
Enjoy your dinner!
I'd like to make a reservation at a restaurant.
Do you have a restaurant in mind? Also, what city and time would you prefer?
I want to go to Campo Fina in Healdsburg at 5:45 pm.
Shall I make a reservation for Campo Fina in Healdsburg for 5:45 pm today? The reservation will be for 2 people.
Yes, that's good. What type of food can I eat there?
The reservation is booked. The restaurant serves Italian.
Thank you, that's all I need.
Have a good day.
I would like to make a reservation at the restaurant Acquerello.
What time do you want the reservation and in what city should is search?
The reservation should be in San Francisco at 6:15 in the evening.
You want to make a reservation at Acquerello in San Francisco for 2 people at 6:15 pm today. Do I have that correct?
Yes, that is correct.
I wasn't able to make the reservation at Acquerello. Should I try a reservation for 2 today at 6 pm instead?
Yes, go ahead.
Your reservation has been made.
Thank you. That is all I need.
Your welcome. Have a good day.
I would like to make a reservation at Chef Zhao restaurant at 11 am
Do you have any particular city in mind?
Palo Alto would be great
Please confirm the following details: Booking a table at Chef Zhao Kitchen in Palo Alto at 11 am today for 2 people
Yes! That works for me.
Your reservation is successful
Is the restaurant costly?
The prices are moderate.
What is their address?
The address is 2180 West Bayshore Road #120
Thank you!
Can I help you with anything else?
No. Thank you very much
Have a good day.
I am meeting my brother to have a meal together so I want to make a reservation at seven in the evening.
I have a preferred restaurant. Make it in Millbrae.
I want the restaurant Yi Yuan in Millbrae.
Your reservation details which you should confirm are as follows; one table at Yi Yuan in the city of Millbrae at 7 pm. This has been booked for 2 people today.
Great! That is perfect. Now I need to know if they have live music?
Your reservation is complete and set but unfortunately there is no live music.
Thank you for all of your work.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. Everything is great, thank you.
Have a great day and evening.
I'd like to reserve a table at a nearby restaurant.
When would you like to dine? Which location would you prefer?
Let's set it up for 6:30 pm at Sakoon.
What location should I search?
It's located in Mountain View.
Let's make sure we have the details correct. We're booking you a table at Sakoon, in Mountain View. Your party of 2 will be dining at 6:30 pm today.
Actually, let's make it 7 pm.
Let's make sure we've got it right. Your reservation is for 7 pm, for a party of 2.
Let's make the restaurant Peacock's Koriander, on the 10th.
Let us know if the following details are correct: Your reservation is at Peacock's Koriander Indian Cuisine on March 10th.
That's right. What is their contact information?
We're sorry. I'm not able to reserve that day and time for you. Is there anything else we can help with?
That's it, thank you.
I hope you enjoy the rest of your day.
Can you find song's from Jason Aldean's ablum Night Train?
I found 1 song from Jason Aldean's Night Train album. The song is When She Says Baby.
What's its genre?
The genre is Country.
That's great.
Do you want to play the music now?
Sure.
Do you want me to play When She Says Baby on TV.
Please play it on the kitchen speaker.
Would you like me to play When She Says Baby on the kitchen speaker?
No. Please play it on the bedroom speaker.
Would you like me to play When She Says Baby on the bedroom speaker?
Yes, that's correct.
Started playing the song.
Thank you. That is all I need.
Have a good day.
I want to listen to some songs from the album Mint.
Do you want to listen to Why So Serious by Alice Merton, from her album Mint?
What is the genre?
It is a pop song.
That's good, please play the song.
So I'll play Why So Serious on the TV, okay?
Yes, pleas do.
The song has started playing.
Thanks, that's all I want for now.
Have a good day!
I would like to find some songs, the album Expectations would be a good place to find several good songs.
I can think of 6 songs you might find enjoyable. Do you think you would like Curious off the Expectations album by Hayley Kiyoko?
What musical category would you use to describe it?
I would classify it as a Pop song.
Let's try something else. Bebe Rexha plays songs I find enjoyable.
Okay there is one on the Expectations album from Bebe Rexha called I Got You. Would that be to your liking?
That one would be perfect, play it in my kitchen please so I can get dinner started.
Just to be sure you want to hear I Got You on the kitchen speaker. Right?
You got it.
The song has begun.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else you need?
No that will be all, thank you though.
Have a super day.
I am looking for some songs to listen to. Could you find pop songs that I can listen to?
Do you like the song Adorn by Miguel on the album Kaleidoscope Dream?
What other songs do you have? I really like songs by Shawn Mendes.
I found 7 songs that I think you might like. How about Aftertaste by Shawn Mendes from the album Handwritten?
What other songs do you have?
How about Bad Reputation by Shawn Mendes from the album Illuminate?
That is great.
Would you like me to play the music now for you?
Sure.
Please confirm that you would like me to play Bad Reputation on the TV.
No please play it on the kitchen speaker.
Please confirm that you would like Bad Reputation to be played on the kitchen speaker.
No I would like it to be played on the bedroom speaker.
Please confirm that you would like Bad Reputation to be played on the bedroom speaker.
Yes that is correct.
I have started playing the song.
Thank you for your time.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No thank you.
Your'e welcome, have a good day.
I'd like to find some music - I really like Metal.
Papa Roach's Born For Greatness from the album Crooked Teeth might be a good choice for you.
What other songs do you have? It doesn't need to be a specific album.
The song Cirice by Ghost from the album Meliora received a Grammy in 2016.
Do you have anything from the Soundtracks genre? I like Hiroyuki Sawano.
I found 1 song that fits what you're looking for: Perfect Time by Hiroyuki Sawano, from the album The Seven Deadly Sins Original Soundtrack. Does that sound good?
That works for me, can you play that?
Would you like to play the song Perfect Time from your TV?
Play it from my kitchen speaker instead.
You would like to play Perfect Time on your kitchen speaker?
Actually, play it in my bedroom instead.
You would like to play Perfect Time from your bedroom speaker?
Yeah, that sounds good.
The song will begin now.
Thank you, that's all I need for now.
Have a great day.
I'd like to listen to a song, it doesn't matter who sings it.
I've found 10 songs for you. How about High Horse by Kacey Musgraves from the album Golden Hour. Would you like to listen to it?
Please find a different song to listen to.
How about the song Carnivore by Starset off of the album Transmissions. Would you like to listen to it?
What genre is that song?
That song is a Rock song.
Good, I'd like to listen to that song. Please play it on the kitchen speaker.
Please verify the following details. You'd like to hear Carnivore on the kitchen speaker. Is that correct?
Yes, that is right.
I've started the song. Enjoy.
Thanks, that's all.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Hey, can you help me look for some songs?
There's a song called Yottabyte by Martin Garrix from the album The Martin Garrix Experience.
Can you tell me what kind of song it is?
It's from the House genre.
Do you have anything else? I'm an Alan Walker fan, and I also really like Pop Songs.
There are 2 songs you might enjoy. There's Alone by Alan Walker from the album Different World, how about that?
That sounds really good.
Would you like me to play the song?
Yeah, put the song on the kitchen speaker please.
You'd like me to play Alone on the kitchen speaker, is that right?
On second thought, no. Please play it on the bedroom speaker.
You'd like me to play Alone on the bedroom speaker, is that right?
Yeah, that is right.
The song has started.
Thanks so much.
Can I help you out with anything else?
No, thanks again.
Alright, have a good day.
Can you find me some songs like those of Dia Frampton?
How about Walk Away by Dia Frampton from the album Red?
Perfect, thank you!
Should I play it now?
Yes, that'll be great.
Please confirm: playing Walk Away on the TV.
Yes, that's great. What genre is it?
The song is playing. It's a Pop song.
Thank you very much!
Can I help you with anything else?
No, that'll be it.
Have a great day!
Can you find me some Pop songs to listen to?
There are 10 songs I found. Do you like Adorn by Miguel from the album Kaleidoscope Dream?
What are my other choices? Rihanna has songs I like.
You may like California King Bed by Rihanna from the album Loud which is one of 6 songs found.
Do you have anything from the album Unapologetic?
I found Pour It Up from the Unapologetic album by Rihanna. How does that sound?
That sounds perfect.
Would you like to hear the song now?
Yes.
I will be playing Pour It Up on TV for you if that is alright.
Please.
The song has begun.
You are the best. I don't need anything else at the moment.
Enjoy the music.
Will you find me some songs to listen to? I am open to anything you find.
How about A Little Bit Stronger by Sara Evans from the ablum, Stronger?
What type of music genre is it?
Country
Can you find some Pop songs?
I just found 10 songs, How about Adorn by Miguel from the Kaleidoscope Dream album?
That's great! Thank you!
Shall I play it now?
Yes , Play it on the kitchen device.
Are you wanting me to play Adorn on the kitchen speaker?
Ive changed my mind, Play it on my bedroom speaker.
To confirm, you are wanting me to play Adorn on your bedroom speaker.
Yes, Play it in the bedroom.
The song is starting.
Thankyou, This is all I need for now.
Have a good rest of your day.
i love Reggae music. Can you help me find some songs?
Have you listened to the Where We Come From album by Popcaan? I especially like the song Addicted.
Awesome, sounds good!
Should we listen to the music now?
Yes! We can play it on my phone or wherever.
Do you want to play Addicted on the TV?
No, please use the speaker in kitchen instead.
Do you want to play Addicted on the kitchen speaker?
Yes please.
The song is now playing.
Thanks a lot!
How else may I help you?
That's all. Thanks!
Have a good one!
I'm looking for help with some songs from Happiness Begins.
How about Sucker by Jonas Brothers on Happiness Begins?
What else?
I couldn't find another song matching your query. Can I help with something else?
How about a good song from Dangerous Woman.
There's Be Alright by Ariana Grande from Dangerous Woman.
What's the genre?
It's Pop.
Great, play is on my kitchen speaker.
Please confirm: Play Be Alright on kitchen speaker.
That's right.
Playing now.
Thank you.
Anything else I can help with?
No, thanks.
Have a nice day.
Can you find me some rock songs?
I found 10 songs. What about Are You Ready by Disturbed. It is from the album Evolution.
That's great.
Should I play the song now?
Sure.
I will play Are You Ready on TV. Is that correct?
No, play it on my kitchen speaker.
Playing Are You Ready on the kitchen speaker. Is that correct?
No, sorry. Play it on the bedroom speaker.
Playing Are You Ready on the bedroom speaker. Is that correct?
Yes.
The song has started playing.
Thanks.
Can I help you with something else?
No thanks.
Enjoy your music. Have a nice day.
Can you find me some songs in album Expectations?
There are 6 songs you may like in album Expectations, including Curious by Hayley Kiyoko.
What else is there?
What about I Got You by Bebe Rexha in Expectations?
Something else. Find another Hayley Kiyoko song. I like Pop songs.
I found 3 songs. What about Let It Be by Hayley Kiyoko in Expectations?
That will be good.
Shall I play the music now?
Yes. Play the speaker in kitchen
Shall I play Let It Be on the kitchen speaker?
No, actually. Play it from my bedroom speaker.
So, play Let It Be on bedroom speaker?
Yes, that's right.
Song is playing.
Great, thank you.
What else can I do for you?
Nothing. That is all.
Ok. Goodbye my master.
Can you find me some songs please. I enjoy pop songs.
I found 10 options. What about Adorn by Miguel from the album Kaleidoscope Dream?
That sounds good.
Would you like it to play now?
Yes, please play it.
Please confirm the play Adorn on the TV.
Actually, play is on the speaker in kitchen.
OK, please confirm to play Adorn in the kitchen speaker.
That is great.
The song is starting.
Thank you again.
Have a nice day.
I'm in the mood for some music. Can you find songs from the album Camila.
What about the song Consequences from the album Camila by Camila Cabello?
I'm not in the mood for that one, do you have a different song?
What about the song Real Friends from the album Camila by Camila Cabello?
What is the genre of the song?
Real Friends is a Pop song.
Sounds good.
Do you want to hear the song now?
Yes, I would love to.
You want to play Real Friends on your TV?
No, I would prefer to play it on my kitchen speaker.
You want to play Real Friends on your kitchen speaker?
Yes, that's right.
The song is now playing.
Thank you very much.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that is all. Thank you for your time.
Enjoy your music. Have a wonderful day.
Could you play a song off of the Heroes album?
How about Sabaton's Night Witches off of the Heroes album?
What genre is that song?
It is metal.
Great, thank you.
Should I play the song now?
Yes, please play it on my kitchen speaker?
Please confirm that you want me to play Night Witches on your kitchen speaker.
That is correct.
I have started playing the song.
Great, thank you.
Can I help you with something else?
No, thank you though.
Have a great rest of the day.
I'm in the mood for some music. Can you find me some Jon Pardi songs?
Sure, what about Head Over Boots by Jon Pardi off the California Sunrise album?
Let's try something else. Do you have anything by Our Last Night? I like Metalcore music.
Yes, I found 1 song you might like. I can play Same Old War by Our Last Night off the Oak Island album.
Okay great, let's play it.
Let's confirm the details: play Same Old War on the TV.
Yes, perfect.
Song is now playing.
Thanks!
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thanks.
Have a great day!
I'm in the mood to listen to some music, can you find my some Pop songs?
What about Adorn from the album Kaleidoscope Dream by Miguel?
Do you have any other songs?
What about African Beauty form the album A Boy From Tandale by Diamond Platnumz?
Sounds perfect.
Would you like to play the song now?
Yes. I want it to play on the kitchen speaker.
You want to play African Beauty on the kitchen speaker, is that correct?
I want it to play on my bedroom speaker instead.
You want to play African Beauty on the bedroom speaker, is that correct?
Yes, that is what I want.
The song is now playing.
Thank you for your time, that was everything.
I am happy to help. Have a great day.
Can you search me some songs? There are many nice songs in the album All The Little Lights
We have 1 songs you may like. How about Let Her Go by Passenger in album All The Little Lights?
What about its genre?
Its a Pop song
Thats superb
Do you wanna play the music now?
Ofcourse sure. Play it on any available device.
Please confirm this : Playing Let Her Go on TV
No Play it on my kitchen speaker
Please confirm this : Playing Let Her Go on kitchen speaker
Yes thats perfect
Started playing the song on the kitchen speaker.
Thanks a lot
What else can I assist?
No Thats all. Thank you
Have a wonderful day ahead
Can you find me some songs by the Konshens's?
How about Bruk Off Yuh Back by Konshens? It's from the album It Feel Good
What kind of song is it?
It's a Reggae song.
What other ones do you have because I like reggae songs a lot and those from the album It Feel Good
I found 1 more song you might like. How about Turn Me On by the Konshens? It's from the album It Feel Good
Perfect, play it now on any device.
Should I play Turn Me On on the kitchen speaker?
Yes, that's fine
Starts song.
Thanks!
Anything else?
Nope
Have a good one.
I like Foster The People songs and can you look for some songs for me?
Do you have any opinion on Houdini by Foster The People in album Torches?
I am interested in Camila Cabello songs especially Pop songs. Do you have any other thing?
Do you have any opinion on Consequences by Camila Cabello in album Camila?
Any other thing you are having?
Do you have any opinion on Real Friends by Camila Cabello in album Camila?
That is cool
You like to start the music now?
yes, for sure
please give confirmation details: Play Real Friends on TV
No, Play the music on Kitchen Speaker
Please give confirmation details: Play Real FRiends on Kitchen Speaker
No, i want you to play it on speaker in the bedroom
Please give confirmation details: To play Real Friends on bedroom speaker
That is perfect
Started running the music
Thank you very much
Have a nice day
It is leisure time for me . I like to hear some Country songs.Could you find me?
I wish to help you.I found one song. It is A Little Bit Stronger by Sara Evans in album Stronger.Do you want?
Anything else? Actually I like Mitchell Tenpenny's songs.The album Telling All My Secrets have many good songs.
Yes.Would you like Drunk Me by Mitchell Tenpenny in album Telling All My Secrets?
That's nice to hear. I want to play the song.
Would you want to play Drunk Me on TV
Not in TV.Play the song on Kitchen speaker.
Do you want to play Drunk Me on Kitchen speaker?
Sorry, Not in Kitchen speaker.Play it on Bedroom speaker.
That's fine.Do you want to play Drunk Me on bedroom speaker?
Yes, you are right.
started playing the song.
Thank you for did what I need.
You are welcome. Have a nice day.
I'm in the mood to listen to some music. Can you help me find some songs?
I found a song you might like. What about the song Girl Crush by Little Big Town from their album Pain Killer?
Anything else you can find?
Sure, what about Nights by Frank Ocean from his album Blonde?
Can you find any Courier songs?
Would you want to listen to San Francisco by Courier from The Present Tense album?
What kind of song is it?
It's a Pop song.
Cool, I wanna listen to that song. Please play it on the kitchen speaker.
Okay, so you want me to play the song San Francisco on the kitchen speaker, right?
No, please play it on my bedroom speaker.
Alright, I'm going to play San Francisco on the bedroom speaker. Is this okay?
Yup, that sounds good.
Okay, the songs playing now.
Great, thanks! That's all I needed.
Have a nice day!
Could you research music for me, perhaps rock songs?
What are your thoughts about Are You Ready in the album Evolution by Disturbed?
What other singer options do you have?
There are 9 songs that you may like. What are your thoughts on Be Somebody by Thousand Foot Krutch in their album, The End Is Where We Begin?
That's a good one, I want to play the song.
Please confirm that Be Somebody should be played on TV.
This is correct.
The song is now playing.
Thanks.
How else can I help?
That is all. Thank you.
Have a pleasant day.
I would like to find some Electropop songs on the album Pure Heroine.
What about Buzzcut Season by Lorde on the album Pure Heroine?
What else can you show me.
How about Team by Lorde on the album Pure Heroine?
That song is perfect. Please play that one.
Please confirm you wish to play Team on the TV.
No, please play it on the kitchen speaker.
Please confirm you wish to play Team on the kitchen speaker.
Yes, that is correct.
The song will begin to play.
Thank you for your help.
Is there anything else I can help you with today?
No, thank you. That is all I need today.
Have a great day!
Hi. I am looking for some Pop songs. I like Frank Ocean's songs. Could you please find them for me.
Sure. I have 4 songs you may like. And what do you think about Ivy by Frank Ocean in album Blonde?
That's great. I love that.
Can I play the music for you now?
Of course. Please play it on kitchen device.
OK. I will play Ivy on kitchen speaker
yeah. That's great.
Yes, here you go.
Uhm. Thank you. This was all I looking for.
Thank you. Have a good day.
I want to listen to some music, can you find me some, preferably reggae?
How about Addicted by Popcaan, from the Where We Come From album?
What else is there? I also like country music.
How about All On Me by Devin Dawson, from the Dark Horse album?
That sounds great, please play that.
So I'll play All on Me on the TV, okay?
Yes, that's a good idea.
The song has started.
Thanks a lot.
Anything else I can help you with?
No, that's all for now, thanks.
Have a good day!
Can you find some country songs?
I found All On Me by Devin Dawson from the album Dark Horse.
Play song on kitchen device.
Please confirm: Playing All On Me on kitchen speaker.
Yes, thank you.
The song has started playing.
Thanks, that's all.
Have a great day.
I am looking for some songs. Can you look for songs in the album A Star Is Born Soundtrack.
How about Alibi by Bradley Cooper from the album A Star Is Born Soundtrack.
Anything else you can suggest?
How about Always Remember Us This Way by Lady Gaga from the album A Star is Born Soundtrack.
What else?
Maybe you'd like Before I Cry by Lady Gaga from the album A Star Is Born Soundtrack.
That one is great, I want to play it.
Please confirm that you want to play Before I Cry on TV.
Yes, play it.
Song is playing.
What is the genre.
Its genre is Soundtracks.
Thank you, that was all.
Have a nice day.
I'm looking for some songs.
I found 10 songs for you. How about I Want You by Taylor Parks on We Need To Talk.
Anything else? I like Jinjer, especially their King of Everything album.
There's Pisces by Jinjer on King of Everything.
What genre is that?
It's metal.
Great, play it now.
Please confirm: Play Pisces on tv.
That's right.
Playing now.
Thanks.
Anything else I can do?
No, thanks.
Have a nice day.
Would you help find me some songs? I really like Alan Walker's songs especially on the album Different World.
I have located 2 songs you may like. Would you wish to hear Alone by Alan Walker form the album Different World?
What other choices might there be? I really like Pop songs.
I located 1 song you may wish to hear. What about Darkside by Alan Walker from the album Different World?
Yes, I would like to hear that.
Is there anything else I can help with.
I would like to hear the song.
Please confirm: you wish to hear Darkside on TV?
Yes that is accurate.
The song will start playing now.
Thank You
Is there anything else I can help with?
No thank you thats all.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you find me some songs? Any album is fine.
I have found 10 songs you may like. How does A Little Bit Stronger by Sara Evans in the album Stronger sound?
That's great.
What else can I help with?
I want to play the song.
Should I play A Little Bit Stronger on the TV?
Yes, that's correct.
Started playing the song.
Thanks, that's all I need.
Have a good day.
I want to hear some Rock songs.
There are 10 available. Would you like to hear Are you Ready by Disturbed from the album Evolution?
Not really. Is that all there is?
Would you prefer Be Somebody by Thousand Foot Krutch from the album The End is Where We Begin?
That does not appeal to me. I am interested in just about any Country song.
I have found 10 sounds that might interest you. Would you like to listen to All on Me by Devin Dawson from the album Dark Horse?
Yes, that would be awesome.
Would you like to listen to it now?
Yes. I want to hear it on the kitchen speaker.
You would like to hear All on Me on the kitchen speaker?
No, I want to hear it on my bedroom speaker.
You would like to hear All on Me played on your bedroom speaker?
That right.
The music has started.
Great. That would be all.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Could you find me some songs to listen to? I like Jake Owen.
I found 1 song you might like. What do you think about Alone With You by Jake Owen off of his Barefoot Blue Jean Night?
What genre is it?
It's a country song.
Great. Play the song.
Can you confirm these details? Play Alone With You on TV.
Yes, that's right.
Started playing the song.
Thanks! That's all I need.
Have a good day.
I really like Metalcore songs. Could you look for some songs?
How about Adrenalize by In This Moment in the album Blood?
Do you need something else? I like songs by In This Moment. Any album should be good.
I have 5 songs that you should like. What about Big Bad Wolf by In This Moment in the album Black Widow?
That is good. I would like to play the song. Play it on the kitchen speaker.
Please confirm that you want to play Big Bad Wolf on kitchen speaker.
Yes, that is right.
I have started playing the song.
Thank you. That is all I wanted.
Have a great day.
Can you find me pop songs, I hear there are good ones in the album Vessel.
How about the songs Fake you out on Twenty One Pilots album Vessel?
Is there anything else? I do like Twenty One Pilots' songs
Maybe the song Truce? It's on the same Vessel album by Twenty One Pilots
That sounds cool
Want it played?
Yes, blaast it on the speaker in kitchen please.
So you want Truce played on the kitchen speaker?
Actually put it in the speaker in the bedroom.
So Truce on the bedroom speaker yeah?
Yup that's right
Playing it now
Thanks so much!
Anything else you need?
Nah we're good
Take care ok!
I need help finding some music.
How does Pretty Girl Team by Alkaline Trip off of their album Alkaline Masterpiece?
What type of music is this?
It's in the Reggae genre.
Nah, anything else? I really like the music on the album Covers.
How does Without Me by Alec Chambers off of the album Covers sound?
What genre is this?
It's considered Pop.
That sounds pretty good.
Want to give it a listen now?
Sure, sounds good.
Just to make sure, you want to hear Without Me on TV.
Actually, play it on my kitchen.
Okay. Just to make sure, you want me to play Without Me on the kitchen speaker.
You got it.
Your music has started! Enjoy!
Thanks, that'll do it for now.
Have a great rest of the day!
I'm looking for some Rock songs. I like the album Raise Vibration.
I found 1 song I think you'll like. What about Low by Lenny Kravitz on the album Raise Vibration.
Sounds good. Play the song on the kitchen speaker.
Please confirm: Play Low on the kitchen speaker.
Yes, that works.
Song has started playing.
Thanks so much.
Anything else I can help with?
No, that's all.
Have a great day.
I would like to listen to a Three Days Grace's rock song
Do you like Right Left Wrong by Three Days Grace in album Outsider?
It's good!
Play Right Left Wrong on TV: do you confirm?
No, play it on kitchen speaker
Play Right Left Wrong on kitchen speaker: do you confirm?
No, play it on my bedroom speaker, thanks
Right Left Wrong on bedroom speaker: it's correct?
Yes, it is
Started playing it
Thaks
Can I do anything else for you?
No, thanks
Have a nice day
Can you find me some Karolina Protsenko songs.
How about Despacito from the album My Dream by Karolina Protsenko?
Can you look up some Pop Songs?
I found 10 pop songs. Here is one, Adorn by Miguel from the album Kaleidoscope Dream.
Can I see the other options?
What about African Beauty from the album A Boy From Tandale by Diamond Platnumz?
Yes, let's play that song.
Play African Beauty on the TV?
No, play it on my kitchen.
Play African Beauty on the kitchen speaker?
No, play it on the bedroom speaker.
Play African beauty on the bedroom speaker?
Yes please.
Started playing African Beauty on the bedroom speaker.
Thank you , that is all I need.
Have a great day!
Can you help? I am trying to locate some songs.
Yes, be happy to. I have 10 songs to choose from. I recommend Take Me Away by Scotty Sire from the Ruin Your Party album.
That one sounds wonderful
Shall I play it now for you?
Yes, I'd like to hear that one
To confirm: you'd like to hear Take Me Away on the TV?
I'd rather hear it on my kitchen please
To confirm: You wish to hear Take Me Away on your kitchen speaker. Is this correct?
Yes it is, thank you. What's the genre of that song?
It is a Pop song. Your selection has started.
Thank you for your help.
Is there anything else I can do?
No that will be all for now.
Have a great day.
I'm in the mood for some music, can you find me some good pop songs from The Bright Side album?
I found 1 song you may like. How about Blue Skies by Lenka - it's on The Bright Side album.
That sounds great.
Anything else I can help you with?
Please play the song on my kitchen device.
I'm ready to play Blue Skies on the kitchen speaker, okay?
Yes, please go ahead.
The song has started.
Thanks a lot, that's all I need for now.
Have a good day!
I want to explore some music.
I have 10 songs I can recommend. How would you like When She Says Baby by Jason Aldean from Night Train album?
What genre is it?
That would be country music.
Fantastic. Can you play it on the kitchen speaker?
So you want When She Says Baby played on the kitchen speaker?
No I rather like it on my bedroom speaker.
Can you confirm that you want When She Says Baby played on the bedroom speaker?
That would be right.
The song has begun playing.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else you want?
No, thanks.
Have a nice day!
I like Black Veil Brides's songs. Can you find me something to listen to
I found 1 song named Wake Up. It is on the album Vale by Black Veil Brides
Let me hear that one
So you want me play Wake Up on the TV?
That is correct.
I am playing the song now.
Awesome. Thanks for the help.
Can i help you with anything else?
No thanks
Enjoy your day.
Can you find me a Metal song?
What about Born For Greatness by Papa Roach from the album Crooked Teeth?
That sounds great. Play that song.
Let's confirm: Play Born For Greatness on the TV.
Yes, that's what I said, isn't it?
I am playing the song.
Okay, don't need you to tell me that.
Have a nice day.
Can you help me find some good Reggae songs?
I know 10 great reggae songs. Do you want to hear Addicted by Popcaan off of the Where We Come From album?
Do you have any Busy Signal music off of the Dolla Van Riddim album?
I got 1 song called Dolla Van by Busy Signal off of the Dolla Van Riddim album.
Okay, that's cool. Can you play in on my kitchen speaker?
You wan to hear Dolla Van on the kitchen speaker?
No my bad I meant to say play it on the speaker in the bedroom.
Are you sure you want to hear Dolla Van on the bedroom speaker.
Yes, I am sure.
Okay. The song is about to play on the bedroom speaker.
Cool. Thanks that's all I need.
No problem, see you later.
I need new music to listen to. Can you suggest any Pop songs?
I found 10 songs you might like. Interested in Miguel's Adorn from Kaleidoscope Dream?
Any other options? Lots of good music can be found in Jack Stauber's Pop Food.
I found 2 songs by Jack Stauber, one called Buttercup from Pop Food.
I love it!
You wanna jam out now?
Oh yeah! Play that funky music kitchen device!
Playing Buttercup on the kitchen speaker!
Nah, play it on the bedroom speaker.
Can you play buttercup on the bedroom speaker?
Sure I can!
The song is playing!
Thanks a lot!
Anything else, pal?
Nah, thanks bro.
Have a good one.
Hearing a song is a beautiful entertainment. It fills my mind with very good thoughts.Will you find me some songs?
There are 10 songs according to your interest. How about this song Singles You Up by Jordan Davis in album Home State? Whether you like it?
Tell me about its genre.
this song is a country song
ok that's great . that sound goods to me.
Whether i need to play the music now?
Yes , please play the music
Ok please check and confirm the following details: Play Singles You Up On TV.
Please change the device as Kitchen speaker
Ok once again confirm the following details: Play Singles you Up on Kitchen speaker
Ok That's great and play it now.
started playing the song
Thanks a lot for your help
Whether i need to find any other thing?
No. Thanks for your immense help
Take care have a great day
Can you please find some pop songs?
Do you like Adorn from the the album Kaleidoscope Dream by Miguel?
I actually like Lady Gaga's music better.
What about Bloody Mary from the album Born This Way by Lady Gaga?
I like that!
Do you want to hear the song now?
Yes please.
Confirm you want to play Bloody Mary on the TV.
Yes, please!
The song is now playing.
Thanks for your help!
Do you need further assistance?
No, that will be all.
See you soon!
I'm looking for some good songs in the Golden Hour album.
There are 4 good songs in the Golden Hour album by Kacey Musgraves. What do you think about the song Butterflies?
I enjoy listening to Kacey Musgraves's songs. Are there any other good songs on the album?
There are 3 more good songs in the Golden Hour album by Kacey Musgraves. What do you think about the song High Horse?
What other songs would you recommend?
Another good song is Slow Burn by Kacey Musgraves in the album Golden Hour.
What's the genre of this song?
The genre for the song is Country.
That's good to know.
Would you like to play the music now?
Yes, please.
Please confirm that you would like to play Slow Burn on the TV.
Yes, I would like to play Slow Burn on the TV.
Slow Burn is now playing on the TV.
Thank you very much.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
I'm okay for now, thank you.
I hope you have a good day.
Please give me some song recommendations.
How about the song Shake Me Down by Cage The Elephant, in their Thank You Happy Birthday album?
Sound great, and I want to hear it. Please play the song.
Please confirm that you'd like to play the song Shake Me Down on TV.
That's right. What kind of song is it?
Now playing the song. The song's genre is Rock.
Thanks a lot.
Will you be requiring my help for anything else?
That will be all, thanks.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you play some pop songs? I especially like Ciara.
I located 1 song for you. Would you like to listen to Ciara's Thinkin Bout You from the album Beauty Marks?
Perfect, thank you.
Should I play it now?
Yes, right now.
Play Thinkin Bout You on TV.
Actually I want to listen to it on the kitchen speaker.
Play Thinkin Bout You on kitchen speaker.
Never mind, I want it on the speaker in the bedroom.
Playing Thinkin Bout You on bedroom speaker.
That is right.
Song is playing.
Thanks very much.
Do you need anything else?
Not right now, thanks.
Then take care.
I need help finding some songs.
How about Reggae Music by Kabaka Pyramid of his Kontraband album?
Sounds good. Let's hear it.
Just to make sure, you want to listen to Reggae Music on TV.
You got it.
Your music has started.
What genre is this?
It's in the Reggae category.
Thanks, that'll be everything.
Enjoy your day!
I would like to find some songs from the album Covers.
There's 1 song from Covers that you might enjoy. What about Without Me by Alec Chambers?
What's its genre?
It's a Pop song.
Nice, Play it.
Are you sure you want to play Without Me on the TV?
Actually, play it on the kitchen speaker.
Are you sure you want to play Without Me on the kitchen speaker?
Yes, I'm sure.
The song has begun.
Thanks. That'll be it for now.
Have a good day.
Can you find some songs in the album Experiment? I enjoy Country songs a lot.
There are 3 songs you may enjoy. What about Homesick by Kane Brown in Experiment.
Do you have any other options or singers?
There are 2. Do you like Lose it by Kane Brown in Experiment?
What others do you have?
What about weekend by Kane Brown in Experiment?
I like that!
Should I play the music?
Yes, please do so.
Okay, will play Weekend on TV.
Sounds like a plan!
The song starts to play.
Thanks, that is perfect.
Have a nice day!
Can you find some songs from Marshmello? I like the genre House.
What about the song Blocks by Marshmello from the album Joytime?
That sounds good. Play the song on the kitchen speaker.
Please confirm: Playing Blocks on the kitchen speaker.
No, play it in my bedroom please.
Please confirm: Playing Blocks on the bedroom speaker.
Yes, that's right.
Playing song now.
Thank you. That's all.
Anything else I can do for you?
No, that's it.
Have a great day.
Could you find me some songs? I like Rihanna's songs, but any type of song works too.
What do you think about California King Bed by Rihanna, from her album Loud?
There are many good songs in Loud. Do you have anything else? I especially like Reggae songs.
How about Man Down, also from Rihanna's Loud album?
That's great.
Do you want me to play it now?
Sure, you can play it now.
Just to make sure, you want me to play Man Down through the TV.
Yes, that's right.
I have started to play the song.
Thank you very much.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, thank you.
Have a good day.
Please play a song from the Frozen album.
Would you like to hear In Summer by Josh Gad from the Frozen album?
Yes, please play the song.
You want to hear In Summer on the TV. Is that correct?
Yes, please play the song.
Now playing your song.
Thank you, this is very helpful.
Is there anything else I can help with?
No, thank you. I'm good.
Have a nice day!
I'm looking for some Olly Murs songs, can you find me some?
I found 1 song from the album You Know I Know by Olly Murs called Moves, would you like that one?
What kind of song is it?
The genre is pop.
That sounds perfect.
Shall I play it now?
Yes, put in on the kitchen speaker
To be certain, you want me to play Moves on the kitchen speaker?
On second thought, play it on bedroom device my bedroom.
Okay, verifying that you want to play Moves on your bedroom speaker
That's right, play Moves in my bedroom
I will play the song now
Thanks so much
Is there anything else you need?
No, that will do it, thanks
You're welcome, have a good day
Can you find some Shenseea songs for me?
I have Time Up from Shenseea's album Big A Presents One Chance Riddim. Is that okay?
What genre is it?
Oh, that is Reggae.
Okay I like Reggae, that is fine.
Anything else I can help you with?
I want you to play the song. Please play it on my kitchen speakers.
Just to confirm, you would like me to play Time Up on your kitchen speaker?
Yes that's right.
I just started the song.
Thanks for your help, that's what I needed.
Have a wonderful day.
Find me songs similar to Tyler childers' songs
How about Tyler childers white house road from the album purgatory
That would do
Do you want to play it now
Sure, play it
Playing white house road on TV
Yes that is right
Started playing the song now
Thanks, that would be all.
Have a great day
Can you recommend me some song? I'd like Pop songs from any album.
How about Miguel's Adorn, in the album Kaleidoscope Dream?
Any other recommendations? I'm fine with any singer.
I have 9 recommendations for you. How about African Beauty by Diamond Platnumz? It's from the album A Boy From Tandale.
Sounds great. Please play the song on the speaker in kitchen.
So you'd like me to play African Beauty on kitchen speaker?
Yes, please.
The song has begun.
Thanks.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thanks.
Have a nice day.
Could you find me some songs from the album Purgatory?
I have found 1 song you may like from the album Purgatory by Tyler Childers it is called White House Road.
What is the genre
It is a country song.
Awesome, Play the song.
Is this correct? Play White House Road on TV.
No, Play on the kitchen speaker instead.
Ok, is this correct? Play White House Road on kitchen speaker.
No. Play it on bedroom speaker.
Is this right? Play White House Road on bedroom speaker.
Yes, that's right
Started playing the song
Thank you, that is all.
Have a good day.
can you discover some music for me? I love Reggae music.
I discovered 10 music you may enjoy. What's your opinion about Addicted by Popcaan in the lbum Where We Come From?
Do you have other alternatives? I enjoy music by Sammielz. There's plenty of wonderful music in the album The Beginning.
I discovered 1 music you may enjoy. What's your opinion about Let Us Be by Sammielz in the album The Beginning?
That's wonderful.
Do you require assistance with anything else?
I'd like to cast the music on any available device.
Please verify the following information: cast Let Us Be on TV.
Yeah, that's perfect.
The music began casting.
Thank you; that's all.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
I'm way bored and want more music now. Can you find something like Popcaan?
There are 4 tracks which may match your interest. Would you like to play Addicted by Popcaan, from the album Where We Come From?
Anything else? I love Reggae.
I have found 3 songs which may match your interest. What do you think about Everything Nice by Popcaan, from the album Where We Come From?
Not really feeling it. What else do you have?
How about the track Silence by Popcaan, from the album Forever.
That sounds fantastic right now.
Would you like to play this track?
Yeah, play it on the kitchen speaker.
Please confirm the following informaiton: play Silence on kitchen speaker.
Yes, that is correct.
The track is playing now. Enjoy your music.
Thank you so much.
Of course. Is there anything else I may do to help you?
No, this song is amazing, Thank you.
Of course. Have a fantastic day.
Can you please find me Linkin Park songs?
I have found 5 songs by Linkin Park. How about Battle Symphony from the album One more Light?
What other options are there?
How about Linkin Park's Final Masquerade from the album The Hunting Party?
What other options are there?
How about Linkin Park's Good Goodbye from the Album One More Light?
That one.
Do you want to play this song now?
yes. Play it on the kitchen device.
please confirm the following request: play Good Goodbye on the kitchen speaker?
Yes. What is the genre of this song?
This song will begin playing. It is an Electropop song.
Thanks!
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No I am all set.
Have a great rest of your day.
I am interested in some songs, I do like Pop songs especially and songs from Frank Ocean.
Would you be interested in Ivy from the Frank Ocean album Blonde?
That sounds great.
Shall I begin playing the song now?
Sure, play the song on the speaker in kitchen.
You want to play Ivy on the kitchen speaker, right?
On second thought, play the song on the bedroom device?
Understood, you want to play Ivy on the bedroom speaker instead.
Yeah, that is correct.
The song has begun playing.
Great, thanks for your help!
Anything else I can help you with?
That will be all, thank you.
Have a good day, enjoy.
I want to listen to some songs.
I've found 10 you might like. The first is Jesus and Jack Daniels by Justin Moore from the album Late Nights and Longnecks.
What kind of music is that?
It's a Country song.
That sounds pretty good.
Should I play it now?
Yes, please. Go ahead.
Just to make sure, I'm going to play Jesus and Jack Daniels on the TV.
Can you play it on the kitchen speaker?
Okay. So, I will play Jesus and Jack Daniels on the kitchen speaker.
Wait, never mind. Please play it in my bedroom.
Sure. I'll play Jesus and Jack Daniels on the bedroom speaker.
Yes, that will work.
Okay. Playing the song now.
Thank you so much!
Is there anything else I can help with?
No. That will be all. Thanks!
Have a great day!
I need helping finding songs by Alan Menken.
I have Kingdom Dance by Alan Menken from the Enredados album.
What music genre is the song?
The song is in the soundtracks genre.
That works for me, can you play that song?
Would you like to hear Kingdom Dance on your TV?
No, can you please play it on the speaker in kitchen?
You want to hear Kingdom Dance on the kitchen speaker, correct?
Yes that is right.
Your song choice is not playing on the designated device.
Thank you so much.
Did you need help with anything else?
No that will be all today.
Okay, enjoy the rest of your day.
I'd like some music. Can you find some songs in album K?
Sure! From album K I'd recommend Worst Ends by Kozoria.
Anything else? Maybe something Pop? There should be a lot of great songs in album Expectations.
From Expectations I would recommend playing Curious by Hayley Kiyoko.
Yes, that's great. Please play it on the kitchen speaker.
Please confirm that you'd like me to play Curious on the kitchen speaker.
On second thought, better play it on the bedroom device.
OK. Please confirm that you'd like to play Curious on the bedroom speaker.
Yes, I confirm.
I've started playing.
Thanks a lot. That will be all.
Have a good one!
Can you find me some country songs? I like them very much.
I found 10 songs that might interest you. How about A Little Bit Stronger by Sara Evans which is in the album Stronger?
What else have you got?
How about All on Me by Devin Dawson which is in the album Dark Horse?
That's a great choice.
Do you wish the music to be played now?
Yes please. Play it on kitchen device.
You want me to play All on me on kitchen speaker; Shall I go ahead and play the song or you want me to change anything?
That is absolutely what i want. Go ahead and play the music.
Song is being played now. Enjoy the music.
Thank you. You are amazing.
Can I help you with anything else?
No. That will be all. Thank you.
Have a great day.
Hey, can you find me some music? I really like Electronica
Do you like the song Gold, from the Nick Murphy album Built on Glass?
Do you have anything else? I love the album The King of Limbs.
I found 1 you may enjoy. Do you like the song Lotus Flower, from the Radiohead album The King of Limbs?
I love it. Play it.
Just to confirm, you want me to play the song Lotus Flower on the TV?
Yes, thats it.
The song is now playing.
Thanks.
Can I help you in anything else?
No, thank you.
Have a good day.
I'd like to hear some Pop music.
Kaleidoscope Dream by Miguel has the lovely Adorn on it.
What about Singular Act I. Any good tunes on there?
Singular Act I? Yeah. At least 3. We have Almost Love by Sabrina Carpenter.
Keep going.
Singular Act I by Sabrina Carpenter, lets see. How about Paris?
Yeah. Play that on the speaker in kitchen.
Paris on kitchen speaker, right?
Check that. Make it the bedroom speaker.
Paris on the bedroom speaker?
Yes. Paris on the bedroom speaker.
Paris is playing in your bedroom.
Great, but what about the song? I mean, thanks.
Could I get you something else. Like a date?
No thanks, Wise Guy.
Enjoy yourself then.
Hi I need some new songs, specifically songs by The Chainsmokers.
What about Everybody Hates Me by The Chainsmokers from the album Sick Boy?
What genre is that?
The genre is Pop.
That's perfect.
Should I play the music now?
Yes, play the music in my kitchen.
I'm playing Everybody Hates Me on kitchen speaker, is that correct?
Yes that's perfect.
The song has started playing.
Thanks, that's everything I needed.
Have a pleasant day.
I am looking for songs on the album Home State.
I found 2 songs; Singles You Up by Jordan Davis on the album Home State.
What else is there?
Next is Take It From Me by Jordan Davis on Home State.
What is the genre?
It is a Country song.
That's it, please play it in my kitchen.
Playing Take it From Me on kitchen speaker.
Yes, that's great.
*Device plays song*
Great, thank you.
Anything else today?
That is all, thanks.
Have a nice day.
Could you please find me some music? I like Jack Stauber's songs as well as Pop songs.
How about the song Buttercup by Jack Stauber on the album Pop Food?
Perfect.
Would you like to play the music now?
Yes please. Play it on the kitchen speaker.
Please confirm the following: Play Buttercup by Jack Stauber on the kitchen speaker.
No. Please play it on my bedroom speaker.
Please confirm the following: Play Buttercup by Jack Stauber on the bedroom speaker.
Yes, that is correct.
Starting the song.
Thank you, that is all I need.
Have a good day.
Can you help me find some music by Shashi Lal Yadav?
Of course: How about Naya Naya Penhi Salwarba from the album No Line Signal Likhat Ba by Shashi Lal Yadav?
Okay, great - can you play the song?
So you'd like to play Naya Naya Penhi Salwarba on your TV?
Yeah - what kind of music is this classified as?
It's classified as Country.
Thanks, great.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, that's all for now.
Have a great day.
I love Rock songs, could you find me some?
I found about 10 songs, what about Are You Ready by Disturbed in their album Evolution?
Do you have anything else?
Do you like Be Somebody by Thousand Foot Krutch in the album The End Is Where We Begin?
Great, I want to listen to it. Play the song on my kitchen.
Confirm the details please: play Be Somebody on kitchen speaker
No, play the song on my bedroom speaker.
Confirm the details please: play Be Somebody on bedroom speaker
Yes.
I've started playing the song for you.
Thank you, that's it.
Have an amazing day.
I like to listen to song like Disturbed, do you have any suggestions of others that are similar that I might like?
What are your thoughts on the song Are You Ready on the Evolution album by Disturbed?
I also like the artist Alec Benjamin and other Pop songs, do you have any other suggestions?
You may like Boy In the Bubble by Alec Benjamin on the album Narrated for You. If not, I have 7 other song suggestions.
Do you have any other suggestions? I've already heard those.
How about Gotta Be A Reason by Alec Benjamin which is also on the album Narrated for You?
I really like that one!
Would you like to listen to it?
Yes please!
To confirm, you would like to play the song Gotta Be a Reason on your TV?
Actually would you please play it on the speaker in kitchen?
To confirm, you would like to play the song Gotta Be a Reason on kitchen speaker?
Sorry, play it on the speaker in the bedroom.
To confirm, you would like to play the song Gotta Be A Reason on bedroom speaker?
Yes please!
The song has started to play.
Thanks!
Is there anything else I can help you with at this time?
That is all, thank you!
Okay, have a nice day.
I'd like a song from the Stars Dance album
There's 1 song called Love Will Remember by Selena Gomez from the Stars Dance album.
What genre is it?
Pop.
Perfect.
Shall I play this song?
Yes, please.
Please confirm the song: Love Will Remember on TV.
No, I'd like it on the kitchen device.
Please confirm the song: Love Will Remember on the Kitchen Speaker
Correct
Start playing
Thanks.
Is there anything else?
No
Have a wonderful day.
I really like Taylor Swift's songs, especially from her album Speak Now. Would you be able to help find me songs similar to those?
Have you heard, The Story Of Us by Taylor Swift? I found 1 song you may like that's from her Album, Speak Now.
That sounds like a great idea.
Shall we begin playing the music?
If that is what you would like, of course!
Is the play, The Story Of Us on TV right now?
Correct. What's the genre?
The song that started playing was a Pop song.
Thanks. I have everything I need.
I hope you enjoy the rest of your day.
Can you find me some music to listen to? I'm a big fan of Rihanna.
I found 7 different songs by Rihanna that you might like. How about California King Bed from the album Loud?
That's perfect, thanks.
Do you want to listen to it now?
Yes please, play it on the kitchen speaker.
Okay, please confirm that you want to listen to California King Bed on the kitchen speaker.
Yes, that's perfect thanks. What genre is it?
It's a pop song. It's playing now.
Thanks so much.
Is there anything else I can do?
No thank you, that's all.
Okay, see you.
Can you find me any Khalid songs?
I found 1 song: Better by Khalid on his album Free Spirit.
What is its genre?
It is a pop song.
I want you to play it.
To confirm:: You want me to play Better on your TV?
No, play it on the speaker in kitchen.
To confirm: You want me to play Better on the kitchen speaker?
Yes
I started plying the song.
Thank you. That's all.
You're welcome. Have a nice day.
I'm looking for some songs. Maybe Jon Pardi or anything Country.
I've got 2. How about Head over Boots from Jon Pardi from California Sunrise.
Sure. Play it.
To confirm: Playing Head Over Boots on TV.
That's right.Thank you.
Enjoy the song
I appreciate your help.
Will there be anything else?
No, that's it.
Take care now.
Will you find some good songs by Lady Gaga from A Star is Born Soundtrack?
How about Always Remember Us This Way by Lady Gaga from A Star is Born Soundtrack?
Great.
Should I play it now?
That would be great.
Playing Always Remember Us This Way on TV.
Cool. What's the genre?
It's a Soundtracks song.
Thanks.
Anything else?
No, that's all for now.
Have a nice day.
I would like to listen to music on the album Shatter Me.
Roundtable Rival by Lindsey Stirling is 1one of 2 songs found on the Shatter Me album.
Can you find the genre?
The genre is Pop.
Super.
May I play the song for you?
Yes, on the kitchen speaker.
I will be playing Roundtable Rival on the kitchen speaker if that is right?
That's right.
The music has begun.
You're the best help.
Enjoy the music and the rest of the day.
Hey, could you find me some songs? I'm thinking pop, stuff like that album, Assume Form.
Here are 2 songs you may like. As for Assume Form, would you like to listen to Barefoot In The Park by James Blake as well?
Thanks, that'll be great.
Would you like the music to play now?
Yep!
Now about to play, Barefoot In the Park on the TV, confirm to begin.
Yep, that's it.
Now playing.
Thank you.
Anything else I can help you with?
No, that's all, thanks tonnes.
Alright then, have a good day.
Would you find me some music?
I have compiled 10 songs you might enjoy. Does the song by Michael Ray called One That Got Away off the Amos sound interesting?
What category would that be in?
It is considered a Country type of song.
That's the one I want to hear on the speaker in kitchen.
You want me to cast One That Got Away to kitchen speaker. Is that right?
Absolutely.
The song is playing now.
Thanks much that will be all.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you find me Pop songs like the ones in Forbidden?
You may like 1 song I found. It's called Dem Beats by Todrick Hall from the album Forbidden.
Ok great.
You want me to play the song now?
Yes of course
You want me to put on Dem Beats on the TV, right?
Yes.
Here it is.
I appreciate that.
Anything else?
Not at all.
Take care.
I like Taylor Swift. Can you help me find some of her songs?
I found 1 song by Taylor Swift you might like. Would you like to try The Story Of Us from the album Speak now?
What genre is it?
It's a Pop song.
That's great.
Would you like to play the music now?
Sure. Play it on the kitchen speaker.
Playing: The Story Of Us on the kitchen speaker. Is that right?
Yes, that's right.
The song has started.
Good. Thank you.
Can I help you with anything else?
No. Thank you.
Have a good day.
I'm looking for Soundtracks to listen to. I really like the song on Purple Reign.
1 song you may enjoy is Wicked by Future on the album Purple Reign.
Yeah play that one.
Please confirm: Play Wicked on TV.
Actually play it on my kitchen device.
Please confirm: Play Wicked on kitchen speaker.
Confirmed.
Playing now.
Thanks, that's all.
Have a nice day.
Please find me some songs, i think Center Point Road has some good ones.
ok, i have Look what God gave her by Thomas Rhett form the album Center Point Road
That sounds good!
Should i play it now?
yes play on any device
ok, please confirm: playing Look what God gave her on TV
ok, correct. Whats the genre of it?
Playing the song. Its a Country genre
Thanks a lot
Any thing else?
No, thats it
Have a good day!
WOuld you find me some Shawn Mendes songs?
What do you think about Aftertaste by Shawn Mendes from the Handwritten album?
Do you have something else?
What about Bad Reputation by Shawn Mendes in Illuminate?
Is there something else? I like the songs in Handwritten.
I have 3 songs I think you'd like. What about Never Be Alone by Shawn Mendes in Handwritten?
What is the genre?
It's a pop song.
That sounds good. Play it on the speaker in kitchen.
Please confirm that I should play Never Be Alone on the kitchen speaker.
No, play it on my bedroom speaker.
Please confirm that I should play Never Be Alone on the bedroom speaker.
Yes, that is right.
I started playing it.
Thanks, that is all I was looking for.
Have a great day.
I'm looking for some songs, and I particularly like the Pop genre.
There are 10 songs you may like. What about Adorn by Miguel from the album Kaleidoscope Dream?
That sounds good.
Would you like to play the music now?
Sure, go ahead.
You would like to play the song Adorn on the TV, is that correct?
Yes, that's fine.
The song has started playing.
Thank you very much.
Is there anything I can help with?
No, that's it.
Have a nice day.
I love to hear songs which makes me relax and enthuastic. Will you find me some songs?
Whether you like song Cups by Anna Kendrick in album Pitch Perfect?
Ok , will you tell what's its genre?
fine , actually it is a Soundtracks song.
Whether any other songs do you have?
How about this song Generation Why by Conan Gray in album Sunset Season?
Ok that's good . sounds good to me.
Whether i need to play this song now?
Sure. Play it and use Kitchen device to play
Ok check and confirm the following details so that i will play, song name is Generation Why on Kitchen speaker
ok, that's good. What's its genre?
Song is playing now. Actually it is a Pop song.
Thanks a lot for your help
Whether i need to find any other thing?
No. Thanks , not now.
Take care have a great day
Could you find me some good songs in the album Halcyon by Ellie Goulding?
I found 1 song you might enjoy. Listen to Burn by Ellie Goulding from the album Halcyon.
What type of genre is the music?
The song is of the pop genre
Cool.
Do you want to listen to the recommended song?
Yes.
Please confirm: play Burn on TV
No. Please play it on my kitchen.
Please confirm: Play Burn on kitchen speaker
No. Please play it on bedroom speaker.
Please confirm: Play Burn on bedroom speaker.
Yes, thank you.
Started playing the song.
Thanks.
Can I help you with anything else?
No. Thanks.
You're welcome, have a good day as well.
Can you find me some music?
I sure can. Do you like Imagine Dragons? I think you'd like Radioactive, it's on the album Night Visions
No, I don't really like that one. Do you have anything else?
What about Justin Moore? The song Jesus and Jack Daniels is good, it's on the Late Nights and Longnecks album.
No, not that one. Anything else? Do you have something pop, like on the Halcyon Days album?
Okay I've found 2 Ellie Goulding songs. What do you think about Beating Heart? It's on the Halcyon Days album.
Yes, perfect! Can you stick that one on please?
Do you want me to play Beating Heart on the TV?
Can you put it on the speaker in kitchen instead?
Sure. Happy for me to play Beating Heart on the kitchen speaker?
Yes please!
I've put it on for you
Thank you! I don't need anything else
No problem, enjoy the song!
Could you find me some songs? There are many good ones in the album Battleground!
I think I just found 1 song you'd like. What do you think about Glad You Came by The Wanted in their album Battleground?
That is great!
Do you want to play it now?
Yeah, play it on the kitchen speaker!
Do you really want to play Glad You Came on kitchen speaker?
Yes! I want it to play on the kitchen speaker.
Playing the song.
Thank you very much.
What else can I help?
Nothing. Thank you.
Have a good day!
I'm wondering if you could find some songs for me. I like songs by Karolina Protsenko.
OK I found 3 possible options. How about Despacito from the My Dream album? It's by Karolina Protsenko.
Can you suggest something else?
Sure, how about Girls Like You by Karolina Protsenko? It's from her album called Fly.
Is there something else you can suggest? I'm a big fan of pop songs, and there are really a lot of good ones on the album Fly.
Another song I could suggest from the album Fly is Let Me Love You by Karolina Protsenko.
That's a good one.
Would you like to hear that right now?
OK, could you play it on my kitchen device.
Sure, confirming the following: starting Let Me Love You on your kitchen speaker.
That works for me.
The song has begun to play.
Perfect, I'm all set then.
Great, have a terrific day.
I'd like to listen to some music.
I found 10 songs for you. Would you like to listen to Sick Love by Red Hot Chili Peppers from the The Getaway album?
What other songs do you have?
What about The Champion by Carrie Underwood from the Cry Pretty album?
What else is there? I like El Alfa. I also like Latin music.
I found 1 song for you. What about Suave by El Alfa from the El Hombre album?
That's a good one.
Would you like me to play the song?
Yes.
Play Suave on your TV. Is this what you want?
Yes.
The song has started.
Thank you. That is all.
Have a nice day.
I'm looking for Frank Ocean songs.
I found 4 songs. There's Ivy by Frank Ocean from the album Blonde.
What's the genre?
It's pop.
Great, play it for me.
Please confirm: Play Ivy on tv.
Yes, play it.
Playing now.
Thanks, that's all I wanted.
Have a nice day.
I really like Jah Cure's songs, can you find me some reggae songs.
There is 1 song that I think you may like, it's called Before I Leave from Jah Cure album titled World Cry.
That song sounds great.
Would you like to play the music now?
Yes, play it on the speaker in kitchen over there.
Do you want me to play Before I leave on kitchen speaker
No. Can you play it on the bedroom speaker
Do you want me to play Before I leave on the bedroom speaker
Yes, that is correct
i just started playing the song
Thank you. That is all I need
Have a good day.
Can you help me find some songs?
I found 10 songs you may like. How about Team by Lorde from the album Pure Heroine?
What is the genre of the song?
It is an electropop song.
What other songs do you have?
There is the song The Lost Battalion by Sabaton from the album The Last Stand.
What is the genre?
It is a Metal song.
Are there any other songs?
Yes, what about Dark Necessities by the Red Hot Chili Peppers from the album The Getaway?
Yes, that's great!
Would you like me to play the song now?
Yes
Okay, would you like me to play Dark Necessities on the TV?
Yes, that is correct.
I have started playing the song.
What is the genre?
It is a pop song.
Thank you for your help.
Is there anything else I can help with?
No, thank you.
Have a great day.
Hey, I'd like to listen to some Pop songs.
Sure. How about Adorn by Miguel from his album Kaleidoscope Dream?
That's okay. Do you have anything else?
I also have African Beauty by Diamond Platnumz from their album A Boy From Tandale queued up.
Do you have anything else? I don't care which album.
Would you like Aftertaste by Shawn Mendes and his album Handwritten?
That sounds great. Yes.
Should I play it now?
Yes. Please play it in my kitchen.
Okay. So, I should play Aftertaste on the kitchen speaker.
Actually, no. Please play it on my bedroom device.
Okay. So, I'm going to play Aftertaste on the bedroom speaker.
Yeah, that would be perfect.
I started the song.
Thank you so much.
Is there anything else you need?
No. That's about it. Thanks.
Have a wonderful day.
I really like pop songs. Are there any that you can recommend for me?
How about Miguel's song Adorn, from his Kaleidoscope Dream album?
I like songs by Jack Stauber. Do you have anything by that artist?
What about Jack Stauber's song Buttercup, from his Pop Food album?
There are a lot of good songs on the Pop Food album. Do you have anything else like this?
Here is 1 song I think you will like. Oh Klahoma by Jack Stauber. Also from his Pop Food album.
This is excellent!
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
Play this song on my kitchen speaker.
Please confirm. Would like me to play Oh Klahoma on your kitchen speaker?
Actually, let's play it on the Bedroom speaker.
Please confirm. Would you like me to play Oh Klahoma on your bedroom speaker?
Yes please play that song.
Song is playing.
Thanks you very much.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
Nope that's it.
Enjoy your day!
Can you to help me find some good Rock songs?
Yes, I have found 10 rock songs you may like. Would you like to hear Are You Ready by Disturbed from their Evolution album?
I prefer Upchurch's songs. Do you have the album Creeker?
I have 1 song from the Creeker album by Upchurch, named Pond Creek Road, would you like to hear that one?
Yes, I would love for you to play that one.
Okay, just to make sure I am correct, you would like Pond Creek Road to play on the TV?
Yes, please and thank you.
That song will begin playing shortly
Great, that is all I needed to day. Thank you so much.
No problem, enjoy the rest of your day.
Could you please help me in finding some songs? There are some really good songs in album The Gaza Don.
Would you like to listen to Summer Time by Vybz Kartel from the album The Gaza Don?
What other options do you have? There are really good songs in album Expectations. I like Pop songs.
Are you interested in Curious by Hayley Kiyoko from album Expectations?
Are there any other options? I like songs by Hayley Kiyoko.
I have found 3 songs that you may like. Would you like to listen to Let it be by Hayley Kiyoko from album Expectations?
That would be really great. Can you play it on my kitchen?
So you want to listen Let it be on Kitchen speaker?
Yes. That is absolutely correct.
The song has started.
Thank you. That's all I needed at this moment.
Have a nice day.
Hi, can you help me find some songs by Blake Shelton?
Okay, I found 2 songs by Blake Shelton. What do you think about I Lived It in the album Texoma Shore?
That's great.
Do you want to listen now?
Yes I do.
Just to be sure, you want to listen to I Lived It on TV?
Yes, that's right.
Okay, playing now.
What's the genre of this song?
This is a Country song.
Thank you, I'm all set.
Have a good day.
Can you find me some songs? I like a lot of the songs in the album called El Hombre. My favourite songs are Latin songs.
I've found 1 song that you might like. Do you like Suave by El Alfa from the album El Hombre?
Perfect.
Would you like to play the music?
Yes. Play in on any device.
OK so you would like to play Suave on the kitchen speaker.
That's right.
The song has started playing.
Thanks, I don't need anything else.
Enjoy your day.
I'm searching for a song, maybe from the Oak Island album
There's 1 song called Same Old War by Our Last Night from the Oak Island album that you might like.
What genre?
metalcore
nice
Should I play the song now?
Yes, in my kitchen.
Please confirm your song choice: Same Old War, playing on the kitchen speaker
No I'd rather play it on the bedroom device
Confirmation of song details: Same Old War on the bedroom speaker
Correct
Song is now playing
Thanks for your help
Have a wonderful day.
find some music for me please.
OK, How about Bloody Mary by Lady GaGa off her Born This Way album?
I really enjoy pop like Sabrina Carpenter. Got anything like that?
How about Almost Love off Singular Act I album by Sabrina Carpenter?
No, give me more options please.
Ok, How about Paris by Sabrina Carpenter off the Singular Act I album?
That sounds good. play this on kitchen speaker please.
Sure, please confirm: play Paris on kitchen speaker. Does this sound right?
No wait. play this on speaker in the bedroom please.
Sure, please confirm: play Paris on bedroom speaker. Is this correct?
Yes that is right.
Music has started playing.
Thanks.
your welcome, will there be anything else?
No, that's it for now.
Ok, have a great day.
I am looking for Reggae songs and Iakopo 's songs.
How about Never Letting Go by Iakopo from the album Waves?
Okay. That sounds great.
Would you like me to play it now?
Yes. Play the music.
Please confirm: You want me to play Never Letting Go on TV.
Yes, That is right.
Song is playing. Enjoy the music.
Okay. Thank you very much.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. That will be all. Thank you.
I ma glad I could help. Have a great day.
Can you find me any Westlife songs?
I found 2 songs you may like. What do you think about Better Man by Westlife in the album, Spectrum?
That sounds great. Play the song on the kitchen device.
Please confirm these details: Play Better Man on the kitchen speaker.
No. Play the song on the bedroom speaker.
Please confirm these details: Play Better Man on the bedroom speaker.
Yes, that is correct.
Song has begun playing.
What is the song's genre?
It is a Pop song.
Thank you. That is all I need.
Have a good day.
I am going to have a party tonight and I love Karolina Protsenko. Can you find me some of their songs?
I have an album called My Dream. I was wondering if you had listened to Despacito by Karolina Protsenko and what you think about it?
I think that is wonderful. I want to play that song later on tonight at the party.
I wanted to make sure that you are going to play Despacito on the TV tonight
Yes I am, that is correct
The song has begun
Thank you for playing the song. That is all I need for now
I hope the rest of your party is good.
I would like you to find some songs, I would prefer Country songs.
Would you enjoy one by Devin Dawson? It is called All On Me from his Dark Horse album.
I am not worried about what album its from but give me some more choices please.
I pulled up 9 songs.Perhaps All The Girls Wanna Ride from the album Kuntry by Jawga Boyz would suit you.
Your right that one would be great.
Would you like to hear it now?
Certainly on the speaker in kitchen.
Just to be sure you want All The Girls Wanna Ride played on kitchen speaker, correct?
No I think I'd rather lay down so play it on the speaker in the bedroom instead.
You are requesting All The Girls Wanna Ride be played on bedroom speaker, is that right?
Exactly right.
The song has begun to play.
Thanks, I won't be needing anything else right now.
Have a joy filled day.
I likes Justin Bieber's songs especially from the album Purpose.
I have found one 1 named Sorry by Justin Bieber from the album Purpose.
What is the genre of the song?
Sorry by Justin Bieber from album Purpose is a Pop song.
I would like to play the song.
Can I play the song Sorry on TV?
Play the song Sorry by Justin Bieber on kitchen speaker
Can I play the song Sorry on kitchen Speaker.
Yes. Please play the song Sorry on kitchen speaker
The song Sorry has started playing on kitchen speaker.
Thank you. That is all I need.
Have a good day.
A good Pop song would really help to improve y mood today
I can play Adorn by Miguel from the album Kaleidoscope Dream for you.
Do you have something different for me? I'm a Shawn Mendes fan.
I can play for you Aftertaste from the album Handwritten by Shawn Mendes.
mmmm.... not my favorite, anything else?
From the album Illuminate, I have picked Bad Reputation by Shawn Mendes.
You've picked a great song, play it on speaker in kitchen.
Confirm the last action. You want to play the song bad reputation on the kitchen speaker
yes, it's what I'm waiting for.
I'll play it for you right away.
great!
Is there anything else you want me to do?
No, it's fine
bye bye!
I would like some help finding some music.
I can help with that. Would you like to hear Written in Sand by Old Dominion off of the Happy Endings album?
No. Do you have anything else?
How about Blue Skies by Lenka off of the The Bright Side album?
No, I don't want to hear that either. Do you have anything else?
Have you heard Let Me Love you by Ariana Grande of her Dangerous Woman album?
I'm not sure, what genre is it from?
The genre is Pop.
Okay. I would like to hear that song. Can you play it on any available device?
You want to hear Let Me Love You on your TV?
No. Can you play it on my kitchen speaker?
You want me to play Let Me Love You on the kitchen speaker, correct?
Yes please and thank you.
No problem, the song is beginning.
Great! Thanks for all your have. Bye
You are welcome. Bye.
I am looking for some songs to listen to. Could you find me some Shawn Mendes songs?
I found 7 songs. How about Aftertaste by Shawn Mendes in his album Handwritten?
What else do you have? Any Pop song is good.
I found 6 songs. How about Bad Reputation by Shawn Mendes in his album Illuminate?
What about any Jessie J's song in the album Who You Are?
I found 1 by Jessie J. It is Mamma Knows best in album Who You Are.
That sounds great.
Would you like me to play it now?
Yes and could you play it on the speaker in kitchen?
Yes. You want me to play Mamma Knows Best on kitchen speaker?
No, actually, play it in my bedroom.
Ok, you want me to play Mamma Knows Best on bedroom speaker?
Yes, that is correct.
Ok, the song is now playing.
Ok, that is all I need. Thank you!
My pleasure. Have a great day.
I like Metal songs, can you find me some?
I found 10 songs, how about Born For Greatness from Crooked Teeth by Papa Roach?
Perfect let's play that.
Please confirm Born For Greatness on TV.
Yes, that's what I want.
The song is starting.
Thank you very much.
Can I do anything else for you?
No that's all I need.
Have a great day.
Can you find me some Country music? I love it.
How do you rate A Little Bit Stronger in Stronger album by Sara Evans?
I would like you to search for something else.
Give me your opinion of Devin Dawson song All on Me in album Dark Horse
Can you find songs by Jimmie Allen for me?
I like Jimmie Allen song Best Shot from Mercury Lane album. How about you?
I like it.
I want to hear the music now.
There you go.
I have Best Shot playing on TV. Would you like to hear it?
That's the one.
Now playing,
Thanks. I need nothing else by now.
Talk to you later.
I'm looking for some good music. My favorites are Electropop songs.
What about Battle Symphony by Linkin Park? It's from their album, One More Light.
What other ones do you have? I like some songs by Lorde.
Do you like Buzzcut Season? It's from Lorde's album, Pure Heroine.
I don't care too much for that. Do you have anything else?
How about Supercut from the Lorde album, Melodrama?
Sounds perfect. I'd like to hear it. Let's play it on the kitchen speaker.
Just to confirm - you want to play Supercut on the kitchen speaker?
No, I think I'd rather hear it on the speaker in the bedroom.
Okay, you want to play Supercut on the bedroom speaker, right?
Right.
I've started playing the song.
Thanks. That's all I need right now.
Okay. Have a great day!
Can you find me some good reggae songs from the Forever album?
I found 2 you might enjoy. How abaout Silence by Popcaan from the Forever album?
That sounds good, play that on the kitchen speaker please.
You want me to play Silence on the kitchen speaker?
Yes.
The song is now playing.
Thanks, that's it.
Have a good day.
Hi, i need a help, I like listening songs, I like the song in album When Was The Last time by Darius Rucker
Sure, i will help you, I found 1 song for you, do you like If I Told you by darius Rucker in the album When Was The Last time?
Yes, I like that song, Please play it on speaker in kitchen
Please confirm the following details: play If I Told you on kitchen speaker
Yes, What's its genre?
It is a country song, Started playing the song in kitchen speaker, Shall i help with you anything else?
No, thank you very much for your help, That is all i need.
You are welcome, have a great day
I'm in the mood for some music. Could you please help me find some songs?
The search has yielded 10 songs that might interest you. How does Better by Khalid, in the Free Spirit album sound?
What type of song is it?
Its genre is Pop.
Do you have another suggestion?
Yes. Would you like to listen to the song Neon Gravestones by Twenty One Pilots in the album Trench?
No, please suggest something else. Tell you what, I really like Nick Murphy.'s songs, especially from the album Built on Glass.
Okay. I found Gold by Nick Murphy in the album Built On Glass. Would you like to listen to the song?
What's its category?
It falls under the Electronica category.
Sounds perfect. Please cast it on my kitchen device.
Okay. Please confirm that you want Gold played on the kitchen speaker.
No, sorry, let's make that my bedroom, so that I can listen while I make my bed.
No problem. Please confirm that you would like Gold cast on the bedroom speaker.
Yes, you got that right.
Now playing the song.
Great! Thanks.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that will be all. Thank you.
Have a great day
Can you find me a song?
What about Change Your Life by Iggy Azalea from the album The New Classic?
Do you have a song from the album Handwritten?
I found 4 songs, what do you think of Aftertaste by Shawn Mendes from the album Handwritten?
Can you look from the album Cuz I Love You?
Do you want to hear Tempo by Lizzo it's from the album Cuz I Love You.
What is the genre?
The genre of the song is Pop.
That is good, can you play it on the speaker in kitchen?
Confirm: Play Tempo on kitchen speaker.
No, in my bedroom instead please.
Play Tempo song on bedroom speaker.
That is correct.
Started playing the song.
Thank you, that is all I needed.
Have a good day.
I'm trying to find some Pop songs.
I have 10 songs you might like. One of them is Adorn by Miguel from the Kaleidoscope Dream album.
Can you tell me some others?
From the album A Boy From Tandale by Diamond Platnumz, I have the song African Beauty.
Anything else please?
How about the Shawn Mendes song Aftertaste from the album entitled Handwritten?
Sounds good, I'd like to hear that one.
Confirming that I'll be playing the song Aftertaste on the TV.
Sorry, make that the speaker in kitchen.
Confirming that I will play Aftertaste on the kitchen speaker.
Yes, great, thanks.
The song has begun.
Thank you for your help.
Is there anything else today?
No, not right now.
Have a wonderful day.
I need some help finding music. I'm into Metalcore and I really the music off of the Black Widow album.
How about Big Bad Wolf by In This Moment off of their album Black Widow?
Is there anything else?
How does Sex Metal Barbie by In This Moment off of their Black Widow sound?
No, anything else?
Okay, how do you feel about Sick Like Me by In This Moment off of their album Black Widow?
That sounds awesome. Let's play it on the speaker in kitchen.
Just to make sure, you want to listen to Sick Like me on the kitchen speaker.
You got it.
Enjoy your song!
Thanks, that'll do it for now.
Have an excellent rest of the day!
I am trying to find some music to listen to. I really like Maty Noyes's music. Could you help me find some of his songs?
Sure, Maty Noyes has 1 song called New Friends in his album Love Songs From a Lolita. Would you like to hear it?
Yes, maybe. What is the genre of that song though?
This song is a Pop song. Will that work?
Yeah, that will be great! I'd like to hear it. Play it on my kitchen speaker.
OK, would you like to play New Friends on the kitchen speaker now?
No, actually play it on my bedroom device.
Alright, would you like to play New Friends on the bedroom speaker now?
Yes, that will be great.
Alright, the song should be playing now.
Thank you so much.
Can I help you with anything else?
No, that's all I need right now.
Ok, great! Enjoy the song!
Could you find me some songs that I will like. Country songs are my favourite, especially those by Kelsea Ballerini.
Here are 2 songs that you may want to listen to. How about we start with Miss Me More by Kelsea Ballerini from the album Unapologetically?
Thats great. Please play that on the kitchen speaker for me.
Just to confirm, you want to listen to Miss Me More on the kitchen speaker?
No, please play it on the bedroom speaker instead.
Can you confirm, Miss Me More on the bedroom speaker?
Yes, that would be great.
The song is now playing
Thanks, that's all
Have a good day.
I want to listen to some music off the album Assume Form.
There are 2 songs, one of them is James Blake's Barefoot In The Park off the album Assume Form.
Find something else. I like James Blake and Pop songs, in general.
How about 1 song from James Blake's album Assume Form called Mile High?
That's awesome! Thanks!
Want to listen to the music right now?
Yeah, put it on the kitchen speaker.
Just to make sure, you want to listen to Mile High on the kitchen speaker.
I changed my mind. Put it on the bedroom device.
Just to make sure, you want to listen to Mile High on the bedroom speaker.
You got it.
The song started.
Thanks a bunch.
Something else you want help with?
Nothing right now, thanks.
Enjoy the rest of your day!
Can you find me some songs? From any singer.
I found 10 songs. Would you like to hear California King Bed by from the album Loud by Rihanna?
What type of song is it.
It's a Pop song.
How about something else. Something from Dangerous Woman.
What about Be Alright by Ariana Grande from Dangerous Woman?
What kind of song is it?
It's another Pop song.
Perfect. Play it on any available device.
Okay, shall I play Be Alright on the TV?
No, make it the kitchen speaker instead.
To verify: You would like to hear Be Alright on the kitchen speaker.
Yes, that's right.
The song will start now.
Thanks! That's all I need for now.
Have a great day.
Find me some songs from album Telling All My Secrets
Found 1 song for you is called Drunk Me by Mitchell Tenpenny from album Telling All My Secrets
And the genre is?
It's a song of the category Country
Sounds great I like
Would you like to play it now?
Yes i would love that
Play Drunk Me on Tv ,is that correct?
Yes I confirm
Playng the song is started
Thank you very much!
Can I help you with anything else?
No.It is enough
Have a great day!
Could you find me some songs? I'd like Pop songs.
I found 10 songs you might like. What do you think about Adorn by Miguel from the album Kaleidoscope Dream?
What else did you find?
What do you think about African Beauty by Diamond Platnumz, from the album A Boy From Tandale?
What else do you have? There are a lot of good songs from the album The New Classic. I like Iggy Azalea 's songs.
I found 4 songs you might like. What do you say about Black Widow by Iggy Azalea, from the album The NEw Classic?
Sounds good.
Do you want me to play the music?
Sure thing.
Please, confirm the following details: play Black Widow on TV.
No, play it on my kitchen instead.
Please, confirm the following details: play Black Widow on the kitchen speaker.
Yup, that's correct.
Started playing the song.
Thanks a lot.
Can I help ypu with anything else?
Nope, thanks
Have a good one!
Can you find a song on the V album?
I found 1 song for you, Lost Stars by Adam Levine on V.
What genre is that?
It's pop.
Great, play it now.
Please confirm: Play Lost Stars on tv.
That's right.
Playing now.
Thanks, that's all I need.
Have a nice day.
I am a fan of Tyler Shaw and would like to hear one of his songs.
I found 1 option. Do you want to hear With You by Tyler Shaw in his album, Intuition?
Yes, I do.
Shall I play the music now?
Yes.
Are you sure you want to hear With You via the TV.
Yes, that's right.
The song is now playing.
What genre of music is this?
It is in the Pop genre.
Thank you, goodbye!
Have a great day!
Find me some pop songs.
Do you like Adorn by Miguel is the album Kaleidoscope Dream?
There are many good songs in the album Climate Change. Do you have anything by Pitbull?
There's 1 sing called Options by Pitbull from the album Climate Change.
That's a good one. Play it on the speaker in kitchen.
Shall I play the song Options on the kitchen speaker?
Hold on. Play it on my bedroom speaker.
No problem. So, you want to play Options on your bedroom speaker, right?
That's right.
The song Options is playing now.
Thank you very much.
Anything else for me?
No. I'm good. Thank you.
Have a great day!
Can you find a song from the album Expectations?
There is 6 songs, do you want to hear Curious by Hayley Kiyoko from the album Expectations?
A pop song by Hayley Kiyoko.
There is 3 songs, there is let it be by Hayley Kiyoko from Expectations?
Yes, play the song in my kitchen.
You want Let it be to play on the kitchen speaker.
No, play it in the bedroom speaker instead.
Let it be to play in the bedroom speaker.
Yes, that is correct.
Stared playing the song.
Thank you, that is all I need.
Have a good day.
I would enjoy listening to Pop songs at the moment, so can you help me find some songs?
How would you consider listening to Adorn by Miguel from the album Kaleidoscope Dream.
Is there some other option? I really enjoy the Classical songs.
How would you like listening to Cocaine March by Nico Cartosio from the Melting album?
Is there some other song I can listen to? I know that there are many nice songs in the Limitless album. For example I enjoy The Piano Guys songs.
Would you enjoy listening to Epiphany by The Piano Guys from the Limitless album?
That seems right. I would like to listen to this song now.
Can you please confirm that you want to listen to Epiphany on TV?
Actually no, because I would like for the song to be playing on kitchen speaker.
Can you confirm once again that you want to listen to the song Epiphany being played on kitchen speaker.
No that's not right because I want the song to be played in my bedroom.
Can you confirm that you want to listen to Epiphany on your bedroom speaker?
That seems right.
The song started playing.
I appreciate it.
Is there something else I can help you with?
Nothing. I am thankful.
Have a good time!
I would really love to listen to some good music.
There are 10 songs I can play for you. What do you say about Slow Burn by Kacey Musgraves from the album Golden Hour?
What kind of music is this?
It's Country.
I like it then.
Can I play it now?
Yes please and do it on the speaker in kitchen.
Confirm me your demand. You want to play the song Slow Burn on kitchen speaker.
No, it's not right. You have to play it on the bedroom device.
Okay, read and give me your input about it. You want to listen to the song Slow Burn on the bedroom speaker
Yes, I confirm you the operation.
I'll start it for you.
Thank you, you can let me listen to the song peacefully. Bye.
Enjoy it. Bye.
Can you find me some songs. I like the Jonas Brothers's album Happiness Begins.
I've got 1 song for you. It's Sucker by The Jonas Brothers from Happiness Begins.
Thanks, that's good.
Shall I play?
Yeah, play it anywhere.
Sure, please confirm: play Sucker on TV.
Yes. What's the genre?
Started playing Sucker. It's pop.
Thanks, that's it.
Have a great day.
Could you find me some songs like Jason Aldean?
I found 6 songs. What do you think about Dirt Road Anthem by Jason Aldean in album My Kinda Party?
What do you have else like Halsey songs?
What do you think about Colors by Halsey in album Badlands?
What else do you have?
What do you think about Control by Halsey in the album Badlands?
What's the genre?
It's an electropop song.
That's great. Can you play the song on my speaker in kitchen.
To confirm, I will play Control on the kitchen speaker.
Yes, that's correct.
The song has started playing.
Thank you.
What else can I help you with?
No. Thank you.
Have a good day.
I want to hear some songs.
I found 10. How about Blocks in the album Joytime by Marshmello.
What kind of music is it?
The genre is House.
Do you have others?
How about Low by Lenny Kravitz from Raise Vibration?
Do you have songs from the album Joytime?
I found 4. From Joytime, I have Find Me by Marshmello.
I like that song.
Do you want to hear it now?
Cast it on the speaker in kitchen.
Confirm Find Me on Kitchen speaker.
I confirm this song.
The song is starting now.
Thanks that is all.
Have a great day.
Hey, could you help me find some sons similar to music by Rebelution? I especially like their album Count Me In.
I have 1 idea I think you'll definitely like. How about Roots Reggae Music by Rebelution? Actually that song is even from the album Count Me In.
Sounds interesting. What's the genre, anyway?
The song's genre is Reggae.
Sounds perfect! Can you go ahead and play the song on my kitchen speaker?
You want to listen to Roots Reggae Music on the Kitchen Speaker, right?
Yep, exactly.
Okay I'm playing it now!
Thanks for the help.
Anything else that I can do?
No, that's all, thanks!
Okay have a good day then.
Can you find me some punk songs?
Sure, what about Get Lucky from Daft Punk 's album Random Access Memories?
That is fine.
Shall I play it now?
Yes, on the kitchen speaker, please.
Confirm play Get Lucky on kitchen speaker.
Actually, please play it in my bedroom.
OK, confirming to play Get Lucky on the bedroom speaker.
yes, that's great.
Playing the song now.
Thank you for that.
Have a nice day.
I would like you to find me some Dubstep songs.
What is your opinion about the song Free Fall in the Awake album by Illenium?
Are there any other things that you have?
What is your opinion of the song in the album Welcome Reality titled Promises that is sung by Nero?
Do you have any Pop songs that I really like?
What is your opinion about the song by Miguel in the album Kaleidoscope Dream titled Adorn?
I would love you to play that song.
Verify the details: On TV, play Adorn
You are correct.
The song started to play.
I have everything that I need, thank you.
I hope you have a good day.
find me a song in the album beauty marks
i found 1 song thinkin bout you by ciara in the album beauty marks
what genre
pop
play it on the speaker in kitchen
should i play thinkin bout you on kitchen speaker
no my bedroom speaker
should i play thinkin bout you on bedroom speaker
yes
now playing
okay
what else do you need ?
nothing
alright
Can you help me choose some songs from the album Burlesque Original Motion Picture Soundtrack?
Of course. There are 3 very good choices. Would you like to hear Express by Christina Aguilera from Burlesque Original Motion Picture Soundtrack?
What is the genre of that particular song?
Express by Christina Aguilera is a Soundtracks song.
What are some other choices?
Would you consider Show Me How You Burlesque by Christina Aguilera from Burlesque Original Motion Picture Soundtrack
No, I don't think so. Could you check for songs on the album Witness?
Yes. Katy Perry has Hey Hey Hey on Witness. Would you like me to play that song?
Do you know the genre of Hey Hey Hey ?
Hey Hey Hey by Katy Perry is a Pop song.
That sounds like a good one.
Would you like me to play Hey Hey Hey by Katy Perry?
Yes please I would like that very much.
To confirm: you wish to hear Hey Hey Hey by Katy Perry on TV?
That is accurate
The song has begun.
Thank You for your help.
Have a lovely day.
Could you find some good tunes to play.
I found 10. How about Dustin Lynch. Small Town Boy off Current mood is a good one.
What else do you suggest.
I like Muse Box by Madilyn Bailey. Titanium is good tune from that album.
How about some Reggae.
I see 10 of those. How about Addicted from Where We Come From by Popcaan?
Yeah. Give it a spin.
I'll play Addicted on your TV as soon as you confirm.
Negative. Play it on the kitchen device instead.
Addicted on the kitchen speaker?
You got it.
Addicted is playing on the kitchen speaker.
I hear it. Thanks.
You have another job for me?
No, just relax.
You too. Speak soon.
Please play some songs from the album So Good.
I found 1 song you might like: I Would Like by Zara Larsson in the album So Good.
What's the genre of the song?
It's a Pop song.
That's great. Please play it in my kitchen.
Please confirm that you would like to play I Would Like on the kitchen speaker.
No. Please play it on the bedroom speaker.
Please confirm that you would like the song I Would Like on the bedroom speaker.
Yes, that's correct.
I am playing the song.
Thank you. That's all I need.
Have a good day.
Could you help me find some pop songs? I really like James Blake's music
I found 2 songs you might like. How about Barefoot In The Park by James Blake, from the album Assume Form?
That's great!
Do you want me to play it for you now?
Sure
Please confirm the following details: play the song Barefoot In the Park on TV
Yes, that's right.
Starting song now.
Thank you.
What else can I help with?
Nothing, thank you.
Have a good day.
Can you find me some songs? I really like Pop.
How about Adorn by Miguel? Its on the album Kaleidoscope Dream.
What else do you have?
How about African Beauty by Diamond Platnumz's A Boy From Tandale Album.
What else do you have?
I have Aftertaste by Shawn Mendes. From the Handwritten Album
That is great.
You want me to play it now?
Ok, that is good.
Ok, you want me to play Aftertaste on the TV
No PLay it on the kitchen device.
Ok, would you like me to pay Aftertaste on the kitchen speaker?
Yes, thats right
Playing the Song
Thank you. That's it.
Have a good day.
I need helping finding some music.
There's 10 songs you might like. How about Curious by Hayley Kiyoko off her Expectations album?
Sounds pretty good.
Want to listen now?
Sure, why not.
Just to make sure, you want to hear Curious on TV.
You got it. What type of music is this?
Your Pop song has started!
Thanks a lot.
Anything else I can help you with?
Not right now, thanks.
Enjoy the rest of your day!
Can you find me some great songs on the Cloud Nine album?
Do you like the song Carry Me by Kygo on the Cloud Nine album?
I do like Kygo songs so what else do you have by them?
Search turned up 1 song with your preferences. Do you like Raging by Kygo on the Cloud Nine album?
What genre is it?
The genre is Downtempo.
That works for me. Please play the song.
You want to play the song Raging on the TV. Is that right?
No, I want it on the kitchen speaker.
You want to play the song Raging on the kitchen speaker. Is that right?
Yes, that is right.
Your song has started.
Thanks a lot.
Do you need anything else?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a great day.
Can you find me a couple of songs? There a good songs in the album Spectrum.
I have found 2 songs. How about the Better Man by Westlife in the album Spectrum?
What is the genre?
A Pop song.
Great. I would like to play that song
Please confirm the following: play the song Better Man on the TV
Yes, that is right.
I have started to play the song.
Thank you very much.
Can I help with anything else?
No, thank you.
Have a great day.
I want to hear some music, maybe from the album Superman?
Would you like to hear the song One Day on the album Superman? It is by Arash.
Sure. That sounds great.
Do you want to hear the music now?
Yes, please.
Please confirm the following: play One Day from the album Superman on the TV.
Yes, that's what I want.
Begin playing the song.
Thanks, that's all I needed.
Enjoy the music.
Will you find me Pop songs?
How about Adorn by Miguel from album Kaleidoscope Dream?
Anything else? Jai Waetford's songs from the album Heart Miles?
I found 1 song. Do you like Shy by Jai Waetford from the album Heart Miles?
Sounds good. Please play the song on kitchen speaker.
I am going to play Shy on kitchen speaker.
That's right.
Song is starting.
Thanks, that's it.
Have a great day.
Find me some songs like Rock songs
We got you 10 songs. How about Are You Ready by Disturbed in the album Evolution?
That's perfect. Please play the song.
Please confirm this: play Are You Ready on TV
I want to play it on kitchen speaker.
Please confirm this: play Are You Ready on kitchen speaker
That's good
Song started playing
Thanks a lot
Do you need anything else?
No. Its all good
Have a nice day
I want to sit back, relax, and listen to music on my day off. I like a lot of the songs on the album Bu Muhabbat, especially the songs by Shahzoda.
The 1 song I was able to find matching that criteria is titled Chicco by Shahzoda from the album Bu Muhabbat. Does that sound like something you would like to hear?
What genre is that song classified as?
It is considered to be a pop song.
That sound like my kind of music.
Would you like me to play that song for you now?
Please, play it on the speaker in kitchen.
Now playing Chicco on the kitchen speaker.
No I'm sorry, I'm going to lay down for a bit. Would you mind playing it on the speaker in the bedroom instead?
Not a problem. To summarize you want Chicco to play on the bedroom speaker.
Yes, please.
I will begin playing the song now.
Thank you, it's greatly appreciated.
Can I do anything else for you at the moment?
No, that will be all but thanks for asking.
It was my pleasure, have a good day.
Hello, Wassup! I wish to listen to some good songs by the Canadian singer Carly Rae Jepsen, probably from his recent album Dedicated that was released on May 17, 2019. Please can you search for some good one to listen? Any songs would be fine from his album.
Please give me a moment... I will look for the best song from the album Dedicated by Carly Rae Jepsen for you... Hey! I found a very nice song for you.. Did you like to listen to Now That I Found You?
Yup! Awesome... Just play the song ... Awaiting to hear the song.
Sure. Please confirm the details that you wish to hear to Now That I Found You in your portable device TV, right?
Yup! It makes sense.
The song is streaming in the TV.
Thanks for your time.
Do you need anything else?
Nope, done with.
Have a wonderful day.
Could you help me look for some songs? I love Agnes Obel.
How about Riverside by Agnes obel from her album Philharmonics?
Awesome. Please play the song on the speaker in kitchen.
Ok. Please confirm that you want to play Riverside on kitchen speaker
No, I guess play it on bedroom device my bedroom instead.
Confirm that you want to play Riverside on bedroom speaker please
Sure. That is right.
I will start playing the song.
Thanks
Do you need anything else?
No. I am all good. Thanks
Ok. Have a wonderful day!
I am in the mood to listen to Jon Bellion.
Would you like to hear Stupid Deep by Jon Bellion for them album Glory Sound Prep?
Yes, that is an excellent choice.
I would like to confirm the following: playing Stupid Deep on TV
No, I want to hear it in my kitchen.
I would like to confirm the following: playing Stupid Deep on the kitchen speaker.
That is fine. What is the musical genre?
Playing a Pop tune.
I appreciate that. That would be all.
Enjoy your day.
Can you find me some songs by Sia?
I found 5 songs you may like. How about Alive by Sia from the album This is Acting?
Do you have any Pop songs?
I found 4 songs. How about Bird Set Free by Sia from the album This is Acting?
Yeah, play that one. In my kitchen, please.
You want me to play Bird Set Free on the kitchen speaker?
No, actually, play it in my bedroom.
So play Bird Set Free on the bedroom speaker?
Yes, that's right.
Okay, I'm playing it now.
Thanks. That's all I need.
Have a nice day.
Could you find me some Pop songs to listen to?
How do you like the song Adorn by Miguel on his album Kaleidoscope Dream?
Awesome!
Do you want to hear some music?
Yes, you can play it on the kitchen device.
Can you confirm that you wanted to play Adorn on the kitchen speaker?
No thanks, I would like to hear it on the bedroom speaker.
Can you confirm that you wanted to play Adorn on the bedroom speaker?
Yes, that is correct, thanks.
I will now start the music.
Thanks!
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thanks.
Ok, have a wonderful day!
Can you find me some songs by Twenty One Pilots?
Do you like Fake You Out from the Twenty One Pilots album Vessel?
What other songs are there?
I found Neon Gravestones from the Twenty One Pilots album Trench.
What other songs are available? I like Inna's album Party Never Ends.
Do you like In Your Eyes from Inna's album Party Never Ends?
Yes, please play it in my kitchen.
Please confirm you want to hear In Your Eyes on the kitchen speaker.
That is correct. Which genre is it?
Now playing this pop song.
Thank you, that will be all.
See you soon!
Can you find a Country song?
I have found 10 songs. Would you like me to play A Little Bit Stronger by Sara Evans from her album Stronger?
No. Can you play something else?
Would you like me to play All on Me by Devin Dawson in the album Dark Horse?
Yes. That would be great!
Is there anything else I can do for you?
Can you play the song on the speaker in kitchen?
Am I correct that you want me to play All On Me on the kitchen speaker?
Yes you are correct.
I have started playing the song.
Thank you. I do not need anything else.
Have a good day!
I'm in the mood for some music. Find me any song to listen to.
How about A Little Bit Stronger from the album Stronger by Sara Evans?
Sounds great. I love Sara Evans.
Would you like to start the music now?
Yes. Please play now.
You want to play A Little Bit Stronger on your TV?
No. I would like to play it on the speaker in kitchen.
You want to play A Little Bit Stronger on your kitchen speaker?
Yes, that's right.
Song playing.
Thank You very much.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. That is all for now. Thank you.
Have a great day.
I feel like listening to some music. Could you find me something by Ben Platt?
How does the Ben Platt song Bad Habit, from his album Sing To Me Instead, sound?
Are any other songs available? The singer doesn't matter, but I'd like for the genre to be Electropop.
How about the Linkin Park song Battle Symphony, from their album One More Light?
Sounds great to me. I'd like to play that song on the kitchen speaker.
Can you confirm the following for me? Play Battle Symphony on the kitchen speaker.
No. You should instead play it on my bedroom speaker.
Can you make sure these details are correct? Play Battle Symphony on your bedroom speaker.
That's correct!
I will start playing the song right now.
Many thanks. That's all I need from you.
Enjoy your day!
Can you search some nice songs especially country songs for me?
Yes, how about All On Me by Devin Dawson in the album Dark Horse, which I think the nice one?
May be, but I want to hear some Pop songs and Bebe Rexha 's songs are the nice one which I like very much, can you search the one for me?
Found 2 results which suit to you and one is I Got You by Bebe Rexha in album Expectations.
please search some other songs in the same album Expectations.
Okay, what bout Knees by Bebe Rexha in Expectations album.
That's the one I want, can you play it now?
Yes, please confirm to play Knees on TV.
No, I want to listen it from my Kitchen so please play it in my kitchen speaker.
Please confirm to play Knees on Kitchen speaker.
Sorry, changed my plan, play it on bedroom device.
Okay, please confirm to play Knees on bedroom speaker.
Yes, that is fine, continue.
Song started playing, enjoy your music.
Thanks a lot.
Anything else you need?
Not, that's all.
Have a great day.
I need you to locate me some songs.
Search revealed 10 songs. Do you like the song Shy by Jai Waetford on the Heart Miles album?
What type of music is it?
The genre is Pop.
What other search results do you have?
Do you like the song Still Got Time by Zayn Malik on the Icarus Falls album?
What type of song is it?
The genre is Pop.
That will work.
Shall I start the song now?
Yes, cast it on the kitchen speaker.
You want me to cast the song Still Got Time to the kitchen speaker. Is that right?
No, cast it to the bedroom speaker.
You want me to cast the song Still Got Time to the bedroom speaker. Is that right?
Yes, that is right.
Your song has started.
Thanks a lot.
Do you need anything else?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a wonderful day.
Could you recommend some Country songs?
How about the song A Little Bit Stronger by Sara Evans from the album Stronger?
That sounds good, I'd like to listen to that.
Okay, so you would like to play A Little Bit Stronger on your TV?
Yeah, do that please.
Song has started playing.
Great, thanks.
Is there anything else I can do?
No, thanks, that's everything.
Okay, have a nice day.
Can you recommend any songs from the album After The Landslide?
Do you like Open Up from After the Landslide, by Matt Simons?
What kind of song is it?
The song is pop.
I think I might like the song.
Do you want to hear it?
Yes, I want to hear the song.
Just confirm you want to play Open Up on the TV.
Actually, can you play it on the kitchen speaker?
So we are playing Open Up on the kitchen speaker?
Yes, please!
Now playing the chosen song.
Thanks, that is what I want.
See you later!
Can you look for some music? I really enjoy Pop music.
What's your opinion about Adorn by Miguel in the album Kaleidoscope Dream?
that's wonderful.
Would you like to cat the song now?
Alright.
Please verify the following information: cast Adorn on TV.
Nope, cast it on speaker in kitchen.
Please verify the following information: cast adorn on Kitchen Speaker.
Nope, cast it on my bedroom.
Please verify the following information: cast Adorn on bedroom speaker.
Yeah, that's right.
The music began casting.
Thank you for your help.
Is there anything else I can assist with?
Nope, thank you for your assistance.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
My Everything has some good songs, can you find me some in that album?
What about Be My Baby by Ariana Grande? It's in her album My Everything.
You got anything else? What about songs in the album Sick Boy? I like Pop.
I found 5 new songs, what about Everybody Hates Me by the Chainsmokers? It's in the album Sick Boy.
Sounds good.
Wanna listen now?
Play it on the speaker in kitchen.
You want me to play Everybody Hates Me on the kitchen speaker?
Yeah
Started playing the song.
Thanks
Anything else?
No thank you.
Have a good one.
Can you put some music on while I make food? I usually like Electronica stuff.
How about Gold by Nick Murphy from the album Built On Glass? That's been trending.
Nah, what else is there?
How about Lady Luck by Jamie Woon from the album Mirrorwriting?
Oh, that would be perfect.
Ok. To confirm, I'm playing Lady Luck on the TV.
No, not the TV. Can you play it on the kitchen speaker?
Sure, to confirm, I'm playing Lady Luck on the kitchen speaker.
No, actually, can you play it on my bedroom speaker? I'm going to finish some homework first.
Sure. To confirm, I'm playing Lady Luck on the bedroom speaker.
Yep, sounds good.
Ok, the music is playing.
Great, thanks. That's all.
Have a good day.
I want you to find me some songs please
How about Man Down by Rihanna in the album Loud?
That's perfect. Play that song.
Please confirm this: play Man Down on TV
Please play it on my kitchen.
Please confirm this: play Man Down on kitchen speaker
Of Course yes
Song has started playing
That's all for now
Have a nice day
I want to hear some music.
Would you like to hear the song How Deep Is Your Love on the album Tomahawk Technique by Sean Paul?
Could you suggest something else?
How about Blue Tacoma on the album Yours by Russell Dickerson?
Yeah, that one will work.
Please confirm the following: Play Blue Tacoma on the album Yours by Russell Dickerson on TV.
Yes, that's what I want.
The song is beginning.
Thanks, that's all.
You're welcome. Enjoy the music.
I am very much fond of Pop songs.Can you look in for some songs for me
What is your opinion on Adorn by Miguel in album Kaleidoscope Dream?
Do you have anything else?
What is your opinion on African Beauty by Diamond Platnumz in album A Boy From Tandale?
All albums are good, you have any other thing?
I have short listed 8 songs of your choice.What is your opinion about Aftertaste by Shawn Mendes in album Handwritten?
That is good
You are interested in starting the music now?
yes for sure
Please give confirmation details: Play Aftertaste on TV
No, i would like to play it on Kitchen Speaker
Please give confirmation details: Play Aftertaste on Kitchen speaker
No, i want you to play it on bedroom speaker
Please give conformation details: play Aftertaste on bedroom speaker
that is perfect
started the song
Thank you very much
Have a nice day
Do you know any music? I'm not picky about who.
I've got 10 songs you might like. How about A Little Bit Stronger by Sara Evans from Stronger?
What else is there? Ember has a lot of good songs, but any song works.
How about Tourniquet by Breaking Benjamin from Ember? It's 1 you like.
Excellent, play that one.
Would you like Tourniquet to play on the TV?
Nope, the speaker in kitchen would be better.
So play Tourniquet on the kitchen speaker?
Nope, play it on the bedroom device my bedroom.
Tourniquet on the bedroom speaker then?
Yeah, that's right.
I've started the song.
Thanks.
Is there anything else?
Nope, thanks.
Have a great day.
Hello! Could you help find me some songs?
Sure, I have found 10 songs, one of which is Generation Why which is sung by Conan Gray in his album Sunset Season.
Do you have alternative songs? I heard that there are some good songs in the album Different World!
Yes, there are 2 songs you may like in the Different World album by Alan Walker, would you like to listen to Alone?
May I know the genre of this song?
It is a Pop song.
That's great!
Do you want me to play the music for you now?
That will be great.
Please confirm your action to play Alone on the TV.
Sorry, could you play it on the kitchen speaker instead?
Please confirm your action to play Alone on the kitchen speaker.
Sorry, I've changed my mind again. Could you play it in my bedroom instead?
Sure, please confirm your action to play Alone on the bedroom speaker.
Sure, that's great!
Your song is currently being played.
Thank you, that's all the help I need.
No problem, have a great day ahead!
I need a recommendation for some good Five Finger Death Punch songs to listen to.
Five Finger Death Punch is a good choice! You should check out I Apologize from the Got Your Six album.
What genre is it technically considered?
It's technically a metal song.
Oh, awesome! I love metal.
Should I play it now?
Yeah, play it on the the kitchen device.
Just to double check, you want me to play I Apologize on the kitchen speaker?
No, actually, can you play it on the speaker in the bedroom instead?
Ok, so you want me to play I Apologize on the bedroom speaker?
Yeah, that sounds good.
I'm playing the song now.
That's awesome, thank you!
Do you need help with anything else?
No, I'm good, thanks!
Ok, have a good day!
Can you find me some songs? The album The Martin Garrix Experience has many good songs.
I found 5 songs for you. How about High On Life by Martin Garrix in the album The Martin Garrix Experience?
That sounds great.
What else could I help you with?
I'd like to play the song on the speaker in kitchen
Please confirm playing High on Life on kitchen speaker.
Yes, that sounds right.
Just started playing the song.
Thank you.
Is there anything else I could help you with today?
No, but thank you.
Have a nice day.
Would you search for some songs?
How about Neon Gravestones by Twenty One Pilots in their album Trench?
Do you have something else? I really like Country Songs. The First Time is a good album.
I have 1 song that you should like. How about Peter Pan by Kelsea Ballerini in The First Time?
Yeah, that sounds good. Play me that song on any device that you can.
Okay, so play Peter Pan on the TV?
Yes, that is right.
I have started playing the song.
Thanks!
Could I help with something else?
No, that is all.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Can you play any songs from the album Foundation?
What do you think of Shatta Wale's song, Shatta Movement, from the Foundation album?
What is the song's genre?
The song's genre is Reggae.
That is great.
Would you like music to be played?
Yes, play it on any device.
Can you confirm the song: Shatta Movement played on the kitchen speaker?
Yes, that's correct.
Song has begun playing.
Thank you. That will be all for now.
Have a good day.
I'd like to listen to some new Pop songs. I know there are some in the album The Martin Garrix Experience.
There is 1 song called High On Life by Martin Garrix from the album The Martin Garrix Experience.
Sure, that's fine.
Would you like to hear it?
Yes, please. I'm in the kitchen, so use the kitchen speaker.
Please confirm that you would like to listen to High On Life on the kitchen speaker.
Yes, that would be perfect.
The song will start now.
Thank you very much. That will be all for now.
Have an enjoyable day.
Can you find some songs. I like songs in the album My Everything. I enjoy pop songs the most.
I have 4 songs you may enjoy. Be my Baby by Ariana Grande is in album My Everything.
Do you have anything else?
What about Best Mistake by Ariana Grande in My everything album.
I like Ariana Grande' songs but do you have anything else.
Ariana Grande has Break Free ib album My Everything.
Oh, that's good.
Would you like to listen now?
Yes, please play it.
Please confirm the information: play Break Free on TV.
Yes, that's good.
The song is playing.
Thanks a lot.
Can I do anything else for you.
No, I am good thanks.
Have a nice day.
i like Electropop songs can you help me find some?
I got you Battle Symphony by Linkin Park in the Park in album one more light and 10 others you may like, what do you think?
Thats awesome
can i play you music now ?
Yeah
are you sure I should play Battle Symphony on TV
Dont , Play on Kitchen Speaker
Affirm this play request: Battle Symphony on Kitchen Speaker
Sure, You are right
song playing
Thanks
can i help you in any other way
No, thanks
Have a nice day
Could you find me some songs on the album The Gaza Don by Dancehall?
I found 1 song called Summer Time by Vybz Kartel on The Gaza Don. What do you think?
That's great!
Anything else I can help with?
Play that song on the speaker in kitchen.
Do you want to listen to Summer Time on the kitchen speaker?
No, play it on the speaker in the bedroom.
Do you want to listen to Summer Time on the bedroom Speaker?
Yes.
Here you go.
Thanks.
Anything else I can help with?
No, thanks.
You're welcome. Have a good day!
Can you find me somme Joe Bonamassa songs?
I found Drive by Joe Bonamassa in album Blues of Desperation.
What genre is that?
Blues.
Great, play it.
Play Drive on TV?
Yes, thank you.
Started playing Drive on TV.
Thank you, that is all for now.
Have a great day!
Can you find me some songs that are like Radwimps'?
I found 4 songs for you, one of them being Dream Lantern by Radwimps, from the album Your Name.
Do you have anything else? I'm not picky with albums
What's your opinion on the Radwimps' Your Name album song Nandemonaiya?
I like the Soundtracks music, do you have anything else?
On the Radwimps' Your Name album , how do you feel about Sparkle?
Can we play that song on the speaker in kitchen?
Hey, play Sparkle off of the kitchen speaker
Yes, that's right
They started playing the song
Thank you so much.
Can I help with anything else?
No, thanks.
Have a nice day!
I like Jason Aldean. Find me some songs please.
Sure, I found Dirt Road Anthem by Jason Aldean off his My Kinda Party album.
What genre of music is that?
This is country music.
Great, I would love to hear this. please play it.
Ok, please confirm: play Dirt Road Anthem on the TV. Is this right?
No wait. play on kitchen speaker.
OK, please confirm: play Dirt Road Anthem on kitchen speaker. Is this right?
No, wait. Play this on speaker in the bedroom please.
Ok, please confirm: play Dirt Road Anthem on bedroom speaker. Is this correct?
Yes it is.
Music has started playing.
Great. Thanks for your help.
Your welcome. Anything else I can help you with?
No, that will be all.
Great, have a goodday.
I'm looking for some songs to listen to. Can you find me Pop songs?
I found Adorn by Miguel in album Kaleidoscope Dream.
Thats great, play the song.
Shall I play Adorn on TV?
No, play it on kitchen speaker.
Please confirm: play Adorn on kitchen speaker.
No, play it on my bedroom speaker.
Please confirm: play Adorn on bedroom speaker.
Yes.
Started playing the song.
Thank You.
Can I help with anything else?
No, that's all. Thank You.
Have a good day.
while doing my household work i like to hear some songs. Will you find me some songs? please find song sung by Joe Bonamassa.
There are 2 songs according to your interest. How about the song Drive by Joe Bonamassa in album Blues of Desperation?
ok tell me about its genre.
It is a Blues Song.
ok that's great.
Whether i need to find any other thing?
Please play the song
ok check and confirm the following details : Play Drive on TV
ok, that's correct. Please play the music.
Started playing the song
Thanks a lot
Whether i need to find any other thing?
No. thanks, not now
Take care have a great day
I a great lover of music. one of my favourites is Album nine Track Mind, especially songs of Charlie Puth. Could you find something like that for me?
2 songs of that genre available, Are you interested in Dangerously by Charlie Puth in the same album Nine Track Mind?
Ok, any other songs available?
Then I think One call away will do by Charlie Puth in Nine Track Mind will surely you choose.
What is the genre of that song.
It belongs to Pop category.
Fine, I think that will do.
Ok, confirm your demand, Play One Call Away on TV.
No, Please play it on Kitchen speaker.
Then I shall play One Call Away on kitchen speaker, confirmed?
Yes, that's all, thank you.
Great, enjoy it, started playing.
Great, Let me enjoy.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you search for Sia 's Pop songs?
How about Alive by Sia from the album This Is Acting?
Okay, That sounds great.
Would you like me to play the music for you?
Yes, Please play the song for me.
Please confirm: You want me to play Alive on TV.
No. Please play it on kitchen speaker.
Please confirm the details again: You want me to play Alive on kitchen speaker.
Yes, that is right.
Your song is playing. Enjoy the music.
That will be all. Thank you.
I am glad I could help. Have a great day.
There are many good songs in the album Always In Between. Can you pick some out for me?
How do you feel about Jess Glynne's song All I am in her album Always In Between?
I'm glad to hear that!
Is there anything else I can do for you?
I'd like to play a song on the kitchen device
Please confirm the following: Play All I Am on the kitchen speaker
No, play on bedroom device my bedroom
Please confirm: Play All I Am on the bedroom speaker
Yes, what genre is it?
The song has started playing. It is in the pop genre
Thank you, that's all I need
Have a great day!
I enjoy listen to music while i clean the house. Could you find me some songs? I appreciate very much Martin Garrix's songs, especially many songs from The Martin Garrix Experience album.
Here is 5 musics you may enjoy. How about High On life by Martin Garrix that is in the album The Martin Garrix Experience?
Do you have anything else?
Sure!How about Latency By Martin Garrix in album The Martin Garrix Experience?
I prefer another one, do have anything else? I prefer House songs.
No Sleep is a good song, you may like it, by Martin Garrix in album The Martin Garrix Experience?
That's amazing.
Do you want to play the music now?
Sure.
Please confirm the following details: Listen to No Sleep playing it on Tv.
Yes, that's correct.
Playing the song.
Thank you.
What else can i do?
Nothing. Thank you.
Have pleasant day.
I want to find Three Days Grace's songs.
I found 2 songs, what do you think about Three Days Grace's song Right Left Wrong from the album Outsider?
What other Rock songs do you have?
I found 1 more song, how about The Mountain by Three Days Grace from the album Outsider?
Sure. That sounds great.
Do you want to play it now?
Yes, please, thank you.
Do you want to play The Mountain on the TV?
No, I want to play it on the speaker in kitchen.
Okay, play The Mountain on the kitchen speaker?
No, I want it to play on the speaker in the bedroom.
Okay, play The Mountain on bedroom speaker.
Yes, that is correct.
Playing the song now.
Thank you.
Anything else can I help you with?
No, that's all.
Have a good day.
I am in the mood to listen to Rock songs. Could you find me some songs from the album Sex Rock?
There are 2 songs that suit you. What about Easy World from the album Sex Rock by Alex Angel
Do you have a different song?
What about My Donna from the album Sex Rock by Alex Angel?
That one sounds perfect.
Would you like to play the song now?
I wold love to hear it.
You want to play My Donna on your TV, is that correct?
No. I want to hear it on the kitchen device instead.
You want to play My Donna on your kitchen speaker?
No. I changed my mind, play it on my bedroom speaker instead.
You want to play My Donna on your bedroom speaker?
Yes, that's right.
The song is now playing.
That is everything, thank you.
You're welcome. Have a lovely day.
I'm going on a road trip, Can you find me some Pop songs? I really like the album Climate Change.
Do you like the song Options by Pitbull, from the album Climate Change?
yes, I like at song, can you play it?
So, you want me to play Options on the TV?
No, play options in my kitchen.
So you want me to play Options on the Kitchen speaker?
Yes, thank you.
I played the song for you.
Thank you.
Have a good day.
Can you search for some songs for me and my favorite is Country songs of Jake Owen
What is your opinion on Alone With You from the album Barefoot Blue Jean Night by Jake Owen?
That is cool
Are you playing the music at this time?
Yes, play it on the Kitchen Speaker
Please give confirmation details: Alone With You on Kitchen Speaker
No, i want you to play it on bedroom speaker
Please give confirmation details: Alone With You on bedroom speaker
That is perfect
Started the song
Thank you very much
Any other hep you need?
no thank you
Have a great day
Could you find me music? I Like La La Land Cast's songs.
I found 1 song you might like, how do you feel about Another day of Sun by the la la land cast in the album La La Land
what's the genre?
it's in the soundtracks genre
Sounds good.
Do you want it to play now?
Sure, play it on the speaker in kitchen.
Please confirm the following: play another day of sun on the kitchen speaker
Actually, play it on the bedroom speaker.
please confirm the following: Play another day of sun on the bedroom speaker
Yup, that's right!
The song is now playing
Thank you! That's all i need
Have a good day
Can you find me songs like those of Billy Watman?
How about Bohemian Rhapsody by Billy Watman from the album Cryptic?
Wonderful, please play it.
Please confirm: Play Bohemian Rhapsody on the TV.
Yes, everything is correct.
The song is playing.
Thank you very much.
Can I help with anything else?
No, that will be all. Thank you.
Have a wonderful day!
songs are of different types and different varieties. I like to hear some songs. Will you find me some songs ? Please find songs of kind Metal song?
How about the song Born for Greatness by Papa Roach in album Crooked Teeth? whether you liked it?
Ok that's great. that is all i need. Please play the song on device speaker in kitchen.
ok please check and confirm the following details so that i could play the song: Play Born for Greatness on Kitchen speaker
Yes, that's correct . Please play it
Started playing the song.
Thanks a lot for your help. song fills my heart with full of joy.
take cara have a great day
I need help finding some good music.
What about Move Your Body by Sia off of her This Is Acting album?
Yeah, that is perfect.
Did you need anything else?
Yes, can you play it on my kitchen speaker?
You said to play Move Your Body on the kitchen speaker?
No on second thought play it on my bedroom speaker.
Okay, you want to hear Move Your Body on your bedroom speaker.
Yes, that is right. What genre is the artist again?
It is starting now and it is a pop song.
Thank you for that.
Did you need anything else?
No that will be all for now. Thanks.
You are welcome. Enjoy your song.
I would like you to find me some pop music songs.
Among 10 songs I found is one called Adorn by Miguel from the album Kaleidoscope Dream.
That will do nicely.
Shall I play that song for you now?
Yes, please play it on my kitchen device.
I'm about to play Adorn on your kitchen speaker. Is that right?
Yes, go ahead.
Here you go.
That's it, thank you.
You're most welcome.
Well, the next thing we need for the reception is the music. We need some songs that are going to amp up the mood and entertain the guests. I know I can count on you to help me get that together. I like mostly all the songs on the album This Is Acting. Do you have that album?
I'm showing 4 songs on the album This Is Acting. Do you like the song Alive by Sia on that album?
Ooh, I'm a real Sia fan. Pop music is great for what I want. Do you show any other songs?
The song Bird Set Free by Sia is also on the album This Is Acting. Does that song interest you?
Cool, you've got my attention and tell me more, please.
The album This Is Acting has another featured song by Sia called Move Your Body.
Well, all right. The song list is looking great.
Would you like to hear that song now?
Yes, I would. Go ahead and play it on any one of my devices.
The song Move Your Body will play on your TV. Please confirm that.
Uh, let's change that to the kitchen device, please.
The song Move Your Body will play on your kitchen speaker. Please confirm that.
Yes, let's confirm that. You got it.
Confirmed. The song will begin now.
Couldn't have done it without you. That's it for now. Thanks so much.
Of course. Enjoy your music.
Can you play a Pop song?
There are 10 songs, would you like Adorn by Miguel from the album Kaleidoscope Dream?
What other option do you have?
There is African Beauty by Diamond Platnumz from the album A Boy From Tandale.
What other song is there?
There is Aftertaste by Shawn Mendes from the album Handwritten.
Yes, play that song.
Do you want me to play it on Aftertaste TV?
No, play it on the kitchen device please.
You want me to play Aftertaste on the kitchen speaker?
No, in my bedroom speaker.
Aftertaste will play in your bedroom speaker.
Yes, that is correct.
Started playing the song.
Thank you, that is all I needed.
Have a good day.
Can you find Pop songs similar to the Demi album?
I found 1 song. Would you like to listen to Neon Lights by Demi Lovato from the Demi album?
That's great. Thank you.
Would you like to listen to it now?
Yes, that's correct.
Please confirm. Would you like to play Neon Lights on the TV?
Yes, that's correct.
Started playing the song.
Thank you very much.
What else can I help with?
No thank you.
Have a good day.
I would like to listen to a Pop song, can you find one?
Here are 10 songs for you. Adorn by Miguel in Kaleidoscope Dream. Is that acceptable?
I like Sigrid's songs. Do you have anything like that?
Here are 3 songs under that description. How about Business Dinners by Sigrid in Sucker Punch?
What else is there?
How about Strangers by Sigrid in Sucker Punch?
That's good.
Do you want to play it now?
Yes.
Please confirm: Play Strangers on Tv?
Yes.
Song is now playing.
Thank you. That's it.
Have a great day.
Hey, could you play me something off Narrated For you.
Narrated For you? How about Boy In The Bubble by Alec Benjamin?
You have anything else?
Yeah Gotta Be A Reason by Alec Benjamin is also off Narrated For You.
What else do you have from Alec Benjamin?
Lets see. Alec Benjamin. Narrated For You. How about If I killed Someone For you.
Besides Murder Mystery, what genre is that?
They go it listed as Pop.
Alrighty then.
So, play it?
Yeah. On the kitchen speaker please.
If I killed Someone For you on the kitchen speaker?
Make it my bedroom speaker.
How romantic. If I killed Someone For You on your bedroom speaker. Correct?
You got it.
The song has started.
Thanks, Dude.
Anything else. A glass of wine?
No thanks, wise guy.
Enjoy your song.
This party could really use some music. Can you find me a Pop song from the album The Bright Side?
The 1 song that I found is titled Blue Skies by Lenka, from the album The Bright Side. Does that sound like what you are looking for?
Yes, that's perfect.
Would you like me to begin playing the song now?
Yes, can you play it on the speaker in kitchen, it is the loudest one in the house.
Okay, I will begin playing the song titled Blue Skies on the kitchen speaker.
No, i'm sorry, can you play it on the speaker in my bedroom, that is the room closest to all the guests.
Okay, I will begin playing the song titled Blue Skies on the bedroom speaker.
Yes, that should be better.
The song is now playing.
Thank you for your help.
Have a wonderful day!
Can you find me a song? Any genre is fine.
I have found 10 songs. Do you want to listen to Before I Cry by Lady Gaga from the album A Star Is Born Soundtrack?
What other songs are there?
Do you want to listen to Naya Naya Penhi Salwarba by Shashi Lal Yadav from the album No Line Signal Likhat Ba?
That sounds great.
Would you like to play the song?
Yes, play the song.
Please confirm: You want to play Naya Naya Penhi Salwarba on TV.
Yes, that is correct.
The song is now playing.
Thank you, for your help.
Do you need help with anything else?
No, that is all I needed.
Have a good day.
Can you list Harris J songs in the album Salam?
I found 1 song, Salam Alaikum by Harris J on the album Salam.
What genre is the song?
It's a Pop song.
Ok, thanks.
Can I help you with anything else.
Can you play the song?
To confirm, you'd like me to play Salam Alaikum on the TV.
Yes, that's what I'd like you to do.
Playing the song
Thanks, that's all I need.
Let me know if you'd like me to do anything else.
Could you find me some Pop songs, especially those by Conan Gray?
I found 2 songs you might like. How about Conan Gray's song, Generation Why, from the Sunset Season album?
That sounds great.
Do you want to play the music now?
Yes, play the song now.
Please confirm that you want to play Generation Why on the TV.
No. Play it on the kitchen speaker.
Please confirm that you want to play Generation Why on the kitchen speaker.
Yes, that's correct.
I'm starting the song now.
Great. Thank you.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. That's all. Thank you.
Have a good day.
I want to listen to some music.
Sure. I see 10 songs that you might enjoy. How about Dean Town from the Vulfpeck album The Beautiful Game?
I'm not a big Vulfpeck fan. Do you have anything else?
How about All On Me from the Devin Dawson album Dark Horse?
I've never heard of that one. What genre is it?
It's Country music.
I hate country. Anything else?
How about He Is from the Ghost album Meliora?
Ghost? Never heard of him. What genre is the song?
It is Rock music.
Okay, I'll give it a shot.
Should I start playing the song now?
Yeah. Set it to the kitchen device.
You want to hear He Is from your kitchen speaker?
Yeah, that's right.
Your music is now playing.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can help with?
Nothing else, thanks.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Could you play some music for me? I like Jason Chen. I really like Pop music.
I found 2 songs for you. What about Best Friend by Jason Chen from the Gravity album?
I want something else.
What about Music Never Sleeps by Jason Chen from the Gravity album?
That's good. I want it on my speaker in kitchen.
Play Music Never Sleeps on kitchen speaker. Is this correct?
Play it on my bedroom device instead.
Play Music Never Sleeps on bedroom speaker. Is this correct?
Yes.
The song has started.
Thanks for your help.
Do you need anything else?
No thank you.
Have a nice day.
Can you search for some Pop songs for me?
Search revealed 10 songs. Do you like Adorn by Miguel on the Kaleidoscope Dream album?
Find me some other songs such as Arash songs on the Superman album.
Do you like One Day by Arash on the Superman album?
Yes, I do. Play that song on the kitchen speaker.
You want to cast One Day on the kitchen speaker. Is that right?
Yes, that is right.
Your song has started.
Thanks a lot.
Do you need anything else?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a great day.
Hi i need a help, i am Interested in listening songs, Could you find some songs for me?
Do you like One That Got Away by Michael Ray in album Amos?
Yes, I like that song
Can i play that song for you?
Yes, play it
please confirm the following details: play One That Got Away on TV
No, Not on tv, play it on speaker in kitchen
please confirm the following details:play One That Got Away on kitchen speaker
No, Please play it on speaker in the bedroom
please confirm the following details: play One That Got Away on bedroom speaker
Yes, That's right
The song has been started on bedroom speaker,Shall i help you with anything more?
No, thank you very much for your help, That's all i need.
You are welcome, Have a great day.
I need to search for a song, can you find some nice one?
Yes, What about a song Look What I found by Lady Gaga in the album A Star Is Born Soundtrack?
I thing Pop songs will be better choice, please search for the one.
Found 10 results. Adorn by Miguel in Album Kaleidoscope Dream is the nice one I think, do you like the same?
No. please search something else.
How about a song African Beauty by Diamond Platnumz in album A Boy From Tandale? this will be definitely good.
Yes, that is nice song, please pay it on my Speaker in Kitchen.
Please confirm to play African Beauty on your Kitchen speaker.
Change it to my bedroom device.
Okay, give your confirmation to play African Beauty on bedroom speaker.
That is correct, continue.
song started playing on your bedroom device.
Thanks, that's all I want now.
Have a great day.
Find me some songs
10 songs I found that you might like.What is your opinion about Album Dolla Van Riddim by Busy Signal with song Dolla Van?
What is the type of music?
It's part of the Reggae category
Anything else you can find?
Tell me your opinion about album Home state by Jordan Davis with song Take it From Me.
What kind of music is that?
The song is Country
You have something else?
How about album Happiness by Hurts with song Wonderful Life?
Sounds great .
You want me to play the music now?
Yes,I would love that.
Play on TV the song Wonderful Life is OK?
Yes perfect.
The song is playing.
Thanks for help.
Can I help you with something else?
No,I'm fine thanks
Have a great day!
Could you play me some music? I like metal music.
What about Born For Greatness by Papa Roach from the Crooked Teeth album?
That's a good one. I want to hear it.
You want to hear Born For Greatness on your TV. Is this right?
I want to hear it in my kitchen.
You want to hear Born For Greatness on your kitchen speaker. Is this right?
Yes.
The song is now playing.
Thanks for your help.
Would you like anything else?
No, that's all I need.
Have a nice day.
I want to listen to some music.
I've found 10 songs you might want to hear. How about Bohemian Rhapsody by Billy Watman from his album Cryptic?
That sounds good.
Should I play it now?
Yes, please. Go ahead.
Okay. Just to make sure, I'm going to play Bohemian Rhapsody on the TV.
Actually, no. Please play it on the kitchen device.
Sure. I'll play Bohemian Rhapsody on the kitchen speaker.
Yes. That is right.
Starting the song now.
Thanks. That's all for now.
Have a great day!
Could you look for some songs for me?
How about the album Voicenotes with song The Way I am by Charlie Puth?
Perfect. I want to listen to the song, so play it on the kitchen speaker.
Please verify the following information: Using the kitchen speaker to play the song The Way I Am.
Yep, that's right.
The song has started playing.
What is the genre of it?
The song is Pop.
Thanks.
Can I help you with anything else?
Nope, thanks very much.
Enjoy your day.
Find me some music please. Any album works.
What do you think about Shy by Jai Waetford from the album Heart Miles.
Anything else? I enjoy Rebelution. I really like Reggae.
I found 2 songs for you. On song is Roots Reggae Music buy Rebelution from the album Count Me In.
Great! Play the song on any device please.
Please confirm the following: play Roots Reggae Music on TV.
No, play it on my kitchen.
Please confirm the following: play Roots Reggae Music on the kitchen speaker.
Yea, that's good.
Now playing the song.
Thanks.
How else can I assist you?
No thanks.
Have a nice day!
I want to listen to some songs.
Okay, how about the song Dark Necessities by the Red Hot Chili Peppers on their album The Getaway?
Let's look for something else, any genre will work. What about something on the album Born This Way?
Want to hear Bloody Mary on the Lady Gaga album Born This Way?
Yes, that's great.
Should i play it now?
Yes, play it.
Please confirm that I should play Bloody Mary on the TV.
Actually, play it on the kitchen speaker.
Great, confirm that I'm playing Bloody Mary on the kitchen speaker.
Yes, that's right.
Okay, I started playing the song.
Thanks so much.
Anything else I can help with?
That's it, thanks.
Have a great day.
Can you play me some music? I'm thinking Sabaton tonight.
I found 5 songs for you. How about Sabaton 's Night Witches, from the album Heroes
Anything else?
Maybe Sabaton 's No Bullets Fly, also from the album Heroes?
What genre is it?
That's a Metal song
Ok, let's play it.
Please confirm: playing No Bullets Fly on TV
No make it the speaker in kitchen instead
Please confirm: playing No Bullets Fly on the kitchen speaker
Yes do that
Your music is playing
Thanks.
Anytime.
I need some relaxation because of my office work . Will you find me some songs? Will you check songs like Alan Walker songs.
Sure. There are 2 songs according to your taste. How about this song Alone by Alan Walker in album Different world?
Whether any other song is available?
Fine , there is another song name Darkside by Alan Walker in album Different World, Whether you like it or not?
What's its genre?
actually it is a Pop song
That's great , I like to hear the song. will you play it?
ok please check and confirm the following details: play Darkside on TV
ok, that's great. Please play the music.
Started playing the song
Thanks a lot for your help and that is all i need.
Take care have a great day.
I would like to hear some classical music.
I have 8 songs that you might be interested in. Would you like to hear Cocaine March on the album Melting by Nico Cartosio?
That sounds like something I'd like.
Is there anything else you need?
I would like to hear that song.
Please confirm the following: play Cocaine March from the album Melting by Nico Cartosio on TV.
No, I want it to play on the kitchen speaker.
Please confirm the following: play Cocaine March from the album Melting by Nico Cartosio on the kitchen speaker.
I'm sorry. I changed my mind. Could you play it on my bedroom speaker?
Please confirm the following: play Cocaine March from the album Melting on the bedroom speaker.
Yes, that's what I want to hear.
Begin playing the song.
Thanks, that's all I want right now.
Enjoy your music.
Would you look for some songs for me?
I have 10 songs that you may like. How about Self Control by Frank Ocean in Blonde?
That sounds good.
Shall I put this on now?
Okay then.
Please confirm that I should play Self Control on TV.
That is right.
I have started playing it.
Thanks.
Anything else I can help with?
No, thanks.
Have a great day.
Hi there, could you help me find some songs? Any genre will do.
I found 10 songs which you may like, one of which is Cirice by Ghost in the album Meliora.
That's not really my taste, I would prefer Pop songs in the album Happiness.
How about Wonderful Life by Hurts in the album Happiness?
That sounds good!
Would you like me to play the music for you?
Sure thing, thanks!
Please confirm your action to play Wonderful Life on TV.
Could you play it on my kitchen device instead?
Sure, please confirm your action to play Wonderful Life on kitchen speaker.
Sorry, could you change it to the bedroom device instead?
Sure, please confirm your action to play Wonderful Life on bedroom speaker.
Yes, that will be fine.
Your music has started playing, enjoy!
Thank you very much!
Do you require further assistance?
No, that's all the help I need. Thank you!
No problem, have a great day ahead!
Can you find any songs for me? I really like electropop.
I have 10 songs for you. How about Battle Symphony by Linkin Park, from the album One More Light?
Anything else you can find?
I found Buzzcut Season by Lorde from the album Pure Heroine.
Can you keep looking? There are lots of good songs on the album My Everything, and any type of song is good with me.
I found 4 songs you might like to listen to. How do you like Be My Baby by Ariana Grande off of My Everything?
That's a really good one.
Should I play it now for you?
Yeah, I'd like to hear it.
Please confirm: playing Be My Baby on TV.
Could you play it in my kitchen instead?
Yes, please confirm that you want to play Be My Baby on kitchen speaker.
No, I actually want it on speaker in the bedroom.
Okay, confirm: playing Be My Baby on bedroom speaker.
Yeah, that's exactly right.
The song will now start.
Thanks, that's it right now.
Have a good rest of the day.
Can you find me some country songs?
I found 10 songs that match your request. What about the song All On Me by Devin Dawson from the album Dark Horse?
What other songs do you have? I want songs from the album Kuntry.
What about the songs All The Girls Wanna Ride by the Jawga Boyz from the album Kuntry?
What other songs do you have?
What about the song Ridin High by Jawga Boyz from the album Kuntry?
That sounds good.
Do you want to play it?
Yes, play it on the kitchen device.
Please confirm: Playing Ridin High on the kitchen speaker.
No, play it on my bedroom speaker.
Please confirm: Playing Ridin High on the bedroom speaker
Yes, that's it.
Playing song now.
Thanks so much.
Anything else I can do for you?
No, that's all.
Have a great day.
Can you find me some Pop songs?
Do you like Adorn by Miguel on the Kaleidoscope Dream album?
Yes, that is what I want. Cast it on my kitchen.
You want to play Adorn on the kitchen speaker. Is that right?
Yes, that is right.
The song has started.
Thanks a lot.
Do you need anything else?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a great day.
I need help finding some songs.
How about Attention by Charlie Puth off the Voicenotes album?
What type of song is it?
It's a pop style.
Sounds good. Play it on my kitchen.
Just to make sure, you want to play Attention on the kitchen speaker.
You got it
Your music has started. Enjoy!
Thanks. That'll do it for now.
Enjoy the rest of your day!
Can you find some songs like Ayo Jay.
I have 1 song by Ayo Jay from the album Lazy Genius called Let him go.
What is the genre?
It is Reggae.
Sounds like a good choice.
Should I play it?
Yes, please do.
Confirm playing let him go on the TV.
Actually please play it on the kitchen device.
OK, playing Let Him Go on the kitchen speaker.
Yes, that is good.
Song is playing.
Thank you again.
Have a nice day.
Could you search for any sort of music for me?
What's your opinion about Barefoot in the Park by James Blake in the album Assume Form?
Do you possess anything else?
What's your opinion about Back it Up by Prince Royce in the album Double Vision?
Do you posses anything else? I enjoy music by Justin Bieber. There are plenty of wonderful songs in the album Journals.
I discovered 1 song you may enjoy. What's your opinion about All That Matters by Justin Bieber in the album Journals?
That's wonderful. I'd like to play the music.
Please verify the following information: play All That Matters on TV.
Nope, play it on kitchen speaker.
Please verify the following information: play all That Matters on kitchen speaker.
Yeah, that's right.
The music began playing.
Thank you for your help; that's all.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
Hey, I'm looking for some music. I like Metal music - the album No More Hollywood Endings has a lot of songs I like.
I've found 1 that could work for you: do you feel about the song Eden from the album No More Hollywood Endings by Battle Beast?
Yeah, that sounds good, play that.
Would you like to play Eden on your TV?
Can you play it on the kitchen speaker instead?
Would you like to play Eden on your kitchen speaker?
Actually, can you play it on my bedroom speaker?
Alright, you'd like me to play Eden on your bedroom speaker?
Yeah, please.
Alright, the song will begin now.
Thanks, that's all I need.
Enjoy your music.
I'm in the mood to listen to some music right now. Can you find me something good to listen to?
Sure, I found 10 songs that you might like. How about listening to Roundtable Rival by Lindsey Stirling from her album Shatter Me?
Yeah, that sounds great.
Do you want to hear the song now?
Yeah, please play it on the kitchen speaker.
Okay, I'm going to play Roundtable Rival on the kitchen speaker. Is that okay?
No, play the song on my bedroom speaker.
Alright, Roundtable Rival will play shortly on the bedroom speaker. Is that right?
Yup, that's right.
Okay, the songs starting to play now. Enjoy your music!
Great, thanks!
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No thanks, that's all I needed.
Have a nice day!
Find some music please.
Ok, how about Be My Baby by Ariana Grande of her My Everything album?
That sounds good.
Should I play this now?
Yes. Play on any available device please.
Sure, Please confirm: Play Be My Baby on TV. Is that right?
No wait. Play on kitchen speaker please.
Ok, please confirm: play Be My Baby on kitchen speaker, is this correct?
Yes, that's right.
Great, music has started playing.
Tell me what genre is this ?
This is a Pop song.
Thanks, that will be all.
Ok, Have a great day.
I'd like to hear some Pop music.
Like your Dad singing? I mean, I got Adorn by Miguel off Kaleidoscope Dream?
What else you got, Funny Man?
How about some Diamond Platnumz. I suggest African Beauty from A Boy From Tandale.
What else do you recommend.
Handwritten by Shawn Mendes has Aftertaste.
That might hit the spot.
Should I throw it on.
Yeah, please do.
Aftertaste on the TV. Confirmed.
You licked the TV? Well play it on the Kitchen device then.
Sure Funny Man. Play Aftertaste on Kitchen Speaker. Correct?
Actually make it my bedroom.
You want Aftertaste on your bedroom speaker?
Yeah. I can see you suppress a smile.
I don't know what you mean but I certainly sense Aftertaste on your bedroom speaker.
I hope that't tongue in cheek. Either way, I'm done for now.
Enjoy your day then.
Can you find some songs for me please?
Sure, I've found 10 songs that you might enjoy. How about Control by Halsey from the album Badlands?
What genre is that song?
Its an electropop song.
What else is there? I really like pop songs.
I've found another 10 songs. How do you like Adorn by Miguel from the album Kaleidoscope Dream?
That song sounds good I'd like to hear it.
Would you like to play Adorn on the TV?
No, please play it on the kitchen device.
Play Adorn on the Kitchen Speaker then?
no play it on the speaker in the bedroom instead.
Okay so, play Adorn on the bedroom speaker?
yes thats right.
Song is now playing.
Thank you.
Do you need help with anything else?
No thanks.
Have a great day.
Can you find me some songs by the Red Hot Chili Peppers?
How about Dark Necessities from the album The Getaway by the Red Hot Chili Peppers.
What are some of the other songs on The Getaway?
I have 3 you might like. How about Go Robot on The Getaway by the Red Hot Chili Peppers.
What's another one? I really like Pop songs.
There's Goodbye Angels on The Getaway by the Red Hot Chili Peppers.
That sounds good.
Shall I play it now?
Yes. Put it on the kitchen speaker.
To confirm: you want me to play Goodbye Angels on the kitchen speaker.
No. Make it my bedroom speaker instead.
Okay. You want me to play Goodbye Angels on the bedroom speaker.
Yes, that's right.
The song will start now.
Thank you. That's all I needed.
Have a great day.
Will you find some songs for me?
I found 10 songs. How about African Beauty by Diamond Platnumz from the album A Boy From Tandale?
Great. Will you play it on kitchen speaker?
Please confirm African Beauty on kitchen speaker.
That's right.
Song is starting.
Thanks, that's all.
Have a wonderful day.
Could you play me some music? I like pop music.
What about Adorn by Miguel from the Kaleidoscope Dream album?
That's good.
Would you like me to play the song?
Yes I do.
Play Adorn on your TV. Is what you want?
Yes, that's what I want.
The song has begun.
Thank you. That is all.
Have a nice day.
I am in a nice mood and I would like to listen some nice songs, I need you to search for the good one.
Found 10 songs. How about Nota De Plata which is composed by The Motans and present in the album Nirvana? Hope you like the same.
No, can you get me some other songs like Kristin Chenoweth which is liked by me specially.
How about a song Maybe This Time from the Album Coming Home by Kristin Chenoweth? Do you like it?
Yes, What's the kind of song is this?
It is a Pop type of song.
Okay, that will be nice.
Anything else you need?
Yes, I would like to listen this song in my Kitchen, can you play it there?
Yes, need your confirmation to play Maybe This time on Kitchen speaker.
No, I would like to listen it in my bedroom device, please do it so.
Okay, please confirm to play Maybe This Time on bedroom speaker.
Ya, that is fine. Go ahead.
Song started playing, enjoy.
Thanks a lot for your help
Anything else you need?
No, thanks that's all.
Have a great day.
I have liking for George Strait songs.Could you please search for some songs for me?
What is your opinion on Codigo by George Strait in album Honky Tonk Time Machine?
Do you have anything else?
What is your opinion on Every Little Honky Tonk Bar by George Strait in album Honky Tonk Time Machine?
I need to know its genre
It is a Country song
That is good
Are you interested in starting the music now?
yes for sure
Please give confirmation details: To play Every Little Honky Tonk Bar on TV
That is perfect
started running the song
Thank you very much
Have a nice day
I'm looking for some music off the album Expectations.
How does Curious by Hayley Kiyoko off of the album Expectations sound?
Nah, anything else?
How about I Got You by Bebe Rexha off of the album Expectations?
What kind of song is that?
It's considered Pop.
Not interested. Anything else?
How about Knees by Bebe Rexha off of the album Expectations?
What kind of song is it?
It's in the Pop category.
Sounds good. Let's listen to it on the kitchen speaker.
Okay, so just to make sure, you want to hear Knees on the kitchen speaker.
Actually, play it on the bedroom speaker.
No problem. So, just to make sure, you want to hear Knees on the bedroom speaker.
You got it.
Your song has begun!
Thanks. That's everything.
Enjoy your day now!
I want to hear some music, any genre.
Would you like to hear Serendipity from the album Higher by Albert Posis?
Yes, that sounds pretty good.
Would you like to hear the music now?
Yes, could you please play it on my kitchen speaker?
Please confirm the following: play Serendipity from the album Higher, on the kitchen speaker.
Yes, that's what I want.
Begin playing the music.
Thanks for your help.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that's all for now.
Enjoy the music.
Can you find me a Halsey song?
I found 5, how about Colors on Badlands by Halsey?
What else do you have from Badlands? I like electropop.
How about Control from Badlands by Halsey?
Anything else you have?
Gasoline on Badlands by Halsey.
Perfect, I want that one.
Gasoline cast to the tv is that correct?
Yes that is perfect.
Started the song.
Thank you for your help.
Can I do anything else for you?
No that will be all.
Have a great day.
Can you find some songs for me?
I found 10 songs I think you'd enjoy. How about Sleepover by Hayley Kiyoko from the album Expectations?
That's perfect for me.
Would you like to play the song now?
Yes, please play it.
Confirm that you would like to play Sleepover on TV.
Yep, that's right.
The song is starting now.
Thanks, that's all I need help with.
You're welcome and have a great day.
I'm in the mood to listen to music, can you find me some Folk songs?
There are 6 songs that I found for you. What about the song Annie from the album Oxford by Connar Moon?
Do you have anything else that is more like Pop? I like many of the songs from the album Singular Act I.
What about Almost Love from the album Singular Act I by Sabrina Carpenter?
I enjoy songs by Sabrina Carpenter but do you have a different song?
What about Paris also from the album Singular Act I by Sabrina Carpenter?
Yes, that is perfect. I would like to play the song on the kitchen speaker.
You want to play the song Paris on the kitchen speaker, is that correct?
No. I want to play the song on the bedroom device.
You would like to play the song Paris on the bedroom speaker?
Yes, that is what I want.
The song is now playing.
Thank you for your time, that is everything.
My pleasure. Have a great day.
I would like to listen to some music while I study for my midterm. Can you help with that. Any album is fine.
I was able to locate 10 songs for you. The first one is titled Carnivore by Starset from the album Transmissions.
That sounds perfect.
Would you like me to begin playing that for you now?
Yes, now is fine.
I will begin playing Carnivore on the TV, is that correct?
No, I will be studying in the kitchen so can you please play it on the kitchen device instead?
I will begin to play Carnivore on the kitchen speaker. Is that correct.
Yes, that's what I want.
The song has begun to play in the kitchen.
Thank so much!
No problem, are there any other songs or anything else you would like me to find for you?
No that will be all for now but thank you for asking.
I'm happy to help, have a great day!
i have many leisure time because i am not going for work today. will you find me some good songs ? please find songs in album camila because it has so many good songs?
How about the song Consequences by Camila Cabello in album Camila? whether you like it?
yes, that's great
could i play this music now?
sure. please play it
ok please check and confirm the following details : play Consequences on TV.
ok that's correct. What kind of music is it?
It is a Pop song . Song is started playing.
Thanks a lot for your help
Whether i need to find any other thing?
No, thanks, not now
take care have a great day
Hello! Jack here. I wish to hear some good songs. Please can you help me to find a good one?
Sure! Do you wish to hear the song One Last Time by Ariana Grande from the album My Everything that was released in 2014?
Do you have any Country songs for I would love to hear them.
Yup! I got 10 songs that suits your taste. One of them is the song All on Me by Devin Dawson from the album Dark Horse that was released in 1974. Do you wish to listen to this song?
Looks too old. Do you have any other songs that's released recently? I would love to hear Old Dominion 's songs and I think you can find many good songs in the album Happy Endings. Please can you find one for me?
Sure! I will do that for you. There are 2 good song that suits your taste. One of the song is the Hotel Key by Old Dominion from the album Happy Endings? Would you like to listen to this song?
Awesome! Awaiting to hear this song... Please can you play it for me?
Yup! Please confirm me that you wish to hear the song Hotel Key in your home device TV, right?
Nope, please play the song on my speaker in kitchen.
Okay! So, you wish to hear the song Hotel Key on your kitchen speaker. Am I right?
Yup! You're right.
You are done and the song you wished to hear is playing in your kitchen speaker. Enjoy the music !!!
Thanks.
Do you need any other songs to be played?
Nope, thanks, that's it.
Have a fantastic day.
Can you find something I can hear to pass the time?
I found 10 available songs. What about Black Eyes by Bradley Cooper from the A Star Is Born Soundtrack?
I love it. Play it.
Should I play it right now?
Yes, on the kitchen device.
So, play Black Eyes on the kitchen speaker?
Yes, that's it.
Just started playing it.
Thanks a lot, that's all.
Have great day.
Can you help me find some music?
How about Why So Serious by Alice Merton on her Mint album?
Sounds great.
Do you want to play it now?
Sure.
Please confirm: Play Why So Serious on tv.
That's right.
Playing now.
What genre is this?
It's pop.
Thanks.
Anything else I can help you with?
No, thanks.
Have a nice day.
Can you search some rock type of songs for me that I like very much?.
Is the song Are You Ready by Disturbed in album Evolution is okay for you?
No, can you search for the songs by Skillet?
Yes, what about the song The Resistance in album Unleashed Beyond which is the 1 by Skillet?
That is the nice one and I like it.
Shall I play this song now?
Yes, please do it and I like to hear it in my Kitchen.
Please confirm to play The Resistance on Kitchen speaker.
Just I want to go to bedroom now so please play it on my bedroom.
Okay, confirm to play the Resistance on bedroom speaker.
Yes, that is correct, continue please.
Song started playing on your bedroom speaker. enjoy your music.
Thanks, that's all.
Have a great day.
I want to listen to some music, can you find me songs from any album?
There are 10 songs that suit your taste. What about With You I Am from the album Gotta Be Me by Cody Johnson?
Sounds perfect, I will give it a try.
Would you like to play the music now?
Yes, I would love to.
You want to play With You I Am on your TV?
Yes, that's what I want.
The song is now playing.
Thank you for your help.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that is all. Thank you very much.
You're welcome. Have a great day.
Hi i need a help, i am Interested in listening songs, Could you find some songs for me? i especially like Pop songs.
Sure, I will help you, I found 10 songs for you, Do you like Adorn by Miguel in album kaleidoscope Dream?
Find another songs for me.
Sure,Do you like African Beauty song by Diamond Platnumz in album A Boy From Tandale?
Find another song, I like Alec Benjamin, There are lot of good songs in the album Narrated For you
Ok, I found 7 songs for you, Do you like Boy in the bubble by Alec benjamin in the album Narrated For you?
yes, i like that song
Can i play the song for you?
Yes
please confirm the following details: play boy in The Bubble on TV
No, not on tv, play it on kitchen speaker
please confirm the following details: play boy in The Bubble on Kitchen speaker
Sorry, play it on my bedroom speaker
please confirm the following details: play boy in The Bubble on bedroom speaker
Yes, That's right.
The song has been started playing on bedroom speaker
thank you very much for your help, That's all i need
you are welcome, Shall i help you with anything more?
No, thanks bye
Have a wonderful day, bye
I would like to listen some nice songs, I need you to search for the good one.
Found 10 songs. Among them I would like is the nice one which is composed by Zara Larsson and present in the album So good. How about your opinion?
I thing this will be a good one and can you play it on my Kitchen speaker?
Yes, please confirm to play I would like on your kitchen speaker.
Yes, that is correct, continue.
Song started playing now.
What kind of song is this?
This is a Pop song, hope you like it.
Yes, I like it very much and that's all I need from you. thanks.
Have a great and enjoyable day.
I am looking for some good songs.
How about On The Loose by Niall Horan from the album Flicker?
Is there any other Pop song from the album Vessel?
How about Fake You Out by Twenty One Pilots from the album Vessel?
Is there any other song by Twenty One Pilots 's?
How about Truce by Twenty One Pilots from the album Vessel?
Okay, That sounds great.
Would you like me to play the music now?
Yes, Please play it on my kitchen.
Please confirm the details: You want me to play Truce on kitchen speaker.
Yes, That is right.
Songs is playing. Enjoy the music.
Okay. Thank you for your help.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
That will be all. Thank you.
I am glad I could help. Have a great day.
I'm in the mood to listen to some music. Can you help me find something to listen to?
Sure, I found 10 songs you might like. Do you want to hear Mahzouz by Tamer Ashor from their Khayali album?
What kind of song is it?
It's a Pop song.
Cool, I wanna listen to it.
Should I play Mahzouz on the TV?
No, I'd like to listen to it on the kitchen speaker.
Okay, so you want me to play Mahzouz on the kitchen speaker?
Yup, that's right.
Okay, the songs starting to play now. Enjoy your music!
Cool, thanks. That's all I needed.
Have a nice day!
I need some help finding songs to listen to.
How about No More by Disturbed from the album Evolution.
Yeah, I like that.
Do you want me to play the song?
Yes, please play it on the kitchen speaker.
I'll play No More on the kitchen speaker, is that correct?
Sorry, no. Can you play it on the speaker in the bedroom instead?
I'll play No More on the bedroom speaker, is that correct?
Yeah, that's correct. What kind of song is it?
It's a Rock song. The song has begun.
Thanks so much.
Do you need me for anything else?
No, thank you again.
Have a good rest of your day.
Would you look for some songs for me?
How about Cool Girl by Tove Lo in Lady Wood?
What is the genre?
It is Electropop.
That sounds cool. Play that song.
So you want to play Cool Girl on the TV?
Yes that is right.
I have started playing the song.
Thank you. I do not need anything else.
Have a great day.
I would like to listen to some music, can you find me some songs?
What about Sleepover from the album Expectations by Hayley Kiyoko?
What genre of music is that?
It is the Pop genre.
Fantastic. Play it on the kitchen speaker.
You want to play Sleepover on the kitchen speaker, is that correct?
I changed my mind, play it on the bedroom device instead.
You want to play Sleepover on the bedroom speaker, is that correct?
Yes, that's what I want.
The song is now playing.
Thank you very much.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
That is everything, thank you.
I'm happy to help. Have a great day.
I am in the mood for some music, can you find me some songs?
What about the song Girl Crush from the album Pain Killer by Little Big Town?
What is the genre of the song?
It is considered a Country song.
I love Country. That's perfect.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Yes, I would like to play the song on my kitchen device.
You would like to play Girl Crush on your kitchen speaker, is that correct?
Yes, that's right.
The song is now playing.
That's all I need, thank you.
My pleasure. Have a wonderful day.
Can you recommend some songs for me? I enjoy songs by Ariana Grande.
How about Be Alright by Ariana Grande in the album Dangerous Woman?
What genre is it?
It is Pop.
Do you have other suggestions?
How about Be My Baby by Ariana Grande in the album My Everything?
Do you have other suggestions?
How about Best Mistake by Ariana Grande in the album My Everything?
Sounds good. Can you play the song on the kitchen speaker?
So you'd like me to play Best Mistake on the kitchen speaker?
Yes, sounds good.
The song has begun.
What genre is it?
It is Pop.
Thank you for the information.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you.
Have a nice day.
Can you find some songs for me?
I have 10. How about Butterflies by Kacey Musgraves on the album Golden Hour?
Anything else to choose from?
From the 10 I found, what about Wicked by Future in the album Purple Reign.
Can you tell me the genre?
It is a soundtracks song.
Do you have anything else?
What about A Zac Brown Band song called Knee Deep from You Get What You Give?
And the genre?
It is a country song.
OK, let's try it.
Shall I play it now?
Yes.
Confirming to play Knee Deep on the TV.
Actually, please play it on the kitchen speaker.
OK, confirming to play Knee Deep on the kitchen speaker.
That will be good.
Playing the song now.
Thanks a lot.
Can i Do anything else?
No, thanks again.
Have a nice day.
Would you find some songs for me?
I have located 10 songs that you may enjoy. What about the album Halfway to Heaven with song Bottoms Up and sung by Brantley Gilbert?
In which genre is it?
The song is Country.
That's good. I want to listen to the song.
Please approve the following: Start song Bottoms Up on the TV.
Actually, no, go ahead and play it on the kitchen speaker.
Please approve the following details: Use the kitchen speaker to play Bottoms Up.
No, not that one, play it on the bedroom device.
Please approve the following: Use the bedroom speaker to play the song Bottoms Up.
Yep, that's right.
Began playing the song.
Thanks.
Do you need any more help?
Nope, thanks a lot.
Have a wonderful day.
Could you look up some songs for me?
Sure. I've found 10 you might like. How about Just Kiss Her by Concorde from the album Summer House?
That sounds like something I want to hear.
Should I play it now?
Yes. Please, go ahead.
Just confirming, I'm going to play Just Kiss Her on the TV.
That's right. You can play it.
Playing the song now.
What genre is this song?
It's classified as a Pop song.
Oh, okay. Thank you.
Is there anything else I can do?
Nope. That would be it. Thanks.
Have a great day!
I'm looking for some songs.
I found 10 songs you may like. How about Lost and Lonely by Aaron Lewis from the album Sinner?
Anything else? Any singer is fine.
I found 10 songs. How about Look What God Gave Her by Thomas Rhett from the album Center Point Road?
What genre is it?
It's a Country song.
Yeah, that's good.
Do you want to play it now?
Yeah.
Do you want me to play Look What God Gave Her on the TV?
Yes, that's right.
Okay, I'm playing it now.
Thanks.
Anything else I can do for you?
No, thank you.
Have a nice day.
Could you get me some songs to listen to, I like the album Home State, so maybe from there?
Do you like Singles You Up by Jordan Davis from the album Home State?
What kind of song is it?
It's from the Country genre.
I think that'll do.
Would you like me to play the song for you?
Yeah, play it on any device that's open.
I'll play the song Singles You Up on the TV, is that okay?
Yeah, that's fine by me.
The song is now playing.
Thanks, that's all for now.
Okay, have a good rest of the day.
I'm looking for songs on the Built On Glass album.
I found 1 song. There's Gold by Nick Murphy on Built On Glass.
Great.
Do you want to play it?
Sure on the kitchen speaker.
Please confirm: Play Gold on kitchen speaker.
That's right. What's the genre?
Playing now. It's electronica.
Thanks, that's all I wanted.
Have a nice day.
I'm looking for some songs to listen to.
There are 10 songs that you might enjoy. Would you like to listen to Weekend by Kane Brown from the album Experiment?
What kind of song is it?
It's from the Country genre.
I like the sound of that. Please play it.
I'll play Weekend on the TV, is that right?
No, I think I want to hear it on the kitchen speaker.
I'll play Weekend on the kitchen speaker, is that right?
I'm sorry, no. I actually want it played in my bedroom.
I'll play Weekend on the bedroom speaker, is that right?
Yeah, that's right.
The song has begun.
Thanks, that's it for now.
Okay, enjoy your day.
Would you find me some songs?
I have 10 songs that you should like. What about Salam Alaikum from the Salam album by Harris J?
Is there anything else?
How about White House Road by Tyler Childers in the album Purgatory?
I'm looking for something else. I like King of the Dancehall, and reggae songs.
I have 1 song that you should like. How about Colouring This Life by Vybz Kartel in the King Of The Dancehall?
That is perfect.
Should I play the music now?
Yeah, play it on my kitchen.
Please confirm that you want to listen to Colouring This life on the kitchen speaker.
No, actually, play it on my bedroom speaker.
So you want to play Colouring This life on the bedroom speaker?
Yeah, that is good.
I have started playing the song.
Thank you. I do not need anything else.
Have a great day.
I want to listen to music. Can you play me some?
Sure. How about I Lived It from the Blake Shelton album Texoma Shore?
That sounds perfect.
Should I play it now?
Yeah, please do.
Do you want me to play I Lived It on your TV?
Actually, could you put it on the kitchen speaker?
Sure. You want I Lived it on your kitchen speaker, right?
I changed my mind. Can you set it for my bedroom?
I Lived it should be played from your bedroom speaker?
Yeah, that's what I want.
Okay. It is now playing.
What kind of song is this?
It's Country music.
Thanks. I don't need anything else.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Hi, could you help me search for some Lady Gaga songs?
Sure, how about Always Remember Us This Way by Lady Gaga in her album A Star is Born Soundtrack?
Any alternatives? I would prefer Soundtracks songs in the album A Star is Born Soundtrack.
I have found 3 songs, one of which is Before I Cry by Lady Gaga in her album A Star is Born Soundtrack.
That sounds amazing.
Would you like me to play the song for you?
Sure, could you play it on my kitchen?
Please confirm your action to play Before I Cry on the kitchen speaker.
Could you play it on the bedroom speaker instead?
Please confirm your action to play Before I Cry on the bedroom speaker.
Sure, that's great.
Your music has started playing.
Sure, that's all the help I need.
No problem, see you next time.
I want to hear some music. I really like Reggae.
I found 10 songs you might like. How about Addicted from the album Where We Come From by Popcaan?
Sounds good.
Shall I play it now.
Yes. Put it on the kitchen speaker.
To be sure, you want to play Addicted on the kitchen speaker?
On second thought, play it on the bedroom speaker.
Okay. You would like to hear Addicted on the bedroom speaker.
Yes, that's right.
I will start the song.
Thanks. That'll do it for me.
Have a great day.
I would like to listen to Iggy Azalea 's songs.
I found 4 Iggy Azalea songs, What do you think about Black Widow from the album The New Classic?
Anything else, there are so many good songs in The New Classic.
What about Iggy Azalea 's song Bounce from the new classic?
Anything else you can find?
What about Iggy Azalea Change your life from the new classic?
What is the genre?
Its a pop song.
Perfect!
Want to play it now?
Yep. Play it in my kitchen.
Can you confirm Change your life on the kitchen speaker?
Yup.
Started the song for you.
Thanks!
Anything else I can do?
Nope, Thanks!
Have a great day!
My friends came to my house they need to hear some songs .Will you find me some songs? I like album To Whom It May Concern ,it consists of many good songs.
There are 2 songs according to your interest. How about the song The Struggle by Blacklite District in album To Whom It May Concern? whether you like this song?
ok , i need to know its genre.
It is a Rock Song
Ok that's great and it sounds good to me.
Can i play the music now?
Sure, Please play the music.
Ok please check and confirm the following details : Song name is The Struggle on TV
Ok its great but Change its device as Kitchen speaker
ok Please once again confirm the following details :play The struggle On Kitchen speaker
ok but sorry to say please change its device on speaker in the bedroom.
ok once again please check and confirm the following details: play the song The Struggle on Bedroom speaker
ok, that's great .Please play the song
Started playing the song
Thanks a lot for your help
take care have a great day
I want to find some new songs to listen to.
No problem! I recommend Fortunately I Met You by Witwisit Hiranyawongkul on their album Quarter. Does that interest you at all?
I don't know. What's the genre?
It's a pop song.
Nah. Can we try something else?
Sure! How about Younger by Ruel on their album Ready?
Oooh, that sounds fun!
Would you like me to play the song for you?
Yeah, on my kitchen speaker!
Okay! Can you confirm the following details, please? I'll play the song Younger on your kitchen speaker.
Wait, my roommate's home now. I need it on my speaker in the bedroom now.
No problem! Can you confirm the following details, please? I'll play the song Younger on your bedroom speaker.
Yup!
Your song is now playing!
What's the song genre?
It's a pop song.
Okay, thanks. That's all I need.
You're welcome! Have a good day!
Could you look for songs for me?
What about Best Friend by Jason Chen from his album Gravity?
What genre is the song?
It's a pop song.
Is there anything else you can find?
How about Raging by Kygo from the album Cloud Nine?
What genre is that one?
Raging is a downtempo song.
Can you give me something else please?
I found Bottoms Up by Brantley Gilbert for you. It's from the album Halfway To Heaven.
That sounds good, I'd like to play it.
Confirm: playing Bottoms Up on TV.
No, I'd like to play it on speaker in kitchen.
Okay confirming Bottoms Up playing on kitchen speaker.
Yeah, that's what I want.
The song will start now.
Thanks, that's great for now.
Have a great rest of the day.
I'm in the mood for music, can you find me some songs?
There are 10 songs for you. Do you want to start with Promises from the album Welcome Reality by Nero?
Yes, I would like that.
Would you like to start playing the song now?
Yes, very much so.
You want to play Promises on your TV, is that correct?
No. I want to hear it on the kitchen speaker.
You want to play Promises on the kitchen speaker, is that correct?
I changed my mind, play it on the speaker in the bedroom instead.
You want to play Promises on the bedroom speaker, is that correct?
Yes, that is what I want.
The song is now playing.
Thank you very much.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
No, that is all, thank you.
It was my pleasure. Have a wonderful day.
I'm in the mood for some music, can you look for House songs for me?
There are 10 songs you might enjoy. How about Blocks by Marshmello from the album Joytime?
I dig it. Can you play it on the speaker in kitchen?
Just to make sure, you want to play Blocks on the kitchen speaker?
Wait, no, please play it on the bedroom device.
Just to make sure, you want to play Blocks on the bedroom speaker?
Yeah, that's where I want to hear it.
The song has begun.
Thanks, that's all the help I need.
Have a pleasant time.
Can you search some songs for me?
I searched 10 songs you may like. In album The Martin Garrix Experience what about song No Sleep by Martin Garrix
What about its genre?
That is a House song
Any thing else you have? i like the songs of Justin Bieber. Any album is ok for me.
I searched 3 songs you may like. In album Journals what about song All That Matters by Justin Bieber.
What about its genre?
This is a pop song
That is good. I like to play the song.
please give the confirmation details:play the song All That Matters on TV.
Ok. that is perfect.
Song started playing now.
Thank you very much.
Do you need any other help?
No, thanks a lot.
Have a wonderful day.
Please help me find songs from an album Bigger. I 'm not really in a good mood.
Would you like Babe by Sugarland from its album Bigger?
Hmm.Am not sure about its genre.
I think it is a Country song.
Ohh, that's nice.
Do you need help with anything else?
Please play the song Babe on the kitchen speaker. I think I have to cook my dinner.
Please do confirm the following details: Play the song Babe on the kitchen speaker.
I changed my mind, just play it on my bedroom speaker instead.
Alright. Please do confirm the following details: Play the song Babe on the bedroom speaker.
Yes. please.
The song has started playing.
Thank you, that's all for now.
Have a wonderful day!
I like songs by Ghost, could you find me some?
Would you consider the song Cirice by Ghost from his album Meliora?
Can you tell me what the genre is?
The song is metal.
What are some other options?
How about the song Dance Macabre by Ghost from the album Prequelle?
What else is there? I really like rock songs and I don't care about which album it is.
I've located 1 song that you might enjoy. How about He Is performed by Ghost from the album Meliora?
That's fantastic. I want to listen to the song from the device in my kitchen.
Please approve the upcoming details: Use the kitchen speaker to play song He Is.
No, change it to play on my bedroom.
Please approve the upcoming details: Use the bedroom speaker to play He Is.
Yep, that's right.
The song has started playing.
Thanks a lot.
Do you want me to help you with anything else?
No, thanks so much.
Hope you have a wonderful day.
I am in a mood to listen to songs like Jai Waetford 's songs. Maybe something in Pop.
There is 1 song you may want to listen. How about Shy from Jai Waetford of the album Heart Miles?
Fantastic, Play that song.
Let me confirm that you want to play Shy on TV.
Not really. I want it played on the kitchen device.
Let me confirm that you want to play Shy on the kitchen speaker.
That is right.
The song is playing.
Thanks. That is all.
Have a wonderful day.
Hi, could you help to find some songs for me?
I have found 10 songs you may like, one of which is Business Dinners by Sigrid in thee album Sucker Punch.
May I know it's genre?
It is a Pop song.
Do you have any alternatives?
How about Tennis Court by Lorde in his album Pure Heroine?
May I know it's genre?
It belongs to the Electropop genre.
Do you have any alternatives?
How about Thinkin Bout You by Ciara in her album Beauty Marks?
That sounds great!
Do you want me to play the music for you now?
Yes, that will be great.
Sure, please confirm your action to play Thinkin Bout You on TV.
Could you play it on the kitchen speaker instead?
Sure, please confirm your action to play Thinkin Bout You on the kitchen speaker.
Could you play it on my bedroom speaker instead?
Sure, please confirm your action to play Thinkin Bout You on the bedroom speaker.
That's great. Thank you.
Your music is currently being played.
May I know the genre of the song?
The song belongs to the Pop genre.
Sure, that's all I need. Thank you.
Have a great day ahead!
I want you to search for some songs for me.
Do ou like Mchat by Hoba Hoba Spirit on the Kamayanbaghi album?
Yes, that works for me.
Shall I start playing the song now?
Yes, play it now.
You want me to cast Mchat on your TV. Is that right?
Yes, that is right. Can you tell me what kind of music it is?
It is in the Rock genre and it is playing now.
Thanks a lot.
Do you need anything else?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a great day.
I am in a nice mood and I would like to listen some nice songs, I need you to search for the good one.
How about a song from the Album Genesis which name is Kara Kul by Mark Petrie?
Yes, I like it.
Okay, How can I help you further?
I like to hear the song now, can you play for me in my Kitchen device?
Yes, give me your confirmation to play Kara Kul on Kitchen speaker.
No, I have to go to bedroom now, please play it on the speaker in the bedroom.
Okay, please confirm to play Kara Kul on bedroom speaker.
Yes, that is correct, continue.
Song started playing and enjoy your day
Thanks a lot for your help
Any more help you need?
No, that's all for me.
Have a great day.
I'd like to listen to some music. I like the album Forever.
What about Silence by Popcaan from the Forever album?
What genre is that?
It's a reggae song.
I'd like something else. I like Popcaan.
What about Wine For Me by Popcaan from the Forever album?
What is the genre?
It's a reggae song.
That's a good one.
Would you like me to play the song?
Yes I do.
Play Wine For Me on your TV. Is this correct?
I want to hear it in my kitchen.
Play Wine For Me on kitchen speaker. Is this correct?
No. I want to hear it in my bedroom.
Play Wine For Me on bedroom speaker. Is this correct?
Yes.
The song has started.
Thank you. That is all.
Have a nice day.
Could you help me find some pop songs?
I managed to find 10 songs you might like, one of which is Adorn by Miguel in his album Kaleidoscope Dream.
Do you have any alternatives?
Would you like to listen to African Beauty by Diamond Platnumz in his album A Boy From Tandale instead?
Sure, could you play that?
Do you want to play it now?
Yes, please play it on the kitchen device.
Please confirm your action to play African Beauty on the kitchen speaker.
Could you play it on my bedroom speaker instead?
Please confirm your action to play African Beauty on the bedroom speaker.
Yes, that is confirmed.
Your song is currently being played.
Sure, thank you!
Could I further assist you?
No, that's all the help I need.
Thank you and have a great day ahead!
I ma looking for some good songs.
How about Love Lost by Mattia Cupelli from Reminiscence?
What about it's genre?
The genre is Soundtracks song.
Okay, That sounds great to me.
Would you like to play the song for you?
Okay, please play it on my kitchen speaker.
Please confirm: You want me to play Love Lost on kitchen speaker.
No. Please play it on my bedroom speaker.
Please confirm again: You want me to play Love Lost on bedroom speaker.
Yes, That is right.
Song is playing. Enjoy the music.
Okay, Thank you for your help.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. That will be all. Thank you.
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day.
I am looking for some good music.
Have you heard of Wojenka by Lao Che of the Dzieciom album?
No. Do you have any Ariana Grande songs?
What about Be Alright by Ariana Grande of the Dangerous Woman album?
Never mind nothing by her either. How Ghost songs of the Meliora album?
I have 2 songs by Meliora album by Ghost. How about Cirice?
Yeah, that's the one.
Do you want me to play it for you?
Yes play that song.
Do you wan to hear Cirice on the TV?
Yeah, play it on the TV.
Okay, the song is playing.
Cool, thanks for all your help.
You are welcome. Bye.
I'd like to listen to some songs.
I found 10 songs you may like. How about Burn by Ellie Goulding in the album Halcyon?
What genre is it?
It's a Pop song.
Do you have anything else?
How about The Heart Wants What it Wants by Selena Gomez in the album For You?
What genre is it?
It's a Pop song.
What else you got?
One Last Time by Ariana Grande from the album My Everything?
That sounds good.
Do you want to play it now?
Yes, play it on my kitchen device.
So you want me to play One Last Time on the kitchen speaker?
Yes, that's right.
Okay, I'm playing it now.
What genre is it?
It's a Pop song.
Thanks. That's all I need.
Have a nice day.
I'd like to listen to some songs, help me look for some?
Now that I Found You by Carly Rae Jepsen from the album Dedicated might be something you'd like.
What type of song is it?
It's a Pop song.
Sounds right up my alley.
Do you want me to play the song?
Yeah, put it on the speaker in kitchen.
I'll put Now That I Found You on kitchen speaker, is that right?
Yeah, that's right.
The song has started playing.
Thanks, that's all the help I need.
Have a good rest of your day.
I'd like to listen to some music, preferably something from the album Undefined put out by Simply Three.
Here is 1 song you should enjoy: it is by Simply Three and it is off the Undefined album it is called Rain.
Perfect play it now.
Would you like Rain played on the TV?
Of course. What kind of music is it?
It's genre is Rock and the song has begun.
I appreciate your help but I won't be needing anything else.
Have a truly fine day.
Would you find me some Justin Bieber songs?
I have 3 songs that you should like. Do you want to listen to All That Matters by Justin Bieber in the album Journals?
That sounds good.
Shall I play the music?
Okay.
Please confirm that you want me to play All That Matters on TV.
Yes, that is right.
I put the song on.
Thank you. That is all I wanted.
Have a great day.
Hi, i need a help, I am interested to listening song, Especially i like Rock songs, Could you find me some songs in album Night Visions?
Sure, I will help you, I found 1 song for you, Do you like Radioactive by Imagine dragons in Night Visions?
Yes, i like that song
Can i play the song for you?
Yes, play it on tv
Please confirm the following details: play Radioactive on TV
Yes
Started playing your favorite song
Thank you very much for your help
you are welcome, Shall i help you with anything more?
No, thanks, bye
have a great day, bye
Can you locate some songs by Grimes on the Visions album?
Do you like Oblivion by Grimes on the Visions album?
Yes, I do. Cast the song on the kitchen speaker.
You want to cast Oblivion on your kitchen speaker. Is that right?
Yes, that is right.
Your song has started.
Thanks a lot. That is all.
Have a great day.
I'm looking for songs to listen to. Can you help me find some?
I found 10 songs that you may like. How about Mercy by Shawn Mendes from the album Illuminate?
What's the songs genre?
It is a pop song.
That sounds good to me.
Would you like to play the song now?
Sure. Play it in my kitchen please.
Please confirm: play Mercy on the kitchen speaker?
Yes, that's correct.
Started playing Mercy.
Thank you, that'll be all.
Have a good day.
Can you find me a country song?
I've found All On Me by Devin Dawson from the album Dark Horse.
What else you got?
What about All The Girls Wanna Ride by Jawga Boyz from the album Kuntry?
I like that. Play.
Please confirm: play All The Girls Wanna Ride on TV.
Play it on the speaker in kitchen.
Please confirm: play All The Girls Wanna Ride on kitchen speaker.
Make it my bedroom.
Please confirm: play All The Girls Wanna Ride on bedroom speaker.
Yes, that's right.
Song is now playing.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else?
No, that'll be it.
Have a good day.
Can you find me songs from the Charlie Puth album Voicenotes?
I found 2 songs including Attention from the Charlie Puth album Voicenotes.
Which genre is the song?
The song is pop.
What other songs are there?
There is a song on the Charlie Puth album Voicenotes called The Way I Am.
That is perfect.
Do you want to hear the song?
Yes please!
Please confirm you want to play The Way I Am on the TV.
Please play it on the speaker in kitchen.
Please confirm you want to hear The Way I Am on the kitchen speaker.
Actually, play it on the speaker in the bedroom.
Please confirm you want to play The Way I Am on the bedroom speaker.
That is correct. What is the genre?
The song is pop and is playing now.
Thank you very much.
May I further assist you?
No, that will be all.
See you soon!
Can you help me find some good tunes?
I have 10 great songs. Do you want to hear Open Up by Matt Simons off his album After The Landslide?
No, what else you got?
How about Latency by Martin Garrix of the The Martin Garrix Experience album?
No, Anything else?
How about Let It Be by Hayley Kiyoko off the Expectations album?
What genre is that artist?
She is a pop artist.
Alright cool, I will listen to that one.
You want me to play the song now?
Yeah, play it on the speaker in kitchen.
You said play Let It Be on the kitchen speaker?
Never mind, play it on the bedroom speaker.
Okay, I will will play Let IT Be on the bedroom speaker, cool?
Yeah that is cool.
Alright it is starting now.
Cool thanks for the help.
Did you need anything else?
No, I am good. Thanks again.
No problem. See you later.
I am looking for some songs. I particularly like Pop songs.
Okay, how about Adorn my Miguel from the album Kaleidoscope Dream?
What else is there? I like the songs from the album Loud.
I found 1 song that may work, it is California King Bed by Rihanna in the album Loud.
Yes, that works.
Would you like me to play the song now?
Yes, play it on the speaker in kitchen.
Okay, can you confirm you would like me to play the song California King Bed on the kitchen speaker?
No, play it on the bedroom speaker.
Okay, can you confirm you would like me to play the song California King Bed on the bedroom speaker?
Yes, that is correct.
I have started playing the song.
Thank you!
Is there anything else I can help with?
No, thank you
Have a great day.
I want to hear some Country songs.
I found 10. How about All on Me by Devin Dawson in Dark Horse?
What other choices do you have?
How about All The Girls Wanna Ride by Jawga Boyz in Kuntry?
Do you have anything in the album California Sunrise?
In the album California Sunrise, I have 2 songs. How about Head Over Boots by Jon Pardi?
Yes, I want that song.
Do you want to play it?
Yes I want to hear it.
Confirm Head Over Boots on the TV.
Play it on the kitchen speaker.
Confirm Head Over Boots on Kitchen speaker.
Play it in my bedroom.
Confirm Head Over Boots on bedroom speaker.
Yes I confirm all.
The song is starting.
That is all I need today.
Have a great day.
I came to know that a lot of good songs in the album The New Classic, can you find me some nice one by Iggy Azalea?
Yes, found 4, How about Black Widow by Iggy Azalea in the album the New Classic?
Yes, I like it.
Shall I play the song for you now?
Yes, I want to listen it now, do it for me.
need your final confirmation to play Black Widow on TV.
Yes, correct, go ahead. What kind of song is this?
This is a Pop song. Song started playing, enjoy it.
Thanks for the same and that's all.
Have a great day.
Can you find me songs from the album Unapologetic?
How about Pour it Up by Rihanna in Unapologetic?
What kind of music?
The genre is Pop.
I like pop songs.
Is there anything else you need?
Play the song please.
Please confirm on TV, the song Pour it Up.
I confirm and please play.
The song is starting.
Thank you for your help.
Is there anything else?
That is all today.
Have a great day.
Can you find some songs for me? I like pop music best.
I have 10 songs for you. What about Adorn by Miguel from Kaleidoscope Dream?
That's perfect, please play it on the speaker in kitchen.
Okay, please confirm: playing Adorn on kitchen speaker.
Yeah, that's what I want.
Starting the song for you.
Thanks so much.
Is there anything more I can do to help?
No thanks, I'm good for right now.
Have a nice day.
I'd like to hear some songs.
What are your thoughts on Raging by Kygo from their album Cloud Nine?
That sounds good. Please play it on the speaker in kitchen.
Just to make sure, I will play Raging on the kitchen speaker.
Never mind that. Please play it on my bedroom speaker.
Okay. So, you want to play Raging on the bedroom speaker.
That's right. Go ahead.
I just started playing the song.
What genre is this music?
It's called a Downtempo song.
Oh, okay. Thanks. That's all.
Have a great day!
I am searching for new music to listen to, can you find me some songs?
Would you like to hear Business Dinners from the album Sucker Punch by Sigrid?
What genre is that song?
The song is considered Pop.
I really like Country songs, do you have anything else?
I have 10 more songs that you might enjoy. What about All On Me from the album Dark Horse by Devin Dawson?
That sounds perfect. I would love to hear that song.
You want to play All On Me on your TV?
Yes, that is right.
The song is now playing.
Thank you very much for all you help.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
No, that is all. Thank you again.
I am happy to help. Have a great day.
I want to listen to some music.
How about Shy by Jai Waetford from the album Heart Miles?
No, not that. What else?
How about Get Lucky by Daft Punk fromthe album Random Access Memories.
What kind of mucis is that?
It is a Punk song.
Ok. Thta sounds good.
Would you like to listen to it now?
Yes I would.
SHall I plpay Get Lucky on TV?
Yes. that's right.
Your selection is playing.
Thanks.
Do you need anything else?
I need you to stop talking while my song is playing!
Let me know if you require anything else.
Can you find any songs for me please?
I found I Like It by Enrique Iglesias from his album Euphoria.
Can you keep looking? I enjoy Cody Jinks' songs, and I really like country songs.
I found 2 possible tracks for you. How about Cast No Stones by Cody Jinks from his Adobe Sessions album?
That sounds great, please play it on the speaker in kitchen.
Confirm: playing Cast No Stones on the kitchen speaker.
I changed my mind, please play it on bedroom speaker.
Confirming that you would like to play Cast No Stones on bedroom speaker.
Yep, that's perfect.
The song will start playing.
Thanks, that's all the help I need.
No problem, have a good one.
I'm looking for some Pop songs, help me out.
Have you considered Adorn by Miguel from the album Kaleidoscope Dream?
Do you have anything else, how about Dancehall songs, I think I would prefer that?
There's 1 song you might enjoy. How about Summer Time by Vybz Kartel from the album The Gaza Don?
Yeah, I like that, play it for me.
You'd like me to play Summer Time on the TV, is that correct?
Yeah, please do.
I've started playing it.
Thanks, that's all I need help with.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
I want to play some Rock songs. Can you find me any?
I can show you 10 songs you might want to listen. How about Are You Ready by Disturbed from the album Evolution?
That sounds good.
Shall I play the song now?
Yes. Can you play it on the speaker in kitchen, please.
Let me make sure that you want to play Are You Ready on the kitchen speaker?
Yes, that is right.
The song has started playing.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else you need help with?
Not at all. Thanks.
Have a wonderful day!
Can you help me with some songs?
I found 10 songs for you. How about Promises by Nero on their Welcome Reality album?
What genre is it?
It's dubstep.
I like pop music, try the Sunset Season album.
How about Generation Why by Conan Gray on the Sunset Season album?
What else do you have?
There's Lookalike by Conan Gray on Sunset Season.
Great, play that one on any available device.
Please confirm: Play Lookalike on tv.
Play it on the kitchen device instead.
Please confirm: Play Lookalike on kitchen speaker.
Right.
Playing now.
Thanks.
What else can I help you with?
Nothing, thanks.
Have a nice day.
Hi i need a help, i am Interested in listening songs, I like Jason Aldean, Could you find some songs for me?
Do you like Dirt Road Anthem by Jason Aldean in album My Kinda Party?
Yes, I would like to play that song
please confirm the following details: play Dirt Road Anthem on tv
No, not on tv, play it on speaker in kitchen
please confirm the following details: play Dirt Road Anthem on Kitchen speaker
Yes, you are right
The song started playing on kitchen speaker, Shall i help you with anything more?
No, thank you very much for your help, That's all i need.
you are welcome, Have a wonderful day.
I'm feeling a little down today. Can you play some music, maybe that will lift my spirits.
Sure, how does the song Broken Arrows by Avicii from the album Stories sound to you?
Not quite what I'm looking for, what else do you have?
How about the song titled Whore by the band In This Moment, from the album Blood?
That sounds like just what I need to lift my spirits.
Is there anything else I can help you with right now?
Yes, can you please play that song on the kitchen speaker while I find something to eat?
No problem. So you want me to play the song Whore on the kitchen speaker, is that right?
Yes, the information you have is correct?
Okay, I will begin playing that for you.
Can you tell me what genre that song is?
That song is considered to be a Metalcore song.
Okay, thanks for the information and help.
Is there anything else I can find or do for you at the moment?
No, that will be all for now, thanks.
Have yourself a great day.
I would like to search music please. Let's do Rock, give me a variety.
OK, May I suggest a song off the album Evolution by Disturbed, called Are You Ready?
Nah, Give me more options please.
Alright, how about Be Somebody of The End Is Where We Begin album by Thousand Foot Krutch.
I don't think so. Let's try some Country songs.
Alright, How about All On Me, off the Dark Horse album by Devin Dawson?
Yes, that sound great. Let's play it now.
OK, please confirm: Play All On Me, on the TV. Is that right?
No wait. Play on speaker in kitchen.
OK, Please confirm: play All On Me on kitchen speaker. is this right?
No. I changed my mind. Play on bedroom speaker please.
Ok, please confirm: play All On Me on bedroom speaker. Is that right?
Yes. That's right.
OK, great. Music has started.
Thanks, that will be all for now.
Your welcome, have a great day.
Can you give me a hand finding some music?
How about Without Me from the album Covers by Alec Chambers?
Can you find me some Pop music instead?
I've got 10 options from my first search: how about Adorn from the album Kaleidoscope Dream by Miguel?
What else is there?
African Beauty from the album A Boy From Tandale, by Diamond Platnumz could be good.
I'll try that.
Would you like to play the song now?
Yeah, play it on the kitchen device.
You'd like to play African Beauty on the kitchen speaker?
Yeah, do that.
Alright, here you go.
Thanks, that's great.
Enjoy your music.
I'm looking for some songs. I'm a fan of Kolohe Kai.
Do you like the song First True Love by Kolohe Kai from the album Love Town?
What kind of song is it?
It's a Reggae song.
Okay, cool. Can you play the song on the kitchen device.
I'll play First True Love on the kitchen speaker, is that right?
No, actually, can you play it on my bedroom speaker?
I'll play First True Love on your bedroom speaker, is that right?
Yes, that's right.
The song has begun.
Thanks a lot.
Do you need me for anything else?
No, thanks again.
Okay, enjoy your day.
I need help finding some songs. I'm into Meghan Trainor and Pop songs in general.
How about All About That Bass by Meghan Trainor off her album Title?
That sounds pretty good.
Want to give it a listen now?
Sure, why not.
Just to make sure, you want to listen to All About that Bass on TV.
You got it.
Your music has begun!
Thanks a lot.
Anything else I can help out with?
Not right now thanks.
Enjoy the rest of your day!
Can you find me some Olly Murs songs from the album You know I know?
I found 1 song you might enjoy, how about Moves by Olly Murs on You Know I know.
What kind of music is it?
It's pop music.
Perfect, play it on any device.
Moves on the TV, is that correct?
No cast it to the speaker in kitchen please.
Moves on the kitchen speaker, correct?
Yes that's great.
Playing your song now.
Thank you very much.
Can I do anything else for you?
No that's all.
Have a great day.
I'd like to hear some music from Billy Watman off his album Cryptic.
1 song you may enjoy off the Cryptic album by Billy Watman Bohemian Rhapsody.
What category of music is that considered?
It is refereed to as Pop.
Cool, good one.
Would you like the song put on right now/
Absolutely.
Do you want to listen to Bohemian Rhapsody on the TV?
No I want to clean the kitchen so put it on the kitchen device.
You want me to cast Bohemian Rhapsody on to the kitchen speaker right?
No, the cleaning can wait, I want to lay down, so I'll listen to it on the bedroom speaker.
Your choice of location for hearing Bohemian Rhapsody is the bedroom speaker correct?
That will do.
The song is now playing.
You can go now, thank you.
Have a super good day.
Could you play some music for me?
I found 10 songs for you. What about Yeah Boy by Kelsea Ballerini from the The First Time album?
I want something else. I like Rock music.
I found 10 songs for you. What about Are You Ready by Disturbed from the Evolution album.
I want something else.
What about Be Somebody by Thousand Foot Krutch from the The End Is Where We Begin album?
That's a good one. I want to hear it. Play it through speaker in kitchen.
Play Be Somebody on kitchen speaker. Is this correct.
Yes.
The song has started.
Thanks for your help.
Would you like anything else?
No. Thanks for the help.
Have a nice day.
Can you find me some music to listen to?
What about Maximize by Amaranthe from Maximalism?
What else can you find? Any singer?
How about Serendipity by Albert Posis on Higher?
What else can you find? There are a bunch of songs from After the Landslide.
I found 1 you might like, Open Up by Matt Simons on After the Landslide.
What genre is it?
It's pop music.
That's perfect, play it on any device please.
Open Up on TV, is that correct?
No cast it to the kitchen device please.
Open up on the kitchen speaker, is that correct?
Yes that is perfect.
Playing Open Up now.
Thank you for the music!
Can I do anything else for you.
No that will be all.
Have a great day.
I want to find a good Country song to hear.
I have 10. How about All On Me by Devin Dawson from Dark Horse?
Do you have others?
How about All the Girls Wanna Ride by Jawga Boyz from Kuntry.
Do you have songs from Morgan Wallen?
I found 3 songs. From Morgan Wallen, I have The Way I talk from If I know me.
I want to hear that song.
Please confirm The Way I Talk on the TV.
Thanks that is confirmed.
The song is starting.
That is all I need
Have a great day.
I want to hear some songs by Charlie Puth.
Would you like to hear Attention from the album Voicenotes by Charlie Puth?
Yes, could you play that on the kitchen device?
Please confirm the following: play Attention from the album Voicenotes by Charlie Puth on the kitchen speaker.
No. Could you play in on my bedroom speaker?
Please confirm the following: play Attention from the album Voicenotes by Charlie Puth on the bedroom speaker.
Yes, that's what I want.
Begin playing the song.
By the way, what is this song's genre?
It is considered a Pop song.
Oh, okay. Thanks.
May I help you with anything else?
No, that's all. Thanks.
Enjoy the music.
I need to find a song for a party. I'd like a song by Major Lazer from '15.
I managed to find 1 song for you by Major Lazer. The song is called Light It Up from the album Essentials. What do you think?
What kind of song is it?
The song is Moombahton.
Yes that's great.
Should I play the song?
Yes please.
I will be playing Light It Up on the TV. Is that correct?
Yes that's perfect.
Hope you enjoy the song.
Thanks! That's all I needed.
Enjoy your day.
I'd like to hear a song. I like songs in the album The Getaway.
How about Dark Necessities by Red Hot Chili Peppers from the album The Getaway?
Is that from nine years ago?
The song is from 2016.
Ah, alright, that's the one.
Would you like to hear the song?
Yes please, play it on the kitchen speaker.
So you'd like to play Dark Necessities on Kitchen speaker?
Yes, please do.
The song has begun.
What genre is it?
It is Pop.
Thank you, that's all I needed.
Have a nice day.
Can you recommend me a song? I like songs by Frank Ocean.
I have 4 suggestions. How about Ivy by Frank Ocean in the album Blonde?
Do you have other suggestions? I enjoy Pop songs.
I have 3 suggestions. How about Nights by Frank Ocean in the album Blonde?
Yes, that sounds good.
Should I play the song?
Yes, please do.
So I should play Nights on the TV?
Yes, please do.
The song has begun. Enjoy.
Thanks!
Can I help you with anything else?
No, thank you, that will be all.
Have a nice day.
Can you play a Pop song?
Do you want to listen to Adorn by Miguel from the album Kaleidoscope Dream.
Is Adorn a song from 2016?
No, it's from the year 2012.
Do you have another song?
There is African Beauty by Diamond Platnumz from the album A Boy From Tandale.
Is it from one years back?
The song is from 2018.
Yes, I would like to listen to that song.
African Beauty to play on the TV?
No, on the speaker in the kitchen.
African Beauty playing on the Kitchen speaker.
Yes, that is correct.
Enjoy your song African Beauty.
Thank you for your assistance.
Is there anything else you need?
No, that is all thank you.
Have a good day.
I would like to search for a song please.
Sure, How does Before I leave by Jah Cure off the album World Cry sound?
Yes, that is the one I wanted to hear.
Great, please confirm: play Before I Leave on TV. Is this correct?
Yes it is. play music please
Ok, Music is confirmed
Tell me what kind of music is this and what year did it come out?
This is from 2010. This is a Reggae song.
Ok, thank you .
your welcome. Have a great day
I'm looking for a song by Jimmie Allen. Do you have anything from the album Mercury Lane?
I found 1 song for you. Best Shot by Jimmie Allen from the album Mercury Lane.
Yeah, that's what I was looking for.
Do you want to play this song?
Sure. Play it on the speaker in the kitchen.
So play Best Shot on the the Kitchen speaker?
Yes, that's right.
Enjoy your music.
Thanks. That's all I need.
Have a nice day.
I would like to listen some nice songs and generally I love to hear Metal type of songs, can you search the one for me?
Yes, can you tell whether Born For Greatness by Papa Roach in the Album Crooked Teeth is okay for you?
this is nice, but I need to search more, please get me some other songs.
What about Cirice by Ghost in album Meliora which is the nice one and definitely liked by you?
Let me know the year in which this song was released? just asking for my reference only.
This song was from the year 2015, is that detail is enough?
Yes, enough and also I like the song, can you play it for me?
Yes, I need your confirmation to play Cirice on your TV.
Yes, confirmed. do it now.
song started playing and enjoy the same.
Thanks for your work and that's all I need from you.
Have a great day.
I'd like to find a song in the album Crooked Teeth.
I've found 2 songs. How about Born For Greatness by Papa Roach in the album Crooked Teeth?
What genre of music is it? It his song from eight years back?
It's a Metal song from 2017.
What's the other song?
How about Help by Papa Roach in the album Crooked Teeth?
Yes, that's the one I'm looking for!
Would you like me to play it?
Yes, please.
So you'd like me to play Help on TV?
Yes, sounds good.
The song has begun, please enjoy.
Thanks, that's all I wanted.
Have a nice day.
I want to hear a song from nine years back.
How about Alone by Alan Walker from the album Different World?
What genre of music is that?
It's labeled as a Pop song.
Okay, that one will work. Please play it on the Kitchen speaker.
To confirm: You want to play Alone on the Kitchen speaker.
Sorry, no. Please play it on the speaker in the bedroom.
Okay. So, I'll play the song Alone on the Bedroom speaker.
That's right. Please go ahead.
Sure. Enjoy the music!
Thanks. That's all for now.
Have a wonderful day!
I want to find a song. Could you find me something from '10?
What about Alone by Alan Walker from Different World?
Yes, that is good. I would like to listen to music. Could you cast it on the kitchen device?
Please confirm that you would like Alone on the kitchen speaker.
No, put it on the bedroom speaker actually.
So you want to play Alone on the bedroom speaker?
Yes, that is right. What sort of music is it?
It is a pop song. Please enjoy!
Thanks!
Could I help you with anything else?
No, that is all.
Enjoy your day!
I feel like listening to some music.
I feel like you'd enjoy the music of Ben Rector. His song Love Like This from the album Magic is a good one.
How recent is it? From around '15? What genre?
It is a pop song from 2018.
I'll give it a listen. Can you play it from my kitchen speaker?
You want me to play Love Like This from your kitchen speaker?
That is correct.
Enjoy the song.
Many thanks! That's all I need.
Have a wonderful day!
I am looking for a song that could make me happy.
I have found 10 songs that you might like from In This Moment, the song is Sick Like me from the album Black Widow.
Do you have anything else? I haven't heard of that.
How about Yeah BOy by Kelsea Ballerini in the album The First Time?
Please look for something else.
How about the song of Lady Gaga Before I cry from her album A Star Is Born Soundtrack?
Am not sure of its genre, was it from '14?
Its a latest song, released year 2018. It's a Soundtracks song.
Okay, that's good. I think it'll help me.
Would you like me to play the song for you?
Yes, please.
Please do confirm the following details: Play the song Before I Cry on the TV.
All good, yes!
Enjoy your music, hope you'll feel better.
Thank you so much. I appreciate it.
Do you need help with anything else?
No,that would be all. Thank you!
Have a wonderful day!
Hello, my media player is dead. I wish to hear some good songs from the album Oxford in some portable device. Can you find one and play it?
Sure. There is 1 song for you. It's Annie by Connar Moon from the album Oxford. Do you wish to hear?
Is it a Rock or Pop song? When was it's release?
It's a Folk song released in the year 2018.
Okay! Please play this song.
Can you confirm me that you wish to listen the song Annie on TV, right?
I acknowledge you that the information is correct.
Thanks. Have a nice time hearing to the music.
Thank you for finding me a good song. I'm done with.
Have a wonderful day.
I would like to find a song.
What about a song by Lady Gaga from A Star is Born Soundtrack called Look What I found?
When was it released?
It is from 2018.
What is the genre?
It is a soundtracks song.
OK, sounds good.
Shall I play it?
Yes, on the speaker in the kitchen.
OK, confirming to play Look What I Found on the kitchen speaker.
Please change it to the speaker in the bedroom.
OK, confirming to play Look What I found on the bedroom speaker.
That is correct.
Have fun listening.
I am sure I will.
Is there anything else you need?
No, thanks again.
Have a nice day.
I am looking to listen to a good song from any artist.
I found 10 songs. How about John Wayne from the album Joanne by Lady Gaga.
I like Pop song and there are many in the album Title.
I found 1 song. From Title, I have All about that bass by Meghan Trainor.
I like that one.
Would you like to hear this song?
Yes I want to hear it.
Please confirm All about that Bass to cast on TV.
Cast it on the kitchen device.
Confirm All about that Bass on Kitchen Speaker.
Cast it on Bedroom speaker.
Confirm All about that Bass on Bedroom speaker.
Yes please cast it now.
Enjoy the music today.
That is all I need.
Thanks and have a good day.
I would like to play a song.
I have 10 songs. How about a Mitchell Tenpenny song called Drunk me on the Telling All My Secrets album.
Sure, please play it on the speaker in the kitchen.
OK, confirm playing Drunk Me on the kitchen speaker.
Yes, that's perfect.
Enjoy the song!
is this from '19?
Actually, it is from 2018?
What is the genre?
It is Country.
OK, thanks again.
Have a nice day.
I would like to hear a Passenger song.
I found 1 song, Let Her Go by Passenger from All The Little Lights.
What genre is it?
It's pop music.
From which year?
It came out in 2010.
Yes, that is what I want to hear.
Yes please play it.
Okay just a moment.
Let her Go cast to the TV, is that correct?
No please cast to my kitchen speaker.
Let Her Go cast to the kitchen speaker, is that correct.
Yes that is perfect.
Enjoy your song.
Thank you, that's all I needed.
Have a great day.
Hello, could you recommend me a nice song to listen to? Thanks!
Would you like to listen to Must Be The Whiskey by Cody Jinks in the albume Lifers?
May I know the genre of the song?
This is a Country song.
Do you have alternatives, I would prefer ones from Sugarland.
I managed to find 1 song for you, which is Babe by Sugarland for the labum Bigger.
Yes, that's the one I was looking for!
Would you like me to play this song for you?
Could you play it on the Kitchen speaker for me please?
Sure, please confirm your action to play Babe on the Kitchen speaker.
Sorry, I've changed my mind. Please play it on the bedroom device instead.
No problem. Please confirm your action to play Babe on the Bedroom speaker.
Sure, that sounds great!
Enjoy listening to your music!
Thank you very much.
Do you require further help?
No, that's all the help I need.
Thank you and have a great day ahead!
I am in a need to listen some music and I like Pop songs, please search the one for me.
How about a song Adorn by Miguel in album Kaleidoscope Dream? which I think is the good one.
Can you tell me the year in which the song was released.
Yes, it was released on 2012
Search for something else.
What about African Beauty by Diamond Platnumz in album A Boy From Tandale? Hope you will like it.
Can you search some other songs from the year 2014?
Yes, found 10 and the best one is Be My Baby by Ariana Grande in the album My Everything. What about your opinion?
That would be perfect and please play it for me now.
Please confirm to play the song Be My Baby on TV.
Yes, that is okay, go ahead.
Started playing the song on TV, enjoy.
Thanks a lot
Any other help?
No, thanks, that's all.
Have a great day.
I'm looking to listen to some music. Something from the album Badlands maybe?
How about Colors by Halsey, from their album Badlands?
Ok. What genre is that? When did they release it?
It's an Electropop song from 2015.
Yeah that's good
Shall I play it?
Yes
Please confirm: play the song Colors on TV
Yes that's right
Your music is playing now
Thanks so much
Always here to help
I am looking for a song to listen to.
How about I want you by Taylor Parks from We Need to talk?
Which year was it released?
It was released in 2019.
What else can you find?
How about Still Ridin Shotgun from Outlaw Soul by Tyler Wood?
What else can you find, maybe from '16?
What about Another Day of Sun by La la Land Cast from La La Land?
What type of music?
It is a soundtracks genre song.
That's what I want to hear.
Would you like me to play this song?
Yes to my kitchen speaker.
Another Day of Sun on kitchen speaker, correct?
Yes that is great.
Please enjoy your music.
Thanks that is all I need.
Have a great day.
Can you help me find a song?
How about Lotus Flower by Radiohead, in the album The King of Limbs?
Do you have other suggestions? I like Shawn Mendes, and I like all genres.
How about Aftertaste by Shawn Mendes, in the album Handwritten?
When did the song come out?
The song is from 2015.
Sounds good, I'd like to play it.
Should I play Aftertaste on the TV?
No, on the kitchen device, please.
So I should play Aftertaste on the kitchen speaker?
Actually, no, in my bedroom please.
So I should play Aftertaste on the bedroom speaker?
Yes, that's right.
The song has begun.
Thanks, that's all I needed.
Have a nice day.
I want to find a song and I especially like rock songs.
I came up with 10 possible songs. What about Are You Ready by Disturbed, from the album Evolution.
When did that song come out?
It came out last year in 2018.
Anything else? I want something released in '12.
How about Be Somebody? It's by Thousand Foot Krutch from the album The End Is Where We Begin.
What else is there? I'm okay with any album.
I found 5 songs you might like. What about Courtesy Call by Thousand Foot Krutch, again from The End Is Where We Begin.
Yeah, that sounds good.
Should I play the song for you?
Yes, please play it.
Please confirm: playing Courtesy Call on TV.
No, actually cast it on my kitchen device.
Okay, confirm you would like to play Courtesy Call on kitchen speaker.
Yeah, that's exactly right.
Enjoy the song!
Thanks, that's all for now.
Have a lovely day.
I'm searching for music.
What's your opinion about Just Kiss Her by Concorde in the album Summer House?
Do you have other music? I like all types of songs.
I discovered 10 music for you. What's your opinion about Pyramid by Jake Zyrus in the album Charice?
When did the music get released?
The music is from 2010.
That's perfect for me. I'd like to the song; play it on speaker in the kitchen.
Please verify the following information: cast the song Pyramid on Kitchen speaker.
Yeah, that's right.
Have fun with your music.
Thank you for your help!
Do you require me to assist you with something else?
No, thank you for your assistance!
Have a pleasant afternoon.
I want to listen to a song.
What about Pyaw Nay Par by Kaung Kaung from the A Soe Htae Ka A Kaung album?
What year is it from? What genre is the music?
It's from 2018. It's a pop song.
That's the one then.
Do you want to listen to it/
Yes. Play it on any device.
You want to listen to Pyaw Nay Par on your TV. Is this right?
No. Play it on my kitchen speaker.
You want to listen to Pyaw Nay Par on your kitchen speaker. Is this right?
Yes, that is right.
The song is now playing.
Thank you for your help.
Do you need help with anything else?
No thanks.
Have a nice day.
Can you find me country songs by Shailesh Premi?
There is 1 song by Shailesh Premi from the album Maza mar Liya Dhori Ke Niche. Do you want to listen to Lahnga Lasar Ke?
When was it released?
It is a recent song from 2019.
Yes, I'd like to listen to it on any device.
Proceeding to play the song Lahnga Lasar Ke on TV.
Actually, I'd prefer to listen it on the speaker in the kitchen.
No problem. Playing Lahnga Lasar Ke on Kitchen speaker.
Right. That's perfect.
Started playing the song. Enjoy your music!
Thank you. That's all I need for now.
Have a great day!
I'd like to find a song, please.
Okay, no problem! How about Burning Man by Dierks Bentley from his album The Mountain?
What kind of music is it?
It's a country song.
Is it a new or old song?
It's new. It came out in 2018.
Okay, that sounds fine. Can you play it for me?
Absolutely! Can you confirm the following details, please? I'll play Burning Man on your TV.
No, on my kitchen device, please.
Okay, my apologies! Can you confirm the following details, please? I'll play the song Burning man on your kitchen speaker.
Yes.
Enjoy your music!
Thanks! That's all.
You're welcome! Have a good day!
Help me find a song to listen to
I found 10 songs you might like. How about the song One Last Time by Ariana Grande from her album My Everything?
What kind of song is that? Is it from the year '14
Yes it's from 2014 and it's a Pop song.
Yeah that's a good one then
Want me to play it?
Sure please do.
Playing One Last Time on your TV
No, not the TV, play it on my kitchen speaker
Playing One Last Time on your Kitchen Speaker
Yes thank you
Enjoy the song.
Thanks, that's all for now
Have a good one
I want to change my mood around so I'm looking for a song.
I have 10 possible songs for you. What about Another Day Of Sun from the album La La Land by La La Land Cast?
Yes, that sounds perfect. I am eager to listen to music, could you play the song on the speaker in the kitchen?
You want to play Another Day Of Sun on the Kitchen speaker, is that correct?
No, I want to hear it from the bedroom device.
You want to play Another Day Of Sun on the Bedroom speaker?
Yes, that's what I want.
The song is now playing, enjoy.
Thank you, much appreciated.
Would you like help with anything else?
That is everything, thank you again.
My pleasure. Have a great day.
Can you find me a Pop song?
Do you like the song Adorn by Miguel on the Kaleidoscope Dream album?
Was it made five years back?
It was released in 2012.
I want that one.
Shall I play the song for you?
Yes, play it on the speaker in the kitchen.
You want me to cast the song Adorn on the Kitchen speaker. Is that right?
No, I want it playing in my bedroom.
You want me to cast the song Adorn on the Bedroom speaker. Is that right?
Yes, that is right.
Your song has begun. Enjoy!
Thanks a lot.
Do you need anything more?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a wonderful day.
I want to find a song.
I found a song. The song is Miss Me More by Kelsea Ballerini from the album Unapologetically.
What are some other songs? I like Pop.
I found 10 songs that match your request. What about Adorn by Miguel from the album Kaleidoscope Dream.
Can you find a song from '18.
I found 10 songs from '18. What about African Beauty by Diamond Platnumz from the album A Boy From Tandale.
Yes, please. I want to listen.
Please confirm: Playng African Beauty on the TV.
No, play it on the kitchen speaker.
Please confirm: Playing African Beauty on the kitchen speaker.
Yes, thank you.
You're welcome. Enjoy.
Thanks so much!
Anything else I can do for you?
No, that's all.
Have a great day.
I'm searching for music. That are plenty of wonderful music in the album Dzieciom.
I discovered 1 music for you. What's your opinion about Wojenka by Lao Che in the album Dzieciom?
That's perfect for me. I'd like to listen to songs; play it on kitchen device.
Please verify the following information: cast the music Wojenka on Kitchen Speaker.
Yeah, that's right.
Have fun with your music.
What sort of song it it?
It's rock music.
When did the music get released?
The music is from 2015.
Thank you for your assistance?
Do you require my assistance with anything else?
Nope, thank you for your assistance.
Have a pleaasant afternoon.
I want to hear some nice songs and I need your help.
Found a song Lady Luck by Jamie Woon which is in the album Mirrorwriting.
Check it whether it is from nine years ago.
It is from the year 2011, Is that okay?
Yes, that is okay for me.
Shall I play the song for you now?
Yes, I like to listen in my Kitchen, please play it on my Kitchen speaker.
please confirm to play Lady Luck on Kitchen speaker.
Yes, that is confirmed, let me know the genre of this song.
It is Electronica song and song was started playing.
Thank you for your help
Any more work you need from me?
No, that's all I need.
Have a great day.
I want to find a song. Maybe something from the album Gravity, it has lots of good songs.
I found 2 songs you may like. What about Best Friend by Jason Chen from Gravity?
What genre is it?
This one is a pop song.
What year was it released?
The song was released in 2011.
Yeah, that's right.
Do you want me to play it?
Yes, go for it.
Confirm: playing the song Best Friend on TV.
Actually, can you cast it to my kitchen speaker?
Okay, please confirm: playing Best Friend on kitchen speaker.
Changed my mind again, play it on my bedroom speaker.
Please confirm that you would like to play the song Best Friend on bedroom speaker.
Yep, that's what I want.
Hope you enjoy the song.
Thanks so much! That's all I need.
Have a nice day.
Can you songs for me particularly by Hurts.
There is 1 song Wonderful Life bu Hurts from the album Happiness. will it do?
The year and genre of music please.
Its a 2010 Pop song.
That will do, Please cast it on my kitchen speaker.
Please confirm the details, you asked for Wonderful Life on Kitchen speaker.
Thats correct, go on.
It started, Enjoy it.
Thank you, great help.
Have a wonderful day.
I'm searching for a music.
What is your opinion on African Beauty by diamond Platnumz in the album A Boy From Tandale?
What sort of song is it, and when did it come out?
The song is from 2018 and is pop music.
Yeah, that's perfect. I'd like to listen to the song.
Please verify the following information: play the music African Beauty on TV.
Yeah, that's right.
Have fun with your music.
Thank you for your help; that's all.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
I want to hear some music.
Sure. I see 10 songs you might enjoy. How about No More from the Disturbed album Evolution?
Seems familiar. That song's from 2015, right?
No, it is a 2018 song.
Ah. Sounds good. Can you play that song from my kitchen device?
Sure. You want to hear No More from your Kitchen speaker, right?
Yeah, that's what I want.
I hope you like the song.
Thanks a lot!
Do you need assistance with anything else?
That's all, thanks!
Enjoy the rest of your day.
I am looking for a song
What about the song Before I Leave from the album World Cry by Jah Cure
Yes that's a good song, cast it on my kitchen speaker
Confirming that I'll play the song Before I leave on the kitchen speaker
Yes that's good
OK enjoy your song
What kind of music is that, is it a song from eight years back?
Yup, it's a Reggae song from the year 2010
OK, that's all then!
Have a great one!
I am searching for a song. Album Loser has so many nice songs.
I searched and found 1 songs for you. What is your opinion about Older by Sasha Sloan in Loser album?
In which year it gets released?
It is released in the year 2018.
What type of genre is it?
It is a Pop song.
Yes. That is it. I wish to listen the music. You may play it on any device.
Kindly ensure that, the song Older is played on TV.
Yes. It is good.
Have a delightful day with music.
Thank you so much.
Do you need any other help for me?
Nope.Thank you so much.
Have a fantastic day.
Will you help me find a song one years back from the album Magic?
I found 1 song. How about Love Like This by Ben Rector from the album Magic?
Sounds great.
Do you want me to play it?
Yes.
Please confirm Love Like This playing on TV.
That's great. What genre is it?
Pop.
Thanks.
Anything else?
No, thanks.
Have a wonderful day.
I want to hear some pop music.
Would you like to hear Adorn from the album Kaleidoscope Dream by Miguel? I also have 10 other songs.
That sounds like a good one. Could you play it on the speaker in the kitchen?
Please confirm the following: Play the song Adorn from the album Kaleidoscope Dream by Miguel on the kitchen speaker.
No, could you please play it on the bedroom speaker?
Please confirm the following: Play the song Adorn from the album Kaleidoscope Dream by Miguel on the bedroom speaker.
Yes, that's good. Is this the album from one years ago?
No, that album was released in 2012.
Thanks, that's all I needed.
Enjoy your music.
I want to listen to a song, maybe something by Scotty Sire because I really like his music.
I've found 1 song. It's called Take Me Away by Scotty Sire from the album Ruin Your Party.
What's the genre of music? Was it made in '18?
It's a Pop song from 2018.
Okay. Yeah, that's the song.
Do you want me to play it?
Yes. Please play it on my kitchen speaker.
Just to make sure, you want to play Take Me Away on the Kitchen speaker.
Actually, no. Please play it on my bedroom device.
Sure. You want to play Take Me Away on the Bedroom speaker.
That's right. Go ahead.
It's playing now. Enjoy!
Thank you so much.
Do you need anything else?
Nope. That will be it.
Have a wonderful day!
I want to hear a song.
I found 10 songs including Into You from the Ariana Grande album Dangerous Woman.
What other songs are there?
Do you like High from the Sivik album Winter Collection?
Do you have any songs by Iggy Azalea?
Do you like Black Widow from the Iggy Azalea album The New Classic?
I like that song. Please play it now.
Please confirm you want to play Black Widow on the TV.
That is perfect.
Enjoy the song!
Thank you, that will be all.
See you soon!
I'm looking for a song I like by Selena Gomez.
I've found 2 songs. Would you like to hear Love Will Remember by Selena Gomez from the album Stars Dance?
Sure, that one will work.
Do you want me to play it?
Yes, please. Go ahead.
Alright. To confirm, I will play Love Will Remember on the TV.
Correct, that will be just fine.
Playing the song now. Enjoy!
What genre of music is this again?
It's labeled as a Pop song.
Oh, okay. Thank you so much.
Do you need anything else?
Nope. That will be all.
Have a great day!
Hey! I am so happy today that I feel like listening to some good music. Could you find me one?
Hey! Do you wish to hear the song Royal Beggars from the album Holy Hell by British Metalcore Band Architects that was released in 2018.
Do you have other song collections for I like to hear songs composed by Justin Bieber.
Okay! Lemme search for you.... Hey! I can find 3 songs for you... Do you wish to hear the song All That Matters from the album Journals by Justin Bieber?
Yup! I'm looking for that only....
Can I play the song for you?
Yup! Please play it on my kitchen device.
Please can you confirm me that you wish to play the song All That Matters in the Kitchen speaker ,right?
Hey! Please not in Kitchen speaker, but can you play in my bedroom device.
Sure! I will do that for you.... But before that, please can you confirm that you wish to hear the song All That Matters in your Bedroom speaker.
Yup! You're right.
Here you go!!! The song will play shortly !!! Keep enjoying !!!
Cool.... thanks for your time.
Do you want me to play any other song for you?
Nope, thanks.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you help me find some music?
Hoba Hoba Spirit has the song Mchat from their album Kamayanbaghi - how does that sound?
What else is there?
How about the song Summer from the album Joytime, by Marshmello?
Can you find me something from two years back? It doesn't really matter who.
How about Airplane Mode from the album Holo by Limbo?
What's the genre?
Limbo makes Pop music.
Yeah, that sounds good.
Would you like me to play the song now?
Yeah, play it on the kitchen speaker.
You'd like me to play Airplane Mode on the kitchen speaker?
Yes, please.
Alright, enjoy!
Thanks, that's all I need.
Have a great day.
Can you help me find a song?
Sure thing! I found 10 songs for you. I recommend Year Zero by Ghost on their album Infestissumam. Does that interest you at all?
I want a song from the year 2011.
Okay, no problem! I have another 10 songs for you. I recommend All the Girls Wanna Ride by Jawga Boyz on their album Kuntry. Does that interest you at all?
Yeah, I like that one!
Great! Would you like me to play that song for you?
Yes, please.
Great! Can you confirm the following details, please? I'll play the song All the Girls Wanna Ride on your TV.
Yup.
Enjoy your music!
I can't remember the genre of that song. What is it?
It's a country song.
That's right! Thanks!
You're welcome! Can I help you with anything else?
No, that's all.
Have a good day!
Hi, I need to find a song for a party. Any kind of music is fine.
How about Glow by Madcon from the album Contraband?
Yes that's great. I'd like to listen to it.
So you'd like me to play Glow on the TV. Is this correct?
No, please play it on the speaker in the kitchen.
I will be playing Glow on the Kitchen Speaker. Is this correct?
Yes, that's perfect.
I hope you like the music.
Thanks, I will.
Can I help you with anything else.
No that's all, thanks.
Have a wonderful day.
I want to listen to a good song.
How about Cocaine March by Nico Cartosio from the album Melting.
Do you have something else? I like music by Alessia Cara. Find me a song from 2018.
I found 2 songs you may like. One song is Out of Love by Alessia Cara from her album The Pains of Growing.
Do you have something else? I like Pop songs. The album The Pains of Growing has great songs.
I found 1 song you may like. How about Trust My Lonely by Alessia Cara; also from the album The Pains of Growing.
Yes, that's good.
Should I play the song?
Yes, play it on my kitchen speaker please.
Please confirm the following: play the song Trust My lonely on the Kitchen speaker.
Yes, that's right.
Enjoy the song!
Thank you. That's all.
Have a great day.
I want to listen to some music. Make it Alternative Country songs today.
I found 1 song. Do you want to listen to Cover Me Up by Jason Isbell? It's from the album Southeastern
Is that from six years ago?
Yes. From the year 2013
Yes I know that one
Would you like to play it?
Yep. Play it
Please confirm: playing Cover Me Up on TV
No, make it on the speaker in the kitchen instead
Please confirm: playing Cover Me Up on the kitchen speaker
No. I want it on the bedroom device really
Please confirm: playing Cover Me Up on the bedroom speaker
Yes that's the one
Your music is playing now
Thank you
Don't mention it
Can you play a song from the album Anesthetic?
Do you like Cross Off by Mark Morton from the album Anesthetic?
Yes, that is the one.
Would you like to play this song?
Yes, play the Cross Off.
The Cross Off to play on the TV.
Is it from seven years back? What is the genre?
It's from 2019 and it's a Metal song.
Thank you for your assistance.
Have a good day.
I need some help finding a song.
How about Call Me Maybe by Carly Rae Jepsen off of her Kiss album?
Yeah, that's perfect!
Want to give it a listen right now?
Sure, why not.
Okay. Just to make sure, you want to hear Call Me Maybe on TV.
Yup. How old is that song?
Your song released in 2011 has started!
Thanks a bunch.
Welcome! Anything else you need help with?
Not right now, thanks.
Anytime. Enjoy your day!
I want to find a song.
I have 10 songs for you. How about Ana Mosh Anani by Amr Diab in Shoft El Ayam?
What year did that come out?
It came out in 2014.
Yes, that is the one I am looking for. I would like to listen to some music.
Please confirm that you want to play Ana Mosh Anani on the TV.
Yes, that is good.
Please enjoy your music.
Thanks! That is all.
Have a great day.
Play some music for me. Something by Matt Simons maybe?
How about Matt Simons' Open Up? It's from his album After The Landslide
I like that one
Would you like to play it now?
Yeah play it. On the kitchen speaker though
Please confirm: play Open Up on your kitchen speaker
Yeah do that. What genre is it? What year was it released?
Your music is playing. It's a pop song from 2019.
Thanks so much
Hope you have a wonderful day
Find me a metal song from three years back please.
How about Maximize by Amaranthe from Maximalism?
Can you find anything else?
Do you like Pisces by Jinjer from King of Everything?
Anything else you can find?
How about Shiroyama by Sabaton from the Last Stand album.
Yes that is what I want to hear.
Shiroyama to the tv, correct?
No please cast to the kitchen device.
Please confirm the following: you want to hear Shiroyama cast to the kitchen speaker.
Yes that is what I want to hear.
Enjoy the song.
Thanks that's all I need.
Have a great day.
I need you to find me a song.
Do you like the song No More by Disturbed on the Evolution album?
Yes, that is great.
Shall I play the song now?
Yes, play it on my kitchen speaker.
You want to cast the song No More on the kitchen speaker. Is that right?
No, play it on the speaker in the bedroom.
You want to cast the song No More on the Bedroom speaker. Is that right?
Yes, that is right and can you tell me what genre the song is?
The genre is rock and I hope you enjoy it.
Thanks a lot. That is everything.
Have a great day.
I want to find songs by Thousand Foot Krutch.
What about the song Be Somebody by Thousand Foot Krutch from the album The End Is Where We Begin?
What year was it released?
It came out in 2012.
Yes, that's it.
Do you want to play the song?
Yes, play it on the kitchen device.
Please confirm: playing the song Be Somebody on the kitchen speaker.
Yes, thank you.
Playing now, enjoy.
Thank you so much.
Have a great day.
Can you search for some songs?
How about Gotta Be A Reason by Alec Benjamin from the album Narrated For You?
Is there any other song by Zayn Malik from one years back?
How about Good Years by Zayn Malik from the album Icarus Falls?
Is there any other song?
How about Let Me by Zayn Malik from the album Icarus Falls?
What is the category of the music?
The music comes under Pop category.
Yes, That is the song I am looking for.
Do you want me to play the song?
Yes. Please play the song for me.
Please confirm: You want me to play Let Me on TV.
No. play it on speaker in the kitchen.
Please confirm: You want me to play Let Me on Kitchen speaker.
No. play it on my bedroom speaker.
Please confirm again: You want me to play Let Me on Bedroom speaker.
Yes, That is right.
Song is playing. Enjoy the music.
Okay. Thank you for the help.
Can I help you with anything else?
No. That will be all. Thank you.
I am glad I could help. Have a great day.
I need to listen to some music to relax. I like all kind of music but mostly songs from Twenty One Pilots.
I could play for you the song Fake you out from the album Vessel by Twenty One pilots.
You got it, that's exactly what I need.
Can I push the play button then?
Yes, please.
Give me the green light after reading this. You want to play the song Fake you out on TV.
Not right, I want to listen to it on the Kitchen speaker.
Confirm again. You want to listen to the song Fake you out on kitchen speaker.
Yes, do it. Is the song from 2011?
It's from 2012. Have a nice time with your favorite tune.
Thank you, that's very kind of you. Bye
My pleasure. Bye to you.
Will you find me a song?
How about Pisces by Jinjer from the album King Of Everything?
Any Pop songs from the album The Bright Side?
How about Blue Skies by Lenka from the album The Bright Side?
From 2018?
No, 2015.
Will you find songs in the album Unapologetic from '12?
I found 3 songs. How about Pour It Up by Rihanna in the album Unapologetic?
That's it.
Do you want to play it?
Yes.
Please confirm Pour It Up playing on TV.
That's right.
Enjoy.
Thanks, that's all for now.
Have a wonderful day.
I want to listen to a song
There are 10 songs: do you like Tennis Court by Lorde in the album Pure Heroine?
I would like to listen to a Carly Rae Jepsen song
There are 2 songs, one of these is Call Me Maybe by Carly Rae Jepsen in album Kiss
What Pop song do you suggest?
I suggest Now That I Found You by Carly Rae Jepsen in the album Dedicated
Ok, I like this one
Where do you want to listen it?
Play it on my kitchen speaker, please
Play Now That I Found You on Kitchen speaker: do you confirm?
No, I'd rather listen to it on the speaker in the bedroom
Play Now That I Found You on Bedroom speaker: do you confirm?
Yes, It's correct. This song is from 2019, right?
Yes, it's from 2019. The song started: enjoy!
Thank you so much!
Have a nice day
I'd like to listen to some music from '17.
How about Airplane Mode by Limbo from their album Holo?
What kind of music is that?
It is a pop song.
I prefer Country songs. Like the alnum When Was The Last Time.
I found 1 song you might like. How about If I Told You by Darius Rucker from the album When Was The Last Time.
Yes. I'd like ot listen to that.
You like me to play the song If I Told You on the TV, correct?
No. Play it on my kitchen speaker
You like me to play the song If I Told You on the Kitchen Speaker, correct?
Yep. That's right.
Here is your music. Enjoy.
Thanks!
Let me know if you require anything else.
Can you play some music for me as I cook dinner?
Sure, does Din Don Dan by Ryutaro Nakahara from the album Seventh Heaven so like a song you would like?
What genre of music would that be classified as and what year was it released, 2010?
That song is from the Anime genre and was released in the year 2015.
I'm not sure if that's really my taste of music. Can you find something from the artist Common Kings?
I was able to find 1 song, sung by Common Kings titled No Other Love from the album Summer Anthems.
That's great, I love that song. You can begin playing it on any device that is connected.
So you want me to begin playing the song titled No Other Love on the TV. Is that correct?
No, I'm sorry. I think I would prefer listening to it on the speaker in the kitchen.
So now you would like me to play No Other Love on the Kitchen speaker. Is that correct?
Yes, that's what I want. I forgot to ask, what genre of music is that song classified as and what year was it released?
That particular song falls under the Reggae genre and it was released in the year 2013.
Thanks for the information and help.
Was there anything else you need from me before I go?
No, you've already been a huge help.
Have a good day and enjoy your music.
I'm looking for somewhere I can grab some food in Fremont. Something intermediate priced would be perfect.
Is there any kind of food you want to eat specifically today?
Asian Fusion food would be perfect.
If you're in Fremont, you've got to give Asian Pearl Seafood Restaurant a try.
What's their address and contact number?
They live at 43635 Boscell Road and you can reach them at 510-979-1368.
Yeah, that works for me. I'd like to make reservations at a restaurant on the 10th of March.
What time would you like it?
1:30 in the afternoon, for 5 people.
So you'd like to book at table for 5 at Asian Pearl Seafood Restaurant in Fremont at 1:30 pm on March 10th, right?
Yeah, that works for me. Do they serve liquor? Live music?
Got it. They don't have have any live music or any alcohol.
Thanks a bunch!
Did you need anything else?
Nope. Thank you.
Have a good day!
I'm hungry and want to find a great restaurant.
What sort of food? Italian, Indian or Mexican, maybe? Just let me know what sort of cuisine you love. Also, which city will you be dining in?
I'll be eating in SF. I love Japanese, that would be great.
Great news, I found 10 restaurants you might like. 2g Japanese Brasserie is great and it's located right in San Francisco!
Where are they located?
601 Van Ness Avenue is their street address.
What's their phone number?
Their number is 415-292-9997.
That sounds great. Can I make a reservation now?
What time would you like to make the reservation for?
Let's make it for 12:30 pm.
Great! Pleast confirm the following: Reservation today at 2g Japanese Brasserie in San Francisco, CA at 12:30 pm. Reservation for  2 people.
Great, I confirm. Do you know if there is live music at the restaurant?
Your reservation has been made. Sorry, no, they don't have live music.
Thanks a lot. That's all the information I need.
Great! Have a wonderful meal.
Could you find a restaurant for me? I'm looking for a place to eat.
Are you looking for a certain type of restaurant? Let me know if you're wanting American, Indian, or any other type of restaurant. Which city should I be looking in?
I'm looking for European food in San Francisco.
Ayola is a nice Eurpoean restaurant in San Francisco.
What is their contact number? Do they have live music?
They do not appear to have live music shows. Their contact number is 415-348-0808.
Can you suggest any other restaurant?
Another European restaurant in San Francisco is Bar Tartine.
Yes, that works for me.
Would you like to reserve a table?
Yes, I want the reservation for 6 people at  1 o"clock in the afternoon.
Please confirm the following: Booking Reservation at Bar Tartine in San Francisco today at 1 pm for 6 people.
Oh, wait, it's for five people, not 6.
Please confirm the following: Booking Reservation at Bar Tartine in San Francisco today at 1 pm for 5 people.
Yes that works for me.
I have successfully reserved a table for you. Will there be anything else?
Do they serve liquor?
Yes, they serve alcohol.
Do they have live music? What is their address?
No, they do not have live music. The restaurant is located at 561 Valencia Street.
Thank you very much. That is all I need.
You're welcome. Have a good day.
Can you recommend a place to eat?
Which city should I search in? What kind of food are you looking for some examples are -  1. Italian 2. Mexican 3. Anything else
I am in the Pacifica area. I would like Sushi at an afforadable price.
I found 3 restaurants in Pacifica area with " 8 Sushi " being the most recommended.
That sounds good, thank you.
Do you need help with anything else?
Can you help me make a reservations at " 8 Sushi " restaurant?
Yes, when would you like the reservation for?
I would like it to be March 1st at 6 pm.
Please confirm that I have the correct information: 1 Table at " 8 Sushi " in Pacifica, for 2 people, Today at 6 pm
That sounds great.
Reservation successful.
Thank you very much.
Do you need help with anything else?
No, that will be all thank you.
You're welcome, have a nice day.
I'm looking for a good place to eat to take my date. She really like's Shabu-shabu food and lives in Berkeley.
There is 1 restaurant in Berkeley that fits your criteria called Zabu Zabu
Sounds really good!
Would you like me to reserve a table?
Yes please do.
What time would you like me to make your reservation for?
How about 11:30 AM on Sunday this week for 2.
Confirming one table at Zabu Zabu in Berkeley at 11:30 AM the day after tomorrow for 2.
That will work!
Your reservation is all set.
Thanks a ton!
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No thank you.
Have a nice day.
I am just getting off work, could you recommend a place to get some food?
What city should I look in?
I'd like it in SF, please.
What are you in the mood for? American? Mexican? Whatever you'd like.
I would love some curry.
I've got 10 restaurants here and, of them, Amber is in San Francisco and looks nice.
Could I get another option?
Maybe August 1 Five, which is also a nice restaurant in San Francisco.
That sounds great. I'd like to make a reservation for 3 at six pm, on March 2nd.
Excellent. Let me just confirm that for you: a table for 3 at 6 pm tomorrow at August 1 Five in San Francisco
That is exactly right.
Done. Everything's all set.
Any chance they have live music? And do you have their number if I need to reach out to them?
No music, sadly. But their number is 415-771-5900
Sweet, thanks so much.
Need anything else?
Nope, nothing at all. Thanks for your help!
Have a fabulous day!
I am looking for a place to eat. I want a place which serves alcohol.
Are you looking for American or Mexican food? Which city should I search in?
I would like to have some pizza and pasta in Campbell.
I found 2 restaurants. I found Buca Di Beppo Italian Restaurant in Campbell
What is their phone number and are there prices economical?
Their prices are moderate and their phone number is 408-377-7722.
Could you suggest any other restaurant?
Dicicco's Ristorante Italiano Autentico is nice and its located in Campbell.
Yes, that works for me.
Would you like to reserve a table here?
Yes I want to make a reservation for the 14th of March for two people.
What time is the reservation for?
Reserve it for 6 in the evening.
Please confirm the following details: Booking a table for 2 at Dicicco's Ristorante Italiano Autentico in Campbell on March 14th at 6 pm.
Yes that works for me. Are the prices economical and do they play live music?
Your reservation is set. They do not have live music and their prices are moderate.
Thank you very much.
Can I help you with anything else?
No. Thank you very much.
Have a good day.
I'm very hungry right now, I'd like to eat somewhere.
What would you like to eat today?
Maybe something exotic, like Chinese food.
You want to eat in any city close by or in particular?
Only around San Francisco.
Found a restaurant called Alice's which is very close by to San Francisco.
What other options are there?
Let me check, well there is also Bamboo Restaurant located in the middle of San Francisco
I'd also like it to have this restaurant live music inside, and to have a large variety of liquor to order as well.
Sorry but no live music in the establishment, but they do serve alcohol.
Sounds fine. Make a reservation for two people, please.
at what time would you want it?
Would be nice Half past 12 in the afternoon for the day after tomorrow, please.
So, just to confirmed. I'll book a table for 2 at Bamboo Restaurant, in San Francisco at 12:30 pm the day after tomorrow.
You know what, better make it at 6 o"clock in the evening for three people
so just to confirmed again, it would be at 6 pm for 3 people.
nope, changed my mind, better on 7th of March.
So it would be at Bamboo Restaurant for next thursday.
that would be great.
It is done.
thanks a lot, that is all for now
have a wonderful day.
I wanna find a place to eat.
What kind of food do you want? it could be Mexican, American, or anything. What city should I search in?
I need it in San Francisco. Some veggie food will be great.
Ben Wah Restaurant is a very good restaurant that is in San Francisco.
Is the price range on the page expensive?
The price range is actually moderate.
Tell me their address.
The address is 2786 California Street
Yes that is fine
Wanna reserve a table here?
Yes, I want a reservation.
What time is the reservation?
I want it to be at afternoon 12:30 and on Saturday this week.
Confirm the booking at Ben Wah Restaurant in San Francisco at 12:30 pm tomorrow for 2 people.
Yes that is good
The reservation went though fine.
Give me their number and tell me if they serve liquor.
No alcohol and their phone is 415-318-8000.
Thanks a lot.
Can I get anything else for you?
No thanks.
Have a good one
Im very hungry I would like to eat somewhere
Where would you like to it?
Hayward would be nice.
Would you like Chinese, Italian, Mexican?
I'm on the mood for some dumplings.
Chef's Experience China Bistro is a really nice restaurant downtown of Hayward.
Whats the address?
22436 Foothill Boulevard
any other option close by?
Frannie's Restaurant is also a nice restaurant in Hayward.
You know their phone number? also would they have some live music?
The number is 510-728-7728, but sadly no live music.
Right, make a reservation at 7:30 pm on the 11th of this month for 2 people, please.
So, just to confirmed, I'll make a reservation on March 11th for 2 people at 7:30 pm at Frannie's Restaurant in Hayward.
Yep, that would be great. Do they serve nice liquor?
Ok, I finished the reservation, and yes, they do have alcohol
that's great, thank you very much
have a wonderful day
My family and I will be taking a vacation in the near future.  Do you have any suggestions on a place to eat?
What is your vacation destination? Do you have any food preferences ?
We will be arriving in Newark this weekend. We love to dine at a restaurant specializing in Afghan food.
There is 1 restaurant that I can recommend in Newark. Afghan Village Restaurant would be perfect for your family.
What is the address of this restaurant? Do you know the average price of dinner at this place?
They are located at 5698 Thornton Avenue. Their dinners are in the moderate price range.
This place sounds perfect for us.
Would you like to make reservations?
Yes a reservation would be a good idea.
What time would you like to dine?
We would like to have lunch at this restaurant. Please make the reservation in the afternoon 1.
The confirmation is for a table for 2 at Afghan Village Restaurant in Newark at 1 pm today.
Would you please change that reservation to a table for 4 people.
I have confirmed a table for 4 people at 1 pm.
I'm sorry, would you please make the reservation on the 7th in the evening 5?
I have confirmed a table for 5 pm next Thursday.
Thank you. Do you know if they serve liquor? Also, will you give me their phone number?
Your reservations are confirmed. They do not serve alcoholic drinks. The phone number to the restaurant is 510-790-0557.
Thank you for your help.
May I assist you with any other reservations?
Not at this time. Thank you for your assistance.
Have a good day!
I am meeting a friend and we plant to get food. Can you find me a place that sells noodles in Millbrae?
There are 7 noodle places in Millbrae. Asian Pearl is a nice restaurant.
I am looking for a different noodle place that is inexpensive. Are there cheaper places in Millbrae?
There is 1 cheaper noodle restaurant, Cheung Hing Restaurant in Millbrae.
I would like to go to Cheung Hing Restaurant. Please make a reservation.
What time would you like to make a reservation at Cheung Hing Restaurant?
I would like the reservation for 17:00.
You now have a table booking for 2 people at Cheung Hing Restaurant in Millbrae at 5 pm today. Please confirm.
I would like to make the booking at evening 7:30 on March 10th.
The reservation is at 7:30 pm on March 10th. Please confirm.
I would like the reservation changed to March 5th.
The restaurant is in Millbrae, and the booking is next Tuesday. Please confirm.
Yes, I would like to confirm the reservation.
The reservation has been confirmed.
Thank you, that is all I need.
Have a good day.
I am going out to dinner later. Do you know of any good restaurants in SF?
Is there any certain kind of restaurant you are wanting?
I would like some California style food.
I know of a great place in San Francisco called Al's Place.
I want somewhere that is more expensive, do you know of anywhere else?
Another restaurant in San Francisco that I would recommend is Alta Msp.
Do you know if they serve alcoholic beverages there?
The restaurant does not serve any alcohol.
Does the restaurant have any live music playing?
The restaurant does not have live music.
That restaurant sounds great to me, I would like to make a reservation there.
What time can you make the reservation for?
I would like to make the reservation for twelve in the afternoon.
I have a reservation for 2 people at Alta Msp in San Francisco at 12 pm, today.
That is great. What is the phone number for Alta Msp?
The phone number for Alta Msp is 415-580-7662. I have successfully made the reservation.
What is the address for Alta Msp?
The address for Alta Msp is 1275 Minnesota Street.
Thank you so much!
Have a great day!
I am going out later with my girlfriend and we would like to go to a restaurant for dinner, can you recommend a place?
Which cuisine do you prefer and in which location should I search for a restaurant?
I want to eat fast food such as burgers in San Jose.
Alright, out of the 9 restaurants that I found in San Jose, I recommend Black Angus Steakhouse.
Can you tell me any other place?
Alright, Citrus Restaurant is another one in San Jose.
Where can I find it and do they sell liquor?
The address is 355 Santana Row and no they do not serve liquor.
That sounds good.
Should I reserve a table for you there?
Sure please make a reservation.
At what time should I make the reservation for?
At half past 7 in the evening please and please make it for 2 people.
I am going to book a table for 2 at Citrus Restaurant in San Jose at 7:30 pm today. Is that correct?
Yes. Can you give me their contact number.
408-423-5400.
Are they expensive?
Their prices are moderate.
thanks.
anything else?
no.
alright.
I'd like to make a restaurant reservation.
Sure, what city are you looking at?
San Francisco please. Can you book for 11:30?
Of course. Is there a restaurant you're thinking of?
Yes, Sheba Piano. The booking if for 5 people.
Okay, can you confirm: Reservation for Sheba Piano Lounge in San Francisco for 11:30 am today, for 5 people.
Yes, that looks good.
Your reservation was a success.
Thanks so much. I think I'm good for now.
Glad i could help. Bye.
I want to make a reservation at a restaurant for the 6th of March.
For what city should I look for a restaurant, and for what time should the reservation be made?
I want a restaurant in Mountain View, and a reservation at 1 o"clock in the afternoon.
Is there a specific restaurant that you want?
Chili's Grill is the restaurant.
Please confirm that you would like to reserve a table for 2 people at Chili's Grill & Bar in Mountain View, on next Wednesday at 1 pm.
Yes, that will be great. Please check if they serve liquor, and if they have live music.
Your reservation has been successfully placed. Yes, they serve alcohol,but no, they do not have live music.
Thanks. That is all.
Have a nice day.
I'm interested in making a reservation for five people at the Artisan restaurant in Lafayette.
At what time would you like this reservation?
Set it for 12:00.
I have a reservation for 5 people Artisan Bistro in Lafayette at 12 PM today. Is this accurate?
Yes, you got it! Is liquor served there?
I was unable to successfully make your reservation. Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that's enjoy.
Have a pleasant rest of your day.
Please book a reservation at 7 pm.
Can you tell me what city, and do you have a restaurant you like?
I would love to go to the Pacific Catch in San Mateo.
OK, please ensure this is right:  You would like a table at the Pacific Catch in San Mateo at 7 pm today for 2?
That will work, is this going to cost a lot of money?  I do not want anything too extravagant.
OK, I was able to book this for you.  It is in the moderate price range.  The phone number is 650-389-2482.
Thank you, that is all for now.
Good bye.
Please can i make a reservation at a restaurant?
May i know your preferred restaurant and location?
I want a Palermo restaurant in San Jose for a 19:30 appointment.
Please can you confirm that want you want is a Table for 2 at Palermo Italian Restaurant in the City of San Jose and that reservation be made for 7:30 pm today.
Oh yes that is what i want. Thank you.
The reservation has been successfully made.
Can i have the address in San Jose as well as their contact number.
It is located at street umber 791 Auzerais Avenue and thetheir phone number is 408-295-6459.
TI appreciate your help thanks.
Is there any other thing i can help you with?
No for now. Thank you.
Do have a lovely day.
Can you please help me make a reservation for a restaurant?
I sure can! What city do you want to eat in and what time? Or did you already have a restaurant in mind?
Brixx Pizzeria in Petaluma is the place. It's a group of four people at 11 am.
4 people want to eat at Brixx Pizzeria in Petaluma at 11 am today. Is that correct?
Yeah exactly. One more thing though, how expensive is that restaurant?
Their price range of Brixx Pizzeria is moderate. Although I'm sorry to inform you that I wasn't able to make the reservation you requested. There is another opening today at 11:30 am. Would you like me to make a different reservation for 4 people?
Ok sure, that sounds good.
I was able to complete the reservation successfully this time!
I really appreciate it.
No problem. Do you need me to help you with anything more today?
No, I think I'm going to be alright for now.
Enjoy the rest of your day then.
I am meeting family for brunch tomorrow morning. Can you find me a resturaunt in Cupertino and schedule my reservation for 11:30 in the morning?
Is there a resturaunt you would prefer?
The name of the resturaunt is Fontana's.
Would you please confirm my reservation for 2 at Fontana's Italian Restaurant in Cupertino today at 11:30 am?
Yes, this restraint sounds great. Can you tell me more about the type food that is served?
Your reservation for the Italian resturaunt is confirmed.
I appreciate this, thank you.
Is there something else I may assist you with?
No but I appreciate it.
Please enjoy your day.
Can i please make a reservation for 7 pm at Tambo.
What city do you prefer?
Oakland is okay for me.
Please re-confirm that we should book for you a Table for 2 for 7 pm  today at Tambo Peruvian Restaurant in Oakland?
No. Please make it for 7:30 pm at Santa Clara.
Okay. Please confirm a reservation for 7:30 pm at Santa Clara.
Yes that is perfect for me.
Unfortunately i am unable to make a reservation. So sorry for that. Is there anything else i can help you with?
No and thanks for you your help anyway.
Do have a lovely day.
I wish to make a reservation for 3 people next Thursday at five pm.
What restaurant do you wish to make the reservation at and in what city is it located?
I would like a reservation at Yuzu in San Mateo.
You wish to book a table at Yuzu in San Mateo for 3 people. The time for the reservation is next Thursday at 5 pm correct?
Actually, I would like it this Sunday at 19:00.
The reservation is at 7 pm the day after tomorrow correct?
That will be fine for me.
Your reservation has been made.
Thank you for the help. I appreciate it very much.
Is there anything else I can help you with today?
That will be all thank you.
Have a pleasant day and thank you for contacting our service.
I would like to make a reservation at a restaurant and make it at half past 11 in the morning.
Do you have a preference when it comes to a restaurant and in which city should I look for?
It is in San Fran and the restaurant is called Kuleto's and it is for six people.
Kindly please confirm the following details: At kuleto's Restaurant in San Francisco city ,the reservation is made for 11:30 am for today's date for 6 people.
That works well for me,Yes
kuleto's Restaurant is a nice restaurant but i am extremely sorry I was unable to make a reservation. Should I try reservation for 6 people at 11 am today?
please no.
Is there something else i can help you with?
Thank you so much but NO.
Good day to you.
I wan to make reservations at a restaurant.
What city and do you have any preferred restaurants?
The restaurant Up 2u at Alameda for 19:30.
Please confirm that you want to book a table at Up 2u Thai Eatery at the city Alameda at 7:30 pm today for 2 people.
Yes and what is their contact number.
Reservation successful. Their phone number is 510-521-6466..
Thank you.
Anything else you need?
No that's all.
Have a good day.
Make a reservation at a restaurant in Oakland
What time is the reservation for. Which restaurant would you like
Make it for twelve pm at Koryo
Do you want me to make the reservation for 2 people at 12 pm today at Koryo Sushi in Oakland?
Yep that's fine.
The reservation is booked
Thanks. that's it
have a nice day
I want to check the weather for March 7th.
What city are you checking the weather for?
I want to check in Dixon.
The average temperature is 80 degrees with a 1 percent chance of rain.
Please check the weather for me in sonoma on 9th of this month
The temperature in Sonoma is 85 degree with 6 percent chance of rain
how humid would it be
it will be 21 percent humidity
What does the weather on March 14th look like?
Which city should I check it for?
Search in Mill Valley
The temperature is expected to be 91 degrees with a 13 percent chance of rain.
What about humidity and wind?
Humidity is expected to be around 40 percent and wind speed is at 2 miles per hour.
How about the weather in Palo Alto on next Tuesday?
The temperature is expected to be 88 degrees with a 27 percent chance of rain.
Check for me please the weather in Mountain View.
The average temperature for the day should be 91 degrees Fahrenheit and 9 percent chance of rain.
Do you know the weather on March 9th?
On which city specifically?
In Yountville, please.
It is not that cold, the average temperature on that day is 91 degrees with 11 percent chance of rain.
Please tell me the weather forecast for March 8th.
Any particular city's weather forecast?
Please check the weather in Menlo Park.
The expected average temperature for the day is 83 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 9 percent chance of rain.
What's the weather like on Thursday next week?
For what city?
Look in Sebastopol.
The average temperature should be 83 degrees Fahrenheit. There'll be a 20 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy? How humid?
The wind speed will be around 1 miles per hour. The humidity should be around 30 %.
What about mill valley?
Average temperature of 91 degrees Fahrenheit. There's a 27 % chance of rain.
What'll the weather be like on March 9th?
In what city?
Check in Fairfax.
It'll be around 80 degrees and have a 3 percent chance of rain that day.
What will the weather be like on 4th of this month in San Fran?
The temperature will be averaging at around 71 degrees Fahrenheit for the day and the possibility of rain is at 16 percent.
Can you find me the weather in Novato for March 13th?
The weather for Novato for the day should be an average temperature of 70 degrees Fahrenheit with a 2 percent chance of rain.
Okay.
What else can I help you with?
I still haven't figured out what to do for my date coming up. Can you check the weather for me?
Sure, what city?
We'll most likely go to Discovery Bay.
Looks like the average is 77 degrees Fahrenheit with a 9 percent chance of rain.
Can you check the weather for me on March 13th?
Where would you like the weather for?
I want the weather for Pinole.
The forecast is for an average temperature of 84 degrees Fahrenheit with a 18 percent chance of rain.
What's the wind like?
Average wind speed is 9 miles per hour.
What about the humidity?
Humidity is expected to be 29 percent.
I need to find out the weather in Napa.
The average temperature in Napa today should be 85 degrees F and there is a 24 % chance of rain.
I want the weather in Lafayette on March 4th
The temperature is 91 degrees and there is a 15 percent chance of rain
What is the weather like in Santa Rosa on the March 10th?
The temperature is 77 degrees Fahrenheit with 18 percent chance of rain.
How humid would it be?
Around 37 percent.
And how windy?
About 9 miles per hour.
What is the weather in Menlo Park on March 9th?
There is a 15 percent chance of precipitation with at temperature of 87 degrees.
Give me the weather in Antioch on the 1st of this month.
There is only a 2 percent chance of precipitation and the temperature is 91 degrees.
What is the humidity?
Humidity will over near 17 percent.
How gusty will it be?
The wind will be blowing at 5 miles per hour.
what's the weather gonna be like in campbell on the March 6th?
the weather that day should be 75 degrees with an 8 percent chance of rain.
Can you check the weather in Walnut Creek on March 7th?
It's going to be 72 degrees Fahrenheit with 19 percent chance of rain.
How humid and windy it's going to be?
There's a 31 percent of humidity and wind speed should be 12 miles per hour.
What is the weather in Alameda.
The avergare high is 73 degrees Fahreheit. The is a slight chance of rain about 8 percent.
What is the weather in Fairfield on the March 13th.
The average temp is 74 degrees and there is 0 percent chance of precipitation.
Okay what about Larkspur on March 11th?
The average temp is 89 degrees and the chance of precipitation is 26 percent.
Whats it going to be like outside on March 8th?
Well, it depends where?
How about in Kenwood?
73 degrees on average. Chance or rain is 14 percent.
What is the weather status in Redwood city?
It is averaging the temperature of 87 degrees Fahrenheit for the day with a 20 percent probability of raining.
Can you tell me how the weather is in San Ramon on March 5th?
There will be a 24 percent chance of rain that day. It looks like the temperature will be 71 degrees Fahrenheit.
Alright, got it.
Do you need something else?
Check the weather on March 5th at Muir Beach.
The temp will be 76 with an 18 percent chance of rain.
How about Walnut Creek on the March 13th?
It will be 82 with a 14 percent chance of rain.
How about wind speed?
It will be 12 miles per hour.
i want to check the weather in healdsburg on March 7th.
the weather that day should be 73 degrees with a 9 percent chance of rain.
I'm going to be at St. Helena soon. How's the weather there?
It's expected to be at an average of 82 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 22 percent chance of rain.
Could you check the weather forecast for me?
Which city will I check?
In Concord please.
There is a 16 % chance of rain and the ave temp will be 71 degrees fahrenheit.
I want to know weather on March 5th
In which city you want
In Los Altos on March 1st
The average temperature for the day is 76 degrees Fahrenheit and there's a 6 percent chance to rain
How windy and humid will it be?
Humidy around 19 percent and average wind speed should be 3 miles per hour
Please help me check the weather in Clayton.
The expected average temperature is 70 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 1 percent chance of rain.
I need to find out the weather for March 1st.
Which city did you want to find out the weather for?
I need to know the weather in Olema, California.
The average temperature in Olema that day should be 91 degrees F with a 21 % chance of rain.
How windy is it expected to be and what will the humidity be like?
The average wind speed is looking like 3 mph and the humidity should be around 25 %.
I need to find out the weather in Daly City on March 7th.
The average temp in Daly City that day should be 75 degrees F with a 26 % chance of rain.
Sure, sounds right.
Did you need help with anything else?
I would like to check out the weather in Pleasant Hill on March 5th.
The average temperature for the day should be about 74 degrees Fahrenheit. There is a 3 percent chance of rain.
How windy will it be?
There should be an average wind speed of about 12 miles per hour.
How humid will it be?
The humidity should be around 18 percent.
Will you be nice and check the weather in Burlingame for me on March 11th please?
It tells me that the average temperature on that day is 91 degrees Fahrenheit with a 12 percent possibility of raining.
What is the humidity of the region and also what is the wind situation there?
Wind would average on 1 mile an hour speed. 34 percent is the approximate humidity.
What's the weather like in Union City on March 10th?
86 degrees with a 9 % chance of rain
Please check the weather on 11th of March.
Which city?
Saratoga please.
It's going to be 89 degrees Fahrenheit with 24 percent chance of rain.
I almost forgot I have this trip coming up. Can you check the weather for me in Burlingame on 5th of this month?
Sure. Looks like the average will be 81 degrees Fahrenheit with a 9 percent chance of rain.
Ok, and what's the humidity like?
It'll be around 17 percent.
How about the windiness?
Looks like it'll be about 4 miles per hour on average.
Please check the weather in Danville on March 1st We have a company meeting there.
There's 24 percent chance of rain on that day. The average temperature is 83 degrees.
Okay, thanks!
Do you need help with anything else?
Tell me what the weather will be on the March 11th in Belmont.
It will be 71 degrees with a 21 percent chance of rain.
What is the humidity and the wind speed?
The humidity is 7 percent with the wind at 8 miles per hour.
I'd like to check the weather please.
Where should I check the weather at?
I'd like to know the weather in Cloverdale on March 11th.
The average temperature will be 76 degrees Fahrenheit and there's a 1 percent chance of rain.
Can you check the weather in El Sobrante on March 13th?
The temperature will reach 82 and there is a 15 perent chance for rain.
What will the wind speeds be?
The wind speeds will be 8 miles per hour.
How about the humidity?
That is expected to be 19 percent.
What will the weather be like in Portola Valley on this Saturday?
The temperatue will be 86 degrees with a 13 percent chance for rain.
What weather will be in San Lorenzo on March 8th?
Average temperature: 90 degrees Fahrenheit. Chance of rain: 25 percent
Will it be a windy and humid day?
Average wind speed: 11 miles per hour. Expected humidity: around 22 percent
Ok, thanks. And on March 7th?
Average temperature: 86 degrees Fahrenheit. Chance of rain: 24 percent
What's the weather forecast for Livermore on March 12th.
The forecast for Livermore calls for an average temperature of 83 degrees iwth a 29 percent chance of rain.
What about Benicia on March 10th.
The forecast for Benicia calls for an average temperature of 79 degrees with a 10 percent chance of rain.
What's the weather looking like for March 2nd?
What city are you interested in?
Search in Burlingame, please.
The forecast calls for an average temperature of 84 degrees Fahrenheit with a 3 percent chance of rain.
Hi, could you help me check the weather in Montara on March 7th please?
Sure. the average temperature on that day is 88 degrees Fahrenheit with a 1 percent chance of rain.
May I know how humid will it be on that day?
It is expected to be 15 percent humid.
Whats the weather like in Rutherford on the March 10th?
Average temperature should be 79 degrees. There's a 23 percent chance of rainfall.
What about humidy and wind?
You are looking at an average wind speed of 10 miles per hour. Humidity> Around 39 percent.
What's the weather gonna be like March 7th?
What city are you talking about?
Sunnyvale
The temperature will be around 94 degrees Fahrenheit. There's a 25 percent it will rain.
Hey, can you tell me the weather on March 1st in Valley Ford?
Sure, it'll be around 72 degrees with a 6 percent chance of rain.
Okay thanks. How about in Pinole on March 11th?
It'll be around 89 degrees with a 17 percent chance of rain.
I'll be going on a short trip to Napa next Tuesday. Can you check what the weather will be like?
Sure, it looks like it'll be an average of 79 degrees Fahrenheit with a 2 percent chance of rain.
Great, how about the humidity?
It will be around 15 percent.
Ok, can you also check Olema, California on the 12th of March while you're at it?
Sure, it looks like it'll be an average of 77 degrees Fahrenheit with a 21 percent chance of rain.
Ok, and how humid and windy will it be?
It looks like the humidity will be around 19 percent with an average wind speed of 6 miles per hour.
Could you tell me the weather conditions please?
In what city please?
In Windsor please.
It will be around 86 degrees Fahrenheit with a 21 percent possibility of showers.
What is the weather like in inverness?
It should be 90 degrees fahrenheit with a 4 percent chance of rain.
I need to see what the weather is like in El Cerrito on the March 11th.
It'll have an average temperature of 87 degrees, with a 10 percent chance of rain.
What is the weather in Fairfax on the 12th?
The average temperature is 94 degrees with a 23 percent chance of rain.
What is the humidity and the wind predicted to be?
The humidity is expected to be 41 percent and the wind should be around 7 MPH.
Check weather for March 13th.
What city do you want?
The city is Los Gatos.
It will be 91 degrees with a 28 percent chance of rain.
How humid will it be?
The humidity will be 37 %.
How about the wind?
The average speed of the wind will be 1 mile per hour.
I want to know what the weather would be like?
For which city?
For albany.
It would be 92 degrees fahrenheit with a 19 percent chance of rain.
What is the weather in San Francisco like this Saturday?
The temperature for the day will be 72 degrees and there is a 15 percent chance of rain.
What will the weather be on March 1st?
Which city do you want to know about?
I would like to know the weather in Sunol
Average temperature: 92 degrees Fahrenheit. Chance of rain: 12 percent
Ok, thank you!
Do you need anything else?
Could you tell me the weather?
Where did you want me to check?
Check Chicago please.
Today's weather shows 73 degrees as the average and a 29 percent chance that it will rain.
Can you help me check the weather for March 1st for Campbell?
Sure. There will be a 4 percent change of rain with an average temperature of 91 degrees Fahrenheit.
Please check the weather on March 7th.
For which city?
Please check San Jose.
The average temperature will be 80 degrees with a 29 percent chance of rain.
I need the weather forecast for the 7th.
What city would you like to check the weather?
Please check Ciudad de Mexico
For that day there is a 6 percent chaning of rain and the average temperature should be 93 degrees Fahrenheit.
What will the humidity be? Will it be windy?
The humidity will be around 24 percent and the average wind speed 5 miles per hour.
Can you check the weather in Paris, France for me?
The average temperature in Paris, France should be 77 degrees Farenheit. There is also a 26 percent chance of rain.
I will go to Millbrae soon. Can you check the weather in there on March 6th?
The temperature will be around 88 degrees Fahrenheit with a 8 percent chance of raining.
I would like to check the weather.
Which city are you interested in?
I would like Berkeley.
The temperature for that day will be 91 F with a 17 percent chance of rain.
What about the March 6th.
The temperature on average will be 84 degrees F with a 7 percent chance of rain.
What about Long Beach on the 13th of March?
The average temperature will be 72 degrees F with a 9 % chance of rain.
i want to check the weather in calistoga on the 3rd of this month.
the weather that day should be 76 degrees and there'll be a 6 percent chance of rain.
how humid will it be?
it'll be around 23 percent.
What will the weather be like in Pleasant Hill on the 9th of March?
The temperature should average 83 degrees and there will be a 26 percent chance of rain.
I would like to check the weather in Hercules.
The average temperature is projected to be 81 F and there is a 19 percent chance of rain.
Can you tell me what the weather is suppose to be like on Wednesday next week in Hercules?
The average temperature is suppose to be 84 degrees with a 12 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy?
Wind speed should be 6 miles an hour.
What is the weather going to be like on March 6th in Seattle, WA?
The average temperature is forecasted to be 64 Fahrenheit, and there is a 27 percent chance of rain.
What's the wind like?
Average wind speed should be 4 miles per hour.
And the humidity?
Humidity will be around 29 percent.
Okay, thank you.
Is there anything else you need?
I wish to check the weather in Nairobi on march 1st.
105 degrees Fahrenheit is the average temperature for the day and 0 percent chances of rain there.
How about windy?
7 miles per hour is the average wind speed.
I like to check the weather on 11th of march.
In which city you want to check the weather?
I want to check in Sunol.
The average day temperature is running at 76 degrees Fahrenheit and the chances of rain is 2 percent
What's the forecast for the 8th in Sydney?
99 degrees F with a 7 % chance of rain.
Humidity?
21 percent.
I want to check the weather condition in Daly City on March 12th. Can you help me to check there?
Yes, please note that the average level of Temperature will be 83 degrees Fahrenheit and there will be a chace of 8 % for rain fall there on that day.
What about wind speed?
It should be around 12 miles per hour in average. Anything else?
What will the weather be in Chi-town on the 10th?
The temperature averages 65 degrees and has a 35 percent chance of rain.
What is the wind speed?
Wind will be 8 miles per hour.
What is the humidity level?
Humidity will hover near 54 percent.
I see. What is the weather there today?
The temperature will be around 73 degrees and there is a 29 percent chance of rain.
Can you check the weather for me on March 4th in Los Angeles?
The forecast is for an average temperature of 81 degrees Fahrenheit with a 16 percent chance of rain.
Alright, how about the weather on day after tomorrow?
The forecast for that day is an average temperature of 89 degrees Fahrenheit with 0 percent chance of rain.
What's the humidity and wind supposed to be like?
Humidity is expected to be around 15 percent, and winds will be around 8 miles per hour.
Alright, how about the weather in Olema, California?
The forecast for Olema is an average temperature of 87 degrees Fahrenheit with 23 percent chance of rain.
I have to verify the weather on the 7th.
What metropolis would you like to verify the weather for/
The city is Cloverdale.
The average temperature for that date ought to be 88 degrees Fahrenheit, and there is a 22 percent likelihood it will rain.
What's the weather forecast for the March 11th?
What city's weather would you like?
I want weather for Fairfield.
The forecast average temperature for the day is 89 degrees Fahrenheit. There's a 13 percent chance it will rain.
What's the weather forecast for the Sunday this week in Inverness?
The forecast calls for an average temperature of 88 degrees Fahrenheit that day. The chance of rain is 22 percent.
How windy or humid will it be that day?
The forecast wind speed is 1 mile per hour, with about 24 percent humidity.
Can you tell me what the weather is in San Pablo?
I'd be happy to. There is only a 2 percent chance of rain and the average temperature is predicted to be 73 degrees Fahrenheit.
It's going to be a beautiful day.
Can I assist you with something else?
What is the weather forecast for the March 3rd?
What city would you like the weather forecast for?
Pinole
A 24 percent change of rain is forecasted for that day with an average temperate of 89 degrees.
What is the weather like on the March 4th?
In which city should I look?
The weather in Mill Valley.
The weather should be around 90 degrees and there is a 7 percent chance of rain.
How humid will the temperature be?
There is about a 18 percent humidity.
Tell me what the weather will be on March 6th.
What city shall I search for?
Check the weather in Belmont.
The weather will be 91 degrees with a 24 percent chance of rain.
What is the humidity and the wind speed?
The humidity will be 28 percent with the wind at 4 miles per hour.
What's the forecast for Rutherford 4th of this month?
Average of 88 degrees and a 12 percent chance of rain.
I want to check the Weather condition for which I need your help.
In which City you want to check for the weather condition?
I want to check it in Santa Rosa.
Temperature level will be 83 degrees Fahrenheit in average and there will be 6 % chances for Rain fall.
Can you check to see what the weather forecast will be in Mill Valley on March 1st?
They are calling for a 24 percent chance of rain with a temperature around 79 degrees.
I need to check out the weather for the the 14th in East Palo Alto.
The average temperature is 80 degrees Fahrenheit and there's a 4 percent chance of rain.
How windy is it? And how humid will it be?
The average wind speed is about 5 miles per hour and there's 21 percent humidity.
Check the weather in Albany.
The temperature is 92 degrees with a 19 percent chance of rain.
How humid is it?
The humidity is 29 %.
How about March 4th in Occidental?
It will be 84 with a 20 percent chance of rain.
What is the wind speed and humidity?
It will be 2 miles per hour and humidity is 18 %.
Thanks for the info.
Is there anything else?
Please check the weather on March 13th.
Which city?
Calistoga please.
It's going to be 81 degrees Fahrenheit with 2 percent chance of rain.
How about in South San Francisco?
It's going to be 91 degrees Fahrenheit with 12 percent chance of rain.
How windy and humid it's going to be?
Humidity is 31 percent and wind speed should be 10 miles per hour.
I would like to know the weather in Alamo for the 9th of March.
The days is supposed to be 93 degrees with a 10 percent chance of rain.
How windy is it going to be and what about the humidity?
The wind speed will be 8 miles per hour and the humidity will be around 20 percent.
Can you look up the weather in Fairfield on the March 6th?
Sure: The temperature will be 80 degrees Fahrenheit with a 20 percent chance of rain.
Okay, how about the humidity?
The humidity will be at 46 percent.
And what about the wind?
That will be going 8 miles per hour.
I need to know the weather in Sacramento, CA on 12th of this month.
The average temperature in Sacramento that day should be 92 degrees F and there is a 14 % chance of rain.
Ok, how about the weather in Vallejo?
The average temperature in Vallejo that day should be 87 degrees F and there is a 25 % chance of rain.
How windy is it expected to be that day and what is the humidity going to be?
The humidity should be around 32 % and the average wind speed should be 3 mph.
Tell me what the weather will be in Castro Valley on March 12th.
The forecast is 93 degrees with a 9 percent chance of rain.
How humid and windy will it be?
The humidity is foretasted to be 25 percent with wind at 1 mile per hour.
What's the weather like in LA?
About 76 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 28 percent chance of rain.
I want to check the weather on March 7th.
In which city you like to check the weather?
Like to check in Point Reyes Station.
76 degrees Fahrenheit is the average temperature for the day and 16 percent chances of rain there.
What is the expectation of humidity and windy?
1 miles per hours is the average wind speed and 21 percent of humidity.
Can you check the weather for march 13th?
Yes. In which city?
Graton please, check the forecast.
There is an 8 percent chance of rain with average temperature of 86 degrees
What is the weather on Friday next week.
In what city?
San Mateo.
It should be around 88 degrees with a 6 percent chance of rain.
Can you check the weather in Foster City on March 14th?
The average daytime temperature is expected to be 91 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 19 percent chance of rain.
How windy and humid is it going to get?
The average wind speed is expected to be 1 mile per hour and the humidity might be close to 36 percent.
Can you check the weather for me in Pescadero for the the 7th?
There's a 4 percent chance of rain with an average of 86 degrees Fahrenheit.
Is it going to be windy?
There might be an average wind speed of 6 mph.
OK, please check also for March 12th.
There's a 19 percent chance of rain with an average of 79 degrees Fahrenheit.
Is it going to be windy?
There might be an average wind speed of 8 mph.
Please check the weather.
In which city would you like to know the weather?
Please check Albany.
The temperature on that day averages 92 degree Fahrenheit with a 19 percent chance of rain.
What is the weather going to be in Oakley on 12th of this month?
The average chance of rain is 22 percent and the average high is 75 degrees.
I'm going to be seeing a friend in Inverness. Can you see what the weather's like there?
It'll be about 90 degrees Fahreinheit, with a 4 percent chance of rain.
Okay. Good to know.
What else would you like?
How will the weather be in Geyserville on the March 3rd?
The forecast calls for an average temperature of 73 degrees Fahrenheit with a 13 percent chance of rain.
How about wind and humidity?
Wind speed is forecast at 7 miles per hour, with humidity around 22 percent.
I want to know what the weather will be like on Tuesday next week.
What city do you want to know the weather in?
I want to know the weather in Rutherford.
It will be 75 degrees Fahrenheit on average for that day and there will be a 23 percent chance it will rain.
What kind of weather do you show for the Monday next week, please?
What city is this weather check for?
Suisun City, please.
There is a forecast of 75 degrees Fahrenheit on average during the day with a chance of rain at 3 percent.
Tell me what the weather will be in Martinez on March 4th.
That daytime temperature will be 87 degrees with a 7 percent chance of precipitation.
What is the humidity level?
Humidity will average 21 percent.
Tell me what the weather will be in Pinole.
The daytime temperature will average 77 degrees and it has a 24 percent chance of rain.
Tell me what the weather will be on March 8th.
The daytime temperature will average 91 degrees and there is only a 1 percent chance of rain.
What's the weather like at the river in Forestville on 12th of this month?
The Temperature will be 75 and there isn't likely to be rain. It's chance is 14 %.
Will it be windy there?
Not really. Maybe about 10 mph.
Will it be humid?
Not at all, about 36 percent.
I need to check the weather.
Sure thing, what city do you want to check the weather in?
Check out the weather in Forestville for me.
Alright. The average temperature for the day should be around 70 degrees Fahrenheit with a 20 percent chance of rain.
Okay, thanks. How's the weather going to be March 14th?
On March 14th the average temperature for the day should be around 80 degrees with a 10 percent chance of rain.
Help me look up the weather.
What's city's weather are you interested in? And for what date?
Check Half Moon Bay on the 11th.
It will be 88 degrees Fahrenheit for the day's average and there's a 6 percent chance for rain.
Alright, let's check Union City.
It will be 87 degrees Fahrenheit for the day's average and there's a 11 percent chance for rain.
What's the weather in Ciudad de Mexico?
Average of 102 degrees and 0 percent chance of rain.
Can you please check the weather for me?
In which city?
New York City, please.
There's a 37 percent chance of rain with an average temperature of 66 degrees Fahrenheit.
I would like to check the Bodega Bay weather for March 6th.
The temperature on average is 82 degrees F with a 19 percent chance of rain.
What about Long Beach?
The average temperature is 85 F with a 20 percent chance of rain.
What will the humidity and wind be like?
The humidity is about 27 % and wind 4 miles per hour.
What is the weather in Long Beach?
The average temperature is 80 degrees Fahrenheit with a 17 percent chance of rain.
Can you check the weather for me? I need to know what it will be like in Long beach, CA on the 3rd of March.
There is a 23 % chance of rain with the average temperature at 89 degrees.
What's the weather going to be like in Oakland on the 6th of March?
The forecast for that day is an average temperature of 90 degrees Fahrenheit with a 28 percent chance of rain.
What's the humidity like?
Humidity is expected to be about 43 percent.
How about the weather in SFO on the 4th of March?
The forecast for that day is an average temperature of 71 degrees Fahrenheit with a 16 percent chance of rain.
Can you tell me how the weather will be in Seattle on March 6th?
It will be around 64 degrees with a 27 percent chance of rain.
Can you check the weather in Rio Vista on 6th of March.
The average temperature will be 79 degrees Fahrenheit with a 21 percent chance of rain.
What about on March 7th in New York City?
The average temperature will be 65 degrees Fahrenheit with a 15 percent chance of rain.
What about the wind and humidity?
The humidity will be approximately 18 percent with a wind speed of 7 miles per hour.
I will be going to London, UK soon. Can you check the weather on March 4th?
The temperature will be around 87 degrees Fahrenheit with a 4 percent chance of rain.
How about the wind and the humidity?
The humidity will be around 16 percent and the wind will be at 1 mile per hour.
Can you check the weather on March 1st?
Which city?
Atlanta GA on March 11th.
It should be 87 degrees Fahrenheit with 0 percent chance of rain.
Hpw is the weather in Anaheim, CA?
A 29 percent chance of showers with a temperature average of 78.
I would like to check the weather in Nairobi March 4th.
The temperature on average is 88 degrees F there with a 1 percent chance of rain.
What will be the humidity and wind like?
The humidity will be about 15 % and the average wind speed 1 mile per hour.
What about in Philadelphia on the March 10th.
The average temperature would be about 91 degrees F with a 4 % chance of rain.
I need to check the weather in Toronto, Ontario
The average temperature for the day is 58 degrees fahrenheit. There is a 13 percent chance of rain.
How humid and windy is it?
The humidity is around 25 percent and wind will be 9 miles per hour
Can you check the weather forecats for the March 10th
In which city?
Seattle, Wa please.
There is a 39 percent of rain with an average temperature of 69 degrees.
ok thanks.
Is there anything else i can do?
What is the weather in Delhi, India on the March 11th?
The average temperature is 103 degrees with a 7 percent chance of rain.
How windy? How humid?
The wind should be around 10 mph, the humidity about 19 percent.
Please check the weather in Sydney, Australia.
The average temperature is 94 degrees Fahrenheit with a 4 percent chance of rain.
What will the humidity be like?
The humidity will be 15 percent.
How is the weather in Washington?
The average temperature right now is around 75 degrees with a 13 percent chance of rain.
Please help me check the weather on March 4th.
Which city?
Nairobi please.
It's going to be 88 degrees Fahrenheit with 1 percent chance of rain.
How humid and windy it's going to be?
Humidity is around 15 percent and wind speed should be 1 miles per hour.
Please can you check the weather forecast on 5th of this month?
Can I have the zip code for the city you are searching for?
Sorry, I don't know the zip code but please can you search for the city Paris, France. Is it windy?
The day is cloudy with a chance of 19 % rain and the average temperature would be 70 degrees Fahrenheit.
Is it humidity? If so, to what percent?
Yup, it's slightly humidity to around 55 percent.
I need your help to check the weather condition in El Cerrito on March 8th. Can you do it for me now?
Yes, please note that the average temperature level will be 90 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 5 % for rain fall there on that day.
That is useful information and thanks. Also please check the weather in Sacramento on the 5th.
Please note that the average temperature level will be 93 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 2 % for rain fall there on that day.
What about the Wind speed on the same day in the same place?
It will be around 12 miles per hour. Any more information you need on the weather condition.
Yes, let me know the Humidity level.
Humidity will be around 17 % on that day.
That's all I want on weather condition and thanks.
How can I help you further?
Check for me the weather in Toronto, Ontario.
For the day the average temperature should be 58 degrees Fahrenheit and 13 percent chance of rain.
I am interested in the weather in Nairobi for 9th of March.
The temperature should be 103 degrees Fahrenheit on average. There should be a 0 percent chance of rain.
How windy and humid will it be?
The humidity is about 15 percent. The average wind speed should be 7 miles an hour.
I would like to check the weather in Philadelphia on March 11th.
On that day, the average temperature should be 72 degrees Fahrenheit and have a 10 percent chance for rain.
How windy will it be?
The average wind speed should be 11 miles per hour.
Alright, how about on March 8th.
On that day, the average temperature should be 78 degrees Fahrenheit and there will be a 5 percent chance for rain.
tell weather in castro valley
average temperature is 91 degrees and 18 percent chance of rain
ho about portland on today
75 degrees there and 9 percent rain chance
how humid though?
16 percent there
how windy too?
13 miles per hour
I need to find out about the weather in Stinson Beach on the March 11th.
The average temperature should be 78 degrees Fahrenheit, and should be a 15 percent chance of rain.
Okay, how about Seattle, WA, on 13th of this month.
The average temperature for your selected date is expected to be 63 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 12 percent chance of rain.
I will be visiting my sister at Sydney, Australia on March 13th, can you please check the weather for me?
Sure. Upon checking, it says that there's a 5 percent chance of rain and the average temperature is 101 degrees Farenheit on that day. You should still bring an umbrella with you.
Do you think it is humid?
It says here that the humidity is around 20 %. Not that hot I think.
I prefer to go on flying kites, is it going to be windy?
I don't think its a good idea to fly a kite since the average speed wind on that day is just 7 miles per hour.
I need to check the weather in Anaheim, CA.
The average temperature for that day should be 78 degrees Fahrenheit, and there should be a 29 percent chance of rain.
can you check the weather in sd on March 6th?
the weather that day should be 80 degrees with a 6 percent chance of rain.
but how windy and humid will it be?
the humidity will be around 23 percent with an average wind speed of 1 mph.
Whats it like outside?
In what city?
Sacramento. Look up the weather for March 4th.
94 degree on average. It probably won't rain but there is still a 27 percent chance it will.
what's the weather in las vegas right now?
the average temperature today will be 84 degrees with an 18 percent chance of rain.
Okay cool.
is there anything else?
I wanna see the weather in delhi, india
temperature is 99 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 4 percent chance of rain.
how windy and humid is it>
humidity is 21 percent and wind seed is 8 miles per hour
how about on march 6th?
the temperature should be 93 degrees fahrenheit and 0 percent chance of rain
how about march 8th
temperature needs to be 98 degrees fahrenheit and 6 percent chance of rain
check weather in delhi, india
average temperature is 99 degrees and there is 4 percent rain chance
I wanna check the weather in ATL on the 13th of March
average temperature is 80 degrees fahrenheit and there is a 2 percent chance of it raining
Please can you find me a weather forecast for Nairobi, Kenya, on March 7th.
On that day, the average temperature should be 86 degrees Fahrenheit, with an 8 percent chance of rain.
Can you check the weather in Seattle, WA on today.
It should be an average of 74 degrees with a 32 percent chance of rain.
I want to know the weather.
What city's weather would you like to know?
The weather in Chicago.
The average day temperature is 73 degrees Fahrenheit with a 29 percent chance of precipitation.
I like to check the weather on march 5th.
On which city you like to check the weather?
I want to check weather in KL.
100 degrees Fahrenheit is the average temperature for the day and 5 percent chances of rain fall.
Will you check the weather in El Cerrito on the 12th?
Average temperature is 88 degrees with 18 percent chance of rain.
NYC?
Average temperature is 70 degrees with 4 percent chance of rain.
How humid and windy?
Humidity is 17 percent and average wind speed is 7 miles per hour.
I need to check what the weather's like in Anaheim, Ca.
No problem. The average temperature in Anaheim for the day is 78 degrees Fahrenheit with a 29 percent chance of rain.
Will you check the weather in Sacramento, CA on March 7th?
Average temperature is 80 degrees with 22 percent chance of rain.
Can you check the weather for March 2nd?
Which city do you want to check?
I would like to check the weather in Washington D.C. please.
The average temperature will be 82 degrees Fahrenheit with a 1 percent chance of rain.
Will there be wind and humidity?
There will be around 16 percent humidity with an average wind speed of 6 miles per hour that day.
Can you check the weather in Los Angeles on 9th of this month?
It's 94 degrees Fahrenheit and there is 13 percent chance of rain.
How windy and humid it's going to be?
Humidity is around 20 percent and the average wind speed should be 9 miles per hour.
What is the weather going to be like in Toronto, Ontario on the the 9th?
It should be 67 degrees fahrenheit with 0 percent chance of rain.
And how windy?
About 10 miles per hour.
That sounds ok.
Would you like anything else?
I would like to check the weather in Sacramento on March 10th.
The temperature for that day should be 90 degrees fahrenheit on average with a 6 percent chance of rain.
I want to see the weather in LAX for the 3rd.
The average temperature is 89 degrees for that day. There is a 0 percent chance of rain.
Tell me what the weather will be in Fairfield on the March 8th.
The temperature will be 92 degrees with a 28 percent chance of rain.
What will the weather be on the 12th of this month?
The temperature will be 82 degrees with only a 7 percent chance of rain.
What is the humidity level and the wind speed?
The humidity will hover around 23 percent with the wind averaging 9 miles per hour.
Tell me the weather in Fresno, CA.
The temperature will average 73 degrees with a 13 percent chance of rain.
Can you tell me the weather in Paris, France?
Sure. The average for the day is 77 degrees, and there's a 26 percent chance it will rain.
What about the humidity?
32 percent.
And the wind?
7 miles an hour.
What's the weather forecast for 14th of this month?
In which location should I check the weather forecast?
Please check in London.
The expected average temperature for the day is 81 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 14 percent chance of rain.
I want to check the weather condition on March 8th for which I need our help.
Do you have any preferred City in your mind to search for the Weather condition on that day?
Search it in Vegas.
The Temperature level will be 76 degrees Fahrenheit and there will be 17 % chances for rain fall there on that day.
I want to check the Weather condition on a particular date which is the 13th. Please help me to check the same.
Do you want to check the weather condition in any particular City that you have in your mind. Please tell me the same to check for.
Check it in Chicago.
please note that the average temperature level will be 65 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 37 % for rain fall there on that day.
I'd like to find out the weather in LA on March 3rd.
The average temperature in LA for that day should be 89 degrees F with a 0 % chance of rain.
Sure, that sounds right.
Did you need help with anything else?
What's the weather like in Nairobi, Kenya?
The average temperature is hot! 105 degrees Fahrenheit with 0 chance of rain
What's the weather on March 10th?
In which city?
Check in Toronto.
The average temperature will 73 degrees and there will be a 26 percent chance of rain.
Can you see what the weather will be in Delhi, India on the 6th of March?
Sure, the average temperature will be 93 degrees with a 0 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy do you know?
The wind will be about 7 miles an hour average.
What will the weather be on March 6th in New York?
There is a 26 percent chance of rain that day with an average temperature of 64 degrees.
I want to check about weather condition in a particular area for which I need your help to check the exact level.
Do you have any particular area in your mind to which you need to check the weather condition?
Yes, I want to check it for Paris on particular date that is March 13th. Hope this information enough to search.
Yes, please note that the average Temperature level will be 88 degrees Fahrenheit and 23 % chances for rain fall there on that particular day.
I want to check the weather Condition on March 14th. Can you help me to check the same.
Yes, will check for the same for that day. Do you have any particular City in your mind for which you need to check the weather?
Check it in SF.
The average temperature level will be 93 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 12 % for rain fall there on that day.
Can you tell me the weather forecast for March 5th?
In which city?
Check in Moraga.
It is expected to average 77 degrees with a 6 percent chance of rain.
Is it supposed to be humid or windy?
Humidity is expected to be 24 percent and wind speeds 1 mile per hour.
Can you also check Atlanta on the March 6th.
It is expected to average 87 degrees with a 25 percent chance of rain.
What's the weather going to be like on March 12th?
What city would like to know the weather for?
I want to know the weather for Las Vegas.
The temperature average for the day will be 84 degrees Fahrenheit and there will be a 7 percent chance for rain.
What's the humidity and wind going to be like?
The humidity will be around 22 percent and the wind speed will average at 1 mile per hour.
I need to know the weather, please.
In which city would you like me to check the weather?
The weather in Fresno for March 6th, please.
The average temperature will by 71 degrees with a 1 percent chance of rain in Fresno.
How humid do you think it'll be?
Humidity levels will be around 16 percent.
How windy will it be?
Wind speed will have an average of 3 miles per hour.
Can you please check the weather for me on this Sunday in Bay Point?
There's a 20 percent change of rain with an average temperature of 72 degrees Fahrenheit.
OK. Please check also for Long Beach on March 12th.
There's a 26 percent change of rain with an average temperature of 90 degrees Fahrenheit.
Is it going to be humid?
No. The humidity is forecasted at 4 percent.
I need the weather for Sydney for March 12th.
The temperature in Sydney for March 12th should be around 101 degrees Fahrenheit. There is also a 2 percent chance of rain.
Will you check the weather in Nairobi on March 12th?
Average temperature is 103 degrees with 9 percent chance of rain.
Humidity?
28 percent.
That's fine.
Anything else?
I would like to get the weather forecast.
What city do you need the forecast for?
Search in Portland.
The average temperature for the day should be 75 degrees Fahrenheit along with a 9 percent chance of rain.
Okay, then.
Do you need something else?
Please check the weather.
Which city you want?
I want KL on March 14th.
It's going to be 100 degrees Fahrenheit with 5 percent chance of rain.
How windy it is?
It should be 9 miles per hour.
I want to see how the weather is in Philadelphia on March 3rd.
From what I can see the average temperature for the requested day in Philadelphia will be 85 degrees Fahrenheit, and there is a 21 percent chance of rain.
Can you tell me the humidity level there?
The humidity level is expected to be 41 percent.
Hi, could you help me check the weather on 5th of this month please?
Sure, where would you like me to check at?
In Moraga, please.
The average temperature should be 77 degrees Fahrenheit with a 6 percent chance of rain.
Sure, how about in LA?
The average temperature should be 87 degrees Fahrenheit with a 12 percent chance of rain.
What's the weather like in Fresno, Ca?
It's 72 degrees fahrenheit with a 2 % chance of rain
Could you check the forecasted weather in San Diego on 12th of this month?
Sure. That day will have a 10 percent chance of rain, and the average temperature will be 90 degrees Fahrenheit.
Could you give me the wind and humidity forecast too?
Average wind speed will be 5 miles per hour. Humidity is expected to hang around 27 percent.
What will the weather be like in London on March 14th?
The temperature should be 81 degrees with a 14 percent chance of rain.
Could you give me the weather forecast for March 7th?
For what city please?
In Portland please.
In Portland, the chance of rain is 32 percent with a temperature of 72 degrees Fahrenheit.
I would like you to check the weather for March 5th.
What city should I check?
check Inverness.
The temperature on average should be 77 degrees fahrenheit with a 7 percent chance of rain.
Could you check the weather in New York on March 10th?
The average temperature will be 59 degrees fahrenheit with a 0 percent chance of rain.
Can you please check the weather for 13th of this month?
Sure, in which city?
Tiburon but check for the March 10th.
There's a 15 percent change of rain with an average temperature of 85 degrees Fahrenheit.
OK. Now please check for San Francisco.
There a 12 percent chance of rain with an average temperature of 93 degrees Fahrenheit.
I want to check the weather condition in Atlanta on March 7th for which I need your help.
The average temperature level will be 83 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 26 % for rain fall there on that day.
Hello! On March 11th, please may I know how the weather will be?
To which location you wish to know the weather forecast?
Please check for SD.
Sure. It's mostly sunny and there is a less chance of 5 percent rain and the average temperature of the day will be around 88 degrees Fahrenheit.
Thank you so much for the information you provided.
Do you need any other details?
Please check the weather in LA for me
Current weather in LA is 76 degree with 28 percent chance of raining
Hello! Can you tell me the weather forecast for SD on March 4th, for I've to travel for a trip?
Yup, the probability of raining is 7 percent and the average temperature would be 75 degrees Fahrenheit.
Is the day going to be windy or sunny or cloudy?
There will be an average wind speed of 9 miles per hour for the day.
What will be the expected humidity on March 4th?
It would be around 18 percent.
What will the weather be like in Toronto, Canada on 1st of March?
The average daytime temperature should be around 58 degrees and there is a 13 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy?
The average wind speed will be around 9 miles per hour.
Tell me what the weather's like in Long Beach, CA.
The average temperature for the day will be around 80 degrees Fahrenheit with a 17 percent chance of rain.
How windy and humid is it going to be?
The humidity should be around 40 percent with wind speeds around 2 miles per hour.
Can you check the weather in Portland on March 11th for me?
There is a 42 percent chance of rain with average temperature of 63 degrees.
Does it give the expected humidity and wind speed?
Humidity is only around 38 percent. Wind speed forecast at 7 mph
Thank you for your help
Is there anything else I can do?
I'd like to check the New York weather for the 11th of March.
That day we'll have an average temperature of 65 degrees Fahrenheit and the chance of rain will be 34 percent.
I'd like to check the weather please.
What city would you like to check the weather for?
Please can you tell me the weather in Long Beach.
The average daytime temperature is around 80 degrees and there is a 17 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy there?
The average wind speed is likely to be 2 miles per hour.
I need to check the March 1st for weather please.
Which city are you looking in?
The San Carlos weather.
The average temp is 90 degrees and there is an 8 percent chance of percipitation.
How about in LAX
The average temp is 76 degrees with a 28 percent chance of percipitation.
I would like to know something about the weather
Where do you want me to look?
The place is nairobi, kenya
Well then. The temperature is around 105 degrees fahrenheit and the probability of rain is 0 percent
I want to check the weather on the March 13th in SD.
on that day the average temperature will be 75 degrees Fahrenheit there is a 19 percent chance of rain.
I need to check the weather for 3rd of this month.
What city should I check?
Newark.
The temperature should be 87 degrees with a 12 percent chance of rain.
Okay, how about Anaheim on the March 14th?
The temperature should be 88 degrees with a 20 percent chance of rain.
How humid and windy will it be?
The average wind speed should be about 6 miles per hour and the humidity is around 44 %.
I need the weather for San Diego on March 3rd.
It will be 82 degrees with a 7 percent chance of rain.
How windy will it be?
The wind speed is 11 miles per hour.
How about Portland on March 4th?
The temperature will be 68 degrees with an 18 percent chance of rain.
I want to know how the weather will be on 9th of March.
Can you tell me the city where you want to check the weather?
I want to check the weather in ATL.
The average temperature in ATL for the day is expected to be 93 degrees Fahrenheit, and there is a 18 percent chance of rain.
What's the weather like in Portland?
75 degree average temps with a 9 percent chance of showers.
I need to find out the weather in Bodega Bay for the 9th.
The average temperature for Bodega Bay that day should be 74 degrees F with a 14 % chance of rain.
What is the humidity expected to be?
The humidity should be around 16 percent.
OK, what about the weather for Paris on the 11th of this month?
The average temp in Paris that day should be 93 degrees F with a 24 % chance of rain.
I would like information on the weather
In which city?
I need information about Atlanta, GA
Average temperature: 86 degrees Fahrenheit. Chance of rain: 28 percent
I'd like to check the weather.
Sure thing. In which city would you like to check the weather?
Tell me the weather in Atlanta, GA.
Okay. The average temperature for the day is 86 degrees Fahrenheit with a 28 percent chance of rain.
Get me the weather for March 12th.
For what city?
For SD.
The weather shows an average temperature of 90 degrees Fahrenheit with a 10 percent chance of rain.
Please check the weather on March 2nd at Pinole
There is a 14 % rain chance and the temperature will be 74 degrees
ok, how about on March 4th in SD
There is a 7 % rain chance and the temperature will be 75 degrees
I would like the forecast in Kuala Lumpur for March 12th please.
It will be around 98 degrees Fahrenheit with a 4 percent possibility of precipitation that day.
What will the weather be on the next Monday in Vancouver?
It will be 58 degrees with a 49 percent chance of precipitation.
What is the humidity and wind speed?
Humidity will be 54 per cent and the wind will gust at 8 miles per hour.
I want to check the weather condition for the date 3rd of March. Can you help me to check the same.
In which Area, I have to check the weather condition on that day.
Check it in Paris.
please note that the average temperature level will be 93 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 6 % for rain fall there on that day.
What about Humidity and Wind Speed level there on that day?
Humidity is around 18 % and the wind speed will be 4 miles per hour in average.
Tell me what the weather will be on the March 1st.
What city do you want to know the weather in?
I want to know the weather in the District of Columbia.
The temperature will be 75 degrees with a 13 percent chance of precipitation.
What is the humidity level?
Humidity will hover around 36 percent.
What's the weather going to be like Delhi on March 12th?
It'll be around 96 degrees Fahrenheit with a 2 percent chance of rain.
Is it going to be windy or humid?
Wind speeds will be around only 1 mile per hour, and the humidity is going to be about 15 percent.
what's the weather gonna be like in sydney on march 5th?
the temperature should be 96 degrees with a 5 percent chance of rain.
how humid and windy will it be?
the humidity will be around 21 percent and the wind should be 11 miles per hour.
What is the weather forecast for New York on the March 6th?
The average temperature is forecasted to be 64 degrees with a 26 percent chance of rain that day.
Can you check the weather for me?
Which city do you want me to check for?
I would like to know the weather in Paris.
The expected average temperature will be 77 degree Fahrenheit with 26 percent chance of rain.
I'd like to check the weather for March 5th.
In which city should I check the weather in on that date?
Check Seattle, please.
The average temperature in Seattle on that day will be 61 degrees with a 18 percent chance of rain.
How windy do you think it'll be?
Wind speed is at an average of 15 miles per hour.
I need to check the Vancouver weather on the 5th of March please.
The average temperature is 62 and there will be a 56 percent chance of rain.
I want to check the weather condition particularly on March 7th. Can you check it for me?
Yes, I can. Is there any particular City in your mind to search for the weather condition?
Yes, check it in Nairobi, Kenya.
Temperature level will be 86 degrees Fahrenheit in average and there will be 8 % chances for rain fall on that day.
What about humidity?
It will be around 23 %.
I'd like check the weather for 14th of this month.
In what city?
Portland, make it for the March 3rd.
The temperature should average 70 degrees with a 22 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy?
Wind speed should average 5 miles per hour.
What about the humidity?
Around 10 percent.
Verify weather conditions for Long Beach, CA on the March 2nd.
Sure, average temperature will be around 77 degrees that day. Be advised there will be a 15 percent chance of rain.
What is the weather on March 10th in Gilroy
The average temperature is 72 degrees Fahrenheit and 18 percent chance of rain
What about the wind and humidity?
The average wind speed is 1 miles per hour and humidity around 28 percent
What about in London, England?
the average temperature is 92 degrees Fahrenheit and 6 percent chance of rain
What about Saturday this week
the average temperature is 80 degrees Fahrenheit and 18 percent chance of rain
Could you tell me the weather in Paris please?
Today's average temperature in Paris is 77 degrees Fahrenheit and the chance of rain is 26 percent.
What's the humidity and how windy will it get?
It is 32 percent humidity with a wind speed averaging 7 miles per hour.
Get the current weather please.
I would love to. Which city should I check?
New Delhi please.
Sure thing, Average daily temperature in New Delhi is 99 degrees. Please be advised there is a 4 percent chance of rain.
Find out wind factor.
you should expect about 8 miles per hour.
Alright, What about on the March 11th.
Average temperature is 103 degrees. There is a 7 percent chance of rain.
I want to verify the weather condition on the 5th.
In which city do you need to check the weather?
Weather at Vancouver, BC on March 8th.
The average temperature is 64 degree Fahrenheit. 24 percentage of possibility of rain.
What is the humid is expected? How windy it is?
The average wind speed is 9 miles per hour and the humidity is around 8 percent.
I would like to know what's the weather like
Where do you want me to look?
The city is Phoenix
The temperature is 89 degrees Fahrenheit and the chance of rain is 15 percent
I want to check the weather condition in particular area like San Rafael. Can you check it for me?
The average temperature level will be 80 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 2 % for rain fall there on that day.
Also check the Weather condition in Nairobi, Kenya on Saturday this week.
please note that the average temperature level will be 86 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 6 % for rain fall there on that day.
What about the Humidity level in that area on that day?
The Humidity is around 20 %.
What will be the Wind speed on that day.
The average wind speed will be around 2 miles per hour.
Whats the weather like in London, UK
The temperature is expected to be 81 degrees with a 23 percent chance of rain
What about wind and humidity?
Wind speed is expected at 10 miles per hour with 35 percent humidity
Can you tell me the weather?
For what city?
I need the weather for San Fran.
The temperature is suppose to be 91 degrees with a 29 percent chance for rain.
How windy and humid will it be?
The wind speeds will get up to 2 miles per hour and th humidity is 49 percent.
Can you help me check the weather in DC as I will be travelling there?
The temperature for the day is 75 degrees Fahrenheit with a 13 percent chance of rain.
Can you check the weather.
For which city?
Please check Delhi.
The average temperature will be 99 degrees Fahrenheit with a 4 percent chance of rain.
Could you please check the weather forecast in Toronto, Ontario.
There is a 13 % chance of rain and the average temp will be 58 degrees fahrenheit.
Will it be windy or humid?
about 25 % humidity and the ave wind speed will be 9 mph.
Will you be my weather checker, please?
Sure, what city's weather do you want to know about?
New York City is where it's at!
Okay. The weather is forecasted as 37 percent rain and 66 degrees for the temperature average during the day.
I need to check the weather.
What city should i check?
San fran.
it looks like it'll be 91 degrees with a 29 % chance of rain.
Okay, thanks.
Do you need anything else?
What the weather like in Philadelphia, on March 1st?
81 degrees is the average. You have only an 8 percent chance of rain.
Will my new hairdo survive the conditions.
Well, the wind will be blowing at only 4 mph.
But humidity affect this do too.
That will come in at 23 percent.
My trip is coming up soon. Can you check the weather for me in Portland, OR?
Sure - looks like the average will be 75 degrees Fahrenheit with a 9 percent chance of rain.
Can you tell how the weather is going to be on the March 2nd in Fresno, CA?
The temperature wll reach 85 degrees with a 13 percent chance of rain.
How humid and windy is it going to be?
The wind speeds will reach 11 miles per hour with the humidity level at 25 percent.
Can you check weather for the March 12th?
What city do you want?
The city is Portland, OR.
The temp is 72 degrees and 16 percent chance of rain.
How windy and how humid?
The wind is 11 miles per hour and the humidity is 30 %.
I want to know how the weather will be on the 8th in Nairobi.
From what I can see the weather in Nairobi for your requested date should be 100 degrees Fahrenheit, and there is a 2 percent chance of raining.
What are the weather conditions in SD on 7th of March?
The temp will be about 90 degrees and there's only a 17 % chance of rain.
What do you think the humidity will be there?
It'll be normal, around 36 percent.
What's the weather like in London?
The average temperature today is 81 degrees Fahrenheit with a 23 percent chance of rain
Will it be humid?
Today's humidity is about 35 percent
Will it be windy?
The forecast is for an average wind speed of 10 miles per house
Please check the weather in New York.
Todays average temperature is 66 degrees faranheit and there is 37 percent chance of rain.
What is the expected humidity and will it be windy?
Winds average 12 miles per hour and there is 41 percent humidity.
Could you check the weather forecast for 5th of this month?
Which city's weather forecast would you like?
Santa Clara, on 13th of March.
The expected average temperature is 78 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 3 percent chance of rain.
All right, thanks. What about in Chicago?
The expected average temperature is 65 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 37 percent chance of rain.
How about the wind speed?
The expected average wind speed is 5 miles per hour.
What is the weather in NYC on March 9th.
The average temperature is 70 degrees and there is a 38 percent chance of rain.
Tell me what the weather is right now.
What city shall I look in?
Tell me the weather in New York City.
It is 66 degrees with a 37 percent chance of rain.
The last thing I have to do for my wedding is make the honeymoon reservations. Can you tell me what the weather is going to be like on March 5th in Delhi.
As of right now the radar says that it will be 90 degrees Fahrenheit with a 7 percent chance of rain.
Do you know if there will be high winds?
Currently the wind is predicted to be only 4 miles per hour.
What about the humidity?
Currently the expected humidity is 21 percent.
Can you tell me the weather?
What city would you like to hear the weather for?
I want to know how the weather will be in Atlanta on the March 10th.
I am showing the temperature will be 88 degrees with a 19 percent chance for rain that day in Atlanta.
Can you tell me how windy and humid it will be there that day?
The wind speed will only be 9 milers per hour and the humidity will be 27 percent.
I need weather for Novato on March 5th.
It's going to be about 79 degrees. There is a small chance, 11 %, of rain.
Well, what about the 8th in New Delhi.
The average temp there is usually 98 Degrees for that day and a small 6 percent chance of rain.
Will you check the weather in Chicago?
Average temperature is 73 degrees with 29 percent chance of rain.
Tell me what the weather is like on the March 12th.
What city would you like to check the weather in?
I want to check the weather in New Delhi, and it's actually for March 3rd.
The temperature will be 92 degrees Fahrenheit as an average for the day and there will be a 2 percent chance of rain.
Alright, what about the weather in Atlanta, GA?
The temperature will be 76 degrees Fahrenheit as an average for the day and there will be a 9 percent chance of rain.
Can you tell me what the humidity and wind will be like?
Wind will average 9 miles per hour and humidity will be around 27 percent.
Hey! Please can you tell me what's the present weather condition?
Sure! Give me your zip code or otherwise give me the city name?
Please can you check how the weather is in Toronto.
Here is the details - There is a probability of 13 % rain and the average temperature for the normal day will be 58 degrees Fahrenheit
Check the weather in Phoenix, AZ.
The temp is 89 F and there is a 15 % chance of rain.
Thank for the info.
Is there anything else?
I will be meeting a friend in Seattle on March 10th, please check the weather for me.
There's a 39 percent chance of rain that day and the average temperature is 69 degrees. I may suggest for you and your friend to bring an umbrella.
I would like to check the weather for March 1st.
What city would you like to check the weahter forecast for?
Check Seattle.
The average temperature for March 1st will be around 74 degrees Fahrenheit with a 32 percent chance of rain.
Can you tell me what the weather is in New York City?
The average temperature should be 66 degrees Fahrenheit with a 37 percent chance of rain.
Please check weather for March 2nd.
What city do you want?
The city is Toronto.
The temperature is 60 degrees with a 20 percent chance of rain.
what is the weather
what city are you looking
search in vancouver, bc
it is currently 75 degree with 15 % chance of rain in vancouver, bc
Can you check the weather for me for March 5th.
Sure, for which city?
For London, please.
There's a 28 percent chance of rain with and expected average of around 94 degrees Fahrenheit.
Will you check the weather on March 7th in Portland?
Average temperature is 72 degrees with 32 percent chance of rain.
I want to check the weather for March 11th.
In what city?
Nairobi, Kenya please.
The average temperature for that day is 89 degrees and there is a 3 percent chance of rain.
what is the weather in washington on Friday next week
weather on March 8th 2019 is 84 degrees with 4 percent chance of rain
Can you check the weather in Kuala Lumpur on the March 13th?
The average for the day should be 97 degrees Fahrenheit with a 1 percent chance of rain.
I would like to see what the weather will be like in March 14th.
What location are you looking for the weather forecast in?
Check Paris.
The temperature that day should be 76 degrees Fahrenheit on average. There is a 14 percent chance that it will rain.
Hello! Please can you check the weather forecast?
For which city, you wish to know?
Please check for Philly.
There is a probability of 8 % rain and the average temperature will be 81 degrees Fahrenheit for the normal day.
Whats the weather like in Las Vegas?
Its 84 degrees on average. Chance of rain is 18 percent.
Can you please check the weather for me in Fresno, CA on 1st of this month?
There's a 2 percent chance of rain with an average temperature of 72 degrees Fahrenheit.
Perfect, thank you.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
What's the weather going to be on next Tuesday?
For which city?
Check the weather in LAX
The average temperature there will be 87 degrees Fahrenheit with a 12 percent chance of rain
I need to find out the weather in Toronto, Ontario.
The average temperature in Toronto for the day should be 58 degrees F with a 13 % chance of rain.
What's the weather in LA like on the March 14th?
It should be around 86 degrees Fahrenheit. There's a 17 percent chance it rains.
How humid will it be?
Humidity will be around 29 percent.
What about on the 1st of March?
It will be around 76 degrees Fahrenheit. There's a 28 percent chance it rains.
How windy will it be? How humid will it be?
Wind speed should be around 4 miles an hour. Humidity will be around 75 percent.
Hey, can you tell me the weather on the March 4th?
Sure, what city is that for?
For Sydney, NSW. Actually please change the date to March 10th.
Sure, the average temperature will be around 92 degrees with a 5 percent chance of rain.
Great, how windy and humid will it be?
The wind speed will sit at around 1 mile per hour, while the humidity will be roughly 20 percent.
I want to check the weather condition in Washington for the date 1st of March. Can you help me to check the same?
Yes, please note that the average temperature level will be 75 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 13 % for rain fall there on that day.
What about the Humidity in that area?
Humidity will be around 36 %. What else you want to know about the weather?
Let me know about the Wind speed on that date in that area.
The wind speed will be around 6 miles per hour in average.
I need to know what the weather is like.
For which city?
For Las Vegas.
It is 84 degrees Fahrenheit with 18 percent chance of rain.
What about Portland, OR?
It is 75 degrees Fahrenheit with a 9 percent chance of rainfall.
Ok, that's not too bad.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
Here's something for you to look up. What's the weather going to be in Nairobi on March 1st, I'd be pleased to know?
I'm showing 0 percent rain forecasted with an average temperature of 105 degree during the day.
Okay, and what's the wind going to be like?
There's a 7 mile per hour wind speed forecasted.
Nice, and what's the humidity going to be?
There is a 15 percent humidity forecast.
Check for me the weather on March 5th in Phoenix.
For the day the average temperature should be 73 degrees Fahrenheit and a 12 percent chance of rain.
Humidity how will be?
Will be around 31 percent.
Sure is good.
Anything else I can do?
I will be travelling soon, I need to know how the weather will be.
In which city do you want to check the weather?
Please check in Paris, France.
The temperature should be around 77 degree Fahrenheit with a 26 percent chance of rain.
I would like weather information in Sydney
Average temperature: 94 degrees Fahrenheit. Chance of rain: 4 percent
Will it be a wet day?
Expected humidity: about 15 percent
Give me the weather report for March 6th please.
What city should I find out?
I want you to look in Phoenix
It will average a temperature of 88 degrees Fahrenheit in the day and it has a 29 percent chance of raining.
What is the wind like?
The wind speed will average on 3 miles an hour.
What is the humidity going to be?
It will be 43 percent humid.
What's it like outside in LA?
Well, around 76 degrees, and there is only a 28 percent chance of rain, so pretty neat.
What's the humidity like though?
It's around 75 %.
I would like to check the weather on Saturday this week in San Francisco.
The temperature should be 72 degrees and there is a 15 percent chance of rain.
I would like the weather report.
What city would you like?
The city is New Delhi.
The average temperature is 99 F and 4 percent rain chance.
Tell me what the weather will be in Paris on March 1st.
There is an average temperature of 77 degrees with a 26 percent chance of rain.
What is the humidity and wind speed?
The humidity is 32 percent and the wind is at 7 miles per hour.
I want to check the weather on March 10th.
What city are you checking for?
I want to check this Sunday in Sausalito.
The average for the day is 90 degrees Fahrenheit with an 18 percent chance of rain.
What about in LA?
The average temperature for the day is 89 degrees Fahrenheit with a 0 percent chance of rain.
Is it going to be humid or windy?
The wind speed will be about 8 miles per hour and the humidity around 15 percent.
I would like to know how the weather will be.
Can you tell me the city where I should check the weather?
I want to know how the weather will be in Paris.
The average temperature for the day in Paris is expected to be 77 degrees Fahrenheit, with a chance of 26 percent of raining.
Can you help me check the weather please
What city are you looking at?
How about in LA
It's gonna be 76 degrees with a 28 % chance of rain
How humid is it gonna be?
Around 75 %, pretty high!
What will the weather be like in Philly on the 5th of this month?
The temperature should be 76 degrees with a 29 % chance of rain.
I need to check the weather for March 2nd
In which city would you like to check weather in?
In Washington please.
The average temperature that day is 82 degrees Fahrenheit and has a 1 percent chance for rain.
How windy will it be? Also, how humid will it be?
The average wind speed should be 6 miles per hour and humidity is about 16 percent.
I need the weather for the Tuesday next week please.
In which city?
I need the Seattle, WA weather.
The average temperature for the day will be 61 degrees and there will be an 18 percent chance of rain.
I want to check the weather condition on the a particular date that is March 9th for which I need your help.
Do you have any particular city in you mind to search for the weather condition?
Yes, search it in Sausalito.
please note that the average temperature level will be 75 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 11 % for rain fall there on that day.
Check it on March 5th in Sydney, Australia.
the average temperature level will be 96 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 5 % for rain fall there on that day.
I would like to find out the weather on March 10th.
What city would you like to know the weather for?
San Fran, please.
The average temperature will be 93 degrees and there's a 12 percent chance of rain.
Awesome. How about on Saturday this week in Sydney?
The average temperature for that day will be 101 degrees Fahrenheit and there's a 2 percent chance of rain.
I need to check the weather in Portland, OR.
Okay no problem. The average temperature in Portland for the day should be around 75 degrees Fahrenheit with a 9 percent chance of rain.
Can you check weather in Seattle, WA?
The temperature is 74 degrees with a 32 percent chance of rain.
Thanks for the info.
Is there anything else?
I want to know how the weather will be in Nairobi.
The average temperature for the day in Nairobi should be 105 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 0 percent chance of raining.
Can you get me the weather for New York for 5th of this month?
The weather shows an average temperature of 73 degrees Fahrenheit with a 51 percent chance of rain.
What's the weather forecast for March 6th?
Which city's weather forecast would you like to know?
Please check the weather forecast for Vancouver, BC
The expected average temperature for the day is 70 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 27 percent chance of rain.
Can you look up the weather for Phoenix, AZ on March 10th?
The temperature will be 80 degrees with a 19 percent chance for rain.
I need the weather for March 14th.
What city do you want?
The city is Geyserville.
The temperature will be 77 and there is a 23 percent chance of rain.
How windy and humid will it be?
Wind is 1 mile per hour and humidity is 27 percent.
How about the March 5th?
The temperature will be 76 and there is a 1 percent chance of rain.
How about in ATL?
The temperature will be 82 and there is an 18 percent chance of rain.
What's the weather going to be like on the March 4th?
Where do you want the weather for?
I want the weather for the next Friday in Sacramento, CA.
The forecast is for an average temperature of 85 degrees Fahrenheit with a 21 percent chance of rain.
What is the weather like in Portland?
It is 75 degrees Fahrenheit with 9 percent chance of rain.
Hi, I'd like to know the weather in Chi-town.
The temperature should be around 73 degrees Fahrenheit with a 29 percent chance of rain.
Okay, what will the humidity be like?
It will be about 29 percent.
Please tell me the weather in Portland, OR.
There is a 9 percent chance of rain, with an average temp of 75 degrees Fahrenheit.
I want to see the weather in Phoenix on the day of 11th of March.
The average temperature should be 86 degrees Fahrenheit. There is an 8 percent chance of rain.
please check the weather in sacramento for me
it is currently 82 degrees with 26 percent chance of rain
Please check the weather for me.
Which city's weather should I check?
Please check Anaheim on March 5th .
The expected average temperature for the day is 75 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 4 percent chance of rain.
What is the expected wind speed?
An average wind speed of 10 miles per hour is expected.
I need to make some last minute plans for my trip. Can you check the weather real quick?
Sure, in what city?
I'm going to London, England.
The average temperature will be 81 degrees Fahrenheit with a 23 percent chance of rain.
What will the weather be like in Toronto, Canada on the 11th of March?
59 degrees on average with only a 28 percent chance of rain.
And the humidity?
Around 9 percent.
Will it be windy?
Wind speed is usually around 11 mph.
What about MArch 12th.
We're talking 64 degrees on average then. Don't worry about rain. Only 1 percent chance.
What's the forecast for March 6th?
In which city?
Washington D.C.
Average of 80 degrees and 29 percent chance of rain.
Check the weather on March 13th
Which city should I search for?
Check it in DC
The temperature would be around 79 degrees with 28 percent chance of rain
What's the weather?
What city do you want weather details for?
Weather in Fresno, please.
The average temperature will be 72 degrees Fahrenheit. The chance of rain is 2 percent.
What will the weather be like in Vegas on the 13th?
Average temperature: 73 degrees Fahrenheit. Chance of rain: 14 percent
Ok, thanks. What will the weather be like on Monday next week?
Average temperature: 77 degrees Fahrenheit. Chance of rain: 15 percent
What is the weather in Sacramento?
The temperature will average 82 degrees Farenheit and there is a 26 percent chance of rain.
What is the expected humidity and wind speeds?
The wind will average 7 miles per hour and the humidity will be 27 percent.
Phoenix forecast.
Average of 89 F and 15 percent chance of rain.
Can you help me check the weather?
In what city do you want to check the weather?
I would like to know the weather in Vancouver, BC for the today.
The temperature is expected to be 75 degrees, however there is a 15 percent chance of rain.
How humid and windy will it be?
The humidity is low at 19 percent and winds are light at 8 miles per hour.
Can you check the weather on March 1st in Fresno?
It should be 72 degrees and there is a 2 percent chance of rain.
How windy will the day be?
The wind should be around 10 miles per hour.
I'd like to check the weather forecast for March 6th in Phoenix, AZ.
It is predicted to be 88 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 29 percent chance of rain.
Can you tell me what the humidity and wind will be?
Humidity is projected to be 43 percent with an average wind speed of 3 miles per hour.
What is he weather like on March 9th?
In which city should I search?
I would like to know the weather in Vegas.
The weather should be 86 degrees with a 4 percent chance of rain.
How humid is the day like and is it windy?
It's 20 percent humidity and the wind is 6 miles per hour.
Can you check the weather for me?
Yes. In which city?
Please check KL on March 11th.
There is a 2 percent chance of rain. Tempertaure for the day is 99 degrees!
What about humidity?
It appears the humidity will be baout 16 percent.
What's the weather going to be like in Portland, OR on March 12th?
It'll be around 72 degrees Fahrenheit with a 16 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy or humdid at all?
Humidity levels will be about 30 percent, and wind speeds are going to be about 11 miles per hour.
I might be going to NYC soon, can you check the weather?
The temperature is 66 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 37 percent chance of rain.
How will the humidity be?
It will be around 41 percent.
What will the weather be like in Kuala Lumpur on March 3rd?
The average temperature for the day is forecast to be 93 degrees Fahrenheit, with an 8 percent chance of rain.
Will it be very windy?
The forecast wind speed is 9 miles per hour.
Hi, I need to see what the weather is like in Mountain View.
In Mountain View it will be about 91 degrees Fahrenheit with a 9 percent chance of precipitation.
Great, can you check the weather in SD on March 5th?
In SD it will be 84 degrees fahrenheit with an 8 percent chance of rain.
Okay, how windy will it be there?
The wind will average about 4 miles per hour.
Great, will it be humid?
The humidity is expected to be 21 percent.
I need to check the weather on the March 8th.
In which city?
In Atlanta, GA please.
The average temperature will be 79 degrees with a 12 percent chance of rain.
Okay, thanks.
Can I do anything else for you?
Hi, I'd like to check the weather in Portland, OR on March 6th.
Sure, the average temperature that day is 73 degrees Fahreneheit with a 7 percent chance of rain.
I want to know how the weather will be in LAX on March 1st.
From what I can see the temperature for your requested day will be 76 degrees Fahrenheit, and there is a 28 percent chance that it will rain.
Can you tell me how windy is going to be there? Also please tell me the humidity level.
The humidity level is expected to be around 75 percent, and the wind speed should average at about 4 miles per hour.
What will the weather in London be on March 4th?
The average temperature will be 87 degree Fahrenheit with a 4 percent chance of rain.
What about on March 2nd?
The average temperature will be 80 degrees Fahrenheit with an 18 percent chance of rain.
What will the wind and humidity be like?
The humidity will be 28 percent and the wind speed will be 6 miles per hour.
I would like to check the weather forecast for March 7th in San Francisco.
There is a 9 % chance of rain and the ave temp will be 74 degrees fahrenheit.
Will it be humid?
About 17 % humidity.
What is the weather?
What city?
Sydney, NSW, Australia
The average temperature is 94 degrees with a 4 percent chance of rain.
I want to check the weather condition on March 13th and I need your help in this regard.
Do you have any particular city in your mind to check for weather?
Yes, I need to search it in Kuala Lumpur.
The level of temperature will be 97 degrees Fahrenheit in average and there will be 1 % chance for rain fall there on that day.
What will the weather be like in Atherton on 3rd of March?
It will be 90 degrees Fahrenheit with a 12 percent chance of rain that day.
Will there be any humidity that day?
There will be 24 percent humidity.
Will it be windy at all on that day?
12 miles per hour will be the average wind speed for that day.
What will the weather be like on March 4th in Delhi, India?
It will be 97 degrees Fahrenheit with an 8 percent chance of rain on that day.
What will the weather be Tuesday next week?
For what city?
For ATL!
The temperature will be 82 degree with a 18 perent chance for rain.
I want to check the weather condition in New York on March 13th for which I need your help.
Temperature level will be 59 degrees Fahrenheit in average and there may be a chance of 33 % for rain fall.
How will the weather be in District of Columbia on March 3rd?
The temperature will be 76 degrees with a 8 percent chance of rain.
How will the weather be in Delhi, India on the tomorrow?
The temperature will be 95 degrees with 0 percent chance of rain.
What will the wind speed be?
The wind speed is expected to reach 5 miles per hour.
What will be the humidity?
The humidity level is expected to reach 15 percent.
Could you possibly check what the weather is going to be like on today?
Which city will I check?
in KL please.
There is an 8 % chance of rain and the ave temp will be 102 degrees fahrenheit.
I will be visiting my sister on Portland on March 4th, can you please check the weather for me?
Sure. Upon checking, it says that there is an 18 percent chance of rain and the average temperature is 68 degrees on that day.
check weather march 7th
what city for weather?
in seattle for me
temperature is 69 degrees and 16 percent rain
how humid though?
is is around 20 percent
Get me a detailed weather report please.
Sure, for what city?
What's going on in London UK?
It's 81 degrees there and there is a 23 % chance of rain.
I wanna see the weather in Olema, California please
It should be 91 degrees today with a pretty high 21 percent chance of rain
OK, what about the weather in Toronto on March 3rd?
It's 65 degrees with an even higher 58 percent chance of rain
Isi it gonna be windy and humid there?
It's around 61 percent humidity and 11 mile per hour wind speeds
Hi, can you tell me how the weather is in Sydney?
The current temperature is 94 degrees with a 4 percent chance of rain.
Can you tell me what the humidity will be?
The humidity index is 15 percent.
I need to check the weather in Atlanta for the March 8th.
Sure thing. The average temperature in Atlanta should be 79 degrees Fahrenheit for the day. There is a 12 percent chance of rain.
Okay thanks. How about the weather for March 11th?
The average temperature in Atlanta for the day should be around 87 degrees Fahrenheit with a 0 percent chance of rain.
Tell me what the weather is like
Which city should I check for?
Check for Chicago
The temperature is expected to be 73 degrees with a 29 percent chance of rain.
Tell me the weather in NYC please.
A 37 percent chance of it raining and temperatures around 66 Fahrenheit.
Is there anything about the wind there?
Yes, 12 miles per hour average winds.
Alright, thank you.
Can I be of any further assistance?
What is the weather like?
In which city?
New York City
The temperature is 66 degrees Fahrenheit, with 37 percent chance of rain.
I'm on my way to the family reunion. Would you use your great mind to tell me the weather in Atlanta on March 7th?
Sure. Besides showing a 26 percent rain forecast, it looks like the temperature during the day will average 83 degrees.
I want to know how the weather is going to be in LAX on March 5th.
The average temperature in your requested location should be 87 degrees Fahrenheit, with a chance of raining at 12 percent.
What's the weather for Sydney please.
Average temperature in Sydney is 94 degrees. I show a 4 percent chance of rain.
What's the humidity expected to be?
Humidity is going to be around 15 percent.
I want to check the weather for March 12th.
Where should I check the weather?
Check the weather in Chicago on March 5th.
The average temperature will be 71 degrees Fahrenheit and there's a 28 percent chance of rain.
How windy will it be? And how humid?
The humidity is around 40 percent while the average wind speed will be around 5 miles per hour.
I would like information on the weather
Which city do you want information for?
I would like to know the weather in New York City
Average temperature: 66 degrees Fahrenheit. Chance of rain: 37 percent
What percentage of humidity is expected?
Around 41 percent
What's the weather like on March 10th?
In what city, exactly?
Specifically in CDMX.
It should be about 96 degrees Fahrenheit there, with a 3 percent chance of rain.
Thanks. How about the weather in Atlanta, GA?
Atlanta? It should be about 88 degrees Fahrenheit with a 19 percent chance of rain.
Please check the weather.
What city?
San Fran.
The average is 91 degrees with a 29 percent chance of rain.
How humid?
The humidity is about 49 percent.
Can you get me the weather forecast for New Delhi on March 13th?
There is a 0 percent chance of rain with a high temperature of 100 degrees!
Give me a weather report.
What city shall I search?
Give me ATL.
Well, high will be 86 F. There is only a 28 % chance.
How windy is it there?
Not too, about 11 MPH.
What's the weather for NYC on March 2nd?
The temperature should be around 57 degrees Fahrenheit. The chance of rain is 29 percent.
How windy will it be? How humid will it be?
Humidity will be around 26 percent. Wind should be around 6 miles per hour.
Thank you.
Would you like anything else?
Can you check the weather on March 2nd in KL for me?
I can do that - it will be 101 Fahrenheit with a 3 percent chance of rain.
Oh, that's hot. How windy?
It will be at 3 miles per hour.
I need to check the weather for the March 3rd in Phoenix.
The temperature will be 94 degrees and there is a 10 percent chance of rain.
How humid is it going to be, and will it be windy?
The humidity is low, around 27 percent and the winds will be light at 4 mph.
Find out what the weather will be like in NYC on March 2nd.
On that day the average temperature will be 57 degrees fahrenheit and there is a 29 percent chance of rain.
How humid will it be?
The humidity will be around 26 percent.
How windy will it be?
The wind speed should be about 6 miles per hour.
Tell me about the weather in San Francisco on March 7th
The temperature is expected to be around 74 degrees with a 9 percent chance of rain.
What about humidity and wind?
The humidity is expected to be 17 percent with a wind speed of 7 miles per hour
What is the status of new york city on March 13th?
The temperature is expected around 59 degrees with a 33 percent chance of rain.
What is the weather forecast for the March 1st?
What city do you want the forecast for?
I want to check the weather in San Diego.
It is forecasted to be 90 degrees that day with a 1 percent chance of rain.
Hello! Can you tell me what the weather forecast is for Portland, OR today?
Hello, I'd be happy to help. It is predicted to be 75 degrees Fahrenheit with a 9 percent chance of rain.
I am planning for an outing. Do you have information about weather?
Which city's weather report do you want?
I would like to get weather status of Redwood City on March 7th.
The average temperature is reported to be 73 degrees Fahrenheit and only 1 percent chance of rain.
Nice, What is the status of weather in Atlanta, on March 12th?
There 19 percent chance for shower is reported with average temperature of 78 degrees Fahrenheit.
What will be condition of humidity?
18 percent humidity is forecast.
Can you please check the weather for me in Delhi on March 3rd?
There's a 2 percent chance of rain with an average temperature of 92 degrees Fahrenheit.
Is it going to be humid or windy?
The average wind speed will be 7 mph and humidity will be around 16 percent.
What is the weather going to be like on March 14th?
What city do you want to check the weather for?
Portland.
The average temperature should be 57 degrees Fahrenheit with a 13 percent chance of rain.
How humid and windy is it going to be?
The humidity is expected to be around 20 percent with a wind speed around 6 miles per hour.
Can you check the weather in San Francisco for March 1st?
It will be 91 degrees with a 29 percent chance of rain.
How humid is it?
Humidity is 49 percent.
How about March 9th?
It is 70 degrees with a 2 percent chance of rain.
How humid is it?
Humidity is 16 percent.
I need to check the weather in Vancouver on the the 10th.
Okay. The average temperature that day will be around 68 degrees Fahrenheit with a 25 percent chance of rain.
What's the wind and humidity going to be like?
There will be around 26 percent humidity with an average wind speed of 6 miles per hour.
Check the weather on March 2nd
Which place should i check
Check in Phoenix, AZ
the average temperature is 72 degrees Fahrenheit and 11 percent chance of rain
What about the wind and humidity?
The humidity is around 31 percent and average wind speed is 9 miles per hour
Okay good.
Do you need anything else?
Ah, I forgot I'm going to San Fran on March 5th. Can you check the weather that day for me?
Sure, looks like it will be 87 degrees Fahrenheit with a 23 percent chance of rain.
What is the weather supppose to be in Kuala Lumpur on March 10th?
It is suppose to be 90 degrees with a 5 percent chance of rain.
How windy?
11 MPH.
How humid?
Around 22 percent.
I want to know how the weather is in Portland, OR.
From what I can see the average temperature in your requested location should be 75 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 9 percent chance of rain.
I would like information on the weather
Which city do you want the information for?
For Sydney, Australia. What will the weather be like on March 7th?
Average temperature: 89 degrees Fahrenheit. Chance of rain: 4 percent
What is the weather like on next Tuesday?
In which city should I check?
The Seattle, WA weather please.
The average temperature is 61 degrees and there is an 18 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy?
The average wind will be 15 mph.
Please check the weather on March 6th.
Which city?
Dublin.
It's going to be 92 degrees Fahrenheit with 7 percent chance of rain.
How about in Philadelphia on March 11th?
It's going to be 72 degrees Fahrenheit with 10 percent chance of rain.
How humid and windy it's gonna be?
Humidity is around 33 percent and wind speed should be 11 miles per hour.
I'd like to check the weather on the March 14th.
For which city please?
I'd like to check Philadelphia.
Philadelphia will have an average temperature of 84 degrees Fahrenheit that day with an 8 percent possibility of precipitation.
What is the weather in Kuala Lumpur on March 3rd?
It is suppose to be 93 degrees with a 8 percent chance of rain.
Can you check the weather in Chi-town for March 3rd?
The weather should be 67 degrees with a 36 percent chance of rain.
What's it like outside? In Anaheim, CA.
It's 78 degrees with a 29 percent chance of rain.
And the humidity?
45 percent humidity.
Lets check NY for 1st of March.
It averages 66 degrees there with a 37 percent rain probability.
What about wind and humidity.
Humidity? 41 percent. Wind speed should be around 12 mph.
Please check the weather in Phoenix, AZ for March 9th
There is a 21 percent chance of rain with average temperature of 76 degrees.
Will it be windy?
Forecast for wind speed is 6 miles per hour.
What about humidity?
Humidity is at 31 percent.
I'd like to check the weather for 7th of March.
For which city?
In New York city.
The average temperature seems to be 65 degrees fahrenheit. There is a 15 % chance of rain.
I want you to check the Phoenix weather.
The temperature for the day will be around 89 degrees fahrenheit and there is a 15 percent chance of rain.
What will the weather be like in LAX on March 3rd?
Average temperature: 89 degrees Fahrenheit. Chance of rain: 0 percent
Find out what the weather is like in Toronto, Ontario.
It will be averaging a temperature of about 58 degrees Fahrenheit and the possibility of rain is at 13 percent.
Would you mind checking the LA weather for me?
Of course. LA temperatures will average 76 degrees Fahrenheit with the chance of rain coming in at 28 percent.
What does the humidity look like?
Approximately 75 percent.
What about the forecast for the March 8th?
Temperatures that day are going to be 81 degrees Fahrenheit on average and the possibility of precipitation will be 21 percent.
And the humidity?
34 percent or thereabouts.
Can you check the forecast for Seattle on March 7th?
There is a 16 percent chance of rain with average temperature of 69 degrees.
What about windy speed?
The average wind will be 8 mph.
How about humidity?
The humidity will be around 20 percent.
Can you please check the weather for me on March 7th in Nairobi, Kenya.
There's a 8 percent chance of rain with an average temperature of 86 degrees Fahrenheit.
Is it going to be humid?
There's a forecasted humidity of 23 percent.
I need to go if a should get a coat. What's the weather gonna be on March 6th?
In which city?
In Vancouver, BC please.
The temperature should be 70 degrees Fahrenheit with a a 27 percent chance of rain.
And how humid will it be?
Around 25 percent.
And how windy?
The wind speed should be at an average of 13 miles per hour.
Please check the weather on 1st of March
Where should i search in
please search in new delhi
The average temperature in new delhi is 99 degree with 4 percent chance of rain
how windy is it
the wind is about 8 miles per hour
I'd like to check the weather for March 9th.
Where would you like to know the weather for?
I'd like to find out the weather for Seattle on the the 4th.
The average temperature will be 69 degrees Fahrenheit and there's a 43 percent chance of rain.
How humid will it be?
The humidity will be around 69 percent.
Tell me what the weather is.
What city do you want me to check?
Check the weather in New York City for March 2nd.
The temperature will be 57 degrees with a 29 percent chance of precipitation.
Hey! please can you tell me what's the weather forecast on 13th of March?
Please can I have the zipcode or city name?
Please find for Atlanta? how is the precipitation?
There is only 2 percent chance of rain and the average temperature for the normal day is 80 degrees Fahrenheit.
What is the weather going to be on March 8th?
In what city would you like to know the weather?
I need to know the weather in Vegas.
There is a 17 percent chance of rain with an average temperature of 76 degrees Fahrenheit.
What is the wind factor expected to be.
7 miles per hour is the average wind speed.
What is the humidity level expected to be?
The humidity is expected to be 36 percent.
What will the weather be like in Atlanta, GA?
The average temperature is 86 degrees. There will be a 28 percent chance of rain.
How about the March 6th.
The average temperature will be 87 degrees and the chance of rain will decrease slightly to 25 percent.
What will the humidity be like.
Around 49 percent.
How windy will it be?
The wind speed will be minimal at around 2 miles per hour.
Thanks for the info.
May I help you with something else?
please check the weather in sydney on 9th of this month
The weather on march 9th 2019 is around 93 degree with 6 % chanec of rain
Hi there, could you help me check the weather at Albany on March 2nd please?
The temperature will be 84 degrees Fahrenheit on that day, with a 14 percent chance of rain.
I see, how about for Philadelphia instead?
The temperature will be 71 degrees Fahrenheit on that day, with a 3 percent chance of rain.
I see, what is the expected humidity and windiness then?
The humidity should be around 16 percent and the average wind speed should be 8 miles per hour.
Sure, how about?
Sorry, I could not comprehend you. Do you require further assistance?
Could you help me check the weather again on the March 12th?
The average temperature for that day is 83 degress Fahrenheit with a 25 percent chance of rain.
I see, thank you!
Do you need any further assistance?
I want to check the weather for Portland, OR on March 2nd.
The average temperature for that of year is 65 degrees. There will be a 15 percent chance of rain.
I wish to check out the weather on March 10th.
In which city do you want to check out the weather?
I wish to check it in New Delhi.
The average temperature is 102 degree Fahrenheit and 4 percent of chance of rain.
I want to find out what the weather will be like on March 4th.
What city do you want to check the weather in?
Check Sydney, NSW.
The average temperature on that day should be around 96 degrees Fahrenheit with a 7 percent chance of rain.
Check the weather for me.
Which city should I check it for?
Check it in Philly
The temperature is expected to be around 81 degrees with a 8 percent chance of rain.
Hello! Please can you check the weather in Chicago, IL on March 12th. Is there any scattered Thunderstorms?
Yup, there are scattered thunderstorms and there is a 26 percent probability of raining and the average temperature for the normal day will be 61 degrees Fahrenheit.
What is the humidity and the wind speed on that day?
The average wind speed on that day will be around 12 miles per hour and it will be around 4 percent humidity.
I'm going to be visiting friends in Nairobi fairly soon. What's the weather like there on March 3rd?
It'll average at a sizzling 103 degrees Fahrenheit, with just a 2 percent chance of rain.
Hi there, could you help me check the weather in LAX?
The average temperature there is 76 degrees Fahrenheit with 28 percent chance of rain.
I see, thanks!
Could I further assist you?
Can you please check the weather?
In which city do you want the search?
What is the weather like in Cupertino?
The weather is 92 degrees and there is a 13 percent chance of rain.
How humid and windy is it supposed to be?
The humidity will be around 22 percent and the wind is 2 miles per hour.
How is the weather in Delhi on March 4th?
The weather should be around 97 degrees and there is a 8 percent chance of rain.
What is the weather in New York City on 10th of March?
The temperature is 59 degrees with 0 percent chance of rain.
Is it humid or windy?
The wind is 5 miles per hour and the humidity is about 15 percent.
Can I get the weather?
Sure, for which city
The weather in Chicago please
Today will have an average temperature of 73 degrees Fahrenheit with a 29 percent chance of precipitation
Will it be humid?
The humidity should be about 29 percent
Ok good
Anything else I can do?
Hey, I want you to tell me about the weather.
What city weather shall I tell you about?
I am interested in Chi-town.
It will be 73 degrees Fahrenheit average temperature for the day with a 29 percentage possibility for rain.
What is the wind like and what will the humidity be?
It will be approximately 29 percent humid with wind speed averaging about 15 miles an hour.
What's the weather forecast in KL on March 9th?
The temperature will average around 92 degrees Fahrenheit, and the chance of rain is 0 percent.
How is the weather on March 5th?
What city's weather should I tell you about?
Vancouver, BC of course. How it is on March 12th?
It says the average temperature is about 59 degrees Fahrenheit with a 10 percent possibility of rain.
What is the humidity?
Humidity could be about 15 percent.
What about how windy it will be?
11 miles a hour should be the average speed of wind.
I would like to check out the weather in LA on March 10th.
The average temperature on that day should be around 91 degrees fahrenheit. There is a 10 percent chance of rain.
I need to check the weather for the March 9th.
Sure thing. Which city would you like me to check the weather for?
Check the weather in NY for me please.
The average temperature in New York will be around 70 degrees Fahrenheit for the day. There is a 38 percent chance of rain.
I need more updates about the weather in stanford on March 14th
Yes. The temperature will be around 82 degrees fahrenheit and the chance of rain is 5 percent
What about the wind?
The wind speed will be 5 miles per hour
Now tell me more about humidity
it will be around 19 percent
Got it. Now look the same thing in vegas on March 11th
the temperature will be around 81 degrees fahrenheit and the chance of rain is 3 percent
I want to see what the weather conditions are like in Paris, France.
The average temperature is 77 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 26 percent chance rain.
Could you look at the weather forecast for March 2nd in Toronto, Ontario.
There is a 20 % chance of rain and an ave temp of 60 degrees fahrenheit.
Will it be humid?
About a 28 & chance of that.
Fine ok.
Would you like help with anything more?
I need to find out the weather in Sydney on March 14th.
The average temp for Sydney that day should be 100 degrees F with a 2 % chance of rain.
How windy is it likely to be?
The average wind speed is looking like 8 mph.
Could you assist me in checking the weather forecast for March 5th in Portland, OR.
There is a 12 % chance of rain with the temp around 56 degrees fahrenheit.
Can you check the weather?
What city do you want?
Check the weather in Philly.
It will be 81 degrees with an 8 percent chance of rain.
How humid will it be?
The humidity is 23 percent.
Check the weather in London, England.
The average temperature is about 81 degrees fahrenheit for the day, with a 23 percent chance of rain.
What will the wind and humidity levels be like?
The humidity level is about 35 percent and wind speed around 10 miles per hour.
What is the weather in Los Altos on March 13th?
The average temperature should be 94 degrees with a 3 percent chance of rain.
What about Chi-Town on March 1st.
The average temperature should be 73 degrees with a 29 percent chance of rain.
How windy will is be?
About 15 miles per hour.
What about the humidity?
The humidity is about 29 percent.
Oh, okay then.
Would you like anything else?
Can you get me the weather on March 7th.
What city is this weather check for?
It's for Atlanta, GA.
The average day temperature is 83 degrees Fahrenheit with a 26 percent chance of precipitation.
Can you show me the weather?
Which city should I be searching for
Search for it in Phoenix
The average temperature is predicted to be at 89 degrees with a 15 percent chance of rain
I'd like to find out the weather.
For what city did you want to find the weather for?
I'd like to know the weather in Valley Ford.
The average temperature in Valley Ford should be 72 degrees F and there is a 6 % chance of rain.
OK, what about the weather in Phoenix, AZ on March 4th?
The average temperature in Phoenix for that day should be 90 degrees F with a 29 % chance of rain.
What's the weather like in London?
The average temperature in London should be 81 degrees fahrenheit with a 23 percent chance of rain.
Can you give me the weather forecast for Chi-town?
It is predicted to be 73 degrees Fahrenheit wit ha 29 percent chance of rain.
Check the weather in San Diego for March 1st please.
Sure thing. The average temperature for that day will be around 90 degrees Fahrenheit with a 1 percent chance of rain.
How windy is it gonna be? What type of humidity are we looking at?
The humidity will be around 16 percent and the average wind speed should be about 1 mile per hour.
What will the weather be like on March 2nd?
What city do you want me to check?
San Fran.
The temperature should be 72 degrees with a 15 % chance of rain.
How windy will it be?
The wind speed should be 8 miles per hour.
What's the wether forecast for March 7th?
For what city?
Las Vegas, Nevada.
The forecast for Las Vegas on March 7th calls for a daytime high of 86 degrees with a 22 percent chance of rain.
Ok. Then how about KL on the March 1st.
The forecast for KL on March 7th calls for a daytime high of 102 degrees with an 8 percent chance of rain.
Will there be any wind to speak of?
Expected winds are a mild 12 miles per hour.
How about humidity?
Expect about 23 percent humidity.
What's the weather forecast for Philly on March 14th?
The expected average temperature for the day is 84 degrees Fahrenheit, with an 8 percent chance of rain.
Can you check the weather in Paris on March 7th?
The temperature should be around 87 degrees and there is a 12 percent chance of rain.
How windy is it going to be?
The average wind speed should be 6 miles per hour.
How humid will the day be?
The humidity will be around 22 percent.
Hi there, could you help me check the weather on March 13th?
For which location are you interested in?
In London, UK please.
Sure, the temperature then is 94 degress Fahrenheit with a 25 percent chance of rain.
I see, what is the humidity and windiness on that day?
The humidity is around 18 percent and the average wind speed is 5 miles per hour.
I see, thanks!
Do you require further assistance?
What is the weather in Las Vegas on March 11th
The average temperature is 81 degrees Fahrenheit and 3 percent chance of rain
What about the wind speed and humidity?
Around 19 percent humidity and 10 miles per hour is the wind speed
What's the weather going to be like in Chi-town on 3rd of March?
I don't have the specific temperature forecast for that day, but the average temperature for that day is 67 degrees. There is a small chance of rain, about 36 percent.
I want to find out what the weather will be like in Paris, France on March 3rd.
The temperature on that day should be 93 degrees Fahrenheit with a 6 percent chance of rain.
Please help me check the weather in Ny on this Sunday.
It's 74 degrees Fahrenheit with a 23 percent chance of rain.
I need to check out the weather on March 11th.
What city are you looking for the weather in?
Kuala Lumpur.
The average temperature for that day should be 99 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 2 percent chance of rain.
I need to finish making plans for my upcoming trip. Can you check the weather for me?
Sure, where are you going?
I'll be in New York.
Ok, looks like it'll be an average of 66 degrees with a 37 percent chance of rain.
Great, that's perfect.
Anything else I can do?
Please check the weather.
What city do you want?
Check the weather in Paris.
The average temperature is 77 degrees F and 26 % chance of rain.
Thank you for the info.
Is there anything else?
Can you help me look up the weather for San Diego on March 13th?
It should be 75 degrees Fahrenheit on average with a 19 percent chance it will rain.
Hello. What is the weather going to be like in SD on the March 12th?
The weather is expected to be 90 oF with a 10 % chance of rain.
What's the humidity supposed to be?
The humidity is expected to be around 27 %.
How windy will it be?
Not very windy; only about 5 mph.
I need to check the weather in Phoenix, AZ on March 5th
The average day temperature is running at 73 degrees Fahrenheit and the chances of rain is 12 percent.
What's the weather going to be like on March 10th?
What city do you want me to check the weather in?
Toronto, Canada please.
The average temperature should be 73 degree Fahrenheit with a 26 percent chance of rain.
Could you check what the weather will be like on March 11th?
Which city are you interested in?
In KL please.
It says that there is a 2 percent chance of rain with a temp of 99 degrees Fahrenheit.
I'm doing a bit of traveling in the next few days. Can you check the weather in Rohnert Park for me?
Sure, looks like the average is 84 degrees Fahrenheit with a 23 percent chance of rain.
How about the wind and humidity?
It will be about 35 percent humidity and an average wind speed of 7 miles per hour.
Great. Can you also check the weather for LA on March 10th?
Sure. The average will be 91 degrees Fahrenheit there with a 10 percent chance of rain.
Tell me what the weather will be on the 6th of this month in Delhi, India.
There is a 0 percent chance of precipitation with an average temperature of 93 degrees.
I will be travelling soon and I would like to know the weather.
Where do you want to check the weather?
Check the weather in Phoenix, AZ on March 8th.
The temperature will be around 77 degrees Fahrenheit with a 15 percent chance of rain.
What will the weather be on March 1st in Atlanta, GA?
The average temperature is forecasted to be 86 degrees and there is a 28 percent change of rain.
Will it be very humid or windy?
Winds are expected to average 11 miles and hour and the humidity will be about 45 percent.
Can you tell me the weather of KL on the March 4th?
Sure. The average for March 4th is 87 degrees and the probability of rain is 8 percent.
What is the weather suppose to be in Paris, France on March 3rd?
The average temperature is 93 degrees with a 6 percent chance of rain.
How humid? How windy?
The humidity is expected to be around 18 percent. The wind should be 4 mph.
What's the weather forecast to be like on the 9th?
Whereabouts do you want to check?
I want to go to NYC.
In NYC the average temperature will be 70 degrees Fahrenheit, and there will be a 38 percent chance of rain.
What about the humidity levels and winds?
Humidity is forecast to be around 47 percent, and there will be wind speeds of 7 miles an hour.
I want to know how the weather will be on the 9th.
Can you tell me for which city should I check the weather for?
I want to know the weather in LAX.
The average temperature in LAX for the day should be 94 degrees Fahrenheit, and with a chance of 13 percent of rain.
Alright, can you check the weather for March 1st?
For your requested date the average temperature should be 76 degrees Fahrenheit, and the chance of raining is 28 percent.
Can you tell me how windy is it going to be?
The average speed of the wind is expected to be 4 miles per hours.
I would like to check out the weather in Toronto, Ontario on March 4th.
The average temperature for the day will be around 70 degrees Fahrenheit with a 38 percent chance of rain.
Will it be humid?
The humidity will be around 33 percent.
How windy will it be?
It should be around 13 miles per hour on average.
I need to see what the weather is in Portland, OR on the 12th of this month.
The average temperature is 72 degrees with a 16 percent chance of rain.
How windy?
It should be averaging 11 MPH.
How humid?
Around 30 percent.
Can I get the weather for March 2nd?
Of course. What city?
For SF
The average temperature will be 72 degrees Fahrenheit with just a 15 percent chance of rain.
What's the weather forecast?
What city do you want weather for?
Give me weather for Portland, OR on March 8th.
The forecast calls for an average temperature of 70 degrees Fahrenheit with a 50 percent chance of rain.
Thanks. What's the forecast for March 4th?
The average temperature for the day is forecast to be 68 degrees Fahrenheit. The chance of rain is 18 percent.
I want to check the weather condition on 9th of this month for which I need your help.
In which area do you want to check for the weather condition?
Check it in Kuala Lumpur.
please note that the average temperature level will be 92 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 0 % for rain fall there on that day.
What about the Wind Speed on that day?
It will be around 8 miles per hour in average on that day.
And what will be the Humidity level in the mentioned area?
Humidity will be around 15 %. Any more information you need?
i want to check weather in seattle on march 6th
The average temperature for the day is 64 degrees fahrenheit and there is 27 percent chance to rain
how about wind?
The average wind speed is 4 miles per hour
how much humid will it be?
its around 29 percent
What'll the weather be like in Vegas on March 11th?
The average will be 81 degrees with a 3 percent chance of rian.
Can you tell me the weather in NYC for Wednesday next week?
Sure, the average temprature is expected to be around 64 degrees with a 26 percent chance of rain.
I want to know the weather in Phoenix, AZ.
The average temperature in Phoenix, AZ for the day is expected to be 89 degrees Fahrenheit. Also there is a 15 percent chance that it will rain.
I want to know the weather for March 11th.
Can you tell me the city where I should check the weather?
I want to know the weather in NY.
The average temperature for the day in NY should be 65 degrees Fahrenheit, and the chance of rain is 34 percent.
Alright, that is fine.
Do you want me to help you with something else?
What is the weather in New Delhi on 9th of this month?
The temperature for March 9th will be 91 degrees Fahrenheit with 3 percent chance of raining.
How will the humidity be?
It will be around 18 percent.
How about the wind?
It is going to be around 2 miles per hour.
can you check the weather on 4th of this month?
Can you tell me which city should I look into?
I want to the weather in Sunol.
The expected average temperature for the day is 93 degrees Fahrenheit with 14 percent chance of rain.
can you tell me the expected humidity and wind speed?
The expected humidity is 17 percent and the expected wind speed is 12 mph.
Okay. Can you check the weather on March 7th?
The expected average temperature for the day is 72 degrees Fahrenheit with 14 percent chance of rain.
Okay, Can you check the weather in Chi-town?
The expected average temperature for the day is 74 degrees Fahrenheit with 23 percent chance of rain.
What will the weather be like on March 6th?
Where would you like to check?
Please check Chi-town.
Okay, the average temperature will be around 69 degrees with a 5 percent chance of rain.
What is the weather like in Nairobi, Kenya?
The average daytime temperature should be around 105 degrees and there is a 0 percent chance of rain.
What will the weather in LA be like on March 13th?
The average temperature will be 94 degrees Fahrenheit with a 19 percent chance of rain.
What will the wind speed be?
5 miles per hour.
Could you find out what the weataher will be like in Atherton on March 2nd?
It will be 93 degrees fahrenheit on average that day with a 17 percent chance of rain.
Check the weather on March 4th for SF.
The temperature will be 71 degrees fahrenheit on average with a 16 percent change of rain.
Will it be humid or windy?
The humidity will be around 19 percent and there will be a wind speed of 8 miles an hour.
I'd like to check the weather on March 14th.
Where would you like to find out the weather?
I want to know the weather in San Diego.
The average temperature will be 76 degrees Fahrenheit and there's a 2 percent chance of rain.
Okay, how is the weather on March 9th?
The average temperature will be 83 degrees Fahrenheit and there's a 25 percent chance of rain.
Tell me the weather for March 6th.
I can do that for you. Which city do you want the forecast for?
Give me the details about the weather in Sydney, Australia.
There is only a 9 percent chance of rain with a temperature of 89 degrees Fahrenheit.
Will it be windy that day? That makes a difference for me. Also tell me about the humidity.
It will not be too windy with a wind speed of 8 miles per hour. The humidity will hover around 22 percent.
Can you check the weather in New Delhi for the March 6th.
There temperature should be around 93 degrees with 0 percent chance of rain.
Could you tell me the weather forecast for March 2nd.
Which city will I check?
In Chi-town please.
There is a 33 percent chance of rain but the avg temp will be 61 degrees Fahrenheit.
Is it going to be windy?
Wind speed will be around 6 miles per hour.
Can you tell me what the weather is suppose to me in SD on March 13th.
The average temperature should be 75 degrees with a 19 percent chance of rain.
Can you tell me how's the weather gonna be like on the March 2nd in Nairobi?
There will be a 6 percent chance of rain with an average of 86 degrees Fahrenheit.
I wanna see the weather in KL on March 5th
The average temperature needs to be 100 degrees fahrenheit and there will be a 5 percent chance of rain
How windy will it be?
The average wind speed is gonna be 6 miles per hour
How humid will it be?
Humidity is 18 percent
Can you tell me the weather for Delhi on March 2nd?
The temperature will reach 95 degrees with 0 percent chance for rain.
What's the weather in Toronto, Ontario like?
58 degrees with 13 % chance of rain
Thanks.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Can you please check the weather in Toronto, Ontario for the March 4th?
There is a average temperature of 70 degrees and there is a 38 percent chance of rain.
I need to know what the weather is like.
For which city?
For Nairobi, Kenya.
The temperature is 105 degrees Fahrenheit with 0 percent chance of rain.
I will be travelling to San Diego. What is the weather like there?
The average temperature for San Diego is around 90 degrees Fahrenheit with a 1 percent chance of rain.
I have to check the weather in London, England on March 10th
Chance of rain is 6 percent there with average day temperature at 92 degrees Fahrenheit
What is the wind condition there?
The average wind speed is around 5 miles per hour
What would the weather be like on March 6th?
In which city?
In London, Uk.
The temperature would be 85 degrees fahrenheit with a 27 percent chance of rain.
Can you please check the weather in Vancouver, BC for March 12th?
The temperature is expected to reach 59 degrees and there is only a 10 percent chance of rain.
What's the weather going to be like on the March 2nd
For which city?
Check it for Toronto, Canada
That day should have an average temperature of about 60 degrees Fahrenheit with a 20 percent chance of rain
Will it be humid or windy?
The humidity is expected to be 28 percent with an average wind speed of 5 miles per hour
That's good
Anything else I can do?
What's the weather forecast for Portland, OR on 8th of this month?
The average temperature is forecast to be 70 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 50 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy at all?
The average wind speed is forecast at 7 miles per hour.
I'd like to check the weather on March 6th.
Which city would you like a weather report for?
Please could you tell me the weather for Toronto, Ontario.
The average daytime temperature should be around 62 degrees and there is a 45 percent chance of rain.
Can you play me some music?
Sure. Perhaps you'd like Big Time Rush 's song Windows Down from their album Elevate.
Yes, play that one
Please confirm: the song Windows Down on your TV
Yes please. Can you tell me what genre it is? Is that song from three years ago?
Playing now. Enjoy! It's a pop song from the year 2011
Thanks so much
Anything else I can do to help?
Hey, I need to find this song I heard four years ago by Lao Che. I think it's from the album Dzieciom.
Is it Wojenka by Lao Che from the album Dzieciom?
Yes, that's it.
Should I play it?
Sure, any device is fine.
So Wojenka on the TV?
That's good. What kind of song is it?
It's rock. Enjoy it!
I need to find a song.
Battle Symphony by Linkin Park on the One More Light is one of 10 options.
Can you find me a song by '15 on the Meliora album?
I have 2 options. Would you like to listen to Cirice by Ghost on the Meliora album?
Yes. Please play.
Please confirm you want me to play the song Cirice on the TV.
No. Please play in my bedroom.
Please confirm you want me to play the song Cirice on the Bedroom speaker.
Yes. That's right. What type of music is it?
It is a metal song. Please enjoy.
It's way too quiet in here right now. Can you put on a pop song?
Sure, I found a playlist with 10 songs you might like. What do you think of Adorn by Miguel from Kaleidoscope Dream?
Is that the 2019 album?
No, that's the 2012 album.
Oh, I remember that one. Yeah, can you put that on?
Sure. Should I play Adorn on the TV?
Yes, the TV is fine.
Ok, it's playing. Enjoy!
Can you recommend a song?
What about Slumber Party by Britney Spears on her album Glory?
That sounds good.
Would you like to play this song?
Sure. Play it on my bedroom speaker.
Please confirm that you want to play Slumber Party on the bedroom speaker.
Yes, that's correct. What kind of music is it and is it from eight years back?
It's from 2016 and it's a pop song.
I am searching for a song.
How about Man Down by Rihanna in the Loud album?
That one is good.
Would you like to play this song?
Okay.
Could you confirm that I should play Man Down on the TV?
Yes, that is good. What sort of music is that?
It's reggae. Please enjoy!
Can you help me find something to listen?
Sure, I found 10 songs. What about Ocean by Martin Garrix from the album The Martin Garrix Experience?
What kind of music is it?
It's a House song.
When did it come out?
Came out in 2018.
Do you have anything else?
There's Look What God Gave Her By Thomas Rhett in the album Center Point Road.
I want it.
Should I play it?
Please do.
So play Look what God Gave Her on the TV?
Yep. Is the song from 2014?
Enjoy the song. It's from 2019.
Hello, I'm feeling tired and bored. Please can you help me to fetch a good song and play it for me?
Ya, sure! There are 10 songs available. Do you wish to hear the song Head Over Boots by Jon Pardi from the album California Sunrise?
What is its genre? Was it released before eight years ago?
Nope, it was released in the year 2015 and its a Country song.
Fine. I can choose this song.
Please may I know if you wish to play this song for you?
Sure. Please do that for me.
Okay! Please can you confirm me that you wish to hear the song Head Over Boots in your device TV. Is that right?
Yup, you're right.
Have fun with the music.
I want to listen to some music. Can you find me a song from two years back from the album When Was The Last Time by Darius Rucker?
I found 1 song from When Was The Last Time by Darius Rucker, it's called If I Told You.
That's the one I was looking for. Please play it on the kitchen speaker.
To confirm: You would like me to play If I Told You on the kitchen speaker.
That's right. What is the genre?
It's genre is country. Enjoy the song.
I'm trying to find a song. I really love Pop songs.
I found 10 songs. One song is Adorn by Miguel from the album Kaleidoscope Dream.
Is the song from three years ago?
The song came out in 2012.
What other songs did you have? I like Enrique Iglesias.
I found the song Heartbeat by Enrique Iglesias from the album Euphoria.
Is the song from '19?
The song came out in the year 2010.
Yes, that is the song I'm looking for.
Did you want to play that song?
Sure, could you play it on the speaker in the kitchen?
Please confirm you're playing the song Heartbeat on the Kitchen speaker.
Yes, that sounds good.
Enjoy listening!
Can you find me a song please?
I found 10. How about El Farsante by Ozuna from Odisea?
Yes that is the one I like.
Would you like to hear it now?
Yes please play it.
You want to hear El Farsante on the TV, correct?
Yes that is correct. What type of music is it?
It's Latin music. Please enjoy your song.
Thanks!
Is there anything else I can do for you?
I want to find a metal song from five years ago.
Okay, what about Final Masquerade, a Linkin Park song from their album The Hunting Party?
Anything else you can find?
Sure, how about Night Witches by Sabaton from the album Heroes?
Yeah, that's great. I'd like to listen to it.
Please confirm: playing the song Night Witches on the TV.
Yep, that's right.
Enjoy the music!
I'm looking for a song by Morgan Wallen from one years ago.
How about Up Down by Morgan Wallen from the album If I Know Me?
Can you find anything else?
Unfortunately I can't find anything else that matches your criteria. Would you like help with anything else?
I'd like you to continue searching for music.Can you find anything by The Chainsmokers from the album Sick Boy.
I have found a song called Everybody Hates Me by The Chainsmokers from the album Sick Boy.
Yes, I love that song.
Would you like to listen to this now?
Yes, please play it on my kitchen device.
Ok so you would like me to play Everybody Hates Me on your kitchen speaker.
Actually I've changed my mind. Please play it on the bedroom speaker.
Sure, so to confirm: You'd like to play Everybody Hates Me on your bedroom speaker.
Yes that's right. What kind of music is it?
It's a pop song. I hope you enjoy it.
I want to hear pop songs from '15, especially from Confident.
I found 1 song. How about Stone Cold By Demi Lovato from Confident.
Yes.
Do you want to hear the song?
Yes, play on my tv.
Please confirm, playing Stone Cold on TV.
Yes that is correct.
Enjoy your music.
I need help looking for a song.
I found 10 songs. How do you feel about Bird Set Free by Sia from the album This Is Acting.
What other options do you have?
How about The Mountain from the album Outsider by Three Days Grace.
Find me something from the album Blood from seven years ago.
I found 3 songs from the album Blood. What do you think about Adrenalize by In This Moment?
What genre of music is that?
Metalcore.
Yes that's the one, play it.
You want to play the song Adrenalize on the TV?
Yes.
Enjoy your music!
I am in a nice mood to hear some good songs. I need to search it with you help. Shall we try now?
Yes, of-course. I searched and found 10 songs in which Cham Cham by Meet Bros in the album Bollywood Monsoon Special is the best one I think. Hope you will also like it.
I think so but before make decision I need to know some more information about the Year in which the song was released and type of music.
It was released in the year 2016 and it is a South Asia song. Is that okay to you?
Try to search for some more songs.
What about a song name Let Him Go by Ayo Jay in the album lazy Genius? You can definitely try this song as this is the good one.
Yes, I like to hear this song now. Can you play it for me?
Need your confirmation to play the song Let Him Go on TV.
That is confirmed. Continue with playing the song.
Song started playing now.
I want to hear some music!
How about Lost Stars by Adam Levine from his album V.
Yes, play that song.
Please confirm the following: Playing Lost Stars on the TV.
Yes, that's great. What type of song is it?
Song is now playing. It's a pop song.
Can you find me a song?
Do you like the song Count On Me by Connie Talbot from the album Beautiful World?
Can you tell me what kind of music that is?
Yes, it is Pop!
Yes, I like that one!
Would you like to hear that one?
Yes, please cast it on the Kitchen speaker.
Please confirm that you would like to hear Count On Me on the Kitchen speaker.
Yes, that is the one!
I hope you like your music!
Any good tunes out there?
I see 10 right off the bat. There's Kindly Calm Me Down by Meghan Trainor. Its off Thank You.
Bingo!
So, give it a spin?
Yeah, toss it on.
Kindly Calm Me Down on the TV?
Yes. You got it.
Playing. Enjoy yourself.
I'd like to find a song.
How about Some Of It by Eric Church from the album Desperate Man.
That's it. Please can you play it on my bedroom device.
Sure, so you would like me to play Some Of It on the Bedroom speaker.
Yes please.
I hope you enjoy the music!
I need to put on some music while I clean my room. Can you put on some Alternative Country, maybe something from the album Southeastern?
Sure, what do you think about Cover Me Up by Jason Isbell from Southeastern?
Yes, I like that one. Can you play it on my bedroom speaker?
No problem. To confirm, you want to play Cover Me Up on your Bedroom speaker. Is that right?
Yes, that's right. What year is that from again?
It's from 2013. Happy listening!
Can you find me a song from 2019?
How about Bad Habit by Ben Platt from the album Sing to me Instead.
Yes, that's the song.
Would you like to play this song?
Cast it on the Bedroom Speaker.
Please confirm the following: Play Bad Habit on the Bedroom speaker.
Yes that's right.
Enjoy!
Can you help me find some songs?
Sure, what about Dark Necessities by the Red Hot Chili Peppers from the album The Getaway?
What other songs you got?
How about the song Mi Gna by Super Sako from the album Love Crimes?
That one sounds good.
Would you like me to play it?
Sure, just play it on any device.
To confirm, you would like to play the song Mi Gna on the TV, is that correct?
Yeah, that's fine. What genre is the music?
Now playing the song. It is considered pop music.
Can you help me find a song from '19?
Sure, what about the song Bad Habit on Sing To Me Instead by Ben Platt?
What's the music type?
It's a pop song.
Yes, cast it on the bedroom speaker.
Please confirm you'd like me to play Bad Habit on the bedroom speaker.
Yes, please do.
Hope you like it.
Im looking for a song. Find me something one years back from album Outsider
There are 2 songs. How about Right left wrong by three days Grace album Outsider
What else there? I want in album Pobrecita
I found 1 songs. what about Mana Zina by Mo Temsamani in the album pobrecita
Whats it genre?
Its a pop song
Yes great. I wanna listen it
Please confirm this : Play the song Mana zina on TV
Yes great
Enjoy your song
I'd like to find a song.
How about Mahzouz by Tamer Ashor from the album Khayali?
That's perfect. Please can you play the music on my television.
Okay so you would like to play the song Mahzouz on your TV.
Actually can you cast it on the Bedroom speaker instead.
Okay so you would like to play the song Mahzouz on your bedroom speaker.
That's correct. What kind of music is it?
It's a Pop song. I hope you enjoy it!
Hello, I am looking for a specific song, something from about four years ago. I think it was on the album Badlands and it is an electropop genre.
I have found 3 songs that match. Is it Colors by Halsey from her album Badlands?
Can you show me other songs, please?
What about the song Control by Halsey from her album Badlands?
Yes, that is the one I am looking for. Can you cast it on my bedroom speaker? I would like to listen to it.
Sure, I can do that. Now playing Control on the bedroom speaker.
Yes, thank you.
Enjoy your music session!
I would like a song from one years back, preferably country. I like Morgan Wallen.
how about Up Down by Morgan Wallen from the album If I Know Me.
That's a good one.
Would you like it to play?
Yes, please, on the television.
Please confirm playing Up Down on the TV.
Sounds like a plan!
Have a nice time.
I would like to find a song.
There are 10 songs. Would you like Lose It by Kane Brown from the album Experiment?
Yes, I would like to listen to that one on the speaker in the bedroom.
Lose It playing on the bedroom speaker.
Yes, thank you for playing the song.
Enjoy your song playing.
I want to hear a Kelsea Ballerini song from '14, preferably pop.
I found 1. How about Yeah Boy on the album the First Time by Kelsea Ballerini?
Yes please play it.
You want to hear Yeah Boy on the TV, is that correct?
Yes that is what I want to hear.
Enjoy your tune.
I want to find a song.
Would you like to listen to Heartbeat by Enrique Iglesias on the Euphoria album?
That one is good.
Should I play the song?
Yes. Please play.
Please confirm you want me to play Heartbeat on the TV.
Yes. What music type is it?
It is a pop song. Please enjoy.
I am in a nice mood and I like to hear some good songs for which I need your help.
How about a song like Another Day Of Sun by La La Land Cast in the album La La Land. This song will keep your mood in nice mode. You will definitely like it.
Let me know the year in which this song was released.
It was released in the year 2016. Is the one you are looking for?
Yes, that is my favorite. Thanks.
Shall I play it for you now?
Yes. I want to listen this song now. Since I have some work in my Kitchen, play it on my Kitchen speaker to enjoy while working.
Need your confirmation to play the song Another Day of Sun on your Kitchen speaker.
Sorry, just now I remind that I have some work in my Bed room and please play it on my Bedroom speaker.
That is okay. Please confirm to play Another Day of Sun on Bedroom speaker.
That is confirmed. proceed with playing the song and let me know about it's genre.
It is a Soundtracks song and it was started playing. Enjoy your day.
I love country song and there are many great songs in Telling All My Secrets
tell me your thoughts on Drunk Me by Mitchell Tenpenny in Telling All my Secrets
when did it come out?
It came out in 2018
Yes that is correct
wanna play the song?
Put it on my kitchen speaker
Play Drunk Me on the kitchen speaker
Yes that is right
Enjoy the good music
I'm looking for a song from about one years back, maybe a pop track from the album always in Between
I found 3 tracks that work. What about All I am on the Jess Glynne album Always In Between?
Yes, that sounds great
Do you want me to play it?
Yes, stream it on my tv
Confirming you want All I Am played on your TV
Yup, that's it
Enjoy your song
Can you help me in searching some songs?
What is your opinion about Royal Beggars in the album Holy Hell by Architects?
Any thing else you have?
What is your opinion about Adorn in the album Kaleidoscope Dream by Miguel?
can you tell e its genre?
This is a pop song.
oh, That's good.
Are you like to play the music?
Yes, i want to play on my tv.
Please give confirmation details: Run Adorn on TV.
Yes, this is perfect.
Song started playing now.
Can you find me some music? I like Old Dominion
What about Hotel Key from the album Happy Endings by Old Dominion?
Great, can you play it?
You want to play Hotel Key on the TV?
That is correct
Ok, it is now playing
What type of music is this?
It is Country
Can you help me to search some songs? I love Five Finger Death Punch 's songs. I really love Metal Songs. There are so many nice songs in the album Got your Six.
I have short listed 2 songs of your likings. What is your opinion about I Apologize in album got your six by Five Finger Death Punch.
That's good.
Are you like to run the music now?
Okay. Run the music.
Please give confirmation details: Run I apologize on TV.
Fine this is okay.
Song started playing now.
Search for songs to play.
Of the the 10 songs I found that you may like is Broken by Isak Danielson from the album Yours.
What type of song is that?
It's considered a Pop song.
Sounds good.
Do you want to hear the song now?
Yes.
Would you like to play Broken on your TV?
Yes I do.
The song is playing now.
Get me a song ok?
I have 10 choices. What about Time up by Shenseea from Big A Presents One Chance Riddim?
What genre is it?
It is Reggae.
Perfect, sounds good.
May I play it for you?
Please do it.
Here goes, playing Time up on TV.
I can barely wait.
It's beginning now.
Find me some Electropop songs by Lorde on the Pure Heroine album.
Do you like Buzzcut Season by Lorde on the Pure Heroine album?
That works for me.
Shall I cast the song now?
Yes, cast it on the bedroom speaker.
You want me to cast the song Buzzcut Season on the bedroom speaker. Is that right?
No, cast it on the TV.
You want the song Buzzcut Season cast onto the TV. Is that right?
That is right.
Your song has started.
I want to search for some nice songs, can you find me the best one?
I got 10 results. What about a song Latency by Martin Garrix in the album The Martin Garrix Experience?
Let me know what type of song is this?
This is house song and you will like it I think.
No, I want to search for some other songs which is the one suitable to me.
Found an another song which is Heartbeat by Enrique Iglesias in the album Euphoria. What do you think about this song. This is the nice one and liked by most of the people.
Yes, I also like this song.
Shall I play it now for you to listen?
Yes, Do it for me.
Please confirm to play the song Heartbeat on TV.
Yes, please proceed.
The song was started playing now and you can enjoy the same.
Thanks for your help to get the nice song.
How can I help you further?
Please help me find good Country songs, preferably in the Unapologetically album.
Miss Me More by Kelsea Ballerini in the Unapologetically album is 1 song you may like.
Sounds good. I'd like to play the song.
Please confirm that you'd like to play Miss Me More on TV.
Yes, that's right.
The song is now playing.
Can you find me some music to listen too please.
I've got 10 songs on deck. Let me ask, what do you think about Only You by Ric Hassani off the album titled The African Gentleman?
I don't know, find out the genre of music for me please.
This is a Pop song.
Alright thank you.
your welcome, Would you like me to play this track now?
Sure, go ahead.
Great, please confirm you would like to play Only You on the TV.
yes, play now.
Selection has started. Enjoy your music.
Can you help me find some pop songs? Maybe something by Hayley Kiyoko.
I found a song called curious by Hayley Kiyoko from her album Expectations. Is this the kind of thing you are looking for?
What other options are there. The Expectations album is full of great songs.
There are 3 more options you might enjoy. One of them is Let it be by Hayley Kiyoko from the Expectations album.
Anything else that is similar?
Another song by Hayley Kiyoko that you might like is the song Sleepover from the album Expectations.
That's exactly what I'm looking for.
Would you like assistance with anything else?
Yes, play the song on the speaker in kitchen.
You want the song Sleepover to be played on the kitchen speaker? Is that right.
No, I changed my mind. Play in on my bedroom speaker instead.
So you want me to play Sleepover on the bedroom speaker?
Yes, that's what I want.
The song will start shortly.
Can you find some songs for me?
I found 10 songs. Would you like to hear what if I was nothing by all that remains from their album a war you cannot win ?
That sounds good insert. Please play it on my bedroom.
You wish to hear what if I was nothing on bedroom speaker . Is this correct ?
Yes that is correct
Your song is starting
I'd like to listen some songs
Do you like Pisces by Jinjer in album King Of Everything?
I prefer Joe Bonamassa 's songs
There are 2 songs. Do you like Drive by Joe Bonamassa in album Blues Of Desperation?
What kind of song is it?
It's a Blues song
Ok, perfect! I want to play it on display
Play Drive on TV: is it correct?
Yes, it sounds good
The song starts playing
Hi, I'm like to find some songs
Sure, there are 10 that popped up. How about Superficial Love by Ruth B from the album Safe Haven?
Which genre is this?
pop
Nice.
Shall I play it now?
Yes on the speaker in the bedroom
Please confirm: Superficial love is now playing on the bedroom speaker
Hmmm, change it to the TV please
Please confirm: superficial love is now playing on the tv
correct
This song is now playing
I would like to listen to rock songs by radwimps from the album your name.
I have found 2 songs. Would you like to listen to dream lantern from radwimps from the album your name.
I would love to hear that song.
You want to listen to Dream Lantern on Tv?
That is right.
The song has started playing.
I really want to listen from a song from the album The Beginning.
I found 1 song from the Sammielz album The Beginning. Thoughts about Let Us Be?
What's the genre?
The song is reggae.
Okay, great to know.
Want to give it a listen now?
Sure thing. I want to hear it on my TV.
You want to listen to Let Us Be on your TV?
Indeed I do.
I started playing the song.
Can you find me some good songs?
How about Battle Symphony by Linkin Park from the album One More Light?
Yes, That sounds great.
Would you like me to play the song for you?
Yes. Play the song for me.
Please confirm: You want me to play Battle Symphony on TV speaker.
Yes, That is correct.
Song is playing. Enjoy the music.
Can you tell me the genre of the song?
The genre of the song is Electropop.
Hello! Can you help me find a Pop song to listen to?
I'd be happy to help. Would you like to listen to Adorn by Miguel from the album Kaleidoscope Dream?
That works for me.
Would you like me to begin your selection?
Yes, please play it on my tv.
You'd like to hear Adorn on TV. Is this correct?
Yes, that is correct.
Your selection is starting now.
Thank you so much.
You're welcome. Is there anything else I can help you with today?
Please help me find Conan Gray' s song in his album Sunset Season, I prefer Pop songs.
Do you like Generation Why by Conan Gray in the album Sunset Season?
That's perfect!
Will I play the music now?
Yes please, play it on any available device.
Okay, you want to play Generation Why on TV. Please confirm.
No, please play it on my bedroom speaker.
Okay. you want to play Generation Why on my bedroom speaker. Please confirm.
Yes, that's good.
It is now starting to play.
I'd like to listen to some music. Can you find me a Country song by Jon Pardi? There are tons of great songs on the California Sunrise album.
Sure thing. I've found 2 songs you may like. How about Head Over Boots by Jon Pardi off the album California Sunrise?
No thanks, what else you got?
What do you think of the song Night Shift by Jon Pardi off the album California Sunrise?
Okay that sounds great. Can you play the song on the television?
Okay, please confirm the following for me: Play Night Shift on the Tv.
No actually I want to play it on the speaker in kitchen.
Okay, please confirm the following for me: Play the song Night Shift on the kitchen speaker.
Yes, that's correct.
Your song is now playing. Enjoy.
Would you look for some good songs in the Dark Horse Album?
I have this 1 song I think you will like. What about All On Me by Devin Dawson in Dark Horse?
What genre is it in?
It's a country song.
That sounds good.
Should I play it now?
Yeah, go ahead.
Could you confirm that I should play All on Me on TV?
Yeah.
I have begun playing the song.
Please search me some songs.
I searched and found 10 songs for you. What is your opinion about Blue Skies by Lenka in The Bright Side album?
What type of song do you prefer?
I like Pop songs.
It is nice.
Shall I play the music now?
Yes. Please broadcast it on television.
Kindly ensure that, playing Blue Skies on TV.
Yes. it is right.
Song is getting played.
Finding a song list for the party is next on my agenda. What are some cool songs you can recommend?
Well, what we have so far are 10 songs for you. Would you consider this one, Alone from the Different World album by Alan Walker?
That's a hit with me.
Would you like to hear the song now?
Okay.
You are confirming that you want to hear Alone on your TV now?
Right-O, in two minutes, please. And what form of song is it?
The song is in the Pop category and will begin playing in two minutes.
Can you play me some great songs
How about the highly rated song Aftertaste by Shawn Mendes in his album Handwritten.
What genre is it?
Its a Pop song.
That is awesome play it for me.
Just to confirm playing Aftertaste on TV
No I want to listen to it on my bedroom speaker.
Just to confirm playing Aftertaste on bedroom speaker.
Nope play it on the Kitchen speaker.
Just to confirm playing Aftertaste on kitchen speaker.
That is perfect.
Your song is playing.
Can you find me a pop song by jess glynne 's album always in between
I found 3 songs by jess glynne in the album always in between. The song is called all i am
perfect, please play the song
please confirm to play all i am on tv
yes please
enjoy
Could you search some songs like Rebelution songs like Reggae
How about Roots Reggae Music by Rebelution from Count me in
Thats good
Do you wanna play it
yes on kitchen device
Please confirm this : Play Roots reggae music on kitchen speaker
Yes thats right
Started playing song
Thank you for that
What else can I assist?
Can you please find some Rock songs for me?
How about Disturbed playing Are you Ready from the album Evolution?
Sure, that's awesome.
Do you want me to play it?
Please play it on the kitchen speaker.
Can you please confirm that you want me to play Are you Ready on the kitchen speaker.
Yes, please do.
I've started playing.
I want to hear some pop songs like Kaung Kaung, like the album A SOe Htae Ka A Kaung.
I found 1 song called Pyaw Nay Par By Kaung Kaung ffrom A Soe Htae Ka A Kaung.
Play the song.
Please confirm, playing Pyaw Nay Par on TV.
Yes, that is correct.
Plays song.
I'd like to listen to some music. Can you find me some Country songs by Cody Jinks? Something off the album Adobe Sessions would be great.
What do you think about Cast No Stones by Cody Jinks off the Album Adobe Sessions?
Yes, that sounds great. Thanks.
Want to play your song now?
Sure thing. Go ahead and play it.
Okay, please confirm the following for me: Play the song Cast No Stones on the TV.
No, play it on the kitchen device for me.
Please confirm the following: Play Cast No Stones on the Kitchen Speaker.
Yes, that's the one. Thanks.
Your song is about to start.
I want to listen to some Pop songs by Rihanna off the Unapologetic album please.
Here's one off Unapologetic by Rihanna called Pour it Up should I play it for you?
Yes please.
Would you like that played right now.
You know it.
Do you want Pour It Up played on the TV?
That's the place.
Your chosen song is now playing.
Can you find me a country song by Jason Aldean on the Rearview Town album?
Girl Like You is one of 4 Jason Aldean songs available on the Rearview Town album.
Okay. Sounds perfect.
Would you like me to play the song?
Yes. Please. Thanks.
Please confirm you want me to play Girl Like You on TV.
Yes. That is right.
The song has started playing.
I want to listen to a song.
The album Bollywood Monsoon Special has a song Cham Cham by Meet Bros.
That's perfect.
I can start the song if you like.
Thanks.
I will play Cham Cham on TV with your permission.
Permission granted.
The music has begun.
Do you know the genre?
South Asia is the genre.
I want to listen to some Rock songs. What is there from the album Ember?
There is 1 songs you might like. Do you want to listen to Tourniquet by Breaking Benjamin from the album Ember?
That sounds great.
Do you want to play it?
Play it on the TV.
Please confirm: Play Tourniquet on the TV.
I changed my mind, play it on my bedroom speaker.
Please confirm: Play Tourniquet on the bedroom speaker.
Yes, plat it.
Playing the song.
Can you find me some songs to listen to?
How about the song Wine for Me by Popcaan from the album Forever.
Sure, let's go with that.
Should I play that for you now?
Yeah, that's fine.
Should I play the song Wine for Me on the TV?
Yeah that sounds good.
Now playing the song.
What genre is this song?
It is considered Reggae.
I am looking for some good Get Scared songs in the album Best Kind of Mess.
How about Sarcasm by Get Scared songs in the album Best Kind of Mess?
That is great.
Do you want to play the music now?
Yes, I would like to hear it now.
Ok, play Sarcasm on TV. Is that correct?
Yes, that is correct. What is the genre?
It is a Rock song and is playing now.
Please find a songs from the album Globalization.
How about Fireball from Globalization by Pitbull?
Yes, please play that.
You would like to hear Fireball on your TV, is that correct?
Yes, that's right. What type of song is it?
It is a Pop song. It will begin playing now.
I want to listen to some music to help me relax. Today was so busy at the hospital.
There are 10 songs that might interest you. Would you like to hear tempo by lizzo from the album cuz I love you?
What type of music is that?
It is pop music.
That would be fine.
You want to hear it now?
Of course. I want to listen in my bedroom speaker.
You want to hear tempo on your bedroom speaker?
No, on the kitchen speaker.
You want to hear tempo on the kitchen speaker?
Yes, that's what I want.
The song has started.
I want some songs, can you help me find some?
I have located 10 songs you may like. What are your opinions on Are You Ready by Disturbed from the album Evolution?
What is the genre of this song?
This is a rock song.
That sounds good. I would like to play the song on kitchen device.
Please confirm these details: play Are You Ready on kitchen speaker.
Yes, that is right.
The song has begun playing.
I want to listen to a song, so can you find me some?
How would you like listening to All Night by Parov Stelar from the album The Princess?
Can you tell me the genre of this song?
This song is considered a Pop song.
That's nice actually.
Would you like to listen to the music now?
Yes, I want to listen to the music now on the speaker in kitchen.
Can you please confirm that you want to listen to All Night on kitchen speaker?
Yes, that's right.
The song you requested has started playing.
I would like to listen to a song.
What song would you like to hear?
The song is called In Your Eyes.
Please confirm the following: You want to play In Your Eyes on the TV?
Yes, that's right. What's the genre? And who sings it?
The song is now playing. It's a pop song by Inna.
Hello! Can you play the song Redemption on the bedroom device?
You'd like to hear Redemption on the bedroom speaker. Is this correct?
Yes, that's right. Can you tell me the genre and what album it is on?
Yes. It is a Blues song found on the album of the same name, Redemption. Your music selection has begun.
Toss some tunes on the kitchen speaker.
What do you have in mind.
Cups by Anna Kendrick.
Cups on the kitchen speaker?
Yes. The song of course.
Cups is playing in the kitchen.
Play Ludovico einaudi song night on any available device
Playing night on tv
Tell me the album and the genre
It is a classical song from the album elements
I'd like to hear a song.
What song would you like to hear?
It's called Best Friend.
Would you like me to play Best Friend on the TV?
Yes, that would be great.
The song will begin now.
Can you play me the song Buzzcut Season by Lorde on my bedroom speaker?
Please confirm: Buzzcut Season playing on bedroom speaker.
Actually, I'd like to hear it on my kitchen device.
Please confirm: Buzzcut Season playing on kitchen speaker.
Yes, that'll be great. What's the genre?
It's playing. It's considered an electropop song.
I want to hear some music please.
I can help you with that. What kind of music should I play?
Let's play Dance Again on my bedroom speaker.
Alright, please confirm we are playing Dance Again on bedroom speaker.
yes, play now. Find out the artist name and what genre this is.
Sure, This is a Pop song by Jennifer Lopez. Your selection is now playing.
I want to play a song.
What song?
Hard Times, play it on the TV.
Please confirm, playing Hard Times on the TV.
Yes, that is correct. Who is the singer?
Plays song. It is Paramore.
What album? Genre?
It is called After Laughter. It is a rock song.
Get me music on my bedroom speaker.
What music would you like?
The selection I want is Business Dinners. I like that it's by Sigrid.
Fine, Business Dinners play no on Bedroom Speaker.
That's perfect, thanks.
The song is starting now.
What album is that sourced to?
It's from sucker Punch.
What genre is that?
It's a pop Genre song.
I want to listen a Hayley Kiyoko 's song
Which song do you prefer?
I want to play What I Need
Play What I Need on TV. Do you confirm?
Yes, I confirm.
The song starts playing
Is it a rock song? Which album is it from?
No, it's a Pop song from album Expectations
Can you play a song please?
Which song do you want to hear?
Please play Redemption on the kitchen speaker.
Please confirm the following: Play Redemption on the kitchen speaker.
Yes, that is correct. Do you know the singer and what genre it is?
The song has started. It is a blues song by Joe Bonamassa.
Please play the song.
Which song would you like to hear?
Please play Love Me Like You.
Please confirm you want to hear Love Me Like You on the TV.
Actually, please play on the bedroom device.
Please confirm you want me to play Love Me Like You on the bedroom speaker.
Yes. Who sings the song and on what album is it?
The song is a Little Mix song on the Get Weird album. The song has started playing.
Can you play a song?
Sure, which song?
Play One More Light.
Okay, confirm you'd like to hear One More Light on the tv.
Yes, please do.
I started the song.
What album is this on?
It's on One More Light.
Cool, and what's the genre?
It's considered electropop.
Can you play me a song? It's called Business Dinners, and I want to hear it on the kitchen device
Please confirm: play Business Dinners on the kitchen speaker?
Yes play it
Enjoy the music
Can I get the album name?
The album is called Sucker Punch
I want to listen to the song Best Mistake of Ariana Grande, and I want for it to be played on my television.
Can you please confirm that you want to listen to Best Mistake on TV?
That's right. Can you tell me from which album is the song, and what genre is it?
The song is from the album called My Everything, and it is a Pop song. The song has started playing.
Find a song to play.
Which song?
Must Be The Whiskey.
Please confirm: play Must Be The Whiskey on tv.
No, play El Farsante on speaker in the bedroom.
Please confirm: play El Farsante on bedroom speaker.
Yes.
Playing now.
I'd like to hear a song over my TV please.
What song would you like to hear?
I want to listen to Colder Weather.
Confirming I will play Colder Weather on TV.
That's right, yes.
The song has begun.
What album is that song from and what genre is it?
It's a country tune from the Pass The Jar album.
I Like Shailesh Premi 's songs. I want to listen Lahnga Lasar Ke on speaker in the bedroom.
Play Lahnga Lasar Ke on bedroom speaker. Do you confirm?
Yes, I confirm
The song starts playing
What kind of song is it? Which album is it in?
It's a Country song. It's in Maza Mar Liya Dhori Ke Niche album.
Can you please play some Ben Platt songs?
What song should I play?
The song is called Bad Habit.
Please confirm the following: Play Bad Habit on the TV.
Yes, that is correct. What album is that on?
The song has started. It is off the album Sing to me Instead.
Let's play one of my favorite songs. Pull up Paramore songs.
Ok, which song should I play?
Yeah, play Hard Times.
Alright, please confirm that you would like to play Hard Times on the TV.
Yes, go ahead and play it.
Great, your selection is now playing.
I want to play a song. Play Self Control by Frank Ocean for me.
Sure thing. Please confirm the following for me: Play the song Self Control on your TV.
Correct. Can you tell me what album this is off of? Also what genre is it?
Your song is now playing. The song is from the album Blonde. The genre is Pop.
I want to hear the song Out of Love. I like Alessia Cara 's music.
Please confirm the following: play Out of Love on your TV.
Yes, that's right. What album is it from.
Song is now playing. The album is from The Pains of Growing.
Can you please play the song Lost Within from Fivefold on my kitchen speaker?
Please confirm the following: Play Lost Within on the kitchen speaker.
Correct. What album and genre is it?
The song has started. The album is called The Story and it is a rock song.
Play the song Girls Like You
Would you like to play the song Girls Like You on the TV?
Yes, that will be perfect. Do you know what type of song that is and who sings it?
Yes, the song should be playing now. It is a pop song by Karolina Protsenko.
Could you find me a song to hear please?
Which song would you like to hear?
I want to hear Cheap Smell.
You want to hear Cheap Smell on TV?
No please play Tempo instead.
You want to play Tempo on TV, correct?
Yes that is correct.
The song is started.
Thanks.
Can I help with anything else?
I would like to listen to a song
Which song do you prefer?
I like Sugarland 's song, I want to listen Babe
Play Babe on TV. Do you confirm?
No, I prefer on speaker in the bedroom
Play Babe on bedroom speaker. Is it correct?
Yes, it is. Thanks!
The song starts playing!
Is it a pop song?
No, it's a Country song.
Which album is it from?
From album Bigger
Can you play me a song?
I'd be happy to. What would you like to hear?
I'd like to hear Shiroyama.
You'd like to play Shiroyama on TV. Is this correct?
Yes, can you tell me what genre that song is considered?
It's a Metal song. Your selection has begun.
Can you tell me who sings it and what album it is from?
It is by Sabaton and it is off their album The Last Stand.
I like to list to the song Alone with you by Jake Owen on my Kitchen device now. Can you play it for me?
Need your final confirmation to play the song Alone with you on Kitchen speaker.
Yes, continue playing the song.
Song started playing and you can enjoy it now.
What type of song is this and from Which album this song comes from?
It is a Country song from the Album Barefoot Blue Jean Night. Anything else you need?
I want to Bounce by Iggy Azalea. Play it on the speaker in kitchen.
Please confirm the following: Play Bounce on kitchen speaker.
Do it now!
Song is now playing.
I like Taylor Swift. I want to play The Story Of Us on any available device
Play The Story Of Us on TV: do you confirm?
Yes, I confirm. Which album does the song belong to? What kind is it?
To album Speak Now and it's a pop song. It started playing.
I want to cast the song O Father O Satan O Sun by Behemoth.
You want to cast the song O Father O Satan O Sun on the TV. Is that right?
That is correct. Can you tell me the name of the album?
The album is called The Satanist and your song is now playing.
I'd like to play song please.
Sure thing. What song would you like to play?
Play If We Have Each Other for me.
No problem. Please confirm the following for me: Play the song If We Have Each Other on the TV.
Yes, that's right.
Your song is now playing. Enjoy your music!
I'd like to play a song.
What would you like to hear?
I'd like to hear the song Yomonsan.
You'd like to hear Yomonsan played on the TV. Is that correct?
Yes, that's right. Which album is that from?
It's from the album of the same name, Yomonsan. Your selection has begun playing.
Can you tell me who sings it?
Janob Rasul is the artist.
I'd like to play Ben Platt 's song on TV called Grow As We Go.
Please confirm Grow as we go on TV.
Yes, that it. What the album and genre?
I started playing the song from the album Sing To Me Instead which is a Pop song.
I would like to play the song.
What song do you want to play?
That song's name is High.
Could you confirm that you want to play High on TV?
That is right.
I have started playing that song.
What is the genre and album?
It's a pop song from the winter collection.
I would like to listen to a song.
Which song did you have in mind?
I like Caro Emerald songs, ones like Tangled Up.
Confirming playback of Tangled Up on TV.
Sounds good. What album is that from?
The song is from The Shocking Miss Emerald album and it has started playing.
Great, thank you.
How else may I help you?
I'd like to play the song.
Which song did you wish to play?
I'd like to play Superficial Love.
Please confirm you're playing Superficial Love on TV.
Yes, that sounds good. What is the album of the song?
The song is now playing. It is from the album Safe Haven.
What is the genre of the song?
The song is a Pop song.
I want a particular song on.
Which song is that?
Its called Keep It Mello.
To confirm I will play Keep it Mello on TV.
Yes please. Do you know the genre and singer?
The song has started and yes it is a house song by Marshmello.
I want to play a song.
What song?
If You Met Me First. Play it on the television.
Please confirm, playing If You Met Me First on the TV.
Yes, that is correct.
Plays song.
What is the album? Who is the vocalist?
The vocalist and the album are both Eric Ethridge.Eric Ethridge.
Please place naya naya penhi salwarba on kitchen speaker. I love shashi lal yadav 's song
please confirm to play naya naya penhi salwarba on kitchen speaker
thats right, what is the genre
this is a country song.
what album is this
this is in the album called no line signal likhat ba
I'd like to listen to some music. I really like Mohammed Al Salem. Can you play Qalb Qalb Party?
You'd like to hear Qalb Qalb Party on the TV speakers. Is this correct?
Yes, that would be great.
Your selection is beginning now.
Can you tell me what genre that is and which album it is from?
Yes, it is a Pop song from the album Radh.
I'd like to listen to music. I'd like to hear Only Love.
Please confirm you're playing the song Only Love on TV.
Yes, that sounds right.
Enjoy your song.
I want to listen to some music.
Is there a song that you would like to hear?
Play Business Dinners.
Confirming that you want me to play Business Dinners on TV.
Yes, that's right.
Enjoy!
I would like to hear music.
What song would you like to hear?
I want to hear I Want You.
Please confirm you want me to play I Want You on the TV.
Yes. That's right.
Please enjoy your song.
I like Zac Brown Band songs. I'd like to listen to Colder Weather.
Could you confirm that I should play the song Colder Weather on the TV?
Yes, that is right.
Enjoy listening.
I have a midterm tomorrow and would like to listen to some music to help me stay awake. Can you find songs by Pop Evil and play them on the kitchen device.
What is the name of the song you are wanting to listen to?
I would really like to hear the song titled Be legendary.
Okay, so you want me to play Be Legendary on the Kitchen speaker?
Yes please. Can you tell me the genre of music that is considered and the name of the album it is on?
The song you are about to hear is classified as Metalcore and is featured in the album Pop Evil.
Can you find me some music?
What song would you like to hear?
Please play All About That Bass on my tv
To confirm: You wish to play All About That Bass playing on TV. Correct?
Yes that is correct
Enjoy your song
I want to find music.
Do you have a song?
I want to hear The Heart Wants What It Wants.
Confirm The Heart Wants What It Wants to cast on TV.
I confirm. Is it from nine years back.
The year is 2014.
i want some music
what music do you want to listen
please play rats
please confirm to play rats on tv
yes please
enjoy
Can you play me some music?
Sure, what song?
Let's hear Banjo Odyssey on the bedroom speaker
Please confirm: playing Banjo Odyssey on the bedroom speaker
No, change it to All Night instead actually
Please confirm: playing All Night on the bedroom speaker
Yes that's right
Your music is playing now. Enjoy!
Can I get the album name?
The album is called The Princess
Who sang it? When is it from?
Parov Stelar is singing and it's from 2012
I want to hear some music.
What song do you want to listen to?
Mile High.
Please confirm, playing Mile High on TV.
Yes, that is correct.
Enjoy the songs!
I would like to listen to musing on the speaker in the kitchen. Please play Dusk Till Dawn.
You would like me to play the song Dusk Till Dawn on the Kitchen speaker. Is this correct?
Yes it is.
Enjoy the song.
What is the genre of the music?
Dusk Till Dawn is a pop song.
What album is the song from? Is it from '13?
It is from the 2017 album Icarus Falls.
Can you pull up some Music by Charlie Puth?
Is there a certain you would like to hear?
Actually, yes, Dangerously.
Play Dangerously on the TV - is that correct?
Sure enough. Hey, was that released in '14. Which album is it from?
Its from the 2016 album Nine Track Mind. Take time for pleasure.
Great input, thanks.
What's next for me?
Can you play some music by Diamond Platnumz on any device.
Which song do you prefer?
I do like African Beauty.
To confirm then i will play African Beauty on your TV.
Yes that is great.
Enjoy the song.
I'm looking for music to listen to.
Sure, what song would you like to hear?
Please play Carry Me.
You would like to hear Carry Me on your TV, is that correct?
Yes.
Alright, enjoy the song.
Thanks!
Is there something else I can do for you?
I want to listen to Bad Habit by Ben Platt in my bedroom.
Confirm the following: Play Bad Habit on your bedroom speaker.
Yep.
Enjoy the music.
What album is it from?
The album's title is Sing To Me Instead.
I would like to listen to music by Gyptian, could you play it on any device please?
Any specific song you are interested in?
I would like to listen to Hold You, thanks!
Please confirm your action to play Hold You on the TV.
Sure, that is fine with me.
Enjoy listening to your music!
I'd like to listen to Ridin High on the speaker in the bedroom.
Please confirm you're playing the song Ridin High on the Bedroom speaker.
Yes, that sounds right.
Enjoy the song.
I want to listen to some music. Play Try To Fight It by Shallow Side in my bedroom.
Sure thing. Please confirm the following for me: Play the song Try To Fight It on the Bedroom speaker.
Yes, that's correct.
Your music is playing. Enjoy!
I'd like to listen to some music on the kitchen device. Can you play Give You What You Like, please?
Of course, please confirm: playing Give You What You Like on the kitchen speaker.
Yep, that's right. Just wondering, what year did it come out and what album is it on?
Enjoy the song. It's from 2013 off the album Avril Lavigne.
I would like to listen to Touch It on TV.
Play the song Touch It on the TV.
Yes, that is correct. Is it from the album from five years ago?
It's from year 2016 from the album Dangerous Woman.
I'd like to listen to The Way I Talk.
PLease confirm: Play The Way I Talk on TV.
Yes, exactly, what album is it from?
Enjoy! IT's on the album If I Know Me.
What kind of music is it?
it's a country song.
Please play some music for me. I want to listen to Consequences in my bedroom.
Okay, please confirm this: You are playing the song Consequences on your bedroom speaker.
Yes, that's right.
Enjoy your music!
I like to listen music.
Any song you want to listen?
I like to listen shy.
Please give confirmation details: Run the song Shy on TV.
This is fine. In which album is it in and what type of music it is?
It is a pop sonG from album Heart Miles. Enjoy.
Can you cast Pyramid by Jake Zyrus on my kitchen speaker please?
Sure, please confirm you'd like to hear Pyramid on your kitchen speaker.
Yes. Is it the one from eight years ago?
It's actually from 2010.
I need to find some new music, on a kitchen device. I want Salam Alaikum. I like songs by Harris J.
Please confirm the following information: play Salam Alaikum on the Kitchen Speaker.
Yeah, that sounds good.
Enjoy your selection.
Can you put on some music while I clean my room? Maybe something by the Radwimps?
Do you have a preferred song?
Let's go with Zenzenzense.
Ok, I'll put Zenzenzense on the TV.
Cool, thanks. What album is it from again and what genre is it?
It's categorized under Rock, and it's from Your Name.
I want to hear the song high.
Playing the song High on TV
No, actually play lose you too
Playing lose you too on TV
who has sung this song?
The singer of the song is Shy Martin
It's so quiet. Can you play some music on my speaker in the bedroom?
Any specific song?
Yes. Qaynona by Shahzoda.
Okay, so I'll be playing Qaynona via your bedroom speaker?
That is correct.
Enjoy the song.
Will you play music?
What song?
Nobody Can Save Me.
Please confirm Nobody Can Save Me playing on TV.
Cool.
Enjoy.
I'd like to listen some music
what song would you like to listen?
I'd like to listen to Team
Play the song Team on TV. Do you confirm?
Yes, I confirm. Thanks
Good listening to you!
I like to hear some nice music now especially Nota De Plata is liked by me the most and can you search it for me.
I need your confirmation to play the song Nota De Plata on TV.
Yes, please go ahead.
Song started playing now and hope you will enjoy it.
Yes, thanks and I want to know whether this song is from nine years ago? and also let me know the name of the album which contains this song.
The album name is Nirvana and it is from the year 2017.
I'd like to listen to some music.
Is there a particular song you want to listen to?
Yes, I would like to hear Goodbye Angels.
You would like to play Goodbye Angels on the TV, is that correct?
Yes, that's right. What genre of music is it, and who is the artist?
Now playing the song. It is a pop song by the Red Hot Chili Peppers.
Great, thank you.
Is there anything else you need?
I want to listen to where have you been
Please play where have you been on tv
Yes thats right, when does it come out and whos the singer
This song is by rihanna from 2011
I am in a mind set of listening some nice songs like the one by Lady Gaga. Can you help to find it for me?
Let me know your interested category, so that I can search for the songs that is suitable to you.
I need your help to play a song name John Wayne now.
Need your confirmation to play the song John Wayne on TV.
Yes, please start to play the song.
Song started playing and enjoy the same.
Please check about the released date of this song, whether it is from three years ago?
It was released in the year 2016.
I'd like to listen to music.
Which song did you want to hear?
I'd like to hear Drive.
Please confirm you'd like to play Drive on TV.
Yes, that sounds good. What album is the song on and what genre of music is it?
The album is called Blues of Desperation and it is a Blues song. Enjoy!
I'd like to listen to music.
What song were you interested in?
I'd like to hear Laila Main Laila.
Please confirm you'd like to play the song Laila Main Laila on TV.
Yes, that's right. What type of music is the song?
The music is a South Asia song. Enjoy!
I would to find music.
Do you have a song in mind?
Yes, cast on my television the song Born Free.
Confirm cast TV the song Born Free.
Yes that is right.
Enjoy the song today.
I want to hear some music.
Do you have a song in mind?
I want to hear When She Says Baby by Jason Aldean.
Confirm When She Says Baby to cast on TV.
I confirm that all.
Enjoy the song you chose.
I am in a nice mood to hear some music in my TV and I love to hear the songs by Lenny Kravitz like Low. Can you play it for me now.
Please confirm to play the song Low on TV.
Yes, confirmed. Proceed.
Song started playing and enjoy it now.
What is the name of the album from which this song was taken?
It is taken from the album Raise Vibration.
Let me know the year of release and genre of this song.
It is a Rock type song and the one is released in the year 2018.
Will you play Only Love by Jordan Smith on Kitchen speaker?
Please confirm Only Love playing on Kitchen speaker.
Great. Year it came out?
2018. Enjoy!
Thanks.
Anything else?
Play fresh eyes for me
Playing fresh eyes on TV
Cool, that works for me
playing music now. Enjoy
I'm in the mood for some music.
Any particular song?
I want to play I Would Like.
To be sure: You want to play I Would Like on the TV.
That's right. What year did this song come out?
It came out in 2016. Enjoy.
What classification of music is it?
It's considered Pop.
Great. Thank you.
Can I help you with anything else?
Hi, I'd like to listen to a song on my television. Can you play If We Have Each Other by Alec Benjamin?
Yes, please confirm: playing If We Have Each other on TV.
Yep, that's what I want.
Enjoy the song!
I wish to listen to music now. Play it on my kitchen speaker. I love songs by The Wanted.
What type of song do you prefer?
I wish to listen to Glad You Came.
Kindly ensure that, Glad You Came song is played on kitchen speaker.
Yes. it is correct. In what year the song some out and from which album?
Enjoy the music. It is come out in the year 2010 from the album Battleground.
I'm in the mood for some music.
What do you have in mind.
How about Lotus Flower. Play it on the Kitchen device.
Lotus Flower on the Kitchen speaker?
Yes. Thats right.
Playing. Enjoy your song.
What genre is this? Do you know the album?
Its Electronica, off The King of Limbs.
I want to relax and listen to music.
What song would you like to hear?
I want to listen to self control.
You want to hear self control on the tv?
Yes, that's right. What genre of music is it?
It is pop song. Enjoy the music.
I'd like to listen to some songs by Starset please.
Okay, which song do you want to hear?
I'm in the mood to listen to Carnivore.
Okay, should I play the song Carnivore on the TV?
Yeah that's fine. Can you tell me which album it's from and when it was released?
It's from the 2013 Transmissions album, enjoy the song!
I'm in the mood for music. I'm a fan of Shawn Mendes.
Is there a particular song you'd like to listen to?
Yeah, it's Treat You Better.
I'll play Treat You Better on the TV, is that okay?
Yes, please play it. What genre is it? And what year was it released?
The genre is pop. It was released in 2016. Enjoy the song.
I would like to listen to some music.
Is there a specific song you would like to listen?
I would like to listen to Girl Like You.
Can you please confirm that you want to listen to Girl Like you on TV?
That is what I want. Can you tell me from who is this song from?
Enjoy listening to the song. The song you requested is by Jason Aldean.
From which album is this song from?
The song is from the album called Rearview TOwn.
Cast Din Don Dan by Ryutaro Nakahara on the Kitchen speaker.
Confirming that I am playing Din Don Dan on the Kitchen speaker?
Yes, correct.
Enjoy your music!
I want music
what song then?
unstoppable is good
unstoppable on the tv
yes that works
enjoy the music
Any good tunes to play?
What do you have in mind?
How about Never Be Alone.
Never Be Alone on the TV?
Yes. What genre is this? When did it drop?
Its a 2015 pop song.
Will you play Babe on my display?
Please confirm Babe playing on TV.
Great.
Enjoy.
Genre?
Country.
Who sang it? Which album?
Sugarland from the album Bigger.
Can you cast the song Bohemian Rhapsody by Billy Watman on the television?
Please confirm that you want to play the song Bohemian Rhapsody on TV.
Yes, that's right.
Song is playing now. Enjoy your music!
I would like to hear Sarcasm by Get Scared on my Bedroom speaker please.
Please confirm you would like me to play the song Sarcasm on your Bedroom speaker.
Yes, and can you tell me the name of the album?
Yes, the name of the album is Best Kind Of Mess. Enjoy!
I want to listen to music
Sure, what song did you have in mind?
Ya Layali please
Please confirm: play ya layali on the tv
Correct, which album is this?
It's ana keteer
I would like to listen to music.
What song would you like to hear?
I would like to hear Side Effects.
Please confirm: play the song Side Effects on the TV.
That is correct.
Enjoy the music.
I'm in the mood for some jams. Pull up my music please.
Sure, what songs are you in the mood to listen to today?
I want Written In Sand.
Ok, please confirm you would like to play Written In Sand on the TV.
Yes, you got it.
Great, your track is now playing. Enjoy your music?
Silly question, but is this from 2014?
No, this is from 2017.
I'm in the mood to listen to music. I'd like to hear On The Loose.
Okay, just to check you want On The Loose to play on the TV.
Yes, you've got that right.
Here you go, enjoy!
Hi there, could you help me play If I Killed Someone For You by Alec Benjamin on my Bedroom speaker please?
Sure, please confirm your choice to play If I Killed Someone For You by Alec Benjamin on your Bedroom speaker.
That is fine with me.
Your music is currently being played.
Thank you! May I know when was this song released?
It was released recently, in 2018.
May I know what is the song's genre and which album did it appear in?
This is a Pop song from the album Narrated For You.
Will you play Love Like This on my television?
Please confirm Love Like This playing on TV.
Perfect. Which album?
It's from the album Magic. Enjoy.
I want to listen to Bruk Off Yuh Back from Konshens in my bedroom.
Playing Bruk Off Yuh Back from Konshens in bedroom speaker.
That is correct. What kind of song is this?
It's a Reggae song
Listen to music
what song then?
whore is the song
whore is on tv
yes that is right
enjoy it then
I have an urge to listen to some music?
Do you have anything in mind.
I could go for Ik Vaari Aa.
I'll play Ik Vaari Aa on the Tv, is that good with you?
That's totally good with me.
Enjoy the song.
I'm interested in hearing some songs
Sure, did you have anything in mind?
Yes, outrunning karma
Please confirm: please play outrunning karma on the tv
Correct, can you tell me if this is from six years back?
It's from 2018
Which album is it from?
Narrated for you
I want to listen to some music, can you play something?
What song do you want to reproduce?
Please play Ik Vaari Aa.
Please confirm: Playing Ik Vaari Aa on the TV.
That is correct. Do you know if the song came out three years back? And whose it from?
The song is playing. It came out on 2017 and it is by Arijit Singh.
I need to find some music to listen to.
What songs would you like to hear?
I want to hear Knock Knock please.
You want Knock Knock cast to the TV, correct?
Yes that is correct, is this a song from 2017?
No it is from 2014. Enjoy your tune.
I would like to listen to some music while I do some spring cleaning.
Is there a particular song you would like me to play for you?
Yes, my friend told me about this great song titled Sucker.
Please confirm that you want to listen to the song titled Sucker on the TV.
Yes, that sounds good to me.
Have fun listening to your music.
I fancy listening to some good music.
Any particular song?
Yes Drive please.
To confirm then I will play Drive on the TV.
Yes that's right.
Enjoy the song.
Do you know who sang it and when it was released?
Yes it was Joe Bonamassa and he released it in 2016.
I want to listen to some songs
which songs do you want?
So Mi like it
please confirm: Play the So Mi like it on TV
yes play. Whose is this song and when was it released?
It was Spice song released in 2014
I want to listen to a Kygo song.
Sure, which one did you have in mind?
Carry Me
Please confirm: play carry me on the tv
Correct, is this song from 2019 and what genre is it?
It's from 2016 and a downtempo song
I want to play some music.
Do you know what song you want to hear?
I am to play Alone With You.
Want want to cast the song Alone With You on TV, right?
That is right. What genre is it and what year was it released?
It under the Country genre and it was released in 2011. Enjoy!
I'm ready to hear tunes on my TV. How about Now that I Found you by Carly Rae Jepsen?
Sure to confirm, Now that I Found you on the TV?
That's it. What is the genre please?
It's pop, enjoy.
I need to listen to some music. I'm so bored.
What song do you feel like listening?
I want to listen to One Last Time.
So One Last Time on the TV?
Yes, that's correct.
Enjoy the music.
Will you play The Struggle?
Please confirm the song The Struggle playing on TV.
Great.
Enjoy.
I want to enjoy listening to some music.
Do you have a particular song in mind that you want to listen to?
I would like that Jennifer Lopez song Dance Again.
So do you confirm that you want Dance Again played on TV?
Yeah that is right.
I hope you like your music.
I want to relax and listen to some music.
What song would you like to hear?
Cast no stones.
You want to place cast no stones on the tv?
Yes, that's right.
I hope you enjoy the music.
What album is it from and who is the singer?
The song is from the album adobe sessions and is sung by cody jinks.
Can you cast music on the television for me/
What song would you like to hear?
I want to her What Now.
You wish to play the song What Now on your TV. Correct?
Yes that is correct. What album is it from? Do you know if it's from nine years ago?
It is from the album Unapologetic in 2012. Enjoy your song.
Can you play me some music?
Do you want to listen to anything in particular?
Play me The Resistance.
Understood, to want to play The Resistance on the TV.
That is correct.
The music will commence shortly, enjoy.
What kind of music is this song classified as, and from what album?
The song is a rock song from the Unleashed Beyond album.
I want to listen to He is
please confirm: Playing He is on the TV
yes thats fine. Which year did it release?
started the song. It was released in 2015
I want to listen to music by Sia on my television.
What songs do you like to listen?
I would like to listen to The Greatest.
Please confirm the details: Play The Greatest on TV
Yes. That's correct.
Enjoy your music.
I want to listen to some music now.
What is the song you are looking for?
I would enjoy listening to My Donna.
Can you confirm that you want to listen to My Donna, and you want the song to be played on TV?
Yes, that is what I want.
Enjoy your time listening to the song.
I appreciate it!
Is there something else I can do to help you with?
Hi, i need a help, I feel boring now, I want to listen some good music, I need to listen to somebody on bedroom device. I like song by The Chainsmokers.
Sure, i will help you, please confirm the following details: Play the song Somebody on Bedroom speaker.
Yes, You are right
Enjoy the music, Shall i help you with anything more?
I'm feeling a bit bored right now. Can you help find me something good to listen to ?
Sure thing. Do you have specific song in mind?
Yeah, play Burning Man for me.
No problem. Please confirm: Play Burning Man on your TV. Correct?
Yeah, that's perfect. Hey, can you tell me what year this came out? I can't remember.
No problem. This song was released in the year 2018. Enjoy your music!
Thanks! What album is it from?
This song is from the album The Mountain.
Will you play music?
What song?
Gasoline.
Please confirm Gasoline playing on TV.
Perfect. Genre? Year released?
Electropop. Released on 2015. Enjoy.
Can you cast the song How Deep Is your Love by Sean Paul on the speaker in the kitchen?
Confirm your request to play the song How Deep Is Your Love on the Kitchen speaker.
Yes, please go ahead.
Song playing now. Enjoy your music!
Put on some tunes.
Is there a particular song you'd like to listen to?
Play me Beautiful in White.
I'll play the song Beautiful in White on the the TV, is the okay?
That would be great.
Enjoy the song.
Who is this song by and what's the album it's from?
The song is by Shane Filan from the album Love Always.
Will you play Nota De Plata by The Motans on my bedroom speaker?
Please confirm Nota De Plata playing on Bedroom speaker.
That's right. Which album?
From the album Nirvana. Enjoy.
I want to hear John Wayne music.
Confirm John Wayne on TV.
Is that from two years ago?
It is from 2016 from Lady Gaga.
I wish to hear the music.
Any song selection you want to hear?
I like to hear time up.
Please give confirmation details: Run the song Time Up on TV.
yes, this is perfect. Can you tell me the song is from which album and who is the singer?
Have fun with your music. Singer of the song is Shenseea and it is from the album Big A presents One Chance Riddim.
I want to hear music on my kitchen device by Janob Rasul.
Which song do you want to hear?
I want Yomonsan.
You want to play Yomonsan on kitchen speaker, correct?
Yes that is right.
Enjoy your song.
Hello. Can you play me New Friends by Maty Noyes on my bedroom speaker?
That I can do. You want to hear New Friends on your bedroom speaker?
Yes, that is accurate.
Enjoy the song.
I'd like to hear some music. Can you play Try To Fight It?
Please confirm: you'd like to play Try to Fight It on the TV.
Yes, that's right. Hey what album is that from? And what year did it come out?
Enjoy the music. It's from the 2012 album Origins.
put music on speaker in the kitchen
what song then?
listen to bounce
bounce on kitchen speaker
what music is it?
2013 pop song
Please play the song Attention by Charlie Puth on the display
Please confirm: Playing the song Attention on the TV
yes, thats right
Playing it now, enjoy
I am looking for a Szcheuan restaurant with any price range.
Where?
SF.
San Francisco has a good one called Alice's.
I need to know if they have live music and a contact number.
You can reach them at 415-282-8999 but there is no live music.
I would like a reservation at that establishment.
What time?
5 pm would be perfect.
I will book a table this March 1st for 2 at 5 pm in San Francisco at Alice's with your permission.
Permission granted.
A table will be held for you.
I am starving! Can you find me a place to eat?
No problem. What city would you like to search in? Do you have any specific type of food you want?
Find me some good Diner food in SFO please.
I hear 1760 is one of the nicest restaurants in San Francisco. What do you think?
Yeah, that works for me.
Would you like to reserve a table?
Yeah, let's go ahead and make a reservation. I can't wait!
Okay, what time would you like to reserve a table?
Make a reservation for 5:15 pm for me.
No problem. Please confirm the following information for me: Booking a table for 2 at 1760 in San Francisco for 5:15 pm on March 1st. Correct?
Yup, that's exactly right. Thanks.
I'm terribly sorry but I couldn't make the reservation for you at that time. How about a table for 2 at 1760 for 5 pm on March 1st instead?
Okay, that still works.
Your reservation is complete. Enjoy your meal!.
Thanks. Just a few more questions for you. Do they have live music by chance? And in what price range would say they are in? I'd like to know what type of money I'll be spending.
I would say they are pretty expensive but the food is great. They do not have live music however.
I want to go out to eat. Can you help me find a place?
Where are you looking to eat?
I'm looking to go out to eat in SF.
Great. What kind of food are you in the mood for?
Well, I'd really like some Japanese food.
Okay! I've located 10 restaurants that might work for you. One of them, a nice one, is 2g Japanese Brasserie, in San Francisco.
Can you tell me their address? Also, do they feature live music?
No, unfortunately they don't have live music. They are located at 601 Van Ness Avenue.
Sounds very good!
Can I go ahead and reserve a table for you right now?
Yes, please. I'd like a reservation for twelve pm.
Okay, to make sure I've got this right, you want a table at 2g Japanese Brasserie, in San Francisco. You want that for 12 pm, on March 1st, and I imagine you want it for 2 people.
You've got that mostly right. I want it to be on the 8th.
Okay, a reservation for 2 people on March 8th.
Yes, that's just right. Does that restaurant serve liquor? Can you give me their phone number?
They do serve alcohol, and their phone number is 415-292-9997.
A nice idea came to my mind, I would really love to have a bite somewhere fancy
let me help you to make your wish come true, where do you wanna go?
oakland is fine
have you thought about the type of food you wanna taste? You can have mexican, italian or you name it
I'm in the mood for coffee & light bites
in oakland there are 4 restaurants, homestead is one of them
go to the next place
In oakland there's also Mcdonald's
do you have their phone number? do you know if they sell alcohol?
the number is 510-633-2152 and you can't buy liquor there
I'm still interested so I want you to book a table at half past 6 in the evening
confirm me the data and I'll book your table. you want a spot for 2 at mcdonald's in oakland. You'll be there on march 1st at 6:30 pm
yes, it's exactly what I've asked
I can't book your table, ask me anything else
I want you to do it again but this time see if they have a free table at 5:30 pm
I can try again, just confirm the updated info. You want to book a table for 2 at mcdonald's in oakland. You'll be there on march 1st at 5:30 pm
go ahead. do you happen to know if the prices are inexpensive?
you got your table at mcdonald's and I can confirm you that prices there are inexpensive
Find me a place to eat at?
Do you like American, Indian or some other type of food?
I want some Chinese food.
What city do you want?
Search in SF.
Search revealed 10 locations. Alice's serves Chinese in San Francisco.
That is great.
Do you need more help?
Reserve me a table there.
What time do you want?
I wish to eat at 11 am.
You want a table for 2 at Alice's in San Francisco at 11 am March 1st. Is that right?
That is right.
I can't book that time. Do you need more help?
Try to make it for 12:15 pm.
You want a table for 2 at Alice's in San Francisco at 12:15 pm March 1st. Is that right?
That is right. How can I contact them?
You can contact them at 415-282-8999 and they are inexpensive. I can't book that time. Do you want a table for 2 at Alice's in San Francisco at 12 pm March 1st?
Yes, try that.
Your table is booked.
I am looking for a place to eat.
What city should I search in and what kind of food are you looking for? You can say Mexican, Chinese or anything else.
I'd like some seafood in Santa Rosa.
I found 3 restaurants for you. The first is Jojo Restaurant & Sushi Bar in Santa Rosa.
Can you suggest some others?
Mariscos El Patron is nice and is located in Santa Rosa.
Yes, that works well. I'd like a reservation on March 10th.
What time do you want it?
Please make it at 19:30.
Please confirm the following: Reserving a table at Mariscos El Patron in Santa Rosa for 2 people on March 10th at 7:30 pm.
Yes, that is correct. How pricey are they and do they serve alcohol?
Your reservation is successful. The price range is moderate and they do not serve alcohol.
I am hungry and I am wanting to meet this friend for lunch. Can you find me a place to dine?
What cuisine would you like and what city are you looking into?
I love Spanish food and look for something in Napa.
There is 1 restaurant called La Taberna in Napa.
Yeah that will be good. Book a table at the restaurant.
Could you let me know at what time to make the reservation?
Book it for six in the evening.
Let me confirm that really want to book a table for 2 at La Taberna in Napa at 6 pm on March 1st.
Yeah I confirm and find out if they play live music.
I am so sorry the reservation didn't go through. Shall I be of any other help?
Can you retry reservation for 17:00?
So you want a table for 2 at La Taberna in Napa at 5 pm on March 1st?
Yeah that sounds good.
Your booking is made.
Does that place provide live music and give me their address?
The place which is located at 815 Main Street has no live music.
I need to find somewhere to eat.
What city are you in?
I'm in San Francisco.
Is there a particular genre you have in mind?
I could get into Moroccan food.
In San Francisco there is El Mansour.
Is it inexpensive? What about liquor?
No alcohol, but they are prices are moderate.
OK. That's what I need. Please make a reservation.
For what time?
How about 18:00?
To confirm: We have a reservation for 2 at El Mansour in san francisco at 6 pm on March 1st.
I'm good with that. Do you have their address and contact number?
My apologies, I can't get that reservation at this time. Do you need anything else?
Could you try booking that reservation at 12:30 in the afternoon.
To confirm: You want a table for 2 at 12:30 pm on March 1st at El Mansour in San Francisco.
That's great, thanks.
The reservation is confirmed.
I'm searching for a restaurant.
What type of cuisine are you searching for? You may suggest American, Mexican, or something else. What metropolis ought I book in?
I'd like it to be in Union City, and some Southern type of cuisine would be wonderful.
There is a lovely diner called Chaplin's Sports Bistro at Union City.
Where are they located?
Their location is 29200 Kohoutek Way.
Can you tell me your phone number?
Their contact number is 510-429-6860
Can you offer some alternative diner?
There is a lovely diner called Mcdonald's in Union City.
That's fine by me. I'd like to make a booking at a diner for two people on the 14th of this month.
When is the reservation for?
Book it at 6:15 in the evening.
Please verify the following information: a reservation for 2 at Mcdonald's in Union City on March 14th 6:15 pm.
Yeah, that's fine by me. Do they offer alcohol?
They do not offer liquor. I apologize, but I could not make the booking. Should I try to book for 2 people on MArch 14th, 6 pm, at Mcdonald's?
Yeah, that's fine by me.
Your booking is complete.
Is the cost range lavish?
Their cost range is inexpensive.
Can you help me to find a good restaurant?
Do you feel like having a specific cuisine like Indian or Chinese?
I want to have some Latin American food in SFO.
There are 8 restaurants based on your requirements in San Francisco and Alegrias is a nice one among them.
Can I get their phone number please?
Their contact number is 415-929-8888.
Do they serve alcohol and do they have live music?
Sorry, they neither serve alcohol nor do they have live music.
That should be okay. I'd like to reserve a table there.
At what time will you be reaching the restaurant?
I'll get there around 11:30.
Reserving a table for 2 at Alegrias restaurant in San Francisco for 11:30 am on March 1st. May I proceed?
That is perfectly correct. Please proceed.
Your table has been reserved successfully.
Can you find me somewhere for me to eat?
I sure can! What kind of food are you feeling?
Ohhh something Taiwanese I think
Okay, and what city shall I look at?
Can you look in San Jose please
Sure. What about the Chef Li in San Jose? That looks nice
Do they serve alcohol?
Unfortunately not.
That's okay, it still looks nice
Do you want me to book you a table?
Yes please, just for one
And what time?
Let's make it 6:45 in the evening
Okay. Just confirming that you want me to book a table for 1 at Chef Li in San Jose, for 6:45 pm on March 1st?
Yes, thanks
Sorry, I couldn't get a table at Chef Li at that time. I can try booking a table for 1 at 7 pm on March 1st?
Yeah that'll be fine
Great, table has been booked for you!
Thank you
Can I do anything else for you?
Can you cast some music on the kitchen speaker? I like songs by Radwimps.
Which song would you like to hear?
I would like to hear Nandemonaiya.
To confirm: You wish to play the song Nandemonaiya on the kitchen speaker. Is this correct?
Yes it is. Can you tel me what album and year it is from?
It's from the album Your Name and came out in 2016. Enjoy your music.
I want to play music on my kitchen device. I prefer songs by Nick Murphy. Play No Diggity.
Please confirm: play the song No Diggity on the Kitchen speaker.
That is correct. What genre is the music?
The genre is Electronica. Enjoy the music.
I want to cast the song Music Never Sleeps by Jason Chen on the television.
Okay, you want to play Music Never Sleeps on the TV, right?
Yes, that is correct. What album is the song from?
I have started playing the song. It is from the album gravity.
I'm in the mood for some music. Can you play Be My Baby? I always liked Ariana Grande.
Let's confirm: We're playing Be My Baby on the TV.
No, let's play Let Me Love You on the speaker in the kitchen.
Let's confirm: We're playing Let Me Love You on the kitchen speaker.
Yes, that's right. Can you tell me what album it's on and what year it came out?
Okay, the song is playing. It was released in 2016 on the Dangerous Woman album.
I would like to hear the song Stitches in my bedroom.
You would like me to play Stitches on your bedroom speaker. Is that correct?
Yes. What album is it on?
It's from Handwritten. It will start now.
What is the genre?
It's considered Pop.
Hi, could you play some Justin Bieber songs for me please?
Sure, which song would you like me to play for you?
I believe there is a song titled Love Yourself.
Yes there is, please confirm your request to play Love Yourself on the TV.
Sure, may I know what is the genre of this song?
This is a pop song. Your songs has been played.
Can you play a song for me?
Which song would you like to hear?
I'd like to hear Take It Back, on any available device.
To confirm: You wish to hear Take It Back, on TV?.
Yes thank you
Your music is playing
I want a song from Carly Pearce to start playing.
Is there some specific song you would like to listen?
The song I am looking for is Every Little Thing.
Can you please confirm that you want to listen to Every Little Thing, and the song to be played on TV?
That is what I want.
Your requested song has started playing.
Play me that song.
What is the name of the song?
The song is called Love Will Remember.
You want to cast the song Love Will Remember to the TV, right?
That is right.
Your song is now playing.
I want a song to start playing on my bedroom speaker. The song I am looking for is called Sangria, and it is a song from Blake Shelton.
Can you please confirm that you want Sangria to start playing on your bedroom speaker?
That is not right, because I want to listen to the song on my tv.
Can you please confirm that you want to listen to the song Sangria on TV?
That is what I want. Can you tell me the genre of the song, and the album it is from?
The song you asked for has started playing. The song is considered as a Country song, and it is from the album called Bringing Back The Sunshine.
play the song
what song then?
the story of us
confirm the story of us on tv
yes that is right
speak now album
genre now please
it is pop
I would like to hear the story of us by taylor swift.
You want to hear the story of us on the tv?
Yes, that's right.
The song has started.
Can you play me some music on my kitchen speaker?
What song would you like to hear?
The name of the song is Stage Show.
So you'd like to play Stage Show on your kitchen speaker?
Yeah, that's right.
Alright, the song will start now.
I want to play the song Shiroyama on my TV. I like songs by Sabaton.
Please confirm: You want to play Shiroyama on TV.
Yes, that is correct.
The song is now playing.
Thanks for that.
Can I help with anything else?
I would like to play a song.
Which song would you like to play?
The name of the song is Wagon Wheel.
Please confirm that you would like to play the song Wagon Wheel on your TV.
Yes, that's right!
The song has started playing.
Play me the song.
What song do you have in mind?
I want to hear If We Have Each Other by Alec Benjamin.
You want to cast the song If We Have Each Other onto the TV?
That is right.
Your song has started.
I want to listen a song on my television
What song would you like to listen?
I like Get Scared songs, so I want to listen Sarcasm
Play the song Sarcasm on TV. Is it correct?
Yes, It's correct, thanks
The song starts to play!
Perfect! Which album is the song located in? Is it a pop song?
No, It's a Rock song. It's located in album Best Kind Of Mess
I want to hear a song.
Which song would you like to hear?
The name of the song is Tous Eipes Pos.
You wish to hear Tous Eipes Pos on TV?
Yes that is correct.
Your song is now playing.
I want the song
what song then?
Hurricane is the name
confirm hurricane on tv
yes that is right
start playing it
can you play a song?
what song?
it's called despacito by karolina protsenko.
you want to play despacito on the tv?
yes. what genre is it? what album is it from?
it's a pop song from the album called my dream.
I would like to hear Fortunately I Met You by Witwisit Hiranyawongkul.
You want to hear Fortunately I Met You on TV, correct?
Yes that is correct.
The song has started.
What genre is it? Which album is it from?
It's a pop song from Quarter.
Thank you very much.
Can I do anything else for you?
I've got a song stuck in my head, can you play it for me?
That depends, which song do you want to hear?
Play me the song Move your body.
You would like me to play Move Your Body on device TV, is that correct?
Yep, that's right.
The song will begin playing momentarily.
Toss on some Ariana Grande.
What song do you want to hear?
Break Free would be great.
Break Free on the TV?
Yes, thats right.
The song is playing now.
Hi, could you play a song titled What Now for me please?
Sure, please confirm your request to play What Now on the TV.
That is fine with me.
Your music is currently being played.
I want a song to be played on my television. The name of song I am looking for is Instant Regret, because I enjoy listening to Instant Regrets songs.
Can you please confirm that you want Instant Regret to be played on TV?
That is what I want. Can you give me the genre of the song, and the album from where the song is from?
The song you requested has started playing, and it is a Rock song from the Instant Regrets album.
I wish to play the song now.
What song do you prefer?
I wish to listen to Royal Beggars and play it on my bedroom.
Kindly ensure that, playing Royal Beggars song in bedroom speaker
Yes. Correct. Do you who sing the song and what is it's genre?
Song is played. It is a Metal song. It is a song of Architects.
I wish to play the song. Broadcast it on my display. I love Kacey Musgraves song.
Which song do you need?
I need the song Slow Burn.
Kindly ensure that, Slow Burn is will play on TV.
Yes. it is perfect.
Song is started.
Thank you so much.
Do you need any other help?
Let's play music on the television.
What song would you like to play?
How about Redneck Crazy.
Alright, please confirm you would like to play Redneck Crazy on TV.
Yes, you got it. What album and singer would you prefer?
Tyler Farr Redneck Crazy started playing! Enjoy your selection.
I would like to listen to a song.
Is there a specific song you want to listen to?
I would like to listen to the song called Burning Man.
Can you please confirm that you want to listen to Burning Man on TV?
Yes, that is what I want.
Your requested music has started playing.
Play some music.
Which song?
Lost Girls by Lindsey Stirling.
Please confirm: play Lost Girls on tv
Yes. What genre and album is it from?
Playing now. It's house and off of Brave Enough.
I would like to play the song.
What song do you want?
The song is called Lush Life.
Please confirm Lush Life on TV.
What genre is it? That's correct.
I started playing the pop song.
Would you know its singer?
The song is Zara Larsson.
Can you find me some good songs by Anna Kendrick song?
Which song would you like me to play?
Play the song named as Cups.
Please confirm: You want me to play Cups on the TV speaker.
Yes, That works for me.
Your song is playing now. Enjoy the music.
I am hearing this particular song for days now, I want to play it.
Which song are you talking about?
I wanted to play it on my bedroom. The title of the song is Hyang Giri.
Can you confirm these details? I am going to play Hyang Giri on the bedroom speaker.
That's right. Can you tell me its genre as well as its singer?
I have started playing the song. Its genre is Pop and the singer is Dewa Budjana.
Will you play the song?
Which song?
Hard Times.
Please confirm Hard Times playing on TV.
Perfect.
Song is starting.
Genre? Which album?
Rock from the album After Laughter.
I want to listen to a song.
Is there some specific song you want to listen?
I would enjoy listening to Bohemian Rhapsody.
Can you please confirm that you want to listen to Bohemian Rhapsody on TV?
No that is not right, I want the song to be played on kitchen speaker.
Can you please confirm that you want to listen to Bohemian Rhapsody on kitchen speaker?
Yes, that is right. From which album is the song from?
Your requested song has started playing, and it is from the album called Cryptic.
I'm in the mood for some music. Can you play Titanium by Madilyn Bailey on any available device?
Let's confirm: Playing Titanium on Tv.
Yes, that's great.
The song is playing.
Play the song for me.
Any specific song you want me to play?
Play swish swish for me
Playing swish swish on tv
yes, that works for me
Playing the song now
What is the genre?
It is an electropop song
Which album is it from? who is the singer?
The song is from the album witness by Katy Perry
Can you play me a Alec Benjamin 's songs.
Can you tell me the name of the song you want me to play?
I would like to listen Gotta Be A Reason.
Please confirm: You want me to play Gotta Be A reason on TV speaker.
Yes, That works for me.
Your song is playing. Enjoy the music.
Can you find me the genre and the album of the song?
This is a pop song from Narrated For You.
do you feel like playing some music for me? I could listen to some frank ocean on my display
can you tell me the title of the song you like?
yes, it's nights
confirm my next process: I'll play nights on tv
yes, I confirm the process. do you know the kind of song this is?
it's known as a pop song and it's already playing just for you
I'm in the mood for some music. Can you play me a song?
What song would you like me to play?
The song is called Best Shot.
Okay, let's confirm: Playing the song Best Shot on the TV.
Yes, thanks.
Okay, the song is starting.
I want to hear a song.
What song do you want?
O Father O Satan O sun
Confirm on TV O Father O Satan O sun.
That works for me.
The song is starting.
I want to play the song named Hold You.
Okay. So, I should play Hold You on the TV?
Yes, that's right.
I've started the song for you.
I need you to play a song.
Which song do you want to hear?
The song I would like is Cool Girl.
You want to hear Cool Girl on TV, correct?
Yes that is correct thank you.
The song has started.
I want to cast the songs by Hayley Kiyoko in my kitchen.
Do you know what song you wish to cast?
I want to cast Let It Be.
You want to cast Let It Be on the kitchen speaker, correct?
That is right.
Your song has started.
Hi, could you help me play Hello My Love with the speaker in the bedroom please?
Sure, please confirm your action to play Hello My Love on your bedroom speaker.
Yes, that will do.
Your music has started playing. Enjoy!
What is the singer of this song?
This is sung by Westlife.
May I know the genre of this song and which album does it belong to?
This is a pop song from their album Spectrum.
Play High by Sivik on my kitchen device please.
Sure, please confirm playing High on kitchen speaker.
Yes, proceed.
Great, track has started. Please enjoy.
Play the song for me.
What song shall I play?
Play Jesus And Jack Daniels.
You want to cast the song Jesus And Jack Daniels onto the TV, correct?
That is right. Who sings it and what type of song is it?
Your song is starting. Is under the Country genre and Justin Moore sings it.
I'd like to cast the music.
What music would you like to cast?
The music's title is Fight Song.
Please verify the following information: cast Fight Song on TV.
Yeah, that's right. What is the album and genre?
The music was cast, and it is pop music from the album Fight Song.
I want to play the song team by Lorde on the kitchen speaker
Playing team on kitchen speaker.
No, the song is Tennis court.
Okay, playing tennis court on the kitchen speaker.
yes, could you tell me its genre and album
Playing the song now. It a electropop song by Pure Heroine.
Can you play me a song?
Sure, which one?
I'd like to hear Shiroyama.
Can you please confirm that you want me to play Shiroyama on TV.
Yes, that's right and please tell me its genre.
The song's genre is metal and I've started playing it on TV.
Who's performing this song?
The song is performed by Sabaton.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I could do for you?
I wish the play the song.
What song do you need to play?
Play the song Latency.
Kindly ensure that, play Latency on TV.
Yes. It is correct. Do you the name of the singer and what is the name of the album?
Song played. It is a song Martin Garrix form The Martin Garrix Experience album.
Hello. I want to listen to music.
Any specific song?
Yes. Cheap Smell.
Do you want to hear Cheap Smell on your TV?
No. Through my kitchen device.
Okay. You want to hear Cheap Smell through your kitchen speaker?
Yes, I do.
I started playing the song. Enjoy!
I'd like to hear a song.
What song should I play?
The song Heartbeat.
Confirming playback of Heartbeat on the TV device.
Yes, thanks. What album is that off of?
It's from the Euphoria album and the song has started.
Please help play a song. I am really in a bad mood.
What genre of songs do you prefer?
I feel like listening to The Water Fountain song.
Please have it check, play the song The Water Fountain on the TV.
Yes, everything is right. I forgot what album it does belong, I used to listen to it when it was first released.
It is from Narrated For You album. The song has started playing at the TV.
Play me the song Keep It Mello.
You want to cast the song Keep It Mello to the TV, right?
No cast the song The Message to the bedroom speaker.
You want to cast the song The Message to the bedroom speaker. Is that right?
That is right. Can you find who sings it?
The song is by Still Corners and your song is playing right now.
do you think you can play a song for me?
Yes, I can totally do that, what song would you like to listen to?
The title is broken and the singer is isak danielson
confirm me what I am about to do: I'll start playing the song broken on tv
yes, it's what I want you to do
The song is playing
Play the song for me.
What song do you want to play?
Play the song What Now.
You want the song What Now cast to the TV, right?
That is right.
Your song has started playing.
What is the name of the singer and the album that it is on?
It is by Rihanna on the Unapologetic album.
Play the song for me.
What is the name of the song?
I want to play O Father O Satan O Sun on my display.
You want to cast the song O Father O Satan O Sun onto the TV, right?
That is right. What type of song is it?
It is listed under the Metal category and your song has started.
I heard about this new song that's really good I would like to hear.
What song would you like me to play for you?
I believe the name of the song is On The Loose.
Okay, so you would like me to play the song On The Loose on the TV, correct?
Yes, please.
I've started playing that for you.
Thanks, can you tell me what genre of music it is and the name of the album it is on?
It is a pop song on the album Flicker.
I'd like to find a restaurant
Sure which city?
SF
What type of food interests you?
Izakaya
There are 10 restaurants you might like. How about 2g japanese brasserie in san francisco
Sure, sounds really good
Should I book at table?
Yes for 2 at a quarter to 6 in the evening on the 5th of this month please
Please confirm: a reservation for 2 at 2g Japanese Brasserie in San Francisco at 5:45 pm on march 5th
Correct.
Sorry, this appointment did not go through. How about a 6 pm reservation for 2 on march 5th at 2g japanese brasserie
Sure, please try that.
Ok, your reservation is now complete
Can you find a place to eat for me?
Yes. What type of food do you prefer? French. American or Indian perhaps?
Seafood is what I would like.
In which city?
In San Francisco.
I found 10 restaraunts. Akiko's Sushi Bar is a nice restaurant located in San Francisco
Do they by chance have live music? What is their location?
Akiko's Sushi Bar is located at 542 A Mason Street. They do not have live music.
Ok, that will work. Can you make a reservation?
Yes of course. What time do you prefer?
Please make it half past 11 in the morning.
To confirm: you wish to reserve a table at Akiko's Sushi Bar in San Francisco, for 2 people on March 1st at 11:30 am. Correct?
Yes that is correct. Do you have their telephone number? Are the expensive do you know?
Your reservation is completed. Their phone number is 415-989-8218. Yes, their price is said to be expensive
Thanks for your help
Is there anything else I can do?
I am looking fora Parisian restaurant in Ross.
There is 1 option. Marche Aux Fleurs is a restaurant in Ross.
Is there live music there? What's their address?
They're located at 23 Ross Common Box 793 and do not have live music.
Yes. That is correct.
Can I book a table for you?
Yes. Please book a table for two.
For what time?
Please book for 11:30 in the morning.
Please confirm you want me to book a table for 2 on March 1st at the Marche Aux Fleurs in Ross at 11:30 am.
Yes. Confirmed. Is liquor served there and are the priced above average?
They are an expensive restaurant and serve alcohol. Your table reservation was a success.
I will be meeting with some friends and we need to find a place to eat. Look for something that sells Indian food, the price range doesn't matter.
Where do you want to look for?
Look in Livermore.
There is Caraway Indian Cuisine in Livermore.
What other restaurants are there?
There is also Sansar Indian Cuisine in Livermore.
Sure, that one sounds good. Please book a table at seven in the evening next Friday.
Please confirm: Booking a table for 2 people at Sansar Indian Cuisine in Livermore on March 8th at 7 pm.
No, we will be four people. And make it for March 3rd.
Please confirm: Booking a table for 4 people at Sansar Indian Cuisine in Livermore on March 3rd at 7 pm.
That is correct.
The table has been booked.
How can I contact them?
Their phone number is 925-606-6191.
i am very much fond of eating outside food. find a good place to eat?
in which city should i search for? what kind of food are you looking for?
i want the food in san francisco and i like chinese kind of food.
how about alice's restaurant located in san francisco.
whether any other restaurant available? i am looking for something bargain priced.
i found 9 restaurants. how about Bamboo restaurant which is located in san francisco?
whether any other restaurant available in santa rosa?
how about mei-don chinese cuisine located in santa rosa?
ok thats suits me.
whether i need to find any other thing?
book a table in a restaurant?
what time is the reservation need to be made?
i need it at 7 in the evening.
please check and confirm the following details. book a table at mei-don chinese cuisine. the city is santa rosa. the reservation is at 7 pm and the reservation is for 2 people and the date is march 1st.
ok that works for me. whether they serve liquor?
reservation is successful. they do not serve alcohol.
vacaville sichuan food
wah shine in vacaville
yes that works
what time do you want it for?
half past 1 in the afternoon on the 11th
confirm wah shine vacaville 1:30 pm for 2 people march 11th
is there liquor?
it went through
I'm look for a food joint.
In what area?
In SF please.
Are you looking for Mexican, Chinese or something else?
Is there a fancy burger place?
1760 is a restaurant in San Francisco.
Okay. That one is good.
Should I book a table?
Yes. Book a table for one at evening 6:30.
Please confirm you want to book a table for 1 at 1760 in San Francisco on March 1st at 6:30 pm.
Yes. That's right.
Your booking was a success.
I would like a moderate priced Oriental place to eat.
Where are you looking?
I'm looking in Oakland.
The Battambang Restaurant is one of 5 found in Oakland.
That will work.
I can book a table if you like.
I would like that.
Do you have a time preference?
I prefer quarter to 1 in the afternoon.
I will reserve a table for 2 March 1st at 12:45 pm at the Battambang Restaurant in Oakland with your permission.
Permission granted. I also need to know if they serve booze and a contact number.
They do not have liquor on the menu. You can reach them at 510-839-8815 but your reservation was not available. I can try to reserve a table for 2 March 1st at 1 pm at the Battambang Restaurant if you like.
That would be nice.
Your table is reserved.
I am searching for eating place and want some fish kind of food
Do you have any choice of city for me to look in?
I need it in Castro Valley
There is a nice Restaurant called DIno's Restaurant in Castro Valley
Fine and i need to book at a restaurant
What booking time you need?
I need it at quarter past 5 in the evening on March 12th
Please give confirmation details: Booking a table for 2 people at Dino's Restaurant at 5:15 pm on March 12th in the city of Castro Valley
No, i require it on March 14th
Please give confirmation details: Booking a table at 5:15 pm on march 14th
That is fine
Sorry i failed to make a reservation. Dino's Restaurant is a nice restaurant and please try booking for 2 people on March 14th at 5:30 pm
That is fine
Your booking is done
I'd like moderate priced latin american restaurant
Sure, which location are you planning to eat in?
Sonoma
La casa is a great sonoma restaurant
Ok, that works. Please book a reservation.
Sure, what time would you like?
evening 7:30 on the 13th
Please confirm: a 7:30 pm reservation for 2 at la casa in sonoma on march 13th
Perfect, what's their number?
This reservation is complete and 707-996-3406
Is there live music and liquor?
No, there's no live music or liquor
Will you find a restaurant?
Which city? Kind of food?
Freshwater fish in SF.
I found 10. Akiko's Sushi Bar is in San Francisco.
Fantastic.
Reserve a table?
Yes.
What time?
11:15 for one.
Please confirm a table for 1 at Akiko's Sushi Bar in San Francisco on March 1st at 11:15 am.
Perfect.
I could not complete the appointment. Try a table for 1 at Akiko's Sushi Bar on March 1st at 11 am?
Fantastic.
I've made your appointment.
I'm going on a date and want to take her to dinner. Can you look up places to eat?
Sure, where at and what kind of food?
Somewhere with Sichuan food in South San Francisco would be perfect.
Ok, it looks like King Sun Buffet is a popular Sichuan restaurant in South San Francisco. How about that?
Yeah, that sounds good.
Would you like to make a reservation?
Yes, can you make it for 19:30 on March 11th?
Sure. To confirm, you want to make a reservation for 2 people at King Sun Buffet in South San Francisco at 7:30 pm on March 11th. Is that right?
Yes, that's perfect. What's their address?
I've made your reservation. They're at 245 South Airport Boulevard.
Cool. Do they have live music?
No, unfortunately not.
I'm hungry find places to eat please.
What city will I be searching? Do you know what kind of food you are in the mood for?
I'm wanting some French cuisine in San Fran please
I've located 10 restaurants for you. Starting with Amelie San Francisco is supposed to be pretty good and it's located in San francisco.
Yeah, that will work. Help make the booking please.
Sure, I can do that, but first tell me what time you would prefer.
How about a quarter to 5 in the evening.
Please confirm a booking for 2 at Amelie San Francisco at 4:45 pm on March 1st in San Francisco. Do I have the details correct?
Yes, please proceed.
I do apologize, I was unable to book this table for you. May I suggest booking for March 1st at 5 pm for 2 people at Amelie San Francisco?
Yes please book that.
Great news, I was able to book this slot for you!
Hi, could you help me search for places to eat please?
Any preference on the type of food, such as Mexican or American food?
Something at a Diner will do. Thanks!
Any preference on the dining location?
Sure, something in San Rafael is fine.
There are 4 available restaurants, one of which is Bj's Restaurant & Brewhouse lcoated in San Rafael.
Are there any alternatives in San Fran?
Yes there are 10 available restaurants in San Francisco, one of which is called 1760.
Do you know if they have live music played?
No, they do not.
What a pity, but I am fine with that.
Would you like me to make a reservation for you?
Yes, could you make one for 4 at 19:30 on March 12th for me?
Sure, please confirm your reservation for 4 people at 1760 in San Francisco at 7:30 pm on March 12th.
Sure, that is fine with me.
Your reservation has been made.
I am searching for a place to eat. I wish to have Pizza and Pasta type of food with afforadable price.
In which city shall I search in?
I want it in Dublin.
I searched and found 2 restaurants. Berevino Cucina & Wine Bar is a great restaurant at Dublin.
What is their contact number and address?
Their contact phone number is 925-361-0862 and their address is 4590 Dublin Boulevard.
Please find some other restaurant.
Tomatina is a great restaurant at Dublin.
Yes. it is good for me.
Shall I book a table there?
Yes. Please go ahead.
When will you need the reservation?
I need it for 2 persons. Book it at 6:30 pm.
Kindly ensure that, on March 1st, reservation has been done for 2 persons at Tomatina in Dublin at 6:30 pm.
Yes. it is good for me.
Your booking is done.
Thank you so much.
Do you need any other help?
I need to find somewhere to eat for this date. Can you look up some not very costly restaurants with Ramen for me?
Sure, in what city?
We'll just be in SF.
Ok, I found 10 restaurants with Ramen in San Francisco. How about 2g Japanese Brasserie?
Do they serve alcohol?
Yes, looks like they do.
Ok, that should work then. Can you make a reservation for me?
Sure, for what time?
I think 6 in the evening should work.
Ok. To confirm, you want to make a reservation for 2 people at 2g Japanese Brasserie in San Francisco on March 1st at 6 pm. Is that right?
Yes, that's good. Do they have live music by any chance?
I've made your reservation. They don't have live music.
Ok, that's fine. What's their phone number and address?
Their number is 415-292-9997 and they're at 601 Van Ness Avenue.
Is there a place to eat you can recommend?
Do you like Mexican, American, or another type of cuisine, and where are you looking for restaurants?
Find me a restaurant in Oakland that serves southern food.
In Oakland, you can visit the Chop Bar.
Anything else you can recommend?
How about Duchess Oakland, it is also in the city of Oakland?
Would you say the price range at this place is lavish?
No, their price is moderate.
Anything else you can find?
You may be interested in Flora, it is a nice restaurant in Oakland.
That works for me, make a reservation at this restaurant.
At what time will you be arriving?
I will arrive at evening 7:30.
You wish to book a table at Flora for 2 on March 1st at 7:30 pm, this is its location in Oakland correct?
That works for me, do they serve liquor and what is their price range?
The price range is expensive, they do not serve alcohol, and the reservation has been made.
My friend is coming over later and I need to find somewhere for us to eat. Can you look up restaurants for me?
Sure, where at and what kind of food?
Some kind of Pizza and Pasta place in Santa Rosa would be nice.
Ok, I found 10 restaurants in Santa Rosa that you might like. How about Basilico?
Are they average priced and what's their number?
Yes, their price range is moderate. Their number is 707-539-0260.
Great, that sounds perfect. Can you make a reservation for me?
Sure, for what time?
17:30 should work.
Ok. To confirm, you want to make a reservation for 2 people at Basilico in Santa Rosa on March 1st at 5:30 pm. Is that right?
No, actually, I'll probably invite a couple other people so make it for 4 people.
Ok. To confirm, you want the reservation to be for 4 people at 5:30 pm. Is that right?
Ah, no, actually, can you change it completely to 1:30 pm on the 7th of March?
Sure. To confirm, you want the reservation on March 7th at 1:30 pm. Is that right?
Yes, that's right. Do they have live music and what's their address?
I've made your reservation. They don't have live music, and their address is 4776 Sonoma Highway.
I need to find a restaurant.
What type of food?
I'm looking for barbecue.
In which city?
I'm looking in Petaluma.
There are 6 options. Bistro 100 is a restauarant in Petaluma.
Are they lavish?
They're actually in the moderate price range.
Find me a different bistro restaurant.
There is 1. The Wild Goat Bistro is also in Petaluma.
Okay. Please book a table there.
For what time?
For 11:30 in the morning please.
Please confirm you want me to book a table for 2 on March 1st at the Wild Goat Bistro in Petaluma at 11:30 am.
It's actually for three people at half past 5 in the evening.
Please confirm you want me to book a table for 3 at 5:30 pm.
No. It's actually only for one.
Please confirm you want me to book a table for 1 at the Wild Goat Bistro.
Yes. That's right.
The reservation was not successful. Is a table for 1 at 5 pm at the Wild Goat Bistro on March 1st okay with you?
Yes. That is perfect.
Your reservation was successfully booked.
I'm looking for a place to eat in San Francisco.
What type of food are you interested in? For example you can say Chinese, Italian or anything else too.
I'd like to go eat some Diner style food.
There are 10 matching restaurants, How about 1760 in San Francisco?
Do they have live music there?
No, they do not have live music.
Sounds good to me, I'd like to make a reservation.
What time would you like the reservation for?
I'd like to go there in the evening 4:45.
Okay, please confirm your reservation for 2 at 1760 in San Francisco on March 1st at 4:45 pm.
Yeah that all sounds good. What are the prices like there? Can you give me their phone number?
Unfortunately I was unable to make the reservation at 1760. The price range is expensive, their phone number is 415-359-1212. Would you like me to try and reserve a table for 2 on March 1st at 5 pm?
Yes please try again.
The reservation was successful.
I will be meeting with a friend later on. Is there any goo restaurant in SF we can go to?
What type of cuisine do you want to eat?
Look for something that sells Japanese.
There are 10 restaurants you might like. There is 2g Japanese Brasserie in San Francisco.
Sure, that one sounds good.
Do you want to book a table?
Yes, please book it.
At what time do you want to book it?
Make the reservation for morning 11:30
Please confirm: Booking a table for 2 people at 2g Japanese Brasserie in San Francisco on March 1st at 11:30 am.
That is correct.
The table has been booked.
I want to eat out.
In which city? Would you like indian, mexican or another type of food?
I want to eat tacos in sonoma.
La casa is a lovely restaurant in sonoma.
That would be great.
Would you like to reserve a table there?
Yes. Go ahead and make the reservation.
At what time?
For seven pm.
You would like a table for 2 at la casa in sonoma at 7 pm on March 1st?
That would be great. Is there any live music?
I have made the reservation. There would be no live music.
I want a place to eat.
In which city?
In Milpitas please.
What type of food?
Just some coffee & light bites will be great.
There is 1 option. Honey Thai Restaurant is in Milpitas.
Where are they located and are their prices extravagant?
They're in the moderate price range and are located at 57 North Milpitas Boulevard.
Okay, that's great.
Would you like to make a reservation?
Yes. Please book a table.
For what time?
11:30 would be perfect.
Please confirm you want me to book a table for 2 on March 1st at the Honey Thai Restaurant in Milpitas at 11:30 am.
Yes. Is liquor served there?
There is no liquor served there. Your table was successfully booked.
I'm super hungry. Can you help me find a nice place to eat?
No problem. Which city would you like to search in?
Find me a nice place in Santa Clara please.
Sure thing. Just let me know what type of food your in the mood for. Say something like Mexican, Indian or another type of food you want.
I could really go for a Burrito right now. How about some Mexican food?
I've found 5 restaurants for you. How about El Amigo Burrito? It's in Santa Clara and I hear they have amazing burritos.
Sounds interesting. What's the phone number? Can you tell me if they serve alcohol or not?
Yes, they serve liquor. Their number is 408-248-3113.
Okay, that sounds good to me.
Would you like to go ahead and make a reservation?
Yes I would. Make a reservation for 3 people at afternoon 1:45 this Sunday.
No problem. Please confirm the following: Booking a table for 3 at El Amigo Burrito in Santa Clara for 1:45 pm on March 3rd. Is this information correct?
Yes, that all sounds perfect.
I'm sorry but I was unable to book a table at El Amigo Burrito for that time. How about a reservation for 3 at 1:30 pm on March 3rd instead?
Okay, that works for me.
Okay, I have completed your reservation. Anything else?
I am searching for a restaurant; specifically something bargain priced. I'd also like some freshwater fish type of food.
What metropolis ought I look in?
I'd like to search in Cupertino.
I discovered 1 diner. There is a lovely diner called Rubio's Coastal Grill in Cupertino.
Do they offer alcohol?
They do offer liquor.
Where are they located, and do they offer live songs?
They are located at 20688 Stevens Creek Boulevard, and they do not offer life songs.
yeah, that's perfect for me.
Do you wish to book a seat there?
Yeah, I'd like to book for three people.
When is the booking for?
Book it at quarter to 7 in the evening.
Please verify the following information: a booking for 3 people at Rubio's Coastal Grill in Cupertino on March 1st, 6:45 pm
Nah. I'd like to book on the 13th of this month.
Please verify the following information: a booking for 3 people on March 13th.
Yeah, that's fine by me. Can you tell me their phone number?
Their contact number is 408-861-0105. I apologize, but I could not make the booking. should I attempt to book for 3 people at Rubio's Coastal Grill on March 13th at 7 pm?
Yeah, that's fine by me.
Your booking is complete.
I'm looking for an average priced place to eat fusion food.
In which area?
In SFO please.
El Valenciano is a restaurant in San Francisco.
What's their contact number?
Their contact number is 415-826-9561.
Is there live music there?
Yes. There is.
Okay. That one sounds good.
Should I book a table for you?
Yes. Please book a table.
For what time?
For 11 in the morning.
Please confirm you want me to reserve a table on March 1st at El Valenciano in San Francisco at 11 am for a party of 2.
No. Make it on March 14th.
Please confirm you want me to reserve a table on March 14th at El Valenciano.
Yes. That's perfect.
Your table reservation was a success.
Do they serve liquor and do you have their address?
Alcohol is served there. Their address is 1153 Valencia Street
I need to find a place to eat please.
In which city should I check.
I need something economical in Petaluma please.
What type of food do you want to find?
Dumplings would be fabulous.
How about City chopsticks in Petaluma?
Yes that would be great. Can you make me a reservation please?
WHat time would you like to reserve a table?
Try to reserve a 1 pm table please.
You want a table for 2 at City Chopsticks at 1 pm in Petaluma on March 1st, correct?
Yes that is correct. Do they have liquor?
They do not serve liquor. Your reservation is made.
I want to eat out side for once and I need your help to find some good places to eat? Can you help me?
Yes, what about your favorite food that you want me to search? Can you tell me the one like Chinese, Italian or any other type?
I like to eat some Japanese food and I want to search for same in some nice restaurants. Find me the best one.
Do you have any particular City in your mind to search for this food?
Yes, I want to have them in San Francisco.
What about your opinion on 2g Japanese Brasserie restaurant which is the best one I think in San Francisco.
That is the perfect place and I want the same. Thanks.
Shall I book a table there for you?
Yes, make a booking for me.
Let me know your convenient time to book the table.
I want to book it at evening 6:30 and is for 2 persons.
Please confirm to book a table for 2 at 2g Japanese Brasserie in San Francisco on March 1st for the time 6:30 pm.
That is confirmed to proceed and also check whether they will supply liquor in their restaurant.
Yes, they will supply liquor and your reservation for the table was confirmed successfully.
I am in the mood for Izakaya type of food. Pull up some options for me please.
Sure, which city would you like?
SFO please.
Alright, I've found 10 options for you. Starting with 2g Japanese Brasserie located in San Francisco.
Yeah, that works for me.
would you like to make a reservation?
I need the reservation please.
Great, for what time works best for you?
I would prefer 12:30 pm.
Please confirm a table booking for 2 at 2g Japanese Brasserie in San Francisco. This reservation will be for 12:30 pm on March 1st.
No, let's dothe 10th of this month please.
Alright, please confirm March 10th in San Francisco. Did I understand correctly.
Yeah, that will do.
Great, your booking was successfully created.
I want to find a place to eat that serves alcohol.
What kind of food would you like to eat? What city?
I want to find barbecue in San Francisco.
25 Lusk is a restaurant in San Francisco.
Is it pricey? What's the phone number?
The phone number is 415-495-5875. It is expensive.
Are there other restaurants?
Alba Ray's is in San Francisco.
That sounds good.
Do you want to book a table?
Yes, I want to make a reservation for next Friday at 11 am.
Please confirm: a table for 2 at Alba Ray's in San Francisco on March 8th at 11 am.
No, make it the 10th.
Please confirm: event on March 10th in San Francisco.
Yes, sounds good. Is is afforadable?
Your reservation has been made. The price range is moderate.
I am looking for a restaurant, somewhere that sells Lobster would be excellent.
Which city are you thinking of?
I want one in SFO.
There are 10 restaurants that meet your requirements, one is called Akiko's Sushi Bar which is lovely and is in San Francisco.
Yes that suits me, could you reserve a table there?
What time would you like?
Seven in the evening on 8th of March.
To confirm then that is a table for 2 at Akiko's Sushi bar in San Francisco, on March 8th at 7 pm.
Yes that information is right.
You booking is now confirmed.
I need a place to eat.
What type of food, Chinese, Italian, or something else?
I would like tacos at Sonoma.
I have 1 restaurant La Casa in Sonoma.
Yes, that is great.
Would you like a table there?
Yes, I'd like to reserve for 2 people at 12:30 March 5th.
Please confirm a table at La Casa Sonoma at 12:30 pm for 2 on March 5th.
Yes, that works. Is there live music and what is the address?
The reservation is a success at 121 East Spain Street. There is no live music.
I want to find a place where I can eat at.
Can you tell me the kind of food you would like to have? It can be American, Mexican or something else.
I would enjoy eating some California kind of food.
Can you tell me the city where I should look for the restaurant?
The restaurant I am looking for should be in Oakland.
I would recommed Dopo which is a nice restaurant in Oakland.
Can you tell me if they have live music there, and if they serve liquor?
Unfortunately they do not serve alcohol, and do not have live music there.
Alright, that suits me well.
Do you want to book a table at this restaurant?
Yes I want to have a table booked for me at this restaurant.
What time you want the reservation to be made for your table?
I want the reservation to be for 6 o"clock in the evening.
Can you please confirm that you want to have a table booked for 2 people at Dopo in Oakland, and you want the reservation to be for March 1st at 6 pm?
That is not right, because I want the reservation to be for 4 people at 5:30 in the evening.
Can you please confirm that you want to book a table for 4 people at 5:30 pm?
That is what I want.
I apologize, but I could not make your requested reservation. Dopo is actually a good restaurant so I can try to make the reservation for 4 people on March 1st at 5 pm.
I like that also.
Your requested reservation has been made.
I will be meeting with a friend later and want to find a place where we can go eat.
Where do you want to look for it?
Look for something in Oakland.
What type of cuisine are you looking for.
I am craving something that sells Noodles and search for something economical, I am trying to save money.
There is Fortune Restaurant in Oakland.
Sure, that one sounds good.
Do you want to book a table?
Yes, please book it.
At what time do you want to book it?
Around 1:15 pm if possible.
Please confirm: Booking a table for 2 people on March 1st at 1:15 pm at Fortune Restaurant in Oakland.
That is correct.
There was an issue booking the table. There is a reservation available at Fortune Restaurant for 2 people on March 1st at 1:30 pm.
That sounds good.
The table has been booked.
I am looking for a pricey place to eat
Which city are you looking for?
I want something in Cupertino
Any food specifications?
Yes, Italian food would be perfect
I found 2 restaurants matching your preferences in Cupertino. How about Enzo's Italian Restaurant?
Sounds good to me
Should I reserve a table for you here?
Yes, Book a table for 1 saturday this week
What time should I book it for?
19:15 works for me
Booking a table for 1 at Enzo's italian restaurant in cupertino on march 2nd at 7:15 pm
Cool, what is their address?
It is 21275 stevens creek boulevard #510. I wasn;t able to make the earlier reservation for 1 at enzo's italian restaurant. Should I make it for March 2nd at 7:30 pm instead?
Sure, I am fine with that
Congratulations, your table has been successfully booked
Do they serve alcohol? what is their contact number?
Their number is 408-255-2686 and they do serve alcohol
find me an average priced place to eat
which city to search in and what kind of food?
some Ramen food will be good, search in Walnut creek
i got 2, Ikoi is in Walnut creek
any thing esle?
Sasa is also in Walnut creek
do they have live music
no, they dont
ok, please make me a reservation there
at what time?
At evening 6 please
Please confirm: Booking a table for 2 at the Sasa in Walnut creek at 6 pm on March 1st
No, make it at 12:15 pm for one person
Please confirm: Booking a table for 1 at 12:15 pm
no, wait make it for two on the 10th
Please confirm: Booking a table for 2 on March 10th
yes, thats right. whats the address and their contact number?
The address is 1432 North Main street and contact number is 925-210-0188 Unfortunately the reservation didnt go through, shall i try Booking a table for 2 at the Sasa 12 pm on March 10th
yes thats ok
your booking is done
Can you find me a place to eat?
Where are you looking for places to eat, and what kind of food do you like?
Search for freshwater fish restaurant in Dublin.
There is 1 applicable restaurant in Dublin, how about Pacific Catch?
That works for me, thanks.
Shall I reserve you a table here?
Of course, reserve a table on next Monday at 11:30 in the morning.
You will reserve a table for 2 at Pacific Catch in Dublin, it will be made for 11:30 am on March 4th correct?
That is all correct, how pricey is this restaurant?
The reservation was made successfully, Pacific Catch has moderate prices.
How can I contact this establishment?
Contact them by calling 925-999-8053.
Hi, could you help me search for intermediate priced food in a restaurant which serves alcohol?
Sure, any preference on the location and type of food served, such as American or Chinese food?
Sure, I would prefer a restaurant which serves Freshwater Fish in Santa Clara.
There is 1 restaurant called The Fish Market located in Santa Clara.
Yes this is fine with me.
Would you like me to make a reservation for you?
Sure, that will be great.
What time will you be dining in?
I will be eating at 11:15 am.
Please confirm your reservation for 2 at The Fish Market in Santa Clara at 11:15 am on March 1st.
Could you make the reservation at 11:00 instead?
No problem, please confirm your reservation at 11 am on March 1st.
This is fine with me. Thanks!
No problem, your reservation has been made.
I'm looking for somewhere in San Francisco that serves Freshwater fish.
What about Akiko's Sushi Bar? It's in San Francisco.
Hmm, surprising, fresh water fish at a sushi place, I'm curious about that? Make a reservation for half past 5 in the evening. I want it on March 6th.
Confirming: 2 for Akiko's Sushi Bar at 5:30 pm on March 6th in San Francisco.
Yes, that's it.
You're all set.
I want to find a place to eat in Larkspur which is not very costly. I enjoy having Japanese kind of food.
I can recommend the Fukusuke Restaurant in Larkspur.
Can you check if they have live music?
Unfortunately they do not have live music.
That suits me well. I want to make a reservation at this restaurant for 3 people at evening 6:45.
Can you confirm that you want to book a table for 3 people at Fukusuke Restaurant in Larkspur on March 1st at 6:45 pm?
That suits me well.
I apologize I could not make your requested reservation. Do you want me to try again make a reservation for 3 people at Fukusuke Restaurant on March 1st at 7 pm?
That is nice for me.
Your requested reservation has been made.
I am looking for a place to eat that serves alcohol in San Mateo.
What kind of food are you looking for?
I'd like some expensive Southern food.
Poplar Creek Grill is nice and in San Mateo.
What is their phone number?
The number is 650-522-7526.
Yes, that works. I'd like to make a reservation for 4 people.
What time do you want the reservation?
Make it for quarter past 11 in the morning.
Please confirm the following details: Reserving a table for 4 people at Poplar Creek Grill in San Mateo on March 1st at 11:15 am.
Yes, that is correct.
I'm sorry, I was unable to make the reservation at Poplar Creek Grill. Shall I try for 4 people on March 1st at 11 am?
Yes, that works for me.
Your reservation is successful.
I'm look for a restaurant
In which city?
I'd like a restaurantin Berkeley
What would you like to eat?
I'd like some Latin American food
In Berkeley I found Fonda
Is there live music? Is it an expensive restaurant?
No, there isn't live music. It's a price range moderate restaurant
It's fine for me! I want to book a table for four people on the 10th at afternoon 12
A table for 4 people at Fonda, in Berkeley, on March 10th at 12 pm: do you confirm?
Yes, I confirm. Can I get the contact number? Does the restaurant serve alcohol?
The contact number is 510-559-9006. Yes, they serve alcohol. Your table is booked!
Can you help me find a place to eat?
What type of food are you looking for? You can say Chinese, Indian or anything else. What city should I search in?
Some pizza and pasta sounds good. Please look in Pleasant Hill
I found Dallimonti's Italian Restaurant in Pleasant Hill.
Yes, that sounds nice. Please make a reservation for two people at the evening 7:30 on March 7th.
Please confirm the following details: Reserving a table at Dallimonti's Italian Restaurant in Pleasant Hill for 2 people on March 7th at 7:30 pm.
No, I need it for 4 people on the 12th of March.
Please confirm: The reservation is for 4 people on March 12th.
Correct. Do they have live music and do they serve liquor?
Your reservation is successful. They serve alcohol and they do not have live music.
Hello, please can you find some good restaurant to have food.
Sure, what kind of restaurant do you prefer - Italian, American, Chinese, Thai or anything else?
I'm looking for a Latin American kind of restaurant.
In which city are you looking for?
Please can you look in San Fran.
Sure. How about dining in Arguello, which is a nice restaurant in San Francisco.
Do you have their phone number and address?
Yup, they are located at 50 Moraga Avenue and you can reach them at 415-561-3650.
Thanks for the information. Please can you book a table at this restaurant for 2 persons at 12:15?
Sure. Please can you confirm me that you wish to book a table at Arguello in San Francisco for 2 people on March 1st at 12:15 pm, right?
Yup, that would work for me. Is it a costlier or a cheaper restaurant?
Its neither of the two, but a moderate one. Unfortunately, I couldn't make the reservation. Please may I know if you wish to book a table at the restaurant Arguello for 2 people on March 1st at 12:30 pm?
Yup, sounds good to me.
Okay! your reservation is made successfully.
Hi, could you help me search for places which serves a nice korean barbeque?
Sure, any preference on the restaurant location?
Yes, I would prefer to dine in the San Francisco area.
How about Aato in San Francisco?
May I have their address please?
They are located in 1449 Lombard Street.
I see, what is the price range of their food and do they serve any liquor?
Their food is moderate priced and they serve alcohol.
That is fine with me!
Would you like me to make a reservation for you?
Sure, could you make a reservation for 4 on the 13th of March?
And what time will you be dining there?
Most likely at 19:00.
Sure, please confirm your booking at Aato in San Francisco for 4 at 7 pm on March 13th.
That is fine with me. Do you know if they play live music, and how can I contact them?
Your reservation has been made. They do not play live music, but you can contact them at 415-292-2368.
I need to find somewhere that serves freshwater fish.
In which city should I search.
Please check in SFO.
I found 10. Do you like Akiko's Sushi Bar in San Francisco.
Yes that is good. Please reserve a table at morning 10:45 on March 13th.
You want a table for 2 at 10:45 am on March 13th at Akiko's Sushi Bar in San Francisco, correct?
That is correct.
I was unable to book that time. Would you like to try March 13th at 11 am for 2 at Akiko's Sushi Bar?
Yes that would work thanks.
Your reservation has been made.
I am searching for a place to eat in SF. Some seafood type of food will be okay for me.
There is one good restaurant called Akiko's Sushi Bar in San francisco.
Fine, This is okay for me. I like to make a reservation.
At what time you want the reservation?
Do it at 13:30 for 3 people.
Please give confirmation details: Booking a table for 3 people at Akiko's Sushi Bar at 1:30 pm on March 1st in the city of San Francisco
Yes this is okay for me.
Your booking is confirmed.
I'm hungry. Can you find me some Asian Fusion?
In what city?
In Los Gatos.
I found 1 relevant restaurant in Los Gatos called Kamakura Japanese Restaurant.
Does live music play there?
No, it does not.
What's the phone number and address?
You can call them at 408-395-6650, and can physically reach them at 135 North Santa Cruz Avenue.
That works. I'd like to reserve a table at the restaurant.
At what time?
At evening 7:30.
You want to book a table for 2 at Kamakura Japanese Restaurant in Los Gatos at 7:30 pm on March 1st?
That is correct.
I successfully reserved your table.
I'd like to find the best restaurant for Cuban food.
What city would you like me to search?
I'd like a place that serves alcohol in San Mateo.
I've located 1 Cuban restaurant in San Mateo. It is called Cha Cha Cha Cuba.
That sounds great.
Would you like to make a reservation?
Please reserve a table for 1 for evening 7:30.
Please confirm that you'd like to book a table at Cha Cha Cha Cuba at 7:30 pm for 1 on March 1st. The restaurant is located in San Mateo.
Yes. That sounds great.
The reservation was successfully booked.
Where are they located?
The location is at 112 South B Street.
What is their phone number?
The number of the business is 650-347-2900.
I'm looking for a place to eat
In which city you want
I want in the Berkeley
What's your preferred food
Some vegetarian kind
Great Wall | Chinese restaurant is a good restaurant located in Berkeley
Look some other I am looking for something not very costly breast
I found 2 restaurants which suits you.Himalayan flavors is a good one in Berkeley
Yes that works for me
Would you like to book a table there
Yes please make a reservation
For what time you need it
At afternoon 12
Please confirm the following making a table booking at Himalayan flavors on march 1st at 12 pm for 2 people in Berkeley
No make it half past 6 in the evening I want it on 12th of this month
Please confirm the following the reservation is at 6:30 pm on March 12th
Yes works for me
Your reservation is confirmed
I am hungry. Where should I eat?
You want Chinese? Italian? Or what? Also, give me the city.
A light meal in Livermore.
In Livermore I suggest Simply Fondue.
Whats their address. Do they have a bar.
Yes, they have alcohol. Go to 2300 First Street #110.
Great. Can you get me a table?
Sure. For what time?
For 6:30 in the evening.
2 at Simply Fondue in Livermore on March 1st at 6:30 pm?
That is correct.
You have a table.
What will this run me? Do you have their number.
925-443-6638. They are moderate priced.
Will you find a restaurant?
Which city? Any preference?
Italian in Mill Valley.
I found 3 restaurants. La Ginestra is in Mill Valley.
Great. Will you make a reservation on March 4th at 6:30 pm?
Please confirm a table for 2 at La Ginestra in Mill Valley on March 4th at 6:30 pm.
That's fine.
I've made a reservation.
Thanks.
Anything else?
Hi, i need a help, one of my friend will come here to meet me, i need a restaurant to eat, could you find good place to eat?
Sure, i can help you, can you say which type of foods are you looking for, Do you like Italian or indian or anything else? which city should i search in for?
i am looking around in Milpitas, I like korean Hot pot
Okay, i have found 3 restaurants for you, One of the best restaurant is Cj House Korean Bbq and it is located in Milpitas.
Cool, give me their contact number.
The restaurant contact number is 408-263-6705
I am looking for some moderate priced restaurants, Could you find it for me?
Sure, I have found 1 restaurant in Milpitas, The restaurant name is Korea Garden.
Yes, it seems good for me, I need to reserve that restaurant.
Okay, please tell me the reservation time?
Reserve it at 6:30 in the evening
Please confirm the following details: The restaurant name is Korea Garden and it is located Milpitas, The reservation date is March 1st at 6:30 pm and the reservation is for 2 people.
No, Please change the time to 12 pm
Please confirm the following details: The restaurant name is Korea Garden and it is located Milpitas, The reservation date is March 1st at 12 pm pm and the reservation is for 2 people
Sorry, i need it on 3rd of this month
Please confirm the following details:The restaurant name is Korea Garden and it is located Milpitas, The reservation date is March 3rd at 6:30 pm and the reservation is for 2 people
Yes, you are right.
congratulations, your reservation has been made.
Okay, Thank you, Do they serve liquor? Give me their contact number?
Sorry, They do not serve alcohol, The restaurant contact number is 408-946-2222
I want to find a place to eat.
What city would you like me to search in?
Find me something in SFO.
What kind of food are you wanting to eat?
I was hoping for some Freshwater Fish.
I have 10 restaurants for you. Akiko's Sushi Bar is a nice place in San Francisco.
Yeah that sounds great. I want to make a reservation.
What time is that for?
Make it at half past 11 in the morning on 3rd of March.
Let's confirm the details. Akiko's Sushi Bar in San Francisco at 11:30 am for 2 people on March 3rd.
Do they serve alcohol and what is there number please?
That is all booked for you. They do serve alcohol and the number is 415-989-8218.
I want moderate place to eat and drink alcohol in Sunnyvale.
What kind of food, like American or Chinese?
Any kind of Italian.
I found 2. In Sunnyvale, I have Gumbas.
That works for me.
Do you want to book?
Yes book tables.
What time do you want?
Book for 12:00.
Confirm March 1st for 2 at Gumbas at 12 pm in Sunnyvale.
That works, do they have live music?
You are confirmed and no live music.
Thank for the help
Is there anything else?
I need to find a place to eat.
Is there some specific kind of food you want to have?
I would enjoy having some Seafood kind of food.
Can you tell me the city where I should look for the restaurant?
I want the restaurant to be in Marshall.
A good restaurant in Marshall is Nick's Cove.
Can you give me their phone number? Is the restaurant considered as expensive?
If you want to call them you can at 415-663-1033. The price range of this restaurant is considered moderate.
Alright, that suits me well.
Do you want to book a table at this restaurant?
Yes, I want to book a table at this restaurant.
Can you tell me the time for when you want the reservation to be made for?
I want the reservation to be for 1 person, and for it to be at half past 11 in the morning.
Can you please confirm that you want to book a table for 1 person at Nick's Cove in Marshall, on March 1st at 11:30 am.
That seems nice to me.
Your requested reservation has been made.
Help me find a place to eat.
Is there a particular cuisine you like such as American, Italian, or anything else?
I really enjoy Sushi.
Where do you want to search?
Please search in SF.
I found 10 matches. 2g Japanese Brasserie in San Francisco is nice.
Okay, I'll try that.
Do you want to book a table?
Yes, book a table for me.
What time do you want the table?
I want it at 7:45 pm.
I'll book you a table for 2 at 2g Japanese Brasserie in San Francisco for March 1st at 7:45 pm. Is that correct?
No, I actually want a table for 4.
I'll book you a table for 4 in San Francisco. Is that correct?
You got it. Do they have liquor there?
I'm sorry, but all the tables are booked. Do you need anything else from me?
Try to book a table at 7 o"clock in the evening this time.
I'll book you a table for 4 at 2g Japanese Brasserie in San Francisco for March 1st at 7 pm. Is that correct?
Yes, try that.
The table is booked.
Do they have liquor there? And where are they located?
They do have alcohol. They're located at 601 Van Ness Avenue.
I am searching for a place to eat.
What type of food you like? Like indian, American etc. Is there any preference f city i should search in?
Japanese type of food is okay for me and want it in San Fran.
There is one nice 2g Japanese Brasserie Restaurant located in San Francisco.
Is it costly over there?
Moderate price range.
Can i know their contact number?
415-292-9997 is the contact number.
This is perfect for me.
Are you like to book table here?
Yes, i like to book a table. Do it at twelve in the afternoon on march 11th.
Please give confirmation details: Booking a table for 2 people at 2g Japanese Brasserie at 12 pm on March 11th in the city of San Francisco
Sorry, i want to book for 1 people.
Please give confirmation details: The booking is for 1 people at 12 pm.
This is okay for me.
Your booking is successful.
I am tired of cooking and would like to eat out.
In which city? Would you like chinese, american or another kind of food?
I want to eat pizza and pasta in dublin.
There is berevino cucina & wine bar in dublin.
That sounds great. Go ahead and make a reservation for me.
For what time?
For 7:15 in the evening.
You would like a table for 2 at berevino cucina & wine bar in dublin on March 1st for 7:15 pm?
Just a table for 1 at 6 in the evening.
You would like a table for 1 at 6 pm?
Yes, that would be great.
I have made the reservation.
I am meeting friends and would like to find a nice place to eat.
Is there a certain type of food you would like to eat?
I'm thinking Szcheuan food would be perfect and would like to eat in San Francisco.
A nice restaurant in San Francisco is Alice's.
That sounds perfect. Please reserve a table for three people for 6 in the evening on the 4th.
Please confirm a table Alice's San Francisco for 3 people at 6 pm on March 4th.
That is correct. What is their price range and do they have live music?
Your table has been reserved. They are considered inexpensive and they do not have live music.
I have a couple friends visiting and need to find somewhere for us to eat. Can you look up restaurants for me?
Sure, where at and what kind of food?
Any place in San Francisco that has Cantonese food would be great.
Ok, it looks like Alice's is a popular restaurant in San Francisco that serves Cantonese food.
What's their phone number?
Their number is 415-282-8999.
Ok, and what's their address? Also, do they serve liquor?
Their address is 1599 Sanchez Street, and they don't serve alcohol unfortunately.
Ok, do you have any other suggestions for economical priced restaurants?
Sure, I found 10 possible alternatives. It looks like Beijing Restaurant is a highly rated restaurant in San Francisco. How about that?
Yes, that sounds fine. Can you make a reservation for me?
Sure, for what time?
Make it at 12 pm for 3 people.
Ok. To confirm, you want to make a reservation for 3 people at Beijing Restaurant in San Francisco on March 1st at 12 pm. Is that right?
Yes, that's right.
Ok, your reservation has been made.
I'm starving over here, can you find me somewhere to eat?
I can, but first I'll need to know your location. Also, I can better suit your needs if you tell me what kind of food you would prefer.
Find me a Mexican place in San Rafael.
Celia's Mexican Restaurant is located in San Rafael, would that work?
I've been there just last week, what else is there?
There is the Green Chile Kitchen, which is also located in San Rafael.
Nah, what else?
There is also the Los Palillos Restaurant in San Rafael.
What's the address?
It is listed as 3060 Kerner Boulevard.
Okay, I know where that is. Let me make a reservation.
What time would you like to make the reservation for?
Make it at 18:30.
You would like to make a reservation for 2 at Los Palillos Restaurant in San Rafael at 6:30 pm on March 1st. Is that all correct?
Yes that is all correct. Do they serve liquor, and what's their phone number?
Your reservation has successfully been made. Their phone number is listed as 415-456-4070, and they do not serve alcohol.
Alright awesome, thanks.
Will that be all?
My stomach is growling. Can you find me some Sichuan food to eat?
In what city?
In San Fran.
There's 10 Sichuan restaurants in San Francisco. I recommend Alice's.
That sounds good to me. Can you book a table for 1 there at 5 o"clock in the evening?
You want to book a table for 1 person at Alice's in San Francisco for the time 5 pm on March 1st?
Yes I do. What are the prices like there?
I booked the table. It's an inexpensive restaurant.
Does live music play there?
No, it does not.
I'm looking for a restaurant.
Are you looking for Indian, Chinese or something else?
I'm looking for Burmese food in SF.
B Star is a restaurant in San Francisco.
That one is good.
Should I reserve a table for you?
Yes. Please reserve a table for the 12th.
At what time?
For 12:30 please.
Please confirm you want to book a table for 2 on March 12th at B Star in San Francisco at 12:30 pm.
Yep. That's right.
Your table reservation was successfully booked.
I would like a place to eat
In which city? Do you prefer Chinese, Italian or anything else of food?
I'd like to eat some Cantonese kind of food in San Fran
There are 10 restaurant. What about Alice's in San Francisco?
Is it a restaurant not very costly? Where is located?
Is an inexpensive restaurant, and it's located in 1599 Sanchez Street
I prefere some Barbecue kind of food.
There are 10 restaurant in San Francisco. What about 1760?
Yes, 1760 it's good for me!
Do you want to book a table here?
Yes, please. I want to book here.
What time do you want the table?
At quarter past 6 in the evening, if it is possible
A table for 2 people at 1760 in San Francisco, on March 1st at 6:15 pm. Do you confirm?
Yes, I confirm. Can I get a contact number and the address, please?
Sure! Phone number is 415-359-1212. The address is 1760 Polk Street. Unfortunately it is not possible to book at that time. Shall I try to reserve a table for 2 people at 1760 on March 1st at 6 pm?
Yes, it's fine even at 6 pm.
Your reservation is confirmed
I am so hungry. I need you to look for a place I can dine in.
What city are you looking into?
I am in Berkeley.
What type of cuisine are you tasting? Maybe American, Chinese or something else?
I am on a Veggie diet. So find me that.
In Berkeley go for the Great Wall | Chinese Restaurant.
Will I get liquor there?
They don't offer any alcohol.
Give me their location.
You will find them at 6247 College Avenue.
Tell me some other restaurant that is moderate priced. I would love Pizza and Pasta type of lunch.
There are 8 such restaurants. How would you like Cugini Restaurant in Berkeley?
Find me some other restaurant.
You can go for Donato & Co. in Berkeley.
Yeah that will really do.
Shall I book you a table there?
Sure. Go ahead and reserve.
What time shall I set your reservation?
I will be there at one pm.
So you want a table for 2 at Donato & Co. in Berkeley on March 1st at 1 pm?
Sure. Give me their phone digits and also figure out if they do live music.
I have your reservation all set. You can call them at 510-838-1131 and they don't do live music at all.
Find me a place to eat?
What city? What kind of food?
I'm craving Korean Barbeque in SFO!
I've heard of a great place called Aato in San Francisco
What else can you suggest?
I hear Barnzu in San Francisco is good too
Do they serve liquor there?
Yes they do!
Yes, that's perfect!
Want me to book a table?
Yes, please do!
For what time
Evening, around 18:30
Confirming you want a table for 2 at 6:30 pm on March 1st at Barnzu in San Francisco
Yes, is it very expensive there?
They are a moderate price range, and your reservation is successful!
Cool, what's their number and address?
They're located at 711 Geary Street and you can call them at 415-525-4985
Hi, could you help me search for an affordable priced restaurant to visit?
Any preference on the type of food, such as Chinese or American food?
Some pizza will be great for me.
Any preference on the location of the restaurant too?
Yes, something in Santa Rosa will be great.
There are 10 restaurants in the Santa Rosa area, would you like t try out Basilico?
May I have their address please?
You can visit them at 4776 Sonoma Highway.
Do they play live music?
No, they do not.
What a pity, but I am fine with that. Could you make a reservation for me please?
When do you intend to dine in?
I intend to visit at half past 4 in the evening.
I see, please confirm your reservation for 2 at Basilico in Santa rosa at 4:30 pm on March 1st.
Sure, that is fine with me.
Sorry, I was not able to make your reservation. Could I further assist you?
Could you try the reservation at 1:30 pm instead?
Sure, please confirm your reservation for 2 at Basilico in Santa rosa at 1:30 pm on March 1st.
Yes, I am fine with that.
Your reservation has been made.
May I have their contact number too?
You can contact them at 707-539-0260.
I need to find a place where I can eat at.
Can you tell me the city where I should look for the restaurant?
I want the restaurant to be in Milpitas.
Is there some kind of food you are interested in?
The restaurant I am looking for should be average priced one, and I would enjoy having some Curry kind of food.
One good restaurant I can recommend is Anjappar Chettinad Restaurant in Milpitas.
Alright, that suits me well.
Do you want to book a table at this restaurant?
Yes I want to have a table booked for me at this restaurant for next Thursday.
Can you tell me the time for when you want the reservation be made for?
I want the reservation to be for six pm.
Can you please confirm that you want to book a table for 2 people at Anjappar Chettinad Restaurant in Milpitas on March 7th at 6 pm?
That suits me well. Can you tell if they have live music there? Can you also tell me their phone number?
Your requested reservation has been made. If you want to call them you can at 408-435-5500. Unfortunately they do not have live music there.
I will be meeting with a friend later on and we need to find a place to eat.
Where do yo want to look for?
Look for something in San Francisco.
What type of Cuisine are you looking for?
Look for something American if possible.
There are 10 possible restaurants for you. There is 1760 in San Francisco.
What is the address?
The address is 1760 Polk Street.
How can I contact them? Is it an extravagant restaurant?
It is an expensive restaurant and their phone number is 415-359-1212.
Sure, that one is alright. Please make a reservation at quarter past 5 in the evening
Please confirm: Booking a table for 2 at 1760 in San Francisco on March 1st at 5:15 pm.
That is correct. Do you know if they serve liquor or have live music?
They do not serve alcohol not have live music. There was an issue booking the table but there is reservation available for 2 at 1760 on March 1st at 5 pm.
Sure, that also sounds good.
The reservation has been done.
My college friends will be in town and we plan on eating out. Please suggest some places.
What type of cuisine should I search for and in which city?
Please find a Gastrobar type restaurant in San Francisco.
Your San Francisco search yielded 10 results, among them the nice B-side restaurant.
Do you have their phone number?
You can reach them by phone at 415-287-6599.
Okay, that's fine with me.
Should I go ahead and reserve a table here?
Yes, please. A table for four, on 6th of March.
For what time should I make the reservation?
Please book it for 6 pm.
Okay. Please confirm that you're reserving a table for 4 at C B-side restaurant in San Francisco, at 6 pm on March 6th.
That is correct.
I have successfully made your reservation.
I need to find a moderate priced placed to eat in SFO?
What type of food do you want?
Fish would be perfect.
I found 10 restaurants in San Francisco. Alamo Square Seafood Grill is a good restaurant.
Do you have another restaurant suggestion?
Alioto's is also a nice restaurant in San Francisco.
Do you have another restaurant suggestion?
Begoni Bistro is also a nice restaurant in San Francisco.
Yes, I like that restaurant.
Can I assist you with something else?
I need a reservation for that restaurant.
What time would you like for the reservation?
I prefer eating at evening 7
Please confirm the following: A reservation for 2 at Begoni Bistro in San Francisco on March 1st at 7 pm.
That is correct. Does the restaurant have live music?
Your reservation has been made. It does not have live music.
What is the phone number?
The phone number is 415-757-0120.
Find me some place to eat.
Are you looking for Italian, Mexican or some other type of cuisine?
Find me some Cambodian food.
What city should I search in?
Search in Danville.
I found 2 restaurants. How about Lotus Thai Restaurant in Danville?
That works for me. Please make me a reservation.
For what time?
Make it for 11:45 in the morning.
Confirming that you want to book a table for 2 at Lotus Thai Restaurant in Danville for March 1st at 11:45 am?
No make it for seven pm on the 5th of this month.
Confirming that you want a reservation for March 5th at 7 pm.
I need it for 1 person.
Confirming your reservation for 1 at 7 pm?
Yes, that works. Do they feature live music?
No they do not feature live music. Your reservation is successful.
Can you find me a place to eat that's nearby?
I can. What kind of food are you looking for?
Someplace casual like a diner would be nice.
Where would you like me to search?
Find me a place in San Jose, I don't want to have to travel very far.
There are 10 restaurants which you might like in San Jose. Would 71 Saint Peter interest you?
Depends. Do they have live music? How pricey are they?
Their price range is listed as moderate, and they do not have live music.
Eh, sounds good enough. Can you make me a reservation for 2 people?
For what time?
Make it for 6 o"clock in the evening.
You would like me to make a reservation for 2 at 71 Saint Peter in San Jose on March 1st at 6 pm. Is that correct?
No. Make it on the 7th.
You would like me to make a reservation for 2 at 71 Saint Peter in San Jose on March 7th at 6 pm. Is that correct?
Yes, that is all correct. Can you also tell me whether or not they serve liquor and what their address is?
Your reservation has been made. They do serve liquor, and the street address is 71 North San Pedro Street.
Hi, could you help me look for places to eat please?
Any preference on the type of food, such as Chinese, Indian food
I would like one which serves intermediate priced Bistro food please.
Any preference on the location of the restaurant?
I would prefer one in Menlo Park.
Sure, there are 2 restaurants available, one of which is Bistro Vida located in Menlo Park.
I see, this is fine for me.
Would you like to make a reservation?
Sure, could you help me do so?
When will you be dining there?
I will be visiting at 11:30 in the morning.
Please confirm your reservation for 2 at Bistro Vida in Menlo Park at 11:30 am on March 1st.
Sure, this is fine with me.
Your reservation has been made.
Do you now if they play live music?
No, they do not.
How about liquor?
They do not serve alcohol too.
I'm starved! I want to find an eatery.
Okay. What city? Do you want Italian or Indian food, or does a different type suit your fancy?
I want to see what Taiwanese eateries SFO has to offer.
Okay. I found 10 Taiwanese places at San Francisco, including Alice's.
Alice's sounds good.
Want a table there?
Yes I do.
At what time?
At seven in the evening.
You want to book a table for 2 at Alice's in San Francisco at 7 pm on March 1st?
I'm the only one eating there. Also, I'd rather eat at evening 5:30.
You instead want a table for 1 at 5:30 pm?
Yes. Does live music play there?
I booked your table. Live music does not play there.
I'm searching for a restaurant.
What metropolis ought I look in, and what type of cuisine are you loking for? You may suggest Indian, Mexican, or something else.
I'd like it in San Francisco, and I'd like some Szcheuan type of cuisine.
I discovered 10 diners. Alice's is a lovely diner located in San Francisco.
Yeah, that's fine by me.
Do you want to book a seat there?
Yeah, I'd like to make the booking.
When is the booking for?
Book it at seven in the evening.
Please verify the following information: Reserve a seat for 2 at Alice's in San Francisco on March 1st, 7 pm.
Yeah, that's fine by me.
Your booking is complete.
I'll be in Redwood City and need to find a place to eat.
What type of cuisine did you have in mind?
A place offering Sushi works for me.
May I suggest Sakura 2 Teppanyaki And Sushi, a nice Redwood City restaurant?
There's been a last-minute change of plans. My vegetarian friend will be available on that day. Could you please find me a bargain Middle eastern restaurant instead?
I recommend Rocknwraps And Kabobs, another nice Redwood City restaurant.
Please get me their phone number and find out whether they have alcohol.
They don't offer liquor, and can be reached by phone at 650-299-9551.
Sounds good to me!
Will you be needing my help with anything else?
Please go ahead and make a reservation for 7th of March at 6:30 pm.
Okay. Please confirm that you'd like to reserve a table for 2 at Rocknwraps And Kabobs in REdwood City, for 6:30 pm on March 7th.
That is correct.
I have successfully made your reservation.
I'm hanging out with my friend later and need to find somewhere for us to eat. Can you look up restaurants for me?
Sure, what kind of food?
I think anywhere with seafood would be perfect.
Ok, and what city will you be in?
Anywhere in San Francisco would be fine.
Ok, it looks like Akiko's Sushi Bar is a nice seafood restaurant in San Francisco. How about that?
Yeah, that sounds good. Can you make a reservation for me?
Sure. For what time?
I think a quarter past 6 in the evening should work.
Ok. To confirm, you want to make a reservation for 2 people at Akiko's SUshi Bar in San Francisco on March 1st at 6:15 pm. Is that right?
No, actually, our other friend will probably want to meet up too, so change that to 3 people at twelve pm.
Ok. To confirm, you want the reservation for 3 people at 12 pm. Is that right?
No, actually, change the whole thing to 4 people on March 8th.
Ok. To confirm, you want the reservation for 4 people on March 8th. Is that right?
Yes, that's right.
Ok, I've made your reservation.
I want to try some different food, something like izakaya in san francisco
you're in luck, I have 10 results ready for you. Tell me if 2g japanese brasserie in san francisco is one you may like
I need to know about prices, are they intermediate priced?
they're moderate
I can still be a good choice for me
I can let you have a table there in a moment
yes, do your magic please
tell me the time you want to start eating your meal
I would like to go on march 7th at 18:00 and we will be in 2
confirm me the following plan. I'm about to reserve a table for 2 at 2g japanese brasserie in san francisco. You'll be there on march 7th at 6 pm
yes, you can go ahead and make it happen
I did my magical trick and now you will enjoy a nice meal!
talking about this place, can you tell me if they play live music and if I can buy alcohol there?
The alcohol is there but the live music is missing
Can you please find me a place to eat?
Please tell me what kind of cuisine would you prefer - may be Mexican, Chinese, or maybe something else.
I'd go for some Fish.
In which city should I search?
Please find me one in San Francisco.
In San Francisco I recommend Akiko's Sushi Bar.
Please tell me their phone number.
You can reach them at 415-989-8218.
Perfect. Now let's book a table there!
At time do you want your reservation?
Please make it on the 11th at 6:30 in the evening.
Can you please confirm that you want me to book a table for 2 on March 11th at 6:30 pm at Akiko's Sushi Bar in San Francisco?
Yes, that's right.
I've successfully booked your table.
Do you know if they have live music.
Unfortunately they do not play live music.
Please tell me their address as well as if they serve alcohol.
They do serve liquor and they're located at 542 A Mason Street.
Get me a place for Pizza and Pasta, I need something average priced.
Where will you eat?
I want sunnyvale please.
Try out Gumba's in Sunnyvale.
Do they have live music? What is their number?
Sorry no music, you may phone them at 408-737-8384.
That's great thanks.
How about a table there?
Please, reserve a table for two at quarter past 6 in the evening on March 14th.
To be clear: table for 2 at Gumba's on March 14th at 6:15 pm in Sunnyvale?
No, change the time and day. I want 12:30 pm on the 10th.
Fine, I'm changing to 12:30 pm on March 10th?
Add a different change now. I'm bringing my daughter, make it for three.
Sure, 3 people for 12:30 pm right?
Yes, I think you got all my last minute changes. Where am I going?
The address is 176 South Murphy Avenue.
I need a place to eat out.
Okay. What city did you want to eat in? And what kind of food are you looking for? I can look for Italian, Mexican, anything you want.
I'm looking to eat at St. Helena, and I'm in the mood for Southern food.
Okay, here's a nice place, Archetype, in St. Helena.
That sounds great. Go ahead and make a reservation at 11:00.
Okay, do I have this right? You want a table at Archetype in St. Helena at 11 am, and I'm guessing it's for 2 people, on March 1st.
You've got everything right.
I've got that all reserved for you.
Where can I grab a bite?
What type of food do you want and where do you want it?
Some Curry in Novato would hit the spot.
OK. There are 2 good Indian restaurants in Novato. Try Batika India Bistro.
Nice. Sounds good.
I can get you a table.
Yes do that for the evening 6:45 on the 11th of this month. Three people.
party of 3 at Batika India Bistro in Novato at 6:45 pm on March 11th?
That is correct.
Batika India Bistro is busy then. Should I try for 6:30 pm on March 11th for 3?
Yeah, give it a shot.
Done. You have a table.
Can you find me a good restaurant for Vegetarian food?
In which city are you planning to dine?
I'm looking for something in Benicia.
There is 1 restaurant in Benicia, called Mai Thai Cuisine which is a nice one.
That sounds like a good one. I'd like to reserve a table there.
At what time are you planning to arrive at the restaurant?
I'm hoping to get there by 6:30 in the evening.
Reserving a table for 2 at Mai Thai Cuisine restaurant in Benicia for 6:30 pm on March 1st. Shall I proceed?
Yes, please go ahead. Can I get their location please?
Your table has been booked successfully. Their address is 807 1st Street.
I'm searching for a restaurant, specifically, I'd like a place offering life songs.
What type of cuisine are you searching for, and what metropolis ought I look in?
I'd like it to be in Cupertino, and some fast food type of cusiine would be lovely.
There is a lovely diner called McDonald's in Cupertino.
Can you offer some other diner?
I was unable to get any diner suitable for your tastes. Could I assist you with something else?
Could you attempt to look again? Id like some Taiwanese type of cuisine would be lovely.
I discovered 1 diner. There is a lovely diner called A Plus Cafe in Cupertino.
Yeah, that's fine by me.
Could I assist you with something else?
I'd like to make a booking at a diner.
When is the booking for?
Book it at 12:15 in the afternoon.
Please verify the following information: a booking for 2 people at A Plus Cafe in Cupertino on March 1st, 12:15 pm.
Nah. Book it at evening 7:15 for one person.
Please verify the following information: a booking for 1 person at 7:15 pm.
Nah. It's for 2 people, and I'd like to book on the 10th.
Please verify the following information: a booking for 2 people on MArch 10th.
Yeah, that's fine by me.
I apologize, but I could not make the booking. Shuld I attempt to book for 2 at A Plus Cafe on March 10th, 7:30 pm?
Yeah, that's fine by me.
Your booking is complete.
Do they offer alcohol? Can you tell me their phone number?
They do offer liquor. Their contact number is 408-606-8976.
I need a San Mateo restaurant please.
What kind of food, Chinese, Indian, or something else?
I want Oriental cuisine.
I have 6 possible places. How about the San Mateo restaurant called Izakaya Ginji?
Do they play live music? And what's the address?
No, they don't have live music and they are located at 301 East 4th Avenue.
That should work.
Would you like to book a table?
I would, for two people at 5:30 in the evening on the 3rd of this month.
Confirming a party of 2 at Izakaya Ginji in San Mateo at 5:30 pm, March 3rd.
Right. Do they have extravagant prices?
No, they are in the moderate price range. The reservation is complete.
I have a plan to eat outside once for which I need your help to find some nice places. I also like to have Parisian foods. Can you find me the perfect one?
In which City you want to search for the places to eat and do you have any particular City in your mind?
Yes, search it in SFO.
What about a Restaurant name Amelie San Francisco which is the best place suitable to your requirements and the same is located in San Francisco.
I select this one and I want to reserve a table in that restaurant.
Let me know your convenient time to search for.
I want to book it at 12 pm.
Please confirm to book a table for 2 at Amelie San Francisco restaurant in San Francisco at 12 pm on March 1st.
Yes, that is confirmed to proceed.
Your table was successfully booked at this restaurant.
Can you check whether the price range is bargain type there? and also let me know their contact number for my reference.
They have moderate price range and their contact number is 415-292-6916 by which you can contact them any time.
Will you find a cheap Mediterranean restaurant?
Which city?
Redwood City.
I found 1 restaurant. Rocknwraps And Kabobs is in Redwood City.
Perfect. Will you make a reservation at 5 pm?
Please confirm a table for 2 at Rocknwraps And Kabobs in Redwood City on March 1st at 5 pm.
That's fine.
I've made your reservation.
Hi, are there any nice Asian food in the Newark area?
Yes, there is 1 called Mumbai Chowk located in Newark.
That is fine with me, could you help me make a reservation there?
When do you intend to dine in?
Probably at afternoon 1.
Please confirm your reservation for 2 at Mumbai Chowk in Newark at 1 pm on March 1st.
Sure, I am fine with that.
Your reservation has been made.
I would like a place to eat in san Jose.
What type of food do you need?
I'd like some spicy indian which will be perfect. I'd like a place serving alcohol that is pricey.
I found 1 restaurant called Amber India in San Jose.
Yes, that will be good for me.
Do you want to reserve a table there?
Maybe at a later date.
Would I be able to help you with anything else?
Would you like to try booking a table at the restaurant I like at half past 6 in the evening?
Please confirm a table for 2 March 13th at Amber India in San Jose at 6:30 pm.
Yes, that is great.
Sorry I couldn't make the reservation. Amber India is a nice place to eat. Do you want me to try to reserve for 2 on March 13th at 7 pm?
Yes, that would be great.
The reservation is a success.
I am starving to death.
What type of food do you want and where do you want it.
Japanese in SFO.
Try 2g Japanese Brasserie in San Francisco.
What else do you recommend.
In San Francisco, Ace Wasabi Rock-n-roll Sushi.
Get me their phone number. Where are they at?
415-567-4903. You can find them at 3339 Steiner Street.
This sounds good.
Should I get you a table.
No, hold off.
What should I get you?
A table for 3 at Ace Wasabi Rock-n-roll Sushi in San Francisco? 11:15 am on March 7th?
Yes. Are they reasonably priced. Can I get loaded there?
Ace Wasabi Rock-n-roll Sushi does not have alcohol. But they are in the moderate price range. I couldn't get that slot, however. SHhuld I try for 3 people at 11:30 am on March 7th?
Yes, please do.
Done. You have a table.
I need to find a place to eat
What city and what type of food are you looking for would you like Italian or Mexican or something else
I would like the Latin American food in Daly City
Celia's is a great restaurant in Daly City
Will they have live music
They don't have live music
Tell me the contact number please
Your contact number is 650-755-6213
Yes
Do you want me to reserve a table for you
Can you please confirm that you've booked a table for Celia's at 7 pm on March 3rd in Daly City for 2 people
that works me. what would be their address?
The reservation is the 6s the address is 379 Gellert Boulevard
I am looking for a nice restaurant in SF.
Would you like American, Italian or something else?
Cambodian food would be great.
There are 10 options for you. Anh Hong is good and is in San Francisco.
Do they serve Alcohol.
Yes they do.
That suits me.
Would you like a table booked?
What time would you like?
at 11:30 please.
To confirm then that is a table for 2 at 11:30 am on March 9th, at Anh Hong restaurant in San Francisco.
Yes that suits me fine. Do they have live music and where are they located?
You booking is confirmed. They do not have any live music. Their address is 808 Geary Street.
I am searching for a place to eat.
What type of food do you need? It may be Mexican, American or anything else. In which city shall I search in?
I wish to have Ramen type of food in Union City.
Maneki Sushi Union City is a great restaurant in Union City.
Yes. it is good for me.
Do you need any other help?
Can you please help me in booking the table at the restaurant at 12 pm?
Kindly ensure that, on March 2nd, reservation has been done for 2 persons in Maneki Sushi Union City at Union City at 12 pm.
It is good for me. Will they provide liquor?
Your reservation is done. Sorry, they will not serve alcohol.
Whether they have live music?
Sorry. They do not have live music.
Find me a place to eat at.
Do you prefer Mexican, Indian, or something else and what city do you want to eat in?
I want some Himalayan food that is economical priced in Half Moon Bay.
Monsoon Himalayan Cuisine offers that in Half Moon Bay.
I need a table for 1 at evening 6:30 at the previous restaurant.
You want a table for 1 person at Monsoon Himalayan Cuisine at Half Moon Bay on March 2nd for 6:30 pm, correct?
That is right. What is the venue's location?
Your booking is done and you can visit them at 20 Stone Pine Road.
How do I contact them?
You can contact them at 650-713-0826.
I want a place to eat that serves alcohol
Any specific type of food you are interested in- Mexican, Indian or something else?
I am looking for Asian Fusion
Which city are you looking in?
I want one in SF
I have found 9 restaurants for you in San Francisco. How about the butterfly restaurant?
Is it reasonably priced? what is the address?
The price range is moderate and are located in 33 the embarcadero
Could you also book a table for me at the previous restaurant?
Sure, what time should I book it for?
Book one at 5:30 pm
Booking a table for 2 at Butterfly restaurant San Francisco at 5:30 pm on March 6th
Cook, sounds perfect
Your booking is confirmed.
DO they have live music?
No, unfortunately not.
I am looking to a place to eat dumplings.
What city do want to search?
The city is Santa Rosa.
In Santa Rosa, I have Gary Chu's.
What is the address and budget?
They are moderate and on 611 5th Street.
Is there anything else?
In Santa Rosa, I have Kirin.
Go ahead and book restaurant too.
What time do you want?
For half past 7 in the evening.
Confirm March 11th for 2 at 7:30 pm for Kirin in Santa Rosa.
Yes that will work.
You are now confirmed.
Thanks for the help.
Is there anything else?
Find me a place to eat in Burlingame.
What type of cuisine?
Italian will be perfect.
How about Cafe La Scala Italian Rest. in Burlingame?
Yes, that's perfect.
Do you need a reservation?
Will you book me a table at that restaurant?
For what time?
Try 5:30 pm.
Confirming that you want a table for 2 at Cafe La Scala Italian Rest. in Burlingame. Your reservation is for March 10th at 5:30 pm.
Yes. Do they serve alcohol?
Yes, alcohol is served. Your reservation is successful.
I need to get something to eat.
What are you hungry for? You can ask for Italian, American or what ever else you feel like. Oh, and what city should I search in?
Could you find me a Burgers place in Union City.
There is a Texas Roadhouse in Union City, it looks pretty good.
Could try at that restaurant, you know the one I liked, Try to make it for half past 7 in the evening.
Is this right - a table for 2 on March 1st at 7:30 pm in Union City at the Texas Roadhouse?
That's what I asked for. Do you know if they play live music there? Do they have number I can get from you?
I was able to reserve your table. They do not have live music and here is the number 510-324-7623.
I am searching for a place to eat in SFO.
What type of food you want? like Italian, Mexican or any more else.
French type of food will be perfect.
There is one nice restaurant called Amelie San Francisco which located in San Francisco.
Can you tell me about other restaurant ? price is not a matter for me.
I searched 9 restaurants for you. One of the nice restaurant is located at san francisco called Aquitaine Wine Bar & Bistro
Is there a live music?
No, there is no live music.
Yes. this is okay for me.
Are you like to book a table there?
At what time you want me to reserve?
Do it at afternoon 1:30 for 3 people.
Please give confirmation details: Table booking at Aquitaine Wine Bar & Bistro which is in san francisco for 3 people on march 11th at 1:30 pm.
Yes. this is okay for me. Are they provide liquor?
No, they don't provide liquor. Your booking is confirmed.
Can i know the contact number and street address?
175 Sutter Street is the address and the contact number is 415-402-5290.
Find me a place to eat at.
Do you like Mexican, Italian or another type of food and where should I search at?
I want Coffee & light bites in SF.
Search revealed 10 locations. Acquolina is in San Francisco.
Do they have alcohol?
They do not have any alcohol.
What is their price range and their contact number?
They have moderate prices and you can reach them at 415-781-0331.
What else can you find? Price doesn't matter to me.
Broadway Dim Sum is in San Francisco.
What time do you want to eat?
I want to eat at 7:45 pm.
You want a table for 2 at Broadway Dim Sum in San Francisco at 7:45 pm on March 14th, correct?
That is right.
I can't book that time. Does 7:30 pm for 2 on March 14th at Broadway Dim Sum work for you?
That is fine.
Your booking is complete.
Where are they located at?
You can find them at 684 Broadway.
Are there any live bands there?
They do not offer live bands.
Can you help me to find a good restaurant?
Are you looking for specific cuisine like Indian or Mexican?
I'm craving for some Barbecue. So, that's what I'll have.
In which city are you located?
I'm in Oakland.
There are 10 barbecue restaurants in Oakland and Chop Bar is one of the nice ones.
What are the other restaurants?
Do you want to consider Duchess Oakland in Oakland?
Yes, that sounds like a good one to me.
Shall I reserve a table for you here?
Not now. Maybe later.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
At what time would you be arriving at the restaurant?
I'm planning to be there by half past 5 in the evening.
Please confirm that you want to reserve a table for 2 at the Duchess Oakland restaurant in Oakland at 5:30 pm on March 1st.
That sounds okay to me. Can you get me their address and phone number please?
Your table has been reserved successfully. Their address is 5422 College Avenue and their phone number is 510-871-3463. Hope you enjoy your meal there!
I need a place to eat.
What city would you like to search in?
Try SFO.
Do you desire Indian, Mexican, or some other type of food?
Parisian food would be perfect.
I found 10 restaurants. How about Amelie San Francisco in San Francisco?
Sure. For what time?
I need a reservation for two at 1 pm.
Please confirm the following: You need a table for 2 at Amelie San Francisco in San Francisco for March 7th at 1 pm?
Yes, that will do. Can I get the address and phone number?
The address is 1754 Polk Street and you can contact them at 415-292-6916. Sorry, I was unable to make your reservation for 2 at Amelie San Francisco. Would you like me to try March 7th at 12:30 pm?
Yes, that works.
Your reservation is complete.
I'm looking for somewhere to eat.
Is there a particular kind of food you like? For example Mexican, Chinese, or anything else? What cit do you want to look in?
I'm looking for a Pasta place in Los Gatos.
There are 8 matches. Aldo's Ristorante & Bar in Los Gatos is nice.
Okay, I'll try that.
Do you want to reserve a table?
Let's do that later.
What else can I do for you?
I'll book a table for 2 at Aldo's Ristorante & Bar in Los Gatos for March 13th at 6 pm. Is this what you want?
Yes, that's it. What's their phone number?
I'm sorry but the booking did not go through. What else would you like me to do?
Try to book another table, this time for one person at 5:15 pm.
I'll book a table for 1 at Aldo's Ristorante & Bar in Los Gatos for March 13th at 5:15 pm. Is this what you want?
Yes, try that.
I'm sorry but the booking did not go through. Would you like me to try a table for 1 at Aldo's Ristorante & Bar in Los Gatos for March 13th at 5 pm. Is this what you want?
Okay, try that one.
The table has been booked.
Help me find somewhere to eat. Any price is fine.
Is there a specific cuisine you like, for example Indian, Chinese, or anything else?
I want to go to a Coffeehouse.
What city would you like to look in?
I want to look in Mountain View.
There are 3 matches. Bajis Cafe in Mountain View is nice.
Back to that restaurant, can you book me a table?
What time would you like the table?
I want it at half past 7 in the evening, just for 1 person.
I'll book you a table for 1 at Bajis Cafe in Mountain View for March 1st at 7:30 pm, is that correct?
Yes, please book it.
I've booked the table.
Hi! Can you help me find a nice restaurant?
I'd be happy to help. Where are you located? What type of food would you like? You can narrow down the search by specifying something like American or Mexican.
I'm in the mood for some Peruvian food in Richmond.
There is 1 restaurant in Richmond that meets your needs. It is caled Inca's Palace.
That works for me.
Would you like to make a reservation?
Not right now.
What else can I do for you today?
You'd like a table for 1 at Inca's Palace in Richmond on March 1st at 7:30 pm. Is this correct?
That is perfect.
Your table has been booked.
I need a place to eat.
Would you like to try Indian, Mexican or some other type of food? Also, what city should I search in?
Find me some Greek food in Campbell.
I found 1 restaurant. How about Opa! Campbell in Campbell?
Yes, that will work.
Would you like a reservation?
Not right now.
Do you need anything else?
For what time?
Try making it for half past 5 in the evening.
Please confirm that you want to book a reservation for 2 at Opa! Campbell in Campbell. The reservation is for March 13th at 5:30 pm.
Yes, that works.
I have successfully booked your reservation.
Find a place to eat
In what city?
San Leandro
American or Italian food? Or another type of cuisine?
Japanese food sounds good
I've found 1 in San Leandro. How about Tsuru Sushi Japanese Restaurant?
Sure. Can you book a table for that restaurant you mentioned?
For what time?
For one person at six in the evening.
Sure. So you want a table for 1 at 6 pm on March 12th at Tsuru Sushi Japanese Restaurant in San Leandro.
Yes that's perfect.
I've made your reservation.
I want a place to eat
what kind of food?
some szcheuan food in sfo
There are 10 restaurants in san francisco. What about alice's restaurant?
any other place?
bamboo restaurant is in san francisco
book table bamboo restaurant in san francisco at 2 pm for 4 people march 6th
yes that works
sorry I could not make it
Make it 6:30 in the evening for 1 person
bamboo restaurant in san francisco at 6:30 pm for 1 person march 6th
yes that works. Does it serve alcohol?
Of course, it does. Your booking was succesful.
I'd like to find a restaurant in Alameda please.
What type of food?
I want Italian food.
How about C'era Una Volta in Alameda?
Okay, thanks. I'd like to make a restaurant reservation, too at 5:45 in the evening for two.
Confirming a table for 2 at C'era Una Volta in Alameda on March 14th at 5:45 pm.
Great, thank you.
I'm sorry, I couldn't book that table. Would you like to try C'era Una Volta on March 14th at 6 pm for 2?
Okay, that's fine.
The table has been reserved.
Will you find a restaurant?
Which city? Kind of food?
Diner in Mountain View.
I found 5. Eureka! is in Mountain View.
Their number and address?
191 Castro Street. 650-426-0582.
Cool.
Reserve a table?
Please confirm table for 2 at Eureka! in Mountain View on March 4th at 5:30 pm.
Yes.
I've made your reservation.
Is it costly? They serve alcohol?
Moderate. They do serve alcohol.
I am searching for a place to eat.
In which city should i search?
I am searching around El Cerrito.
What type of food you want? like italian, chinese etc.
Korean type of food is okay for me.
I searched 1 nice restaurant of your choice called Ancient Szechuan at El Cerrito.
What about the price range? Is there a live music?
The cost is moderate and there is no live music.
Can you try reserving table at the restaurant i liked?
At what time you want the reservation?
Do it at 8 pm.
Please give confirmation details: Table booking at Ancient Szechuan Restaurant in El Cerrito city on march 11th at 8 pm and the booking is for 2 people.
Fine. This is okay for me. Can i know the contact number?
Sorry, i could not book the table. Can i do any other help?
Please try booking again and do it at 7 in the evening.
Please give confirmation details: Table booking at Ancient Szechuan Restaurant in El Cerrito city on march 11th at 7 pm and the booking is for 2 people
Yes this is perfect.
Your booking is successful.
Hey! Reena, I wish to have some good dishes. Do you know any good place to eat?
Where wish to have food and what kind of food do you wish to have?
If you can find some Cambodian kind of food in Santa Rosa, that would be perfect.
Okay! There is a Sea Noodle Bar restaurant at Santa Rosa. Do you wish to eat here?
Please, if you have any other, let me know?
Okay! how about the Sea Thai Bistro, which has a good rating in Santa Rosa?
Yup, sounds good to me.
Do you want any other help?
Sure. Please can you confirm me that you wish to book a table at Sea Thai Bistro in Santa Rosa on March 4th at 1:45 pm for 4 people, right?
Yup, that works for me. Is live music available there?
Sorry, the system crashed and your reservation is unsuccessful. Do you want me try the reservation again for 4 people at Sea Thai Bistro on March 4th at 1:30 pm? Sorry about that they don't have live music.
Okay, this works to me.
I've booked successfully to you.
find me a place to eat.
What kind of food are you looking for Mexican or Italian or something else?
Malaysian will be good
which city to look in?
Search in Milpitas
There is the Banana leaf restaurant in Milpitas
That is ok
should i book a table here?
no, not now
Any thing else?
at what time?
make it 12:30 in the afternoon
please confirm: Booking a table for 2 at Banana leaf restaurant in Milpitas on march 8th 12:30 pm
thats is right
i is booked
Will you find an expensive restaurant in San Fran?
Any preference? American, Mexican or something else?
Pizza and Pasta.
I found 10. Ala Romana is in San Francisco.
Live music?
No.
Address and contact number?
1098 Jackson Street. 415-292-3699.
Will you find a restaurant?
What time?
7 in the evening.
Please confirm table for 2 at Ala Romana in San Francisco on March 8th at 7 pm.
Cool.
I've made your reservation.
I want to find a restaurant.
Would you like Chinese cuisine, Mexican cuisine, or something else?
I want to find a barbecue place in San Jose.
There are 10 restaurants to choose from in San Jose. How about 71 Saint Peter?
What else is there?
Also in San Jose is Bazille.
What's the phone number there?
It is 408-261-5787.
Okay, great, thanks.
Do you want to make a reservation there?
Confirming a table for 2 on March 6th at 12:15 pm in San Jose at Bazille.
Great. Do they play live music there, do you know?
They do not, I'm sorry. I apologize, I couldn't book a table for you. Would you like to try March 6th at 12 pm for 2 at Bazille?
That's no problem.
The table has been booked.
Hello, I wish to go out to have some food. Please can you find a good place to dine that serves alcohol too?
Do you prefer to have Mexican, Indian, Italian, American or anything else? where are you looking for exactly?
Please find some American food in Redwood City.
Okay! there is a very good rating restaurant, Scroll Bar Waterside Kitchen located in Redwood City. Do you wish to dine here?
Please can I have their address?
Sure, they are located in 223 Twin Dolphin Drive.
Okay! Please may I know what's their phone number?
sure, you can reach them at 650-598-9000.
Sounds good to me.
So, do you have a plan to reserve a table here?
Please can you book a table for 2 people in the prior selected restaurant?
Sure, I can do that for you? At what time you want to reserve?
Please can you reserve the restaurant at evening 5.
Sure. Please can you confirm me that you wish to book a table for 2 people at Scroll Bar Waterside Kitchen in Redwood City on March 2nd at 5 pm, right?
Yup, sounds good to me.
Okay! your table is booked.
Please may I know if they have live music?
Nope, they don't have.
Hi there, could you search for a place to eat please?
Any preference on the cuisine and location of the restaurant?
I would prefer one which serves some Burmese food in the SF area please.
There are 5 restaurants you may like, one of which is called B Star in San Francisco.
Sure, please confirm your reservation for 2 at B Star in San Francisco on March 10th at 5:30 pm.
Sure, I am fine with that.
Your reservation has been made.
Thank you, is the food there cheap priced?
Their food is moderate priced.
May I also have their address please?
You can visit them at 127 Clement Street.
Sure, thank you!
May I further assist you?
Hi there, could you search for a place to eat please?
Any preference on the type of food, such as Mexican or American cuisine, and the location of the restaurant?
I would prefer a restaurant serving spicy noodles in the San Francisco area.
Sure, would you like to dine at Baan Thai House & Wine Bar which is located in San Francisco?
May I have their contact number please?
You can call them at 415-379-4505.
Are there any alternatives?
How about Basil, which is located in San Francisco.
May I have their address please?
They are located at 1175 Folsom Street.
What time do you intend to visit them?
Somewhere around 19:00.
Please confirm your reservation for 2 at Basil in San Francisco at 7 pm on March 3rd.
Sure, could I have their contact number please?
You can contact them at 415-552-8999. Unfortunately, your reservation could not be made. Would you like a reservation for 2 at Basil in San Francisco at 6:30 pm on March 3rd instead?
Yes, that is fine with me.
Your reservation has been made!
Are the food there expensive?
No, they are moderate priced.
I would like to eat out, the place must offer non meat food but I still want alcohol
Where do you allow me to look for such a place?
San jose area
In san jose there's blue mango
I like the place
I'm happy to know it, I may go on and book a table then
tell me your favorite time for the reservation
book it at quarter to 7 in the evening
tell me if I got this right. You want me to book a table for 2 at blue mango in san jose. the date is march 4th at 6:45 pm
yes, you're pretty clever
the reservation is unsuccessful, I can look for a table for 2 at blue mango on march 4th at 7 pm if it's okay for you
yes, it is indeed
now you got your table
superb. give me address and phone number too
The address is 635 coleman avenue and the phone is 408-885-9222
I want Cambodian food that is afforadable
what city then?
It needs to be in burlingame
there are 2 in coconut bay thai restaurant in burlingame
yes that is fine
anything else for you?
book coconut bay thai restaurant in burlingame at 6 pm for 2 people on march 9th
tell me their adress and contact
address is 1107 howard avenue and number is 650-558-8268
Can you find me somewhere to eat?
Sure. In what city?
Try San Fran.
Can you tell me what type of cuisine you would like to eat? Italian, Indian or something else?
I'd like some Mediterranean food.
How about Barcha in San Francisco?
How expensive is it? Can I get the address?
They are priced expensive. The address is 28 Fremont Street.
That will work.
Would you like to make a reservation?
Maybe later.
Can I help you with something else?
Can you book a table for four at Barcha?
Sure. For what time?
Make it for 5:30 pm.
Please confirm that you want to book a table for 4 at Barcha in San Francisco for March 4th at 5:30 pm.
Yes,that works.
Your reservation is complete.
I need to find a eating place in San Carlos and some kind of Ramen food i okay
There is a nice restaurant called Aya Sushi in San Carlos
That is fine
Is there any other help you need?
What time you prefer for reservation?
I want it at 5 pm
Please give confirmation details: Booking a table for 2 people at Aya Sushi at 5 pm on March 6th in the city of San Carlos
That is fine
Your booking is done
Can i have their phone number?
Their contact number is 650-654-1212
I would like to eat out at a restaurant.
You would like indian, mexican or what kind of food?
I want some affordable punjabi food in concord.
Hot basil cafe is a lovely restaurant in concord.
What is their contact number and address?
It is located at 790 oak grove road and the number is 925-288-0000.
I would like to book at table for 1 at the restaurant for 7 o"clock in the evening.
You would like a table for 1 at hot basil cafe in concord on March 3rd for 7 pm?
That would be fine. Do they play live music and serve liquor?
I have made the reservation. There would be no live music, but they serve alcohol.
I want some restaurants with veggie food
Which city are you looking for?
San Jose it is
Blue mango is a great place in San Jose
do they have live music? what is the address?
they don't have live music and they are located at 635 coleman avenue
Find me another reasonably priced place
I have found 6 places for you in San Jose. How about Emperor of India?
Booking a table for 1 at Emperor of india san Jose at 7 pm on march 5th
Cool, sounds perfect
Booking confirmed.
Find me a place to eat at.
Do you prefer American, Indian, or some other type of food and in what city do you want to eat?
I want to eat Fondue in SF.
Search revealed 1 place that is Fondue Cowboy in San Francisco.
How can I contact them and do they offer live entertainment.
You can contact them at 415-431-5100 and they do not have live entertainment.
What time do you wish to eat?
I want to eat at evening 7:30.
You want a table for 2 people at Fondue Cowboy in San Francisco for 7:30 pm on March 11th. Is that correct?
That is correct and can you tell me the venue location?
Your table and booked and they are located at 1052 Folsom Street.
I'm looking for a restaurant in the moderate price range in San Jose.
Are you looking for Indian, Italian or something else?
Would some burgers interest you?
There are 6 options. Black Angus Steakhouse is a restaurant in San Jose.
What's their address?
Their address is located at 1011 Blossom Hill Road.
Okay. That one is good.
Should I book a table?
Yes. Perhaps later.
Is there anything else we can help with?
For what time?
For 1:30 in the afternoon.
Please confirm you want me to book a table for 2 on March 11th at Black Angus Steakhouse in San Jose at 1:30 pm.
Actually, it's for 3.
Please confirm you want me to book a table for 3 at 1:30 pm.
Yes and please give me their phone number.
Their phone is 408-266-6602. The reservation was booked successfully.
I would like to find a restaurant.
Do you want Italian or Indian, etc?
I want Mexican in Menlo Park.
In Menlo Park I found 3. How about Cafe Del Sol Restaurant.
That works for me.
Do you want to book?
Go ahead and book restaurant for three at 13:00.
Confirm March 10th for 3 at 1 pm at Cafe Del Sol Restaurant in Menlo Park.
Yes that works for me.
Sorry how about March 10th for 3 at 12:30 pm at Cafe Del Sol Restaurant in Menlo Park.
Yes that works too.
You are now confirmed.
I am searching for a place to eat.
What type of food do you need? In which city shall I search in?
I wish to have Punjabi type of food in Benicia.
I searched and found 1 restaurant for you. Mirchi Indian Grill is a great restaurant in Benicia.
Kindly ensure that, on March 10th, reservation has been made for 2 persons at Mirchi Indian Grill in Benicia at 7 pm.
Yes. it is good for me.
Your booking is done.
Hi there, are there any places which I can dine at?
Do you have any preference for the location of the restaurant?
I would prefer one located in Lafayette please.
Any preference on the type of food, such as Chinese, American food?
Yes, a restaurant serving pizza would be great for me.
I have found 3 restaurants for you, one of which is called Locanda Positano which is located in Lafayette.
May I have their address and what is the price range of their food?
You can visit them at 1005 Brown Avenue and they are moderate priced.
This is fine with me.
Would you like me to make a table reservation for you
Perhaps at a later time.
Will you require any further assistance?
Sure, please confirm your reservation for 2 at Locanda Positano in Lafayette at 4:30 pm on March 11th.
Yes, I am fine with that.
Sorry, I could not make your reservation, could I further assist you?
Yes please, could you try booking again at 17:15 instead?
Sure, please confirm your reservation for 2 at Locanda Positano in Lafayette at 5:15 pm on March 11th.
I am fine with this arrangement. May i have their contact number and do they serve liquor?
You can contact them at 925-310-4337 and they do serve alcohol. Unfortunately, I was not able to make your reservation. would you like a reservation for 2 at Locanda Positano in Lafayette at 5:30 pm on March 11th instead?
Yes, I am fine with that too.
Sure, your reservation has been made.
Search for me not very costly restaurant that serve alcohol.
What kind of food do you want to eat and which city?
Ramen food in San Francisco will be perfect.
I found 10 restaurants in San Francisco for you. How about 2g Japanese Brasserie
Sounds perfect to me.
should i book your table there?
Not right now
is there anything else I can help you with?
What time should I make the booking for?
At 1 o"clock in the afternoon
Booking a table for 2 at the 2g japanese brasserie in san francisco on march 6th 1 pm
Cool, what is their phone number?
Booking confirmed. Their number is 415-292-9997
Cool, tell me their address. Also, do they have live music?
The address is 601 Van Ness Avenue. they do not have live music.
Hello! Please can you find me some good restaurant to have a small dinner in the evening?
What do you prefer - American, Mexican, Thai or anything else?
Afghan food will be fine to me.
Where are you looking for?
Please can you find in San Carlos.
Sure, I can find 1 restaurant, Kabul Afghan Cuisine, which is a nice one located in San Carlos.
Yup, that would work for me.
Do you wish to book a table here?
Sure, at what time?
Please can you make it at 1 pm.
Sure, please can you confirm me that you wish to book a table at Kabul Afghan Cuisine in San Carlos on March 2nd for 2 people at 1 pm, right>
Yup, you're correct. Did they have live music? In which number I can contact them?
Nope, they don't have live music. You can reach them at 650-594-2840. Your booking is successful.
Hi there, could you help me search for places to eat please?
Sure, any preference on the location?
Something in San Jose is fine with me.
How about the type of food?
A place which serves Chinese will be fine.
Would you like to dine in at Chef Li, which is located in San Jose?
Yes, I am fine with that!
Would you like me to make a reservation for you?
When will you be dining in?
Could you book it at 18:30 please?
Sure, please confirm your reservation for 2 at Chef Li in San Jose at 6:30 pm on March 1st.
Sure, that is fine with me.
Your reservation has been made.
May I have their contact number, and what is the price range of their food?
You can contact them at 408-377-8310, and their food is moderate priced.
I see, thank you so much!
No worries, could I further assist you?
Hi there, could you help me search for some nice places to eat please?
Do you have any preference on the type of food, such as Chinese or American cuisine? And which location do you prefer to dine at?
I would prefer one which serves up some sushi in the San Francisco area.
How about 2g Japanese Brasserie in San Francisco?
Do they play live music?
Unfortunately, they do not.
What a pity, but I'm okay with that.
Would you like me to make a reservation for you?
Perhaps at a later time.
Could I further assist you?
Could you reserve a table at 6:30 in the evening for the restaurant you previously entioned?
Please confirm your reservation for 2 at 2g Japanese Brasserie in San Francisco at 6:30 pm on March 12th.
Yes, I am fine with that.
Your reservation has been made.
May I know the price range of their food?
Their food are moderate priced.
May I have their address and do they serve alcohol?
They are located at 601 Van Ness Avenue and do serve alcohol.
i need to look for eating place as i like some Burgers kind of food
Which is your preferred city
I need it in San Francisco
There is a nice restaurant called 5a5 Steak Lounge in San Francisco
Can you look for some other restaurant?
There is a nice restaurant called Alexander's Steakhouse in San Francisco
Can i have their phone number and how pricey are they?
Their contact number is 415-495-1111 and they have a very expensive price range
Yes that is fine
You need to book a table here?
Not now, later
Is there any other help you need?
Can you please try reserving a table at the restaurant i liked?
What is your preferred time for reservation/
I need it at 7:30 pm
Please give confirmation details: Booking a table for 2 people at Alexander's Steakhouse at 7:30 pm on March 13th in the city of San Francisco
That is fine
Your booking is done
Find me a place to eat.
Do you prefer Mexican, Chinese, or another type of food and where do you want to eat at?
I want to eat Fish in SFO.
Search revealed 10 places. Akiko's Sushi Bar is in San Francisco.
What else do you have?
Alamo Square Seafood Grill is in San Francisco.
You want a table for 1 at Alamo Square Seafood Grill in San Francisco for 5 pm on March 7th?
That is right. How can I contact them.
Your table is reserved and you can contact them at 415-440-2828.
I am in a nice mood and I think it will be great if I eat outside once. Can you search for some good and clean restaurants for me to enjoy my food outside?
Do you have any particular category of food in your mind to search for and which is your selective city to search for the restaurants. If I know these details then I can get you suitable options to select.
I think to search for German foods which I want to eat at some nice place in San Jose. Can you search for a restaurant here.
Yes, How about your suggestion on a Restaurant named Ludwig's German Table in San Jose?
Thanks for that. Now we will proceed with the booking of restaurant that you have selected for me before.
Let me know your convenient time to book the table.
Book it for the time at 8 o"clock in the night.
Please confirm to book a table for 2 at Ludwig's German Table in San Jose for the time at 8 pm on March 4th.
Yes that is correct to proceed and also I want to know whether Liquor supply is available there?
I was unable to book the table as you required. How can I help you further?
Please check it for the time seven pm instead of 8.
Please confirm to book a table for 2 at Ludwig's German Table in San Jose for the time at 7 pm on March 4th.
Yes, correct, please proceed.
Successfully reserved your table at that time.
Find me some place to eat.
What city do you want?
I want to eat in San Francisco.
Do you prefer Mexican, Chinese, or some other type of food?
I am in the mood for Taiwanese.
Search revealed 10 results. Alice's serves Taiwanese in San Francisco.
That is perfect.
Shall I book you a table?
No, not right now.
Do you need more help?
I want to book that restaurant for 1 person at 12:30 in the afternoon.
You want a reservation for 1 at Alice's in San Francisco on March 6th for 12:30 pm, correct?
That is right.
Your table is booked.
Im looking for a place to eat something
What kind of food you want
Barbecue is fine
In which city you want
Woodside is great
Little store restaurant is nice in Woodside
What's its addres
The address is 3340 Woodside road
Is there live music
Yes they play
Look some expensive priced restaurant
There is 1 restaurant called the mountain House in Woodside
At what time
Make it 12 pm
Please confirm it. Making a table booking at the mountain House in Woodside at 12 pm for 2 people on March 11th
Great for me
Your booking is confirmed
Help me find somewhere to eat.
Is there a type of food you're craving?
I want some Diner food, in a place that has live music.
What city would you like to look in?
Look for a place in San Jose.
There are 4 matches. Hukilau in San jose is nice.
Where are the located, and do they have alcohol?
There are located on 230 Jackson Street, and they do have alcohol.
Recommend me another place, a place in San Rafael would be good.
San Rafael Joe's in San Rafael is nice.
I'll book a table for 2 at San Rafael Joe's in San Rafael for March 7th at 7:15 pm, is that correct?
Yeah, that's food.
I'm sorry but they're all booked at that time. Would you like to book a table for 2 at San Rafael Joe's on March 7th at 7:30 pm instead?
Okay, that's good too.
The table has been booked.
I'm looking for an average priced restaurant in San Francisco
What kind of food would you like to eat?
I'd like some Indian food.
There are 10 restaurant, for example August 1 Five in San Francisco
What restaurants are there in Pleasanton?
In Pleasanton there's Aappakadai
Yes, it sounds good!
Do you want to book there?
Not now, thanks
Can I do anything else for you?
Thank you! I want to book the restaurant
What time do you want to book?
I want a table at 7:30 pm
A table for 2 people at Aappakadai in Pleasanton, on March 10th at 7:30 pm. Is it correct?
Yes, It's correct. Is there live music? Are liquors served in the restaurant?
No, there isn't live music, and liquors are not served there. Your table is booked!
Hi, I need a help. me and my friends are very hungry, i am looking for a place to eat, could you find it?
Sure, i will help you, Which type of foods do you like? Please tell me do you like, American, Indian or Italian foods or anything else?
i like cuban kind of foods.
Okay,Which type of events do you like?
Search in Richmond.
I have found a good hotel in Richmond, The hotel is Saigon Seafood Harbor Restaurant.
Cool, it seems good for me.
May i help you anything more?
please confirm the following details: The Restaurant is Saigon Seafood Harbor Restaurant and it is located at Richmond, The reservation for 2 people and reservations date is march 1st at 7:30 pm
Yes, That's right.
Congrats, Your reservation has been made.
Hi there, are there any places which I can dine at?
Any preference on the location and type of food?
Yes I would prefer to have some Freshwater fish in the San Fran area please.
Sure, there is a nice restaurant called Akiko's Sushi Bar which is located in San Francisco.
May I have their address please?
You can visit them at 542 A Mason Street.
Are there any alternative places to eat?
Yes there is, how about the Alamo Square Seafood Grill in San Francisco?
This is fine with me too.
Would you like me to make a reservation for you?
Perhaps at a later time.
Could I further assist you?
Sure, please confirm your reservation for 2 at Alamo Square Seafood Grill in San Francisco at 7 pm on March 1st.
Sure, I am fine with that too.
Your reservation has been made.
How about dining out? can you help me with that?
Sure, where do I look?
San francisco. I'm in the mood for pizza and pasta.
In san francisco you can enjoy some food at 54 mint ristorante italiano
send me the address
it's at 16 mint plaza
send me the phone number too
it's 415-543-5100
what about some other restaurant?
in san francisco area you can eat at a16
sounds nice
May I reserve a table there?
sure, tell me the exact time you want to be there
5:15 pm
confirm me the procedure. You want to book a table for 2 at a16 in san francisco on march 11th at 5:15 pm
Exactly.
the reservation can't be done. I can still try to find a spot for 2 at a16 on march 11th at 5 pm
yes please, try it one last time
now I got it, you have your table
Hi, I'm in the mood for some Indian food. Can you find me a restaurant?
What city should I look in?
Please search in Santa Rosa.
How about Kafal Restaurant in Santa Rosa?
Anything else you can suggest?
How about New Sizzling Tandoor in Santa Rosa?
Is there anything else? I'd like something in the moderate price range.
How about Yeti Restaurant in Santa Rosa?
Do they serve alcohol?
No, they do not serve liquor.
That works great.
Would you like to book a table there?
So you'd like a table for 2 people at Yeti Restaurant in Santa Rosa for 1 pm on March 2nd. Is this correct?
Yes, that's perfect.
Your table has been booked.
I'm looking for something to eat.
What sort of food do you want? You can say Chinese, Indian or something else.
Cambodian food would be perfect.
What city should I look in?
I would like to have it in San Fran.
Angkor Borei Restaurant is a nice San Francisco restaurant.
Please confirm that you would like to book a table at Angkor Borei Restaurant in San Francisco at 6 pm for 2 on March 11th.
That sounds great. I would like to hear some live music. Do they have that? What is the address of the place?
Your reservation has been made. They don't have live music. They are located at 3471 Mission Street.
Can you find me somewhere to eat?
Sure, what do you fancy? Chinese, Indian? And where would you like me to look?
Can you see if there's anywhere that does Korean Hot Pot food in Dublin? Something in a moderate price range.
Sure, what about the Go Goong restaurant in Dublin? It looks nice!
Can you get me their address and number please?
Sure, the number is 925-829-7237 and they are at 7178 Regional Street
Cool, thank you
Do you want me to book you a table?
Thank you! Can you book a table for that restaurant? I'll need a table for 4 at 19:00
Sure, just confirm that you want me to book a table for 4 at Go Goong in Dublin, for 7 pm on March 4th?
Yes please. Do you know they have live music?
Unfortunately not. I have booked the table for you though.
Can you find me a place to eat?
Sure. Would you like Indian, Chinese or something else? Where would you like to search?
Find me a Coffeehouse in San Leandro.
How about McDonald's in San Leandro?
Do they have live music? What is the phone number?
They do feature live music. You can contact them at 510-430-9417.
Yes,that will work.
Would you like to make a reservation?
Not now.
Do you need anything else?
Can you get me a table at that restaurant? Try booking it for half past 11 in the morning.
Please confirm that you want to book a table for 2 at McDonald's in San Francisco for March 12th at 11:30 am.
Yes, that is correct. Does the restaurant serve alcohol? Where are they located?
They don't serve alcohol. They are located at 255 Winston Drive. Your reservation is complete.
Can you help me find a place to eat?
What type of food and in which city?
I'd like a cafe in Santa Clara.
I found 1 option for you. La Fontana is a cafe in Santa Clara.
Yes, that sounds great.
Do you want me to reserve a table for you?
Perhaps later, not right now.
Do you need help with anything else?
Yeah, can you book me a table at the cafe from earlier?
At what time?
7:45 in the evening please.
Please confirm: reserve a table for 2 at La Fontana in Santa Clara on March 13th at 7:45 pm.
Actually, just make it at 7:30 in the evening.
Please confirm: the reservation time should be 7:30 pm and the date should be March 13th.
Actually, it's just for 1 person.
Please confirm: a 7:30 pm reservation for 1 person.
Yes, that's correct.
Your reservation is successful.
I am searching for a place to eat.
What type of food do you need?
I prefer some Japanese type of food.
In which city shall I search in?
I need it in SF.
I searched and found 10 restaurants for you. 2g Japanese Brasserie is good restaurant in San Francisco.
Will they serve liquor?
Yes. they provide liquor.
Could you help me in booking a table in restaurant at 7 o"clock in the evening.
Kindly ensure that, on March 12th, table has been booked for 2 persons at 2g Japanese Brasserie in San Francisco at 7 pm.
Yes. it is good for me.
Your booking is done.
I'd like to eat something. I prefer Japanese food.
What is your current address ?
I prefer in SF.
There's 10 Japanese restaurant in San Francisco, but you should try 2g Japanese Brasserie.
How's the pricing of their food there? Do they have beer or liquor there?
They only serve alcohol. Their pricing there is moderate.
Any other restaurant ?
Also in San Francisco, try Ace Wasabi Rock-n-roll Sushi.
Please confirm your reservations: A table for 2 people at Ace Wasabi Rock-n-roll Sushi at San Francisco on March 4th at 11:45 am.
Okay. Can you give me their contact info? Do they have liquor there?
Their contact number is 415-567-4903. Let me remind you that i wasn't able to make a reservation for 2 in Ace Wasabi Rock-n-Roll Sushi on March 4th at 11:45 am. Is it ok if 12 pm ?
Yeah it's fine.
Your reservation is approved. Enjoy there
I'm looking for a restaurant
Do you prefer Indian, Italian or some other kind of food?
I want to eat some Pizza kind of food!
In which city?
I want to eat pizza in Alameda
There are 3 restaurants in Alameda, for example C'era Una Volta
What time do you want to reserve the table?
I prefer at 6:45 pm, please
A table for 2 people at C'Era Una Volta in Alameda, on March 12th at 6:45 pm. Is it correct?
Yes, It's correct. Book it.
Unfortunately it is not available. Do I try to book a table for 2 people at C'era Una Volta on March 12th at 7 pm?
Yes, it's fine even at 7 pm
Your table is booked!
my mouth is watering to eat food from outside. find a good place to eat?
what kind of food do you like the most whether italian, chinese or any other thing?
some diner kind of food is comfortable for me.
in which city should i search for?
i need it in san carlos.
What about izzy's san carlos which is a nice restaurant located in san carlos?
whether they have live music?
no they do not have live music.
what is their address and phone number?
their street address is 525 skyway road and their phone number is 650-654-2822.
please confirm the following details. book a table at izzy's san carlos. the city is san carlos and the reservation is a 8 pm. the reservation is for 2 people and the date is march 10th.
ok that suits for me.
sorry i was unable to make a reservation. Whether i need to find any other thing?
i need to book it again at 7:30 pm.
please confirm the following details. book a table at izzy's san carlos. the city is san carlos and the reservation is a 7:30 pm. the reservation is for 2 people and the date is march 10th.
ok thats sound good to me
reservation is completed.
Whether the price range is afforadable ? whether they serve liquor?
they do not serve alcohol and the price range is moderate.
I want to eat out tonight.
In which city?
Somewhere affordable in San Jose.
What type of cuisine? Italian, indian or something else?
I am in the mood for some asian fusion.
There are 10 restaurants available in san jose. I recommend dynasty.
What is the address?
It is at 1001 story road.
What number can I reach them at?
The number is 408-286-6668.
Yes, that would be fine.
Would you like to reserve a table there?
For what time?
For 12:45 pm.
You would like to reserve a table for 2 at dynasty in san jose for March 8th at 12:45 pm?
That would be fine.
I apologize but I was not able to make the reservation. You would like a table for 2 at dynasty for March 8th at 1 pm instead?
Yes, that would be great.
I have made the reservation.
I would like to find a reasonably priced place to eat in Orinda please.
What type of food? Would you like Chinese or American maybe?
I want diner food, actually.
I have 2 restaurants in Orinda. How about Casa Orinda?
Do they have alcohol there?
Yes, they do.
What's the phone number?
The telephone number is 925-254-4630.
Confirming a table for 2 on March 11th in Orinda at Casa Orinda at 2 pm.
That is great, thanks.
I'm sorry, there was a problem booking the table. Is there anything else I can do for you?
Try the reservation again in the afternoon 1:30.
Confirming a table for 2 people in Orinda at Casa Orinda on March 11th at 1:30 pm.
Okay, good. What is their address and do they have live music there?
No, there's no live music there, I'm sorry. The address is 20 Bryant Way and table is booked.
Hi, could you help me search for some good places to eat please?
Sure, any preference on the type of food and the location of the restaurant?
Yes, some taiwanese food in the San Fran area would be great!
How about Alice's, which is a nice restaurant in San Francisco?
Could you make a reservation for two at the restaurant we talked about previously?
Sure, what time will you be visiting them?
I intend to visit in the morning 11:30 with a group of four people.
Please confirm your reservation for 4 at Alice's in San Francisco at 11:30 am on March 3rd.
This sounds great to me!
Your reservation has been made.
Do you know where are they located?
You can visit them at 1599 Sanchez Street.
And how can I contact them?
You can call them up at 415-282-8999.
I want to find a restaurant please.
What type of food? Indian or Mexican maybe?
I want Korean barbeque.
In what city please?
Someplace in Concord.
How about Imperial Seafood Restaurant in Concord?
Okay, why not?
Do you want to book a table?
Would you please book a table at that restaurant?
For what time?
In the afternoon 12.
Confirming a table at Imperial Seafood Restaurant on March 10th at 12 pm for 2 people in Concord.
Great, thank you. Do they serve alcohol there?
They do not. The table has been booked.
What good places are there to eat? I want Noodles that are budget priced in Concord.
I found 1 restaurant for you in Concord. It's called Hunan Restaurant.
Do they have live music and booze?
They have neither.
Great. Becky likes neither.
Do you want to book a table?
Yes, for what time?
Do it for 16:45.
Please confirm the following: Booking a table at Hunan Restaurant for 2 on March 5th at 4:45 pm. The restaurant is in Concord.
Yes, please do it. What's their phone number?
The number is 925-827-4800. Sorry the reservation at Hunan Restaurant did not go through. Shall I try again for 2 people on March 5th at 5 pm?
Yes, do it.
Your reservation was successfully confirmed!
What's their address?
4804 Clayton Road.
I need to find a place to eat. I would like eating some kind of Greek food, and I want the restaurant to be in SFO.
There are 5 restaurants which you might like. One of the restaurants is Ayola which is a good restaurant, and can be found in San Francisco.
Is there some other restaurant you can recommend? The restaurant I am looking for should be afforadable priced.
There are 2 restaurants which match your requests. One of the restaurants is the Novy Restaurant in San Francisco.
Now I want to book a table at the restaurant I liked before.
Can you tell me the time for when you want the reservation to be made for?
I want the table to be booked for half past 6 in the evening, for 1 person.
Can you please confirm that you want to book a table for 1 person at Novy Restaurant in San Francisco for March 6th at 6:30 pm?
That is not right, because I want the table for four people, and I want the reservation to be for 7:45 in the evening.
Can you please confirm that you want to book the table for 4 people at 7:45 pm.
That suits me well. Can you check if they have live music?
Unfortunately they do not have live music there. I apologize but I could not make your requested reservation. Do you want me to try again make a reservation at Novy Restaurant for 4 people on March 6th at 7:30 pm?
That seems nice to me.
Your requested reservation has been made.
Can you tell me if they serve liquor there? Can you also give me the address for this restaurant?
The restaurant is found at 4000 24th Street. From what I can tell, they do not serve alcohol.
I appreciate it very much.
Is there something else I can help you with?
I need to find a restaurant which serves alcohol in Redwood City please.
What type of cuisine?
Something Latin American would be nice.
How about La Viga Seafood & Cocina Mexicana in Redwood City?
Would you try for a restaurant reservation now? For four.
At what time?
In the evening 6:15.
Confirming a table for 4 on March 7th at 6:15 pm in Redwood City at La Viga Seafood & Cocina Mexicana.
Sounds good to me.
I apologize, I couldn't make the reservation. Would you like me to try for March 7th at 6 pm for 4 at La Viga Seafood & Cocina Mexicana?
Please do, yes.
The table has been booked.
What's their phone number? And is it an extravagant place?
They are in the moderate price range and you may reach them at 650-679-8141.
I have a plan to eat outside and particularly I like to have Italian foods. Can you search for the one with affordable priced?
yes, in which City you want me to search for the place to eat your favorite food, any option?
Yes, I like to eat at a nice place in Windsor.
Got a restaurant which is Mary's Pizza Shack and it is the best place to eat and the same is located in Windsor.
I changed my mind. I want to have Diner food for which please search for the best place to eat in the same City.
That's okay. I have searched for your new interest and got 3 restaurants among which I think Charlie's Restaurant is the perfect one in Windsor. What about your opinion?
That is great and thanks for your work.
Do you want me to book the table in this restaurant now?
Thanks for that information. Now I want to proceed with the booking of table at that restaurant which I was selected before.
At what time?
I need it at eight in the night.
Please confirm to book a table for 2 at Charlie's Restaurant in Windsor on March 14th at 8 pm.
please make it for three persons.
Please confirm to book a table for 3 at Charlie's Restaurant in Windsor on March 14th at 8 pm.
That is perfect. Do it now.
Sorry, I couldn't make it, How can I help you further?
Please continue to search for the availability of table at quarter past 7 in the evening on that restaurant.
Please confirm to book a table for 3 at Charlie's Restaurant in Windsor on March 14th at 7:15 pm.
Yes, please do it.
Sorry, again that time is also not available. Shall I book it at 7:30 pm on the same day March 14th in the same Charlie's Restaurant for 3 persons.?
Yes, that time is also okay to me. Go ahead.
Your booking was confirmed on that restaurant.
Let me know their address and also check for the availability of live music there.
The address is 1320 19th Hole Drive and please note that they do not offer live music there. Is that okay?
Can you help me find a place to eat
Which city are you looking for?
I want one in Los Gatos
Sure, are you looking for mexican, american or any other type of food?
I am craving some sichuan food.
Okay, how about jasmine chinese cuisine in Los Gatos?
What time should I make the booking for?
Book it for 6:30 pm for one
Booking a table for 1 at jasmine chinese cuisine Los gatos at 6:30 pm on march 8th.
No, change that to 13:30 for four.
Booking for 4 at 1:30 pm
Sounds perfect now.
Your booking is confirmed.
I'll be visiting Sunnyvale soon, and would like to dine at a restaurant serving alcohol.
Did you have a particular cuisine, such as Chinese, Italian or anything else in mind?
A restaurant serving Barbecue works for me.
Black Angus Steakhouse is a nice Sunnyvale restaurant.
Remember the restaurant I liked? Please reserve a table there.
For what time should I make the reservation?
Book it for seven pm.
Okay. Please confirm that you'd like to reserve a table for 2 at the Black Angus Steakhouse restaurant in Sunnyvale, for 7 pm on March 10th.
That is correct.
I have successfully made your reservation.
I am planning to eat outside once for which I need your help to find a suitable place for me. Can you help now?
Yes, in which City do you want me to search for the place to eat?
I like to eat some Caribbean foods and I want the same in San Rafael.
I got 1 good place which is Whipper Snapper Restaurant located in San Rafael. What about your opinion on this place?
I want to know your convenient time to book the table on that restaurant.
I want it at evening 7:30.
Need your confirmation to book a table for 2 at Whipper Snapper Restaurant in San Rafael for the time 7:30 pm on March 8th.
That is correct to proceed.
I have successfully booked the table as per your requirements.
Please also check about their pricing details and the availability of liquor supply?
They offer foods for moderate price range only and sorry liquor supply is not available there.
Find me a restaurant to eat at.
Do you like Italian, Indian, or some other type of food and what city do you want to eat in?
I want to eat Diner food in Concord.
Search revealed 5 plaes. Claim Jumper Restaurants is a diner in Concord.
Is alcohol available?
They do have alcohol for sale.
What is their phone number?
You can contact them at 925-798-4300.
What time do you want to eat?
I wish to eat at afternoon 1.
You want a table for 3 people at 1 pm at Claim Jumper Restaurants in Concord on March 2nd, correct?
That is right. What is their price range and do they have live bands.
They have moderate prices and do not have live bands. I can't make your appointment time. Do you want a 12:30 pm reservation for 3 people on March 2nd at Claim Jumper Restaurants?
That is fine.
Your booking is complete.
Hi there, could you help me search for places to eat in Foster City please?
Sure, any preference on the type of food?
A place which serves Szcheuan food will be great.
How about a restaurant called 5 Joy Restaurant located in Foster City?
Sure, what time will you be visiting them?
I will be visiting them at six pm.
Please confirm your reservation for 2 at 5 Joy Restaurant in Foster City at 6 pm on March 14th.
Sure, that is fine with me. Do you know if they serve alcohol?
Yes they do serve alcohol. Your reservation has been made.
May I know if their food is afforadable priced?
Their food is moderate priced.
I see, thank you so much!
Do you need any other help?
What cool restaurants are there?
What kind of food do you want? Which city should I look in?
I like Fish. Try San Mateo.
I found 4 restaurants in San Mateo. Try Joy Sushi please.
Great! Can you book a table at the restaurant you mentioned last. It's for 4.
At what time?
Do it for 7 o"clock in the evening.
Please confirm the following details: Booking a table for 4 at Joy Sushi in San Mateo. The date is scheduled for March 13th at 7 pm.
Yes, that is perfect.
Your reservation was successful.
I want a place to eat in SF.
What type of food do you want?
I am in the mood for some Freshwater fish.
Akiko's Sushi Bar is in San Francisco.
Where are they located?
They are located at 542 A Mason Street.
What else do you have?
Alamo Square Seafood Grill is in San Francisco as well.
Do they have any live bands.
They do not have any live bands.
Book me that restaurant from earlier?
What time do you want to eat?
I wish to eat at 5:15 in the evening.
You want a table for 2 at Alamo Square Seafood Grill in San Francisco at 5:15 pm on March 5th, correct?
That is right.
I can't book that time. I can get a table for 2 at Alamo Square Seafood Grill in San Francisco at 5:30 pm on March 5th.
That is fine.
Your table is booked.
What is their location do they have alcohol?
They are located at 803 Fillmore Street and they don't have alcohol.
I want to find a place to eat.
What kind of food? Maybe, Mexican, American or somethig else. What City should I search in?
Some southern food in Pleasanton.
I have 4 restraunts for you. Baci Bistro And Bar is a really nice place in Pleasanton.
Is it very pircey? What is their address?
The address is 500 Main street. Yes the restaurant is expensive.
Can you book a table at the restaurant?
What time would you like to book the table?
For one person at 7:30 in the evening.
Okay, let's confirm the details. One table at Baci Bistro And Bar. The city is Pleasanton. The reservation is at 7:30 pm on March 14th and the reservation is for 1 person.
Yeah that sounds great.
Your reservation was successful. The phone number is 925-600-0600.
Will you find an economical restaurant that serves liquor?
Any preference? Indian, Chinese or something else? Which city?
Persian in Berkeley.
I found 1. Alborz Restaurant is in Berkeley.
When?
Quarter past 12 in the afternoon.
Please confirm a reservation for 2 at Alborz Restaurant in Berkeley on March 13th at 12:15 pm.
Cool. Phone number? Live music?
510-848-8877. No live music. I could not make the reesrvation. Try Alborz Restaurant for 2 on March 13th at 12:30 pm?
That's fine.
I've completed your reservation.
I'd like to find a restaurant.
In what city?
In San Jose.
Would you like Indian food, American food or something else?
I think I'd like tex-mex. And I don't care about the price range.
I have 1 restaurant, which is Chili's Grill & Bar In San Jose.
Thank you. Would you try making a restaurant reservation?
At what time?
At 7 o"clock in the evening.
Confirming a reservation on March 11th at 7 PM at Chili's Grill & Bar for 2 people in San Jose.
Sorry, make it for three people at six in the evening.
Confirming a 6 PM reservation for 3 people.
Sounds good. Do they serve alcohol and do they have live music?
No, they don't have live music but they do serve alcohol. That table has been booked.
Thanks for your help.
May I help you with anything else today?
I need to get some chow.
I'll find a place. Where do you want me to look?
Look in Millbrae.
That type of food are you hankering?
I could use some Chinese.
In Millbrae, I got 7. Asian Pearl is the standout.
Is it costly?
No, its moderate.
What else you got?
In Millbrae? Try Chef Wang's Restaurant.
Can I toss down a few cold ones there? Give their address.
There's no alcohol. Its at 1320 El Camino Real.
I'm on the wagon anyway.
So get you a table?
Nada. Shelve that.
Ok. What's next?
Great. Now about that restaurant. How about a table in the evening 5:15?
Table for 2 at Chef Wang's Restaurant in Millbrae at 5:15 pm on March 3rd?
Actually, I prefer 17:30.
2 for 5:30 pm?
You got it.
An you got a table.
They are in the moderate price range, right?
Yes. Moderate. Right.
Do they got a band? Whats their number.
No live music. 650-588-3648.
I need to find somewhere to eat.
Where should I search? Are you looking for Indian? Mexican?
I want some Cantonese food. I want it in SF.
I've found 10 restaurants. There's Alice's restaurant in San Francisco.
Yes, can we book a table at the restaurant.
What time for?
For one in the afternoon. It's for two people.
Okay, please confirm: table for 2 at Alice's in San Francisco at 1 pm on March 4th.
Yes, that's good.
Your reservation has been made.
I'm hungry find me somewhere to eat.
Sure, I can help with that. Would you like some Indian, Italian or is there anything else you may have a taste for? Also which city would you like to search in?
Pull up Gilroy. I really am in the mood for some Oriental.
Great idea! I found Ginger Cafe in Gilroy, I hear good things about this restaurant.
Alright please confirm 2 people for a table at Ginger cafe in Gilroy at 1:30 pm on March 10th.
You got it. Whats their address and phone number please.
Reservation made! There address is 8657 San Ysidro Avenue and the number is 408-847-2625
I am in a mood to eat outside once for which I need to find some good restaurant. Can you help me to find the one?
Yes, what is your favorite kind of food and in which City do I need to search for the restaurant?
Can you search some Veggie food in San Francisco?
Yes, what about a restaurant like Ben Wah Restaurant in San Francisco?
How can I contact them? Can you get me their phone number for my reference?
Yes, please note that their phone number is 415-318-8000.
Yes what about your convenient time to book the restaurant?
Book the table at evening 5:15.
I need your confirmation to book a table for 2 at Ben Wah Restaurant in San Francisco on March 3rd at 5:15 pm.
Yes, that is correct to proceed and also check whether the price range is above average?
The price range is moderate and unfortunately I could not book the table at the Ben Wah Restaurant for the time 5:15 pm. Shall I book it for another time at 5:30 pm on the same day March 3rd for 2 persons?
Okay, that is also a comfortable time for me. Go ahead.
Good, now the table was booked successfully as per the new time.
I need to know whether they will supply alcohol there and also let me know their address for contact.
Sorry, alcohol is not available there. Their address is 2786 California Street.
Please help me find a place to eat.
What kind of food do you prefer? Do you like Italian, Chinese or what? And in which city?
I prefer Nepalese in San Fran.
How about Cuisine Of Nepal Restaurant in San Francisco?
What time do you plan to go there?
At 6 pm.
Okay, you want a table for 4 people at Cuisine Of Nepal Restaurant in San Francisco on March 7th at 6 pm. Please confirm.
Yes, do they serve liquor and what is their phone number?
No, they don't serve liquor and their phone number is 415-647-2222. Your reservation is now confirmed!
What restaurants are there?
What kind of food do you like? You can say Mexican, Sushi, Chinese, Indian, diner, or another kind of food. Which city should I look in?
Burger food sounds good. Check San Francisco.
I found 10 restaurants for you in San Francisco 1760 is great restaurant.
What's their number?
415-359-1212.
What other places did you find?
25 Lusk is in San Francisco. It's highly rated.
What else is available?
3rd Cousin is also in San Francisco and they serve burgers.
Yes, that's great.
Do you want to make a reservation?
Not now. Maybe later.
May I assist you further?
For what time?
Do it for 7:45 pm. Becky likes to dine with me in the evenings.
Please confirm the following reservation details: Booking a table for 2 at 3rd Cousin in San Francisco. The reservation is for 7:45 pm on March 11th.
Yes, that's perfect.
Sorry the reservation did not go through at 3rd Cousin. Should I try again for 2 people on March 11th? This time I will book it for 7:30 pm.
Yes, that's okay, Becky should be fine with that time.
Congrats! Your reservations was booked successfully.
Hello, I'm feeling hungry. Please can you suggest me some good restaurant?
Sure, what do you prefer to eat?
I prefer to have Sushi kind of food.
Where you wish to dine?
I wish to dine in Dublin.
Okay! The restaurant, Halu Shabu Shabu located in Dublin is a nice restaurant. Do you wish to go here?
Will they serve alcohol? where it is located?
Sorry, they don't serve liquor. They are located at 4288 Dublin Boulevard #110. Do you prefer this one?
Please may I know if you have any other restaurant?
Please give me a moment...Yup, there is another pleasant restaurant, Yanagi Sushi & Grill Dublin located in Dublin. Do you wish to dine here?
Sure, at what time?
Please can you make it at 19:00.
Please can you confirm me that you wish to book a table at Yanagi Sushi & Grill Dublin at 7 pm on March 5th in the city of Dublin for 2 people, right?
Yup, that would work for me. Will they provide alchol and what's their address?
Nope, they do not serve alcohol and they are located in 6599 Dublin Boulevard and your reservation is successful.
Can you find me somewhere to eat in Santa Clara?
Sure, what food do you fancy?
Can you see if there's anything Mediterranean? Something moderate priced would be good.
I've found Athena Grill & Catering in Santa Clara, it looks nice - what do you think?
Yeah that sounds good to me
Great, do you want me to book a table for you?
Not right now, thanks.
Okay. Anything else I can do for you?
Sure, what time do you want it for?
Around 7:30 in the evening please
Okay, so do you want me to book a table for 2 at the Athena Grill & Catering in Santa Clara? I'll book it for 7:30 pm on March 6th.
Yes please. Could you get me their address too, and tell me if they have live music?
Table all booked for you! Unfortunately no live music, but I can get the address for you. They're at 1505 Space Park Drive.
Please find me some place to eat.
Any particular city I should search in? What cuisine did you have in mind?
Please find me a Ramen restaurant in San Fran.
There's a good restaurant in San Francisco known as 2g Japanese Brasserie.
That sounds perfect!
Should I go ahead and reserve a table here?
Okay thanks. Now let's go back to booking a table at the restaurant that I liked.
For what time should I make the reservation?
Please book it at afternoon 1:30.
Let me see if I got everything correctly: You'd like to reserve a table for at 2 at 2g Japanese Brasserie in San Francisco, for 1:30 pm on March 6th.
That is correct.
I have successfully made your reservation.
What's their phone number?
You can contact them by phone on 415-292-9997.
How expensive is it? Do they have a live band?
They don't play like music, and their price range is moderate.
Hi, could help me search for places to eat please?
Sure! Any preference on the restaurant location?
Yes, something in the SF area will do.
Any preference on the type of food?
Some Parisian food will be great for me, have been craving that all day.
There are 10 restaurants available, one of which is Amelie San Francisco which is located in San Francisco.
May I have their contact number, and do they play live music?
Sorry, they do not play music, but you can contact them at 415-292-6916.
What a pity, but I am fine with that.
Would you like me to make a reservation for you?
Perhaps at a later time.
Could I further assist you with something else?
Sure, when will you be dining in?
I will be visiting them at 5:30 in the evening.
Please confirm your reservation for 4 at Amelie San Francisco in San Francisco at 5:30 pm on March 9th.
Sure, do you know if they serve liquor and where are they currently located?
Your reservation has been made. They are located at 1754 Polk Street and they do serve alcohol.
I'm looking for a restaurant.
In which city?
I want Chinese in Palo Alto.
Chef Zhao Kitchen is a restaurant located in Palo Alto.
For what time?
Quarter past 12 in the afternoon would be great.
Please confirm you want to book a table for 4 at Chef Zhao Kitchen in Palo Alto on March 10th at 12:15 pm.
Yes. That's right.
I was not able to make the reservation. Would a table for 4 at 12 pm at Chef Zhao Kitchen on March 10th work?
Yes. That does work.
Your booking was a success.
I want enjoy a different cuisine. How will you help me?
Are you looking for it from a particular city? Which cuisine will make you satisfied ?
Pizza and Pasta will be the right food and particulary in Los Gatos.
Then you can visit Aldo's Ristorante & Bar in Los Gatos.
Confirm the details please, For 2 people you need a table at 1 pm on March 10th at Aldo's Ristorante & Bar in Los Gatos.
Very good. Give me their address.
You got a successful booking. The address of the hotel is 14109 South Winchester Boulevard.
I'm looking for a restaurant
In which city? Do you prefer Italian, American or other food?
I'd like some Deli food. I'm looking for it in Pleasant Hill
There's 1 restaurant. Mcdonald's in Pleasant Hill
Now I want to book a table for 1 people at the restaurant.
What time do you want the table?
I want to book at six pm
A table for 1 people at Mcdonald's in Pleasant Hill, on March 11th at 6 pm. Is it correct?
Yes, it is. Is there live music that day?
Yes, there is live music. Your table is booked!
Is it an expensive or cheap restaurant? At what address is it located?
Is an inexpensive restaurant. It's located in 1690 Contra Costa Boulevard
Ok, It's perfect!
Do you need anything else?
I need help finding a place to eat.
Is there a food you prefer?
European food would hit the spot.
Where would you like me to search?
Search for places in SF.
There are 6 restaurants that match. Ayola in San Francisco is nice.
Is there live music there?
There's no live music there.
What else do you recommend?
Bar Tartine in San Francisco is nice.
Okay, that sounds good.
Would you like to book a table?
We can do that later.
What else would you like help with?
What time would you like the table?
I want it at 12 o"clock in the afternoon.
I'll book you a table fore 2 at Bar Tartine in San Francisco for March 8th at 12 pm, is that correct?
Yeah, that's good. Is there live music, and what's their telephone number?
I've booked they table. There's no live music there. You can call them at 415-487-1601.
I want to eat some parisian food at a very expensive restaurant in los gatos.
manresa is a lovely restaurant in los gatos.
Yes, that would be fine.
Would you like to reserve a table there?
Not right now.
Is there anything I can assist you with?
I want to book a table for three for quarter past 6 in the evening.
You would like to book a table for 3 at manresa in los gatos for 6:15 pm on March 9th?
Yes, that would be great.
I am sorry, but the reservation was unsuccessful. Would you like a reservation for 3 at manresa at 6:30 pm on March 9th?
Yes, that would be fine.
I have made the reservation.
What is the address and is alcohol served there?
It is at 320 village lane and alcohol is not served.
Can you find me somewhere to eat?
Absolutely. What food do you fancy - Italian, Mexican? And where would you like to eat?
Can you see if there's somewhere in SFO that serves fish?
Sure. I've found 10 in San Francisco - what about Akiko's Sushi Bar?
Is there anything else? I'm saving money so something economical.
Okay, what about Alamo Square Seafood Grill in San Francisco? That looks nice.
Where is it?
It's at 803 Fillmore Street.
Sure. What time would you like it for?
Quarter past 12 in the afternoon please
Thanks. Please just confirm that you want me to book at table for 2 at the Alamo Square Seafood Grill in San Francisco? I'll book the table for 12:15 pm on March 7th.
Sorry, can you make the table for three people?
No problem. So do you want me to book the table for 3 on March 7th?
Yes please
Sorry, I couldn't book it the table at Alamo Square Seafood Grill. Do you want me to try booking a table for 3 at 12 pm on March 7th?
Yes please, thank you
Table has been booked for you!
Thanks, what's their number?
IT's 415-440-2828
Can you find a good eatery for me?
Sure. Do you want it to be Italian, Mexican, or something else?
I'd like to see what Japanese food San Fran has to offer.
I found 10 Japanese eateries in San Francisco, including 2G Japanese Brasserie.
That sounds good to me.
Want to get a table there?
Not right now.
Can I help some more?
Thanks. I'm also ready to book the table at the Japanese eatery we talked about.
At what time?
Book a table for one at five pm.
You want a table for 1 at 2G Japanese Brasserie in San Francisco at 5 pm on March 3rd?
Yes. Does live music play there? What's the price range?
I booked your table. Live music does not play there. Their prices are moderate.
I'm looking for a restaurant
In which city? What would you like to eat?
In Oakland. I'd like some Asian kind of food
In Oakland I found Battambang Restaurant
Ok, It's fine!
Do you want to book a table now?
Perfect! Now I want to book at the restaurant.
At what time do you prefer?
I want to book at half past 6 in the evening
A table for 2 people at Battambang Restaurant in Oakland, on March 3rd at 6:30 pm. Do you confirm?
Yes, I confirm. Thanks
Your table is confirmed!
Can I get their contact number? Is it a costly or cheap restaurant?
Their contact number is 510-839-8815. Is a price range moderate restaurant
I'm looking for a restaurant that has live music.
What city would you like to look in?
Look for a place in Los Gatos.
Is there a particular food you like?
Actually, I want Fast food somewhere in the Fremont area.
Mcdonald's in Fremont is nice.
Now can you book me a table at the restaurant you mentioned before.
What time would you like the table reservation for?
I want it for morning 10:45.
I'll book you a table for 2 at Mcdonald's in Fremont for March 13th at 10:45 am.
Okay, nice. What are the prices like?
The prices are inexpensive. I'm sorry but the reservation did not go through. Do you want me to make a reservation at McDonald's for 2 people on March 13th at 11 am instead?
Yeah, that's fine.
I've booked the reservation.
Where are they located? And do they have liquor?
They're located on 42800 Mission Boulevard. They don't have alcohol.
Can you find me a place to eat in Campbell?
What type of food are you looking for? American, Chinese, or anything else?
Some snacks would be great.
Stacks is a snack restaurant located in Campbell.
That sounds wonderful.
Do you want me to reserve a table for you?
Perhaps later, not right now.
Do you need help with anything else?
What time do you want to reserve?
Can you book me a table at evening 7?
Please confirm: book a table for 3 at Stacks in Campbell on March 12th at 7 pm.
Yes, that sounds great. Do they offer live music? What's the price range?
Your reservation is confirmed. They do not offer live music, and their price range is moderate.
Find me an affordable place to eat which serves alcohol
What kind of food?
Malaysian will be good
Which city to look in?
search in Palo Alto
There is the Lotus Thai Bistro in Palo Alto
That is good
Should i book a table here?
Please book a table at the earlier restaurant
at what time?
make it for 6:30 pm
Please confirm: Booking a table for 2 Lotus Thai Bistro in Palo Alto at 6:30 pm on march 5th
yes, thats right
Sorry there was an error. Any thing else?
Please try again at afternoon 12:30
Please confirm: Booking a table for 2 Lotus Thai Bistro in Palo Alto at 12:30 pm on march 5th
yes thats right. Do they have live music and whats their address?
Your booking is done. They do not have live music and their address is 425 California Avenue
I need to find a restaurant.
In which city?
In Walnut Creek.
Are you looking for Chinese, Indian or something else?
Some Sichuan would be great.
China Palace Restaurant is in Walnut Creek.
What's their location?
They're located at 2932 North Main Street.
Okay. That's perfect.
Would you like a table reservation?
Can you book the table for 12:30 in the afternoon for 2?
Please confirm you want me to book a table on march 8th for 2 at China Palace Restaurant in Walnut Creek at 12:30 pm.
Yes. That is correct.
Your booking was a success.
Hi, could you help me search for a place to eat which is not very costly?
Are there any preferences you might have?
Some Lithuanian cuisine will be great.
Any preference on the restaurant location?
Something in Alameda will be fine.
Sure, would you like to visit Mama Papa Lithuania Restaurant in Alameda?
That is fine with me.
Would you like me to make a reservation for you?
When will you be dining in?
Most likely at half past 1 in the afternoon.
I see, please confirm your reservation for 2 at Mama Papa Lithuania Restaurant in Alameda at 1:30 pm on March 9th.
Sure, that is fine with me.
Your reservation has been made.
Find me a restaurant to eat at.
Do you like Chinese, Italian or something else and what city do you want to eat in?
I want to eat some Spicy Indian food in Pleasanton.
Search revealed 7 results. Aappakadai in Pleasanton serves Spicy Indian food.
Are they intermediate priced and do they have live bands?
They have moderate prices and they do not have live bands.
What time do you want to eat?
I wish to eat at 17:30.
You want a table for 2 at Aappakadai in Pleasanton on March 3rd at 5:30 pm. Is that right?
That is right. Can you tell me their phone number and their location?
Your booking is complete. They are located at 4555 Hopyard Road and you can contact them at 925-750-7709.
How about a suggestion for dinner?
What city are you interested in? What about Chinese or Indian food?
Give me some Taiwanese in Concord.
What about Hunan restaurant? It's in Concord?
Please confirm this: 1 on March 1st at 6:30 pm for Hunan Restaurant in Concord.
No, scratch that, make it for 2 at 18:15.
Ok, changing it to 2 for 6:15 pm.
Yes, indeed. What's their contact number?
Phone them at 925-827-4800. The time you want isn't available. What about trying for Hunan Restaurant 6 pm instead on March 1st for 2?
Just do it.
That works. You are reserved.
I want to eat someplace in San Francisco.
What type of food? You can say Indian, Italian, Vegetarian, or something else.
Small plates would be perfect.
Aatxe has small plates and is in San Francisco.
What's the address and is their live music?
Their address is 2174 Market Street and they don't have live music.
What else is available? Check Redwood City.
La Viga Seafood & Cocina Mexicana is in Redwood City.
Yes, that will work.
Do you want to book a table?
Could you try booking a table at that La Viga place?
What time is it for?
Make it for two an book it for morning 11:15.
Please confirm the following: Booking a table for 2 at La Viga Seafood & Cocina Mexicana in Redwood City for March 1st at 11:15 am.
Yes, that will work.
Sorry that did not work. Shall I try again at La Viga Seafood & Cocina Mexicana? I can try for 2 people, March 1st at 11 am.
Yes that will work.
Your reservation is now confirmed!
I need to find a place to eat.
Can you tell me which city should I look for the restaurant, and what kind of food you would prefer? It can be American, Indian or something else.
I would enjoy some Punjabi kind of food. I want the restaurant to be located in San Jose.
There are 8 restaurants which match what you want. 8elements is a good restaurant which can be found in San Jose.
Can you tell me if they serve liquor? Can you also give me their address?
The address of the restaurant is 1781 Capitol Expressway. The restaurant does serve alcohol.
Now I want to book a table at the restaurant I liked before. I want the booking to be for seven in the evening.
Can you please confirm that you want to book a table for 2 people at 8elements in San Jose on March 1st at 7 pm?
That suits me well.
Your requested booking has been made.
I appreciate it very much.
Is there something else I can help you with?
I'm seeking a place to eat with California food in Oakland.
I would like 3 restaurants. Dopo would be nice in Oakland.
Yes, that works.
Do you want to reserve a table here?
Maybe a later time.
Would I be able to help you with something else.
Please confirm booking Dopo in Oakland at 7:30 pm for 3 people March 8th.
Yes, that is good for me.
Sorry, I couldn't make a reservation. Is there anything else I can help with.
I would like to book for 2 people at 6:30 pm.
Please confirm a booking Dopo in Oakland at 6:30 pm for 2 people March 8th.
Yes, that will work for me.
The reservation is successful.
I don't feel like cooking so I would like you to look for a place in fremont that serves some curry kind of food
In fremont I've found paradise biryani pointe
look for the phone number and if they are pricey
phone number is 510-598-4940, the price range is moderate
I can eat there
May I book a table?
Not at the moment
What can I do for you then?
cool, now let's go back to the restaurant thing, book a table for four at 1:15 pm
Confirm me your plan. You want to book a table for 4 at paradise biryani pointe in fremont on march 1st at 1:15 pm
yes, I would really love so, I need the address and I would also love to know if they play live music
You won't listen to live music while there. The address is 5029 mowry avenue but I couldn't book the table. What I can do it to see if they have a spot for 4 on march 1st at 1:30 pm at paradise biryani pointe
please try, I really wanna go there
I was able to book the table for you
I am looking for nice restaurant.
Which city are you in?
In Santa Clara.
Chinese, Mexican or which type do you want?
I want budget fast food of some kind, in a place that plays live music.
There is McDonald's in Santa Clara.
Where abouts are they?
3509 Homestead Road.
Do they sell alcohol and what is the telephone number?
Yes they do sell alcohol and their contact number is 408-243-2897.
That suits me fine.
Will I book a table for you.
not right now.
What else can I do for you?
Now I think I will book the restaurant we discussed.
What time would suit you best?
around 6:30 in the evening.
To confirm then that is a table for 2 at McDonald's, Santa Clara, at 6:30 pm on March 14th.
Yes that suits me fine.
Your booking is confirmed.
I am searching for a place to eat.
In which city shall I looked in? What type of food do you need? It may be Chinese, American or anything else.
I prefer Tacos type of food in Pleasanton.
Alberto's Cantina is a great restaurant in Pleasanton.
When will you need the reservation?
Reserve at two in the afternoon.
Kindly ensure that, on March 9th, a table has been booked for 2 persons at Alberto's Cantina in Pleasanton at 2 pm.
No. It is for 1 person at seven in the evening.
Kindly ensure that, the reservation is for 1 person at 7 pm.
It is good for me. What about the pricey there?
Your reservation is done. It is a moderate price range.
What is their contact address?
Their contact address is 435 Main Street.
Hello! please can you find an average priced restaurant in Oakland?
Sure! Are you looking for Indian, Chinese, American or any other food?
I would like to have some Tacos kind of food.
Okay there are 8 restaurants for you. The best one among them is Agave Uptown that is located in Oakland. do you wish to dine here?
Do they have liquor? At what number I can contact them?
Nope, there is no alcohol provided. You can call them at 510-288-3668.
Please can you try booking a table at the restaurant that I chosen earlier?
Sure, at what time?
Please can you reserve at 1:30 in the afternoon.
Sure. Please can you confirm that you wish to book a table at Agave Uptown in Oakland for 2 people on March 8th at 1:30 pm, right?
Nope, please can you make it at 6:30 pm.
Sure. Please can you confirm that you wish to reserve on March 8th at 6:30 pm, right?
Yup, that works for me.
Okay! your booking is successful.
I am searching for a place to eat around Fremont and i want some korean barbeque.
There is one nice restaurant called Bob Sang in Fremont.
Are they provide liquor? Can i know their contact number?
Yes, they serve liquor. The contact number is 510-252-9844.
Can you suggest me the restaurant in Milpitas?
I searched 3 restaurants. One of the nice restaurant called Cj House Korean Bbq located in Milpitas.
Can you book the table at the restaurant i liked at one in the afternoon?
Please give confirmation details: Table booking at Cj House Korean Bbq which is in Milpitas city and the booking date is march 6th for 2 people at 1 pm.
Do it at 17:30.
Please give confirmation details: The booking is for 2 people at 5:30 pm.
Fine . this is okay for me. Is there a live music?
Your booking is done. There is no live music.
What about their price?
A moderate price range.
Find me a place that serves French food.
What city do you want?
Search in San Francisco.
Search revealed 10 results. Amelie San Francisco serves French food in San Francisco.
How do I contact them?
You can contact them at 415-292-6916.
What else do you have?
Aquitaine Wine Bar & Bistro is in San Francisco.
That is great.
Shall I book you a reservation?
No, not right now.
Do you need more help?
I need a table at that restaurant from earlier.
What time do you want to eat?
I wish to eat at 12:30 pm.
You want a table for 2 at Aquitaine Wine Bar & Bistro in San Francisco on March 11th at 12:30 pm, correct?
That is right. Do they have extravagant prices and what is their contact information?
Your booking is complete. They have moderate prices and you can get in touch with them at 415-402-5290.
I need a place to eat.
What type of cuisine do you prefer? Italian, American or something else?
How about Noodles? I need something in San Jose that is not very costly.
How about Chef Li in San Jose?
Can I get the address?
Their address is 2033 Camden Avenue # F3.
Do they feature live music?
No, they do not.
Okay, that will work.
Would you like a reservation?
Not now.
Is there anything else that you need?
Sure. For what time?
Try for seven in the evening.
Please confirm the following: I am booking a table for 2 at Chef Li in San Jose for March 4th at 7 pm.
Yes. Does the restaurant serve alcohol? What is their contact number?
The restaurant does not serve alcohol. You can reach them at 408-377-8310. Your reservation is successful.
I need help finding a restaurant.
Please tell the city I should search in and cuisine you prefer.
A Walnut Creek restaurant that has a Sushi Bar would be perfect.
The nice Kaiwa Sushi in Walnut Creek is one of the 2 restaurants I found.
You mentioned finding two restaurants. What's your other suggestion?
May I suggest Kana Sushi, a nice Walnut Creek restaurant?
Sure, that's fine with me.
Should I go ahead and reserve a table here?
Remember the restaurant I liked? Please make a 6:30 pm reservation for 1 there.
Sure, no problem. Please confirm that you'd like to reserve a table for 1 at the Kana Sushi restaurant in Walnut creek on March 3rd, at 6:30 pm.
That is correct. Do they serve alcohol?
I have successfully made your reservation. No, it is a dry restaurant.
I'm really hungry and would like to find a restaurant with afforadable prices.
Any particular city I should search in? What type of cuisine did you have in mind? You can tell me American, Indian or something else.
Please search for an Oriental restaurant in Burlingame.
I found a nice restaurant in Burlingame known as Barracuda Japanese Restaurant.
Sounds perfect!
Should I go ahead and reserve a table here?
Okay thanks. Please try booking a table at the restaurant I liked.
For what time should I make the reservation?
Please book it for 6:45 in the evening.
Okay. Please confirm that you'd like to reserve a table for 2 at Barracuda Japanese Restaurant in Burlingame , for 6:45 pm. on March 3rd.
No, I'll be dining alone. Make it a table for one.
Sure, no problem. Please confirm that the reservation is for 1 person, on March 3rd.
You got that right.
Unfortunately, I was unable to make your preferred reservation at the nice Barracuda Japanese Restaurant. There's an open table for 1 on March 3rd at 7 pm. Does that work for you?
Yes, that's fine with me.
I have successfully made your reservation.
Hi, I'm hungry and I need somewhere to eat. Can you find me a place?
What city should I look in?
How about San Rafael?
What type of cuisine are you looking for?
I'm in the mood for some Italian food.
I found 4 restaurants in San Rafael. How about Gaspare's Pizzeria Ristorante?
Is there anything else you can suggest?
How about Il Davide in San Rafael? It's nice.
What time would you like the table for?
Please make it for seven in the evening.
So you'd like a table for 2 at Il Davide in San Rafael for 7 pm on March 10th. Does that sound good?
Sounds good to me.
Your table has been booked!
Where are they located? Do they play live music?
They do not play live music, no. You can find them at 901 A Street.
Hi, could you suggest some nice places where I can dine at?
Any specific food preference you might have, such as Italian or American food? And what location do you prefer to dine at?
A restaurant serving pasta in Fairfield would be great!
Sure, there are 1 restaurant called Johnny Carino's which serves up nice Pasta in Fairfield.
I see, what is the price range of their food and do they serve liquor?
Unfortunately, they do not serve alcohol but they are moderate priced.
Sure, please confirm your reservation for 2 at Johnny Carinos in Fairfield at 7 pm on March 3rd.
Sure, I am fine with that.
Your reservation has been made!
I'm hungry and I need somewhere to eat. Any price range is fine.
What city should I look in?
I'd like a restaurant in SFO.
What cuisine are you looking for? For example: Chinese, American, etc.
I'm in the mood for some Ramen.
I found 10 restaurants that you may like. 2g Japanese Brasserie is good and it is in San Francisco.
Yes, that's perfect.
Should I book a table for you?
Now back to booking the restaurant reservation. Can you book me a table for 2 people at 20:00?
So you'd like a table for 2 at 2g Japanese Brasserie in San Francisco at 8 pm on March 3rd. Is this correct?
Yes, that's great. Do they serve alcohol?
Sorry, I couldn't book the table. Is there anything else I can help with?
I'd like to book a table for quarter past 7 in the evening.
So you'd like a table for 2 at 2g Japanese Brasserie in San Francisco. You'd like the reservation for 7:15 pm on March 3rd. Is that correct?
Yes, that's perfect.
Sorry, I couldn't book the table. How about 2g Japanese Brasserie for 2 people on March 3rd at 7:30 pm?
Yes, that's great.
Your reservation has been booked.
I want to eat Pasta in Walnut Creek.
In Walnut Creek I found 7. How about Caffe Delle Stelle Restaurant?
Do they have alcohol and what is contact?
Yes and number is 510-943-1094
That works for me.
Do you want to book.
Confirm for 2 at 1 pm on March 7th for Caffe Delle Stelle Restaurant in Walnut Creek.
Ok, how pricey and what is address?
Address is 1532 North Main Street and they are moderate.
Will you find a restaurant?
Any preference? Which city?
Afforadable Peruvian in Oakland.
I found 2. La Furia Chalaca is in Oakland.
Address? They serve alcohol?
310 Broadway. No alcohol served.
Please confirm a reservation for 2 at La Furia Chalaca in Oakland on March 12th at 8 pm.
Cool.
I could not reserve a table. Anything else?
Try 7:45 in the evening?
Please confirm a reservation for 2 at La Furia Chalaca in Oakland on March 12th at 7:45 pm.
Great. Live music? Phone number?
Yes, live music. You may reach them at 510-451-4206. Reservation was unsuccessful. Try La Furia Chalaca for 2 on March 12th at 7:30 pm?
Sure.
I've completed your reservation.
I'm famished and would like to find a restaurant with moderate prices.
What type of cuisine did you have in mind?, such as Mexican, American or something else?
Please find a place that serves Sushi.
Any particular city I should search in?
It should be in Morgan Hill.
Hanami Sushi, a nice restaurant is one of the 2 restaurants I found in Morgan Hill.
Please find out whether they have live music, and get me their phone number.
They don't play live music and you can reach them by phone on 408-778-6288.
Cool, sounds good.
Should I go ahead and reserve a table here.
Not right away.I might do so later.
Will you be needing my help with anything else?
Okay, now please reserve a table for 3 at the restaurant I liked.
For what time should I make the reservation?
It should be for 13:15.
Okay, no problem. Please confirm that you'd like to reserve a table for 3 at Hanami Sushi in Morgan Hill for 1:15 pm on March 1st.
That is correct.
Unfortunately, I was unable to make your preferred reservation at the nice Hanami Sushi restaurant. There's an open table for 3 on March 1st at 1:30 pm. Will that be fine?
Sure, that's fine with me.
I have successfully made your reservation.
Help me look for places to eat.
Indian, Italian or something else? which city should I search for?
Burgers in Livermore would be perfect
I found 1 castle rock restaurant in Livermore.
Do they have live music? what is their phone number?
They have live music and their number is 925-456-7100
Also book the table for 1 at 11:00
Booking a table for 1 at castle rock restaurant in livermore at 11 am on march 4th
sounds perfect to me
Booking confirmed.
Do they serve alcohol?
Yes, they do.
I want a place to eat
what food do you want?
italian food in napa
9 restaurants and allegria is there in napa
I want a place for two people
what time for?
afternoon 1 please
table at allegria in napa for 1 pm and 2 people on march 9th
yes that works
it went through
Can you please find me a place to eat?
Sure, but first please tell me in which city as well as the type of cuisine you're looking for - like Mexican, Italian or anything else?
I'd go for some Coffeehouse in Hayward.
Mcdonald's Hayward is actually very nice.
Yes, please also book a table to the previously found restaurant.
For what time?
7:30 in the evening, please.
Can you please confirm that you want a table for 2 at McDonald's Hayward for March 7th at 7:30 pm?
Yes, that's correct. Do you know if they have a live music band?
I've successfully placed you reservation. The restaurant has live music.
Hi there, could you help me find a place to eat in Morgan Hill please.
Do you have any food preferences, such as Chinese or Indian food?
A restaurant which serves burger would be great for me!
Would you like to eat at 88 Keys Cafe in Morgan Hill?
Sure, this is fine with me.
Would you like me to make a reservation for you?
Perhaps later on.
Could I further assist you then?
Could you now help me book a table at the restaurant mentioned just now?
Sure, what time will you need the reservation for?
Perhaps at seven in the evening.
Sure, please confirm your reservation for 2 at 88 Keys Cafe in Morgan Hill at 7 pm on March 9th.
Sure, that is fine for me.
Your reservation has been made!
Thank you, do you know if they have live music and the price range of their food?
They play live music and their food are moderate priced.
i like to eat food outside home. find me some good place to eat? pizza kind of food will be perfect.find it in alameda with some intermediate priced food?
what about c'era una volta which is a nice restaurant located in alameda?
ok thats suits for me.
would you like to reserve a table over here?
will you try to book a table at the restaurant which i liked? i need a table for 1 people.
at what time the reservation should be?
i need at seven pm.
please confirm the following details. book a table at c'era una volta. the city is alameda. the reservation is at 7 pm for 1 people and the date is march 7th.
ok that sound good to me.
sorry i was not able to reserve. Can i try reservation for 1 people on march 7th at 6:30 pm in c'era una volta restaurant?
ok that works for me.
reservation is successful.
what is their phone number and its address?
their street address is 1332 park street d. their phone number is 510-769-4828.
I want to find moderate priced curry food to eat.
What city do you want?
The city is Half Moon Bay.
In Half Moon Bay, I have India Beach.
How about Cambodian food?
In Half Moon Bay, I found 1 called Spice Me Thai Cuisine.
How about booking the restaurant now?
What time would you like?
Book 6:45 in the evening.
Confirm 6:45 pm for 2 on March 9th at Spice Me Thai Cuisine in Half Moon Bay.
Change it to 1.
Confirm change to 1 for March 9th.
That works for me.
I was only able to make it on March 9th for 1 at 6:30 pm for Spice Me Thai Cuisine.
That works for me too.
You are now confirmed.
I need to get a nice Pizza fix for my day off.. Where do you advise that I go in the moderate price range?
Tell me city you want to check, please.
What's place in Napa?
If you like, you could choose the Allegria restaurant in Napa.
Is live music featured?
It seems there is no live music there.
All right. What's their street address and phone number, please.
You can find this place at 1026 1st Street, and the number there is 707-254-8006.
Wonderful. I think I'm ready to reserve a table at that restaurant for eleven in the morning.
Okay. You are confirming that you want to book a table for 2 at Allegria in Napa city on March 3rd at 11 am?
Oh, make that a table for one, and I remember now that I can't make it there until 5 in the evening.
All right. Are you ready to confirm a reservation for 1 guest at 5 pm?
I am. Let's seal the deal.
Your table reservation is all set.
Can I get liquor there?
No alcohol is served there.
I am wanting to go to an Italian restaurant in Novato.
There is Aurora Ristorante Italiano in Novato.
Any other options maybe Asian Fusion, that would be great.
There are 2 possibilities, Anokha Cuisine of India is a good restaurant in Novato.
Yes that would suit.
Would you like me to make a reservation for you?
Possibily a bit later.
Do you need help with anything else?
Could you book a table or 2 at the restaurant we discussed previously?
What time for?
for half past 12 in the afternoon.
To confirm then that is a table for 2 at 12:30 pm on March 13th at Anokha Cuisine of India in Novato.
Yes that is it.
Your booking is now confirmed.
Hi, could you help me search for some take-out food which is average priced in San Mateo?
Sure, would you like Mr Pizza Man San Mateo, which is located in San Mateo.
Do they have live music and do they serve liquor there?
No they do not play live music and serve alcohol.
Are there any alternative restaurants which serves alcohol?
Sure, there is 1 restaurant in San Mateo called North Beach Pizza.
Yes, I am fine with that.
Would you like me to make a reservation for you?
Perhaps at a later time. Thanks!
Sure, could I further assist you then?
Could you book a table for 2 at the restaurant you have found previously? Preferably at 20:00, thans!
Please confirm your reservation for 2 at North Beach Pizza in San Mateo at 8 pm on March 9th.
I am fine with that, do you know whether they play live music on venue and how can I contact them?
Sorry, your reservation could not be made. Could I further assist you?
Yes, could you try booking at 7 in the evening again for a group of 4 people?
Sure, please confirm your reservation for 4 at North Beach Pizza in San Mateo at 7 pm on March 9th.
Sure, that is fine with me.
Sorry, your reservation can not be made. Would you like a reservation for 4 at North Beach Pizza in San Mateo at 6:30 pm on March 9th instead?
Sure, that is fine with me too.
Your reservation has been made, enjoy!
Thank you so much!
Could I further assist you?
Hi, could you help me find some places to eat in the San Fran area please?
Sure, are there any types of food you are looking at?
I would love to have some Sichuan food please.
There are 10 available restaurants for you one of which is Alice's which is located in San Francisco.
Could you make a reservation at the other restaurant too?
Sure, what time will you be dining in?
I will be visiting them at 5 pm.
Sure, could you make a reservation for 2 at Alice's in San Francisco at 5 pm on March 2nd?
Sure, that is fine with me. May I know the price range of their food items?
Your reservation has been made, and the food there is inexpensive.
I see, that is great! Where are they currently located at?
You can find them at 1599 Sanchez Street.
Can you please help me find a restaurant?
In which city? And what type of cuisine? You can say something like Italian, American, or something else.
I'd prefer a diner in Vallejo.
I found 2 diners in Vallejo. One is Black Angus Steakhouse.
What's the other?
McDonald's is located in Vallejo.
How can I reach them?
Their number is 707-552-9798.
Yes, that one works for me.
Do you want to reserve a table?
Perhaps at a later time.
Do you need help with anything else?
Can you book a table for 4 at the restaurant I liked?
At what time is the reservation?
17:30 would be perfect.
Please confirm: you want to book a table at Mcdonald's in Vallejo at 5:30 pm on March 5th. The table is for 4 people.
Yes, that sounds correct.
I've confirmed your reservation.
Do they serve liquor? Are they cheap?
They're inexpensive, and yes they serve alcohol.
I'd like help searching for somewhere to eat.
Is there a kind of you prefer?
I really want to go to a Sushi Bar.
What city would you like to search in?
I want to find a place in Santa Rosa.
Haku Sushi in Santa Rosa is nice?
Do they have liquor. And where are the specifically?
The address is 518 7th Street. The do not have liquor.
Okay, that's fine by me.
Do you want to book a table?
Let's do that later.
What else can I help you with?
I'll book a table for 4 at Haku Sushi in Santa Rosa on March 7th at 11:30 am, is that correct?
That's correct, yeah.
I'm sorry but the reservation did not go through. Do you need me for anything else?
Try that reservation again, but with 2 people.
I'll book a table for 2 at Haku Sushi in Santa Rosa on March 7th at 11:30 am, is that correct?
Yes, try that. Do they have live music there? And how are the prices, not very costly I hope?
I'm sorry, but the reservation didn't go through. Do you need me to do anything else?
Okay, let's try again. Book it for the evening 5.
I'll book a table for 2 at Haku Sushi in Santa Rosa on March 7th at 5 pm, is that correct?
Yes, please try that.
The table is booked.
Hi, i need a help, i am very hungry now, could you find me a good place to eat?
yes, i can help you, which type of food are you looking for?
I like some oriental kind of foods.
okay, which city should i search in ?
i am looking around in San Mateo
I have found a restaurant for you in San mateo, The restaurant name is Izakaya Ginji.
Cool, What is the price range are they?
Their price range is moderate.
Yes, it seems good for me.
Can i make a reservation for you?
Okay, thanks, i need to book a table at the restaurant i liked, book it at evening 7.
please confirm the following details: The restaurant name is Izakaya Ginji and it is located at San mateo, The reservation date is march 11th at 7 pm and the reservation for 2 people.
No, It is for 3 people.
please confirm the following details:The restaurant name is Izakaya Ginji and it is located at San mateo, The reservation date is march 11th at 7 pm and the reservation for 3 people.
Yes, that's right, may i know do they serve liquor?
Congratulations, Your reservation is successful, Yes, they serve liquor.
okay, thanks, give me their address.
Their address is 301 East 4th Avenue.
I need a place to eat that has live music.
In which city and what kind of cuisine? Would you like indian, mexican or something else?
I am in the mood to eat mexican food in SF.
There is 1 such restaurant in San Francisco. I recommend los yaquis.
Is alcohol served there? What are they located?
The address is 324 south van ness avenue and alcohol is served.
Yes, that would be great.
Would you like to reserve a table there?
Not right now.
Is there something else you would like?
I want to reserve at table for three for 12:15.
You would like a table for 3 at los yaquis in san francisco for march 3rd at 12:15 pm?
Yes, that would be fine.
I was unable to make the reservation. You would like to reserve a table for 3 at los Yaquis on march 3rd at 12 pm?
Yes, that would be fine.
I have made the reservation.
Is there a contact number for there? Is the food expensive?
The number is 415-252-8204 and the prices are moderate.
How will be the weather in SD on March 7th?
90 degree Fahrenheit average temperature with 17 percent chance of rain.
What's the weather going to be in San Pablo on the 6th of March?
The temperature should be about 73 degrees Fahrenheit with a 21 percent chance of rain.
Thanks. What's the weather going to be in Seattle, WA on March 12th?
The temperature should be about 66 degrees with a 34 percent chance of rain in Seattle.
I want to check the weather
In which city's weather do you want to search?
In district of columbia
The average temperature for the day is 75 degrees fahrenheit and there is a 13 percent chance to rain.
whats the expected humid?
The humid is around 36 percent
I'd like to check the weather
Which city would you like to check the weather for?
Check it in phoenix please
The average temperature should be 89 F with a 15 % chance of rain
How humid is it expected to be
The humidity is expected to be 23 %
I wonder if its a good day to go outside. What is the weather like?
In what city do you want to check the weather?
I am in Sacramento, CA of course.
82 degress Fahrenheit is the average temperature today and there is a 26 percentage possibility of raining.
What is the weather?
Which city should I check for you?
What's the weather in Phoenix?
The average temperature for today is 89 degrees. The chance of rain is 15 percent.
How's the weather in San Francisco on March 13th?
There's a 9 percent chance of rain and it'll be about 94 degrees.
How about Vegas on March 14th?
There's a 15 percent chance of rain and it'll be 71 degrees.
Please tell me the weather forecast for March 5th, in Vancouver.
The expected average temperature for the day is 62 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 56 percent chance of rain.
Can you check the weather in London on 12th of March?
The expected average temperature through the day is 87 degree Fahrenheit with 21 percent chance of rain.
How humid and windy is it expected to be?
The expected humidity is 32 percent and average wind speed will be 2 miles per hour.
Please help me to check the weather condition in KL.
Yes, please note that the average temperature should be 102 degrees Fahrenheit and the chance of rain is 8 %
I want to check the weather in Lagunitas.
It's 92 degrees Fahrenheit and there's a 18 percent chance of rain.
What about on March 3rd?
It'll be 87 degrees Fahrenheit with a 12 percent chance of rain.
And how about on March 12th in Anaheim?
It'll be 71 degrees Fahrenheit with a 16 percent chance of rain.
What's the weather in Saratoga?
It's 78 degrees with a 1 percent chance of rain.
How about Sydney Australia for March 10th?
Average temp should be 92 degrees with a 5 percent chance of rain.
Is it going to be windy?
Only 1 mile per hour.
What's the humidity going to be like?
Expect the humidity to be about 20 percent.
What about on March 12th?
Average temps for that day is about 101 degrees with a 2 percent chance of rain.
Hey, what's the weather gonna be in Sacramento on the 1st of March. I need to know if I should buy a coat.
The weather is expected to be 82 degrees Fahrenheit with a 26 percent chance of rain.
What's the weather forecast for Anaheim on March 5th?
The average temperature for the day will be 75 degrees, with a 4 percent chance of rain.
What will theweather be like in Seattle on March 5th?
The temp should be 61 degrees Fahrenheit and there is an 18 percent chance of rain.
I want to know if I should buy a coat. How's the weather gonna be in San Rafael on Wednesday next week?
The average temperature should be 76 degrees Fahrenheit with a 14 percent chance of rain.
Good to know. How about in Vancouver, BC on March 5th?
The average temperature should be 62 degrees Fahrenheit with a 56 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy? How humid is it expected to be?
The humidity should be around 43 percent with a 12 miles per hour average wind.
Please tell me what the weather will be on this Saturday in San Fran.
There is a 15 percent chance of rain on that and the average temperature should be 72.
Will it be very humid?
The humidity is forecasted to be about 30 percent.
Tell me the weather on March 8th for Vegas.
It average 76 degrees with a 17 percent chance of rain.
What about humidity and wind?
Humidity is expected to be around 36 percent with a 7 mile per hour wind.
i need to know about the weather condition on March 3rd , will you find the weather on that day?
In which city i need to check the weather for?
In the city San Diego.
the average temperature for the day be 82 degrees fahrenheit and there is a 7 percent chance of rain.
I wanna see what the weather is gonna be like.
Which city would you like to check?
Kuala Lumpur please.
There is an 8 percent chance of rain but the average temp for the day will be a toasty 102 degrees.
I want to check the weather!
In which city?
In Ciudad de Mexico.
The average temperature is about 102 degrees with a 0 percent chance of rain.
How windy will it be?
The wind speed will around 12 miles per hour.
I'm going on a little day trip. Can you check the weather for me in Nairobi on March 13th?
Sure. Looks like the average temperature is 89 degrees Fahrenheit that day, and there's a 1 percent chance of rain.
How about the humidity?
It will be around 15 percent.
I want to check the weather condition, need your help.
In which City, do I need to check it? Any preferred area?
Check it in Philadelphia.
Checked and found that average temperature will be 81 degrees Fahrenheit and there will be a chance of 8 % for rain.
What abut the Wind speed? Is that high or normal?
Average Wind speed will be 4 miles per hour. Any other information you need?
I want to check the weather in Atlanta.
The temperature is 86 degrees F with a 28 % chance of rain.
Check the weather for Sydney for the March 2nd please.
One moment. The average temperature for that day should be 101 degrees Fahrenheit. Be advised there is a 2 percent chance of rain.
I'm going on a trip soon. What's the weather like in London, England on the the 11th?
London temperatures on that day should average 71 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 15 percent chance of rain.
What will the weather be like at Half Moon bay on March 11th?
88 degrees Fahrenheit we be the average for the day along with a 6 percent chance of rain.
How windy and humid will it be on that day?
There is an average wind speed of 10 miles an hour with 20 percent humidity.
Great, and about
I'm sorry, was there something else you'd like me to help you with?
I'd like to check the weather in ATL for March 8th.
79 degrees Fahrenheit is the average temperature for the day with a 12 percent chance of rain.
Hey, I wanna know the weather in Castro Valley
It's gonna be 91 degrees and an 18% chance of rain
It is gonna be windy and humid?
It's 16% humidity and about 9 mph wind speed
Okay, how about in Ciudad de Mexico on March 12th?
89 degrees over there with a 6% chance of rain
Can you check the weather in Seattle, WA for March 8th?
The weather on March 8th will be 65 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 21% chance of rain.
What about the humidity, and the wind conditions?
Humidity will be around 16%, and the wind speed is expected to be on average 7 mph.
What's the weather going to be on the 5th of March?
Where would you like me to look?
For Anaheim, CA.
It should be about 75 degrees with a 4 percent chance of rain.
What's the weather in Chi-town for 14th of March?
The average temperature for the day will be 68 degrees, with a 24 percent chance of rain.
Is it going to be windy or humid?
The humidity forecast is around 26 percent, with an average wind speed of 12 miles per hour.
I'd like to know the weather at Point Reyes Station on the 9th of this month.
The temperature will be around 90 degrees Fahrenheit with a 13 percent chance of rain.
Great, what about the weather in Atlanta on March 5th?
On that day the average temperature will be 82 degrees Fahrenheit with an 18 percent chance of rain.
How humid will it be then?
The humidity will be about 29 percent.
How windy will it be?
The wind will be about 5 miles per hour on the 5th.
I like to visit the place Philly on March 1st. I need to check about the weather condition there on that day. Can you help me to check it?
Yes, please note that the average temperature should be 81 degrees Fahrenheit and the chance of rain will be 8 % there.
Check with the level of Humidity and Wind there.
Average wind speed will be 4 miles per hour and the humidity will be around 23 %. Is that information useful to you.
What is the weather going to be like in Chicago on this Sunday?
The temperature will average around 67 degrees and there will be a 36 percent chance of it raining.
Tell me what the weather will be on March 6th.
What city shall I look in?
Look in Portland for March 9th.
The normal temperature is 67 degrees with a 44 percent chance of rain.
I see. Thanks.
Do you want anything more?
Whats the weather going to be like in SD on March 5th?
It averages 84 degrees at that time with an 8 percent chance of rain.
Can you tell me what the weather is like?
Sure, what city?
Can you look in Toronto on 12th of March?
It's going to be a mild 64 degrees with a 1 percent chance of rain
Can you tell me how humid and windy it's gonna be?
Humidity will be around 15 percent and wind speeds of around 12 miles per hour.
Check the weather for 10th of this month.
For what city?
Los Angeles
There's a 10 percent chance of rain and it should be around 91 degrees.
How about humidity and wind?
Humidity should be about 19 percent with wind speed approximatey 8 mile per hour.
Check the weather.
For what city?
Sacramento, CA
There's a 26 percent chance of rain and it should be about 82 degrees.
Please check the weather in Muir Beach
Its average temperature is 81 degrees Fahrenheit with a 13 % chance of rain
ok, and in Seattle, WA on March 11th
Its average temperature is 73 degrees Fahrenheit with a 4 % chance of rain
What will the weather in Ciudad de Mexico be on the the 7th.
The temperature on that day will be 93 Fahrenheit with a 6 percent chance of rain.
What will the humidity be like?
The humidity will be 24 percent.
How windy will it be?
The wind speed will be an average of 5 miles per hour.
What is the weather forecast March 1st?
Where are you checking?
Seattle.
Seattle has a 32 percent chance of showers with an average temperature of 74.
Can you check the weather of San Francisco on March 14th?
The expected average temperature is 93 degrees Fahrenheit for the day with 12 percent chances of rain,
I need to check the weather.
In which city?
Check Phoenix, AZ please.
The average temperature for today is 89 degrees Farenheit and there is a 15 percent chance of rain.
We friends are planning for a outing in Philadelphia. Is the weather there is suitable?
Average temperature there is 81 degree fahrenheit and there is 8 percent chance of shower.
I'm going on a trip to Washington on 1st of March. Can you check what the weather is that day?
Looks like the average will be 75 degree Fahrenheit with a 13 percent chance of rain.
Check for me please the weather in Nairobi on March 14th
For the day the average temperature should be 93 degrees Fahrenheit and 0 percent of rain.
I see!Thanks.
Something else would you like to know?
What is the weather like in New York City today?
The forecast for today is an average temperature of 66 degrees Fahrenheit with a 37 percent chance of rain showers.
I need to know what the weather will be like on March 6th.
What city should I check?
Delhi, India.
The average temperature should be 93 degrees with a 0% chance of rain.
What will the weather be like in Vacaville on the March 10th?
The average temperature will be around 89 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 26 percent chance of rain.
How humid will it be?
The humidity will be around 36 percent.
Thanks, how about the weather in New York City on March 4th?
It'll be around 59 degrees with a 22 percent chance of rain.
How windy will it be?
The average wind speed in predicted to be 8 miles per hour.
Thanks a lot.
No worries, anything else?
What is the weather like in San Diego?
An average temperature of 90 degrees Fahrenheit is expected today, with a 1 percent change of rain
I'd like to know the weather in Nairobi.
There is an average of 105 degrees Fahrenheit with a 0 chance of rain.
How humid will it be? And is it going to be windy at all?
There is 15 percent humidity and the wind speed is 7 miles per hour.
I see. And what about the March 10th?
There is an average temperature of 95 degrees Fahrenheit with a 1 percent chance of rain.
Can you please tell me the weather in Mexico City?
The average temperature today should be around 102 degrees Fahrenheit. There is 0 chance of rain.
Okay, thanks a lot.
Is there anything else?
I would like to check the weather.
Which city would you like a forecast for?
I need the weather for Anaheim, CA.
The average temperature for the day should be around 78 degrees Fahrenheit. There is a 29 percent chance of rain.
I would like to check the weather in Phoenix on March 8th.
The average temperature for that day should be 77 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 15 percent chance of rain.
Can you tell me the weather forecast in Delhi, India on the Monday next week?
The temperature for that day is expected to be 97 degrees with an 8 percent chance of rain.
How windy will it be?
The wind is expected to be around 3 miles per hour.
How humid will it be?
The humidity will be about 18 percent.
What is the forecast for the weather?
Can you be more specific? Which city do you want the forecast for?
Please tell me the weather for Eldridge on the March 12th.
On March 12th 2019, the average temperature will be 74 degrees Fahrenheit with a 14 percent change of rain.
What will the humidity be like that day?
The humidity for the 12th will hover around 17 percent.
What about the wind? Will it be breezy on that day?
The average speed for the wind should be around 3 miles per hour.
Okay enough about that city. Tell me the forecast for Toronto, Ontario for March 9th.
It will be 67 degrees Fahrenheit with a 0 percent chance of rain in Toronto on March the 9th.
I need to check on the weather in London on the the 9th.
The average temperature for the day should be 90 degrees Fahrenheit. There will be a 5 percent chance of rain.
I would like to check the weather at NYC on March 9th.
The average temperature for the day should be around 70 degrees Fahrenheit. There is 38 percent chance for rain.
What's the weather forecast in Delhi for the March 11th?
The average temperature for the day will be 103 degrees Fahrenheit. There's a 7 percent chance of rain.
I want to check the weather Condition for which I need your help.
Do you have any choice of City to check it?
Yes, check it for Atlanta on March 11th.
The average temperature will be 87 degrees Fahrenheit on that day and there will be a 0 percent of chance for rain.
Alright, let's see the weather on March 3rd in London, UK
It's going to be 88 degrees with a 29 percent chance of rain
And the humidity?
It'll be around 66 percent
How windy will it be?
It's gonna average around 2 miles per hour wind speed
I would like to check the weather.
Which city should I look in?
Check Kuala Lumpur.
It should be 102 degrees fahrenheit on average with an 8 percent chance of rain.
How will the weather be on March 4th?
It should be about 87 degrees fahrenheit on average and there is 8 percent chance of rain.
What will the wind and humidity be like?
The wind is 8 miles per hour and the humidity is around 29 percent.
What will the weather be like in Moraga on next Tuesday?
The average daytime temperature will be around 77 degrees and there is a 6 percent chance of rain.
How about the humidity?
The humidity should be around 24 percent.
Will it be windy?
The average wind speed should be 1 mile per hour.
What will the weather like be in Vancouver on March 2nd?
The average daytime temperature will be around 67 degrees and there is a 49 percent chance of rain.
What's the weather going to be like in Toronto, Canada on March 12th?
In Toronto, it'll be an average of 64 degrees Fahrenheit with a 1 percent change of rain.
Is it going to be windy?
The average wind speed is going to be around 12 miles per hour.
And how humid will it be?
Humidity levels are going to be around 15 percent.
Can you tell me what the weather in Santa Clara will be on March 5th?
There is an average of 88 degrees Fahrenheit with a 25 percent of rain.
And what are the humidity levels?
There is around 44 percent humidity.
But how windy will it be?
There is an average wind speed of 5 miles per hour.
Can you also check the weather in Paris, France for March 10th?
There is an average of 80 degrees Fahrenheit with a 2 percent chance of rain
I would like to check the weather.
Where would you like to check the weather for?
I want to know the weather in Los Angeles.
It'll be 76 degrees Fahrenheit and there's a 28 percent chance of rain.
Check for me the weather please.
In what city are you interested?
I would like to know in Anaheim.
For the day the average temperature should be 78 degrees Fahrenheit and 29 percent chance of rain.
I understand. But in Sacramento?
For the day the average temperature should be 82 degrees Fahrenheit and 26 percent chance of rain.
All right, thanks.
With something else I can help you?
COuld you tell me the weather in fresno, CA?
Today's temperature should be 72 degrees fahrenheit, and there's a 2% chance of rain.
Can you look up what the weather will be like in Fresno on March 4th?
Of course: It will be 92 degrees Fahrenheit on March 4th with an 18 percent chance of rain.
Is it going to be humid.
Let's see: the humidity will be 19 percent.
What will the weather be like March 11th?
Where would you like the weather checked?
Anaheim, CA weather, please.
There will be an 11% chance of showers with an average temperature of 70.
What is the expected weather on March 8th in Sacramento, CA?
The average temperature is 85 degrees with a 21 percent chance of rain.
I'm thinking about visiting Montara on March 11th. What's the weather like then?
The weather is estimated to be 86 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 17 percent chance of rain.
I see. How will it be in Philly on March 4th?
It should roughly be 78 degrees Fahrenheit, with an 8 percent chance of rain.
How about the humidity?
The humidity will be about 30 percent.
And how about the windiness?
The wind speed should roughly be 1 mile per hour.
What is the weather forecast March 12th in Sacramento?
A 14% chance of showers with an average temperature of 92.
I see.
Do you need any other information?
I want to see what the weather will be like on the March 12th.
Sure. Where do you want to check the weather?
Please look up the weather for the District of Columbia.
The temperature should be 80 degrees on average and there is a 9 percent chance of it raining.
What would the weather be like in Toronto on the 3rd of this month?
It would be 65 degrees Fahrenheit with 58 percent chance of rain.
How windy would it be?
11 miles per hour.
Please check the weather for Toronto, Ontario on March 8th.
It should be around 67 degrees with a 6 percent chance of rain.
Sure, that is cool.
Anything else today?
I need you to check the weather for me in Antioch on March 6th
Today's average temperature is 72 degrees Fahrenheit and there's a 7 percent chance of rain
What about humidity? Is it windy?
Humidity is 23 percent and wind' speed is 9 miles per hour.
Okay, now tell me the same parameters in Seattle, WA on the 3rd of this month
Temperature is around 73 degrees Fahrenheit and there's a 49 percent of probability that it will rain
What's the weather supposed to be like on March 5th?
What city will you be in?
Chicago.
There will be a 28 percent chance of rain, but the average temperature for the day should be 71 degrees.
Will it be windy?
The average wind speed will be about 5 miles per hour.
What about the humidity, what will that be like?
It will be around 40 percent that day.
I need to see the weather in Ross
It's 79 degrees with a 14% chance of rain right now.
How about in Nairobi, Kenya on the the 6th
It's hot! 89 Degrees with a 1% chance of rain
What's the weather like in Fresno?
It's gonna be 72 degrees with a 2% chance of rain
Can you please check the weather for Vegas on the 13th?
The average temperature for the day is 73 Fahrenheit with 14 percent chance of rain.
I'd like to check the weather in Sunol.
The average weather is 92 degrees F with a 12 % chance of rain.
How about ATL on March 14th?
The average temperature is 86 degrees F with a 1 % chance of rain.
How humid will it be?
The humidity is 16 % about.
What about on the next Wednesday?
The average temperature is 87 degrees F with a 25 % chance of rain.
Tell me what the weather is going to be in San Lorenzo on March 6th.
It should be around 77 degrees with a 25 percent chance of rain.
What about humidity and wind?
Humidity is expected to be around 17 percent and the wind should be around 6 miles per hour.
Can you tell me the weather in SF on March 11th?
The temperature should average around 72 degrees with a 7 percent chance of rain.
Hi, I need to check the weather at Rohnert Park, on 3rd of March.
The average Temperature for that day is 75 degrees Fahrenheit. There is about 23 percent of chance of rain.
I want to know the weather.
What city?
Atlanta, Ga please.
The temperature will be 86 degrees Fahrenheit and there is 28 percent chance of rain.
What's the weather in Napa for March 2nd?
The forecast calls for average temperature of 72 degrees for the day. There is a 29 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy?
The average wind speed is forecast at 5 miles per hour.
What's the weather forecast for Portland, OR on the 5th of this month?
The average temperature for the day will be 56 degrees. There is a 12 percent chance of rain.
How humid will it be?
The humidity is about 24 percent.
How windy will it be?
The average wind speed will be 9 miles per hour.
What is the weather forecast for LA on March 5th?
The average temperature for the day is forecast to be 87 degrees. There's a 12 percent chance of rain.
Check weather conditions for March 7th in Vancouver please.
The weather will be about 63 degrees with a 23 percent chance of rain.
What is the wind factor? How humid will it be?
Humidity should be around 11 percent with the wind factor at 13 miles per hour.
Will you check the weather in San Francisco on March 3rd?
Average temperature is 83 degrees Fahrenheit with 27 percent chance of rain.
Can you tell me what the weather will be like on March 2nd in Sacramento?
Sure. The average temperature will be 93 degrees and the chances of rain will be 27 percent.
What about the wind and humidity?
4 mph and 24 percent.
Can you tell me the weather in Yountville?
Sure, the average temperature today is 75 degrees Fahrenheit. There's a 7 percent chance of rain.
What's the forecast for the March 14th?
In which city?
Stanford.
It should be 82 degrees F that day with a 5 % chance of rain.
Any wind?
Just 5 miles per hour.
Can you tell me the weather in ATL on March 1st? I may need to dress differently.
For ATL on March 1st, the average temperature should be 86 degrees with a 28 percent chance of rain.
Check for me please the weather on 11th of this month in District of Columbia.
Will be 25 percent chance of rain and average temperature for the day should be 86 degrees Fahrenheit.
Tell me how it will be humidity and wind.
Around 58 percent will be the humidity and average wind speed should be 8 miles per hour.
Can you tell me what the weather will be in Sonoma on the March 12th?
The temperature that day should average 86 degrees with a 15 percent chance of rain.
What about Brisbane on March 8th?
It should average 83 degrees with a 0 percent chance of rain.
Could you please check for me the weather in Marshall on march 2nd?
The average temperature should be 84 F with a 14 % chance of rain
Thanks, and what about March 14th?
the average temperature should be 78 F with 15 % chance of rain
Thanks, and what about Vancouver, BC?
The average temperature should be 64 F with 30 % chance of rain
Perfect, thanks
Is there anything else I can do for you?
I need to check the next Wednesday weather please.
Which city do you want to check in?
In San Jose.
The average temp is 87 degrees and there is a 7 percent chance of rain.
Please check the weather in LAX for March 10th.
The average temperature for the day is forecast at 91 degrees, with a 10 percent chance of rain.
I want to know how the weather is in Seattle, WA
From what I can see the temperature for the day will be at an average of 74 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 32 percent chance of raining.
Can you tell me what the weather is like on the 11th in Livermore?
It's gonna be 80 degrees with a 13 percent chance of rainfall
Please check the weather in Philadelphia for 1st of this month.
The average temperature is 81 degrees with an 8 percent chance of rain.
what is the expected humidity?
The humidity will be around 23%.
I want to see the weather forecast.
Is there a specific where you want to check the weather for?
I want to see the weather forecast for San Diego.
From what I can tell the average temperature in San Diego should be 90 degrees Fahrenheit, and there is only 1 percent chance of raining.
What's the weather forecast for March 13th?
What city do you want the forecast for?
Stanford
The expected temperature for that day is 73 degrees with a 4 percent chance of rain.
I want to know what the weather is like in Phoenix.
The temperature is 89 degrees Fahrenheit with 15 percent chance of rainfall.
Can you tell me the weather on 13th of March in Orinda?
Sure, the temperature is expected to be about 78 degrees with a 15 percent chance of rain
How about the wind?
Wind speed is expected to be 2 miles per hour.
How about weather in Sacramento, CA on March 1st?
The temperature is expected to be about 82 degrees with a 26 percent chance of rain
What about humidity and wind?
Humidity is expected to be 27 percent with a wind speed of 7 miles per hour
What will the weather be like in New York on March 7th?
A 15 percent chance of rain and an average temperature of 65 degrees.
May I know the weather on March 3rd?
In which city?
Las Vegas please.
It's going to be 91 degrees Fahrenheit and there is 22 percent chance of rain.
How humid and windy it's gonna be?
Humidity is around 44 percent and the avaerage wind speed should be 6 miles per hour.
On March 13th, I wish to check the weather in Yountville.
The average temperature is 93 degree Fahrenheit. There are 13 percent chance of rain.
What is the expected humidity?
It is around 24 percent.
What will the weather be on March 13th in SD?
The average temperature will be 75 degrees with a 19 percent chance of rain.
Hi there, may I check the weather in Berkeley now please?
The temperature there today should be 91 degress Fahrenheit with a 17 percent chance of rain.
Can you show me what the weather would be like for March 3rd?
Which city should I check the weather for?
I want to search for Anaheim
Okay, the average temperature is expected to be 87 degrees with a 22 percent chance of rain
How about humidity and wind?
The humidity is expected to be 35 percent with a wind speed of 2 miles per hour.
I'd like to see the weather condition at LAX
It's 76 degrees there with a 28% chance of rain
Please tell me what the weather will be in London On March 3rd.
The weather reports it has an average temperature of 88 degrees with a 29 percent chance of rain.
Could you help me check the weather in london, England on march 13th
the average temperature for the day should be 94 F with 25 % chance of rain
I'd like to spend the day outdoors in Oakland, on March 6th. Please check the weather forecast for me.
The expected average temperature for the day is 90 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 28 percent chance of rain.
What about the wind speed?
The city expects an average wind speed of 6 miles per hour.
What about the expected humidity?
The expected humidity is around 43 percent.
How is the weather in Long Beach on the 7th of this month.
The temperature would be 94 degrees Fahrenheit with 26 percent chance of rain.
How windy or humid would it be?
The humidity is 39 percent and the wind speed would be 2 miles per hour.
I want to check the weather in Brisbane on March 2nd.
The temperature on average should be 75 degrees F with a 9 % chance of rain.
What about Seattle, WA on the next Thursday.
The temperature on average should be 69 degrees F with a 16 percent chance of rain.
What is the wind and humidity like?
The humidity is 20 % and wind speed 8 mph.
I want to search for weather condition. Please search it in Seattle, WA on the 1st.
Checked the same and found the average temperature will be 74 degrees Fahrenheit on that day and there will be chance of 32 % for rain there.
What about the Humidity range?
It is around 25 %.
Okay then, what is the Wind speed?.
It will be around 15 miles per hour.
Check the weather in San Fran on the 10th of March
It's gonna be 93 degrees with a 12% chance of rain
Sure, that's good
What else do you need?
I want a reservations
what time for and city?
hopscotch in oakland at 19:30
hopscotch oakland at 7:30 pm on march 1st for 2
eiko's in napa
eiko's sushi in napa
11:45 am it is for
confirm 11:45 am on march 1st
yes that is fine
eiko's sushi for 2 on march 1st at 12 pm
yes that is fine
it went through
I need to make a reservation at My Ivy in SFO for one person.
What time would you like to make the reservation for?
five pm please.
You would like a reservation for 1 person at My Ivy in San Francisco on March 1st at 5 pm, is that right?
Yes, that is correct. Does the restaurant have bargain prices and what is their address?
The restaurant is in the moderate price range and they are located at 1901 Divisadero Street. I have confirmed your reservation.
Great, thanks!
Is there anythign else you need?
Could you book me a table at Fujiyama-ya in SFO at eleven in the morning?
Table for 2 at Fujiyama-ya in San Francisco at 11 am on March 1st. Correct?
Yes. Hey, what about drinks? And where are they?
You have a table. They are at 1234 Noriega Street. There is no alcohol served.
I want to make a reservation at the Taqueria Y Carniceria Apatzingan 2 restaurant for just one person at this evening 5.
Where is this restaurant located?
I'd like to make the reservation at the Redwood City location.
Okay. Just to confirm, you want to book a table for 1 at Taqueria Y Carniceria Apatzingan 2 in Redwood City at 5 pm on March 1st.
Actually, no. Change the restaurant to Crouching Tiger.
Okay. So, now you want to book at a table at the Crouching Tiger Restaurant in Redwood City.
Yes, that is correct. What's their street address? What kind of food do they have?
I've booked your table. They serve mainly Asian food and they're located at 2644 Broadway.
I want san rafael
what time for?
evening 6 please
any preferred place?
ristorante la toscana
ristorante la toscana san rafael 6 pm march 1st 2 people
any liquor there?
I could not
napoli pizza then
napoli pizza-taste of the himalayas san rafael at 6 pm march 1st for 2
what food is there?
nepalese food is there
I need to make a restaurant reservation.
What time do you need the reservation.
Make it in the afternoon 1.
Which city do you need the reservation at?
In Napa please.
Which restaurant do you prefer?
Pasta Prego please.
You want a table at Pasta Prego in Napa at 1 pm for 2 people for March 1st, is this correct?
Yes that is great, do they serve liquor? How expensive are they?
Your table is reserved. They have a moderate price range and do not serve alcohol.
I need help to book a restaurant
Which restaurant and what time?
Book it at Spalti at half past 11 in the morning
Which city should I book it for
It is Mary's pizza in Napa for three people
Booking a table for 3 at mary's pizza shack in napa at 11:30 am on March 1st
Does it serve Indian food. What is the address
They serve Italian and are located at 3085 jefferson street
I like to make a booking at restaurant in SFO.
Any restaurant you like? Can you tell me the booking time?
I like osha. Do booking at 12 in the afternoon.
Please give confirmation details: Booking a table for 2 people at Osha thai Restaurant and Lounge at 12 pm on March 1st in the city of San Francisco.
Yes, this is perfect for me.
Your booking is over.
Could you help me with a restaurant reservation?
In what city and at what restaurant?
The restaurant is Everest in Albany.
What time would you like the reservation?
I'd like it at 11 in the morning.
Confirming a table for 2 at Everest Kitchen in Albany at 11 AM on March 1st.
Can you change that to one person on the 4th of this month?
Confirming a reservation for 1 person on March 4th.
Sounds great. Do you know if they have live music?
No, they don't. The booking is complete.
I'd like to book a table at a restaurant in Vacaville.
What time are you looking to book for and which restaurant are you interested in?
I want to go tio Umi Sushi at a quarter to 6 in the evening.
Okay so to confirm: You'd like to book a table for 2 at Umi Sushi in Vacaville at 5:45 pm on March 1st.
I'd only like a reservation for one person.
No problem. So that's 1 person at 5:45 pm
Actually, thinking about it, I think I want to invite a couple of friends. Can you make a reservation for three people instead?
Sure thing. So that's 3 people at 5:45 pm.
Yes that's correct. Where is the restaurant located and do they serve alcohol there?
This place doesn't serve alcohol. Their address is 501 Davis Street. Unfortunately I have not been able to make your reservation at Umi Sushi. Would you like me to try for 3 people at 6 pm on March 1st?
Yes please, go ahead and try to make the reservation.
Your reservation has been confirmed.
I want to make a reservation at the restaurant
Are they any preferred restaurant? Also in which city and time are you looking to reserve the restaurant?
The restaurant is Wine Cellar in Los Gatos. Make reservation for evening 6:30.
Please confirm the details: Booking of table at Wine Cellar Restaurant in Los Gatos for March 1st at 6:30 pm for 2 people.
Yes. That's fine for me.
The reservation is now successful.
I would like to make a restaurant reservation.
What city and what time?
I would like to eat in SFO at 5:30 in the evening.
Is there a specific restaurant you prefer?
I like Aslam's.
So you want to book at Aslam's Rasoi in San Francisco for 2? The reservation is for 5:30 pm on March 1st.
Actually it is for one person on March 14th.
Please confirm that you want to make a reservation for 1 person on March 14th.
Yep, that is right. Is it a fancy price range?
Your reservation was a success. The price range is moderate.
I'm meeting a client for lunch and I need to make a restaurant reservation for 1 o"clock in the afternoon.
Is there a certain restaurant or city I should search in?
I'd like to book the Limon Rotisserie in Walnut Creek.
Let's confirm the details: You are making a reservation for 2 people at Limon Rotisserie Walnut Creek located in Walnut Creek on March 1st at 1 pm.
Yes, that's great. What's their address?
Your table is reserved. Their address is 1524 Locust Street.
I want to eat out at a restaurant in Berkeley.
At which restaurant and for what time?
I want to eat at Ippuku for 11:45 am
You would like a table for 2 at Ippuku in Berkeley for 11:45 am on March 1st?
That would be fine.
I was not able to make the reservation. Would you like a reservation at Ippuku for 2 on March 1st at 12 pm?
That would be great.
I have made the reservation.
What is the budget I should work with?
The restaurant is expensive.
Do they serve Tacos and where are they located?
They serve Izakaya and they are located at 2130 center street.
Can you make me a reservation at the restaurant A16?
Sure, what city is it in?
It's in San Fran.
What time do you want me to make it for?
Try for a quarter to 6 in the evening.
Can you confirm you'd like a table for 2 at A16 in San Francisco on March 1st at 5:45 pm?
Yup, do you know is they have live music and can I get their phone number?
They're at 415-771-2216 and no live music. I apologize but I couldn't make a reservation at A16 for 2 at that time. Should I try March 1st at 6 pm instead?
Yes, that's fine.
Your booking was confirmed.
I would like to reserve for a restaurant on March 8th for two.
What type of restaurant do you prefer? What time and city?
I would the restaurant called Layang Layang in Milpitas at 19:00.
Please confirm 2 people for Layang Layang Malaysian Cuisine in Milpitas for 7 pm on March 8th.
Yes, that is fine. What is their phone number?
The reservation has ben successfully made and the number is 408-263-6788.
I need a dining reservation.
Where and what time?
San Jose at 18:00.
Which restaurant?
Mcdonald's.
With your permission I will book a reservation for 2 at 6 pm at Mcdonald's in San Jose for March 1st.
Permission granted. Do they serve Pizza and Pasta?
Breakfast food is served. The reservation is booked.
I would like to make a reservation at the restaurant Hatcho.
What time will the reservation be for? Which city am I searching in?
Make the reservation for next Friday at half past 11 in the morning. I want it in Santa Clara.
Please confirm these details: You want a reservation for 2 at Hatcho Japanese Cuisine located in Santa Clara. It will be at 11:30 am on March 8th.
Yes, that works out for me.
Your reservation was successful.
What is their contact number?
Their phone number is 408-248-8500.
Can you make me a reservation for 3 at Golden Garlic next Friday?
Sure, what time and what city?
It's in San Jose at 6 in the evening.
Okay, can you confirm you'd like a table for 3 at Golden Garlic in San Jose at 6 pm on march 8th?
Yup, that's correct.
Your reservation has been made.
I wish to have a reservation at a restaurant.
In which city do you need and what is your preferred time? Do you have any preferred restaurant?
The restaurant Kamakura is at Alameda. Reserve it at 7 pm.
Kindly ensure that, on March 1st, reservation has been booked for 2 persons at Kamakura Japanese Restaurant at Alameda. It is at 7 pm.
Yes. It is good for me.
Your booking is done.
i am looking for a restaurant
Do you have any preference? what time would you like to go
i prefer royal thai at 12:30
what city is royal thai located in
look for martinez city on march 2nd
please confirm your reservation with royal thai restaurant for 2 people in city of martinez on march 2nd at 12:30 pm
yes thats correct. Do they sell liquor
your reservation is confirm and they do not serve alcohol
are they pricy
price range is moderate
I need a place to eat, so I want to make a reservation at a restaurant.
Which city would you like for the restaurant to be located at?
I want the restaurant to be in SFO.
Is there a specific restaurant you prefer?
I really like the restaurant called Noir. I want the reservation to be for two people in afternoon 12:15.
Can you please confirm that you want to book a table for 2 people at Noir Lounge restaurant in San Francisco at 12:15 pm on March 1st?
That suits me well. Can you check if they serve liquor?
I am glad to confirm that they serve liquor, but unfortunately I could not book the table. Do you want to try again to book a table for 2 people at Noir Lounge restaurant for March 1st at 12 pm?
That's seems right for me.
Your table has been booked.
Can you give me their address?
You can find the restaurant at 581 Hayes Street.
I would like to make a reservation at a restaurant.
In what city you want to be and at what time?Do you have a favorite restaurant?
Restaurant name is Spalti and is located in Palo Alto.Reservation I want to be at afternoon 12:30.
Book a table for 2 people at Spalti Ristorante in Palo Alto on March 1st at 12:30 pm.Is that okay for you?
Yes good.Tell me if liquor is served and if they have live music.
Alcohol is not available and they not have live music.Soory but reservation was not been made.You want me to try for 2 people on March 1st at 1 pm ?Because Spalti Ristorante is a nice place.
Yes is good.
Reservation was made.
Thank you for all.
Anything else I can do for you?
I need to make a restaurant reservation in SF.
Is there a specific restaurant you would like to eat at and what time would you like the reservation for?
Yes, the restaurant is Sakana Sushi and I need a reservation for quarter to 6 in the evening please.
Ok, you would like to make a reservation for 2 at Sakana Sushi Bar & Grill in San Francisco on March 1st at 5:45 pm. Is that correct?
No, the reservation should be on the 11th not the 1st.
OK, you would like to reserve a tabe at Sakana Sushi Bar & Grill on March 11th. Is that right?
Yes, perfect.
I'm sorry, I could not make a reservation at that time. Would a reservation for 2 people at 6 pm on March 11th at Sakana Sushi Bar & Grill work instead?
Yes, that would be great.
Great, I have confirmed your reservation.
I have a small plan to eat outside for which I need to reserve a table in a restaurant. Can you help me to do?
Yes, in which restaurant do you want to book the table? Is that any choice in your mind?
Yes, try with Drying Shed.
in which City?
I think San Jose is perfect. Search there for this restaurant.
What is your planned time to go to that restaurant, if you inform it then I will make the booking.
Make the booking at one in the afternoon what will be convenient to me.
Please confirm to book a table for 2 in Drying Shed restaurant in San Jose on March 1st at 1 pm.
Please make it for next Friday.
then, need your final confirmation to book it on March 8th at 1 pm.
Yes, confirmed to proceed with booking.
booking was confirmed as per your wish.
Will you make a reservation at Ca' Momi Osteria on 8th of this month at afternoon 12:30?
Which city?
Napa.
Please confirm a table for 2 at Ca' Momi Osteria in Napa on March 8th at 12:30 pm.
Cool. How pricey? What's their number?
I've completed the reservation. Price is moderate. You can reach them at 707-224-6664.
I'm looking for a restaurant reservation in Santa Clara on the 8th of this month at five pm.
Do you have a preferred restaurant?
Yes, the restaurant is McDonalds.
Okay, I have a reservation at McDonald's in Santa Clara for 2 people on March 8th at 5 pm, correct?
Yes, that is correct.
I have successfully confirmed the reservation.
Thanks, does the restaurant serve Chinese food?
No, they serve sandwich cuisine.
What is the address?
The street address 2850 Augustine Drive.
I want a reservation at the restaurant Troya.
What time would you like it for? What city is it in?
It is in SFO. I want it for 7:15 in the evening.
A table for 2 at Troya Restaurant in San Francisco at 7:15 pm on March 1st. Is this right?
Make it the Krua restaurant instead.
A table for 2 at Krua Thai. Is this right?
I want it at seven in the evening now for 4 people.
A reservation for 7 pm with 4 people. Is this right?
Yes, that's it. Where are they located? Do they sell alcohol?
Your reservation has been booked. They sell alcohol. Their address is 3214 16th Street.
Get me a restaurant reservation.
Do you have a restaurant preference in a certain city?
Make a reservation for me at Frida's in Napa.
What time do you want?
I want to be there at half past 1 in the afternoon.
You want a reservation for 2 people at Frida's Mexican Grill in Napa on March 1st at 1:30 pm. Is that right?
That is correct and is liquor served?
Your table is booked and they don't serve any alcohol.
Where are they located at?
They are located at 1533 Trancas Street.
I would like to reserve a table at a restaurant for Thursday next week.
In which city are you planning to dine and at what time? Do you have a specific restaurant in mind?
I want the table at the Xiao Loong restaurant in San Fran at six pm.
Please confirm that you want to reserve a table for 2 at the Xiao Loong Restaurant in San Francisco at 6 pm, on March 7th.
Yes, that sounds perfect.
You table has been reserved successfully.
Can you help me make a restaurant reservation?
Sure, what city is it in?
Look in San Rafael.
Okay, and what time?
Make it for 12:30 pm.
Is there a particular restaurant you have in mind?
Yes, Vin Antico.
Okay, could you confirm that you'd like a table for 2 at Vin Antico in San Rafael on March 1st at 12:30 pm?
Yes, what's their address?
Your reservation is booked. They're at 881 4th Street.
I need to eat something, so I want to make a reservation at a restaurant. I want the reservation to be for 3 people at seven in the evening, and the restaurant to be Sala.
Is there a specific city where I should look for the restaurant?
I want the restaurant to be in Fremont.
Can you please confirm that you want to book a table for 3 people at Sala Thai Restaurant in Fremont on March 1st at 7 pm.
That suits me well. What is the price range of the restaurant?
Your table has been booked. The restaurant has a moderate price range.
Can you tell me if they serve Punjabi type of food? What is their phone number that I can use to call them?
If you want to call them you can at 510-792-0770. The type of food they serve is Thai.
I need to make a restaurant reservation on the 11th at 12 o"clock in the afternoon.
What city will this be in?
It's in SF, and it's for 3 people.
And what restaurant is this for?
It's for Green papaya, and it's actually for the 2nd of March.
Just to confirm everything, you'd like a reservation for 3 people at Green Papaya in San Francisco on March 2nd at 12 pm?
Yes, that's what I want. Is there live music there?
I've made you the reservation, there's no live music.
Thanks so much.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
I want to go to a restaurant.
Which city should I search in? Is there a restaurant you would like to go to?
I want to go to 8 Dragons in Healdsburg.
At what time?
I want to be there at evening 5:30.
Please confirm the following reservation details: A reservation for 2 people, March 1st, 5:30 pm at 8 Dragons Restaurant in Healdsburg.
Yes that works!
Your reservation is complete!
I'd like to reserve a table at a restaurant.
In what city would you like me to look? What is the best time to make the reservation?
I would like it to be in Fairfield at 6:15 pm.
Is there a desirable restaurant?
The restaurant I'd prefer is Favela's.
Please check the following for approval: Reserving a table for 2 at Favela's Fusion at 6:15 pm on March 1st. It is located in Fairfield.
Okay, that sounds to me. Do they serve alcohol? Do they also have Indian on the menu?
They serve Mexican cuisine, but don't serve liquor. I'm sorry, I couldn't make the reservation. Would you like me to see if I can get a table on March 1st at 6 pm for 2 people? Favela's Fusion is a great restaurant.
Okay, sounds pretty good to me.
I was able to successfully reserve a table.
I need to get some chow.
Do you have a place in mind?
Yes. Tachi in Concord, around 6:45 in the evening.
Ok. Table for 2 at Tachi Sushi Bar in Concord on March 1st at 6:45 pm. Correct?
That is correct.
Sorry. No can do. Should I try Tachi Sushi Bar for 2 on MArch 1st at 7 pm instead?
Yeah, give that a shot.
Shot taken. You scored.
Ha. Great. Hey, how much will this run me you think? Where they at?
Its moderate price-wise. They are at 5458 Ygnacio Valley Road.
Can you help me make a restaurant reservation?
Sure. Do you have a particular restaurant in mind.
Actually I do! Tuba.
When do you want your reservation to be?
11:15 in the morning, please.
Please tell me the city in which I should search!
Search in San Francisco, please.
Can you please confirm that you want me to place a reservation for 2 at Tuba Authentic Turkish Restaurant in San Francisco on March 1st at 11:15 am?
Yes, that's correct.
Unfortunately I was unable to reserve the table. Are you OK with a reservation for 2 at Tuba Authentic Turkish Restaurant on March 1st at 11 am?
Yes, that will do.
I've successfully place your reservation!
I want to make a reservation at the Sparrow Bar.
What time would you like a table.
I want on the 10th at 11:15 am
What city would you like it in?
I want it in Napa at Trancas.
Just to confirm you want a table for 2 people at the Trancas Steakhouse in Napa on March 10th at 11:15 am.
Yes that is great. How expensive is it?
It is a nice moderate priced restaurant. I'm sorry there are no tables at that time. How about at 11 am for 2 people at the Trancas Steakhouse in Napa on March 10th.
yes that is fine.
Your table is booked.
Do they serve Alcohol?
It is a nonalcoholic restaurant.
I want to eat out at Truya in San Jose.
What time would you like to book the table for?
I want to go there at 18:15
You would like a table for 2 at truya sushi in San Jose for 6:15 pm on March 1st.
I want the reservation for evening 7 on the 3rd of March.
You want the reservation for 7 pm om March 3rd.
That would be fine.
I have made the reservation.
May I have a contact number?
the number is 408-223-2497.
Is there live music and is the food cheap?
The prices are moderate and there is no live music.
I'd like to make a reservation for 3 at a restaurant in Larkspur.
Any specific restaurant in mind? What time is the reservation for?
Book me a table at Picco for half past 12 in the afternoon.
Sure. Please confirm the following for me: Booking a table for 3 people at Picco Restaurant in Larkspur on March 1st at 12:30 pm. Correct?
Yes that works for me. Do you know if they serve liquor?
Your reservation is complete. I'm sorry but they do not serve alcohol.
I'd like to make a restaurant reservation please.
What time do you want the reservation for?
Let's shoot for 11:00.
Is there a particular restaurant you had in mind?
Yes. Make a reservation at Eurasia.
What city is this located in?
Find me one in Richmond.
Before I go farther, you want a reservation for 2 at Eurasia in Richmond. It's scheduled for 11 am on March 1st.
Yes, that's perfect.
I'm sorry, but I couldn't make a reservation then. Would you like a reservation at 11:30 am for Eurasia instead? It's still for 2 people on March 1st.
Sure. That's fine too.
Okay. Your reservation has been made.
Can you place a restaurant reservation for me?
Is there a specific restaurant on your mind?
Yes, Pastries N Chaat.
For when do you want your reservation to be?
Please book my table for quarter to 1 in the afternoon.
Can you please tell me in which city should I look?
Foster City. Make it a table for 2.
Can you please confirm that you want me to reserve a table for 2 at Pastries n Chaat in Foster City on March 1st at 12:45 pm?
Yes, that's correct.
Unfortunately I was not able to book your table. Is there anything else I can do for you?
Please try again, this time Banana Leaf, in Milpitas, at half past 12 in the afternoon.
Can you please confirm that you want me to reserve a table for 2 at Banana Leaf Restaurant in Milpitas, on March 1st at 12:30 pm.
On second thought, please make it for just one person.
Can you please confirm that your 12:30 pm reservation should be for 1 person?
Yes, that's correct.
I've successfully placed your reservation.
Can you please give me their phone number and address.
They're located at 182 Ranch Drive and you can reach them at 408-719-9811.
Hello, I want to eat out pretty soon. Can you reserve a restaurant for me?
Sure. Give me a city, time, and, if possible, a preferred restaurant.
I want to eat at The Grill in San Jose at 12:30.
You want to book a table for 2 at The Grill on the Alley in San Jose at 12:30 pm on March 1st?
Yes, I do. What number can I call to reach them?
You can dial 408-294-2244.
I would like to make a reservation at a restaurant.
Do you have a restaurant in mind? What time will the reservation be for?
The restaurant is Lapats Noodles. I want a reservation at 11:30.
In what city should I search in?
Search in SFO.
Please confirm these details: You want to reserve a table for 2 at Lapats Thai Noodles Bar located in San Francisco. The reservation will be on March 1st at 11:30 am.
Yes, that works. Do they have any live music?
Your reservation was successful. They do not have live music.
I need a reservation with amalfi
what city is this in
I want it in larkspur afternoon 1:45
Please confirm your reservation for 2 people at amalfi in larkspur on march 1st at 1:45 pm
thats correct, what is their address
Their address is 455 magnolia avenue. I was unable to reserve for you on your prefer time. What about reservation with Amalfi for 2 people on march 1st at 1:30 pm
thats fine with me
your reservation is booked
I'd like to make a reservation at Regent for two people at 17:30.
Where is the restaurant located?
It is in San Fran.
I'll make a reservation for Regent Thai in San Francisco for 2 on March 1st at 5:30 pm. Is that correct?
Yes, please make the reservation. Also, is it in the fancy price range and do they make American food?
It's an inexpensive restaurant that serves Thai food. I tried to make the reservation but it's all booked. I can try to make another reservation at Regent Thai for 2 people on March 1st at 5 pm instead?
Yes, please make that reservation.
I've made the reservation.
Make me a restaurant reservation.
Do you have a city, time, and restaurant in mind?
Make it for six pm at 71 Saint Peter in San Jose.
You want a reservation for 2 people for 6 pm at 71 Saint Peter in San Jose on March 1st. Is that right?
That is correct. Do you know if they have live entertainment?
Your reservation is booked and they do not have live entertainment.
Hi, I'd like to make a restaurant reservation in San Jose in the evening 5:30.
Any preferred restaurants?
I'd like to go to Mcdonald's.
Okay, confirming a table at Mcdonald's in San Jose for 2 people. The reservation is at 5:30 pm on March 1st.
That's great. Can I get liquor there?
The reservation has been a success. Yes, they do serve alcohol.
Can you give me their phone number? Also, do they ever have live music on?
You can reach them at 408-272-1335 and yes, they do have live music.
I need a table for 2 in SF for the 7th of this month.
At which time and restaurant?
Half past 5 in the evening at Sushi Rapture.
Please confirm: table for 2 at Sushi Rapture in San Francisco on March 7th at 5:30 pm.
Yes, perfect. Do they have an intermediate priced menu and live music?
Your table is reserved. They have a moderate price range and no live music.
Will you make a reservation at a restaurant?
What time?
6:30 in the evening.
Which restaurant?
Oliveto.
Which city?
Oakland.
Please confirm table for 2 at Oliveto in Oakland on March 1st at 6:30 pm.
Make that Filippi's Pizza in Napa.
Please confirm a table at Filippi's Pizza Grotto in Napa.
Great. Does it have live music?
I've made your reservation. No live music.
I want a reservation on March 6th at a restaurant in San Francisco.
What time?
18:30.
Is there a certain restaurant you have in mind?
Please reserve a table for 2 at Rue Lepic.
Confirm, reservation on March 6th at 6:30 pm for 2 people at Rue Lepic French Restaurant in San Francisco.
Yes, that is perfect.
Your reservation is complete.
I want to book a table for 1 at a restaurant on the 2nd of this month at 17:30.
Do you have a restaurant in mind? Which city should I look in?
I want to go to Tony & Alba's in San Jose.
Sure. Can I just confirm the details? You want to book a table for 1 at Tony & Alba's Pizza and Pasta in San Jose. This table should be available at 5:30 pm on March 2nd.
Yes, that will work.
Okay. I've successfully made your reservation.
Thanks a lot!
Is there anything else that you need help with?
I want to make a restaurant reservation. Please make it for 11:30 in the morning, March 14th at Agrodolce Osteria.
In which city?
Make it for Berkeley.
Please confirm the following the details: Booking a table for 2, March 14th, 11:30 am, at Agrodolce Osteria in Berkeley.
No, I have changed my mind, make it for Kirin.
Please confirm the following details: a reservation for 2 at Kirin Restaurant.
Yes, that works well. Do they have live music there?
Your reservation is confirmed. They do not.
I am planning a dinner date for tonight and could use some help making the reservation.
I can help with that. Are you interested in a particular restaurant? I also need to know the city and time of the reservation.
Oh, yes, I would love it if we are able to go to the Chaat Paradise in Mountain view at 5:15 in the evening.
Would you like to confirm a reservation for 2 at 5:15 pm, March 1st at Chaat Paradise in Mountain view?
Yes, that will work perfectly.
I am so sorry, Chaat Paradise is booked at that time. Do you want to try to a reservation for 2 at 5 pm on March 1st? Sometimes the earlier times are available.
Yes, we can probably do that.
Good news, I was able to make the reservation for 5.
I would like to make a lunch reservation.
What time do you prefer?
I want it at 11:00.
Do you have a preference in location and type of restaurant?
I would like Nico's 1508 in Berkeley.
Please confirm the table at Nico's 1508 in Berkeley at 11 am for 2 people on March 1st.
Great, do they offer live music?
The reservation is completed. No, they do not have live music.
OK, thank you.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Hello! I'd like to make a restaurant reservation. Can you help me?
I'd be happy to. Let's get some details out of the way first. Where are you looking for a restaurant? What type of cuisine do you prefer? When would be best for you?
I would like a reservation at Sushi Zono in Campbell for 11 o"clock in the morning.
You'd like a table for 2 on March 1st at 11 am at Sushi Zono in Campbell. Is this correct?
No, there will be four people in the party.
You need a table for 4 at Sushi Zono. Is this correct?
Yes, that is correct.
Your table has been successfully reserved.
I'd like to make a restaurant reservation.
In what city?
In San Jose. At Seven Restaurant.
For what time?
Seven pm on the 8th of March.
To confirm, you would like a table for 2 at Seven Restaurant & Lounge in San Jose on March 8th at 7 pm.
Yes that'll work.
Your reservation is booked.
I would like to reserve a table to three at 5:15 pm today.
In which city should I search?
I would like something in San Jose for 1:45 in the afternoon.
Do you have a preferred restaurant?
Yes, I would like to go at Black Angus.
Table for 3 at Black Angus Steakhouse at 1:45 pm on March 1st in San Jose.
That is correct. What type of food do they serve and are they pricey?
The price is moderate. The Steakhouse serves multiple kind of foods. Would you like your reservation for 3 at Black Angus Steakhouse on March 1st at 1:30 pm?
Yes, that works for me.
Your reservation was made.
I want to make a restaurant reservation.
What time? What restaurant?
Myriad at 17:45.
What city?
Sf.
Please confirm, reservation for 2 at Myriad Gastropub in San Francisco on March 1st at 5:45 pm.
Yes, that is good.
Sorry, no reservation available. Let's try reservation for 2 at Myriad Gastropub in San Francisco on March 1st at 6 pm.
That is fine.
Your reservation is complete.
I would like reservations for San Fran at 18:45.
Is there a preference of restaurant?
The reservation is for 1 person at Clay Oven.
Please confirm that you'd like a table at Clay Oven Indian Restaurant in San Francisco at 6:45 pm for 1 on March 1st.
Yes, that would work.
Sorry, I couldn't make the reservation. Clay Oven Indian Restaurant is a nice restaurant. Would that work for 1 person on March 1st at 6:30 pm?
Yes, that is good.
The reservation is a success.
Can you help me book a reservation at a restaurant on the 9th of March?
Sure, which restaurant?
It's called Gibson.
What time do you want to dine there?
Half past 5 in the evening would be great.
Okay, and what's the city?
It's in San Fran.
Okay, please confirm that you'd like me to book a table for 2 at Gibson in San Francisco at 5:30 pm on March 9th.
Yes, that's great. Can I have their phone number, and is it expensive?
I've booked your reservation. They are in the moderate price range and can be reached at 415-771-7709.
I'm looking for a bite in San Rafael. 3 people for 19:15.
Do you have a restaurant in mind?
Lotus Chaat should hit the spot.
3 for Lotus Chaat And Spices at 7:15 pm on March 1st in San Rafael. Do I have that right.
You got it. Is this place low-cost?
Lotus Chaat And Spices is in the moderate price range. But they have nothing for that slot. How about 3 for 7:30 pm on March 1st instead?
Yeah, try that.
Done. You are booked.
Can you please help me make a reservation for three people at Lotus Garden?
In what city do you want this reservation?
In SFO please.
At what time would you like the reservation?
At 6 pm please.
Please confirm the following details: Booking a reservation for 3 at Lotus Garden Vietnamese Cuisine in San Francisco at 6 pm on March 1st.
No, can you please make it for 1 at 5 pm.
Please confirm the following: The reservation is for 1 at 5 pm.
Yes, that is correct. Do they have live music?
Your reservation is successful. They do not have live music.
I'd like to book a San Jose restaurant for 3.
At what time will that be?
It'll be at 5:30 pm.
Do you have a certain restaurant in mind?
Yes. Maggiano's Little Italy.
Alright then, so you want to book a table for 3 at Maggiano's Little Italy in San Jose at 5:30 pm on March 1st?
Yes, that's fine by me.
I have booked your table.
What type of food is there?
Like the name implies, it's an Italian restaurant.
I'd like to make a reservation at La Folie restaurant.
What time would you like to make a reservation for and where is the restaurant located?
The restaurant is in SFO and I'd like to book for a quarter to 5 in the evening.
Okay so you would like to book a table for 2 at La Folie in San Francisco at 4:45 pm on March 1st.
That's correct.
Unfortunately I have not been able to make your booking. Shall I try and book a reservation for 2 people at La Folie at 5 pm on March 1st instead?
Sure.
Your booking has been confirmed.
Is it an expensive place and where is it located?
The prices are very expensive and their address is 2316 Polk Street.
I'm hungry. I want to book a table at a restaurant.
At what time would that be?
It'd be at 5:15 pm.
Give me a city to search, and a preferred restaurant, if any.
I'd like to eat at Amber in SF.
Sure thing. I'll go ahead and book a table for 2 at Amber in San Francisco at 5:15 pm on March 1st, if that's okay with you.
That's good with me. As for the address?
The address is 25 Yerba Buena Lane. Very sorry. I couldn't reserve the table! I can still get you a seat for 2 at Amber, it'll just instead have to be on March 1st at 5:30 pm.
Sure, that's fine with me.
I successfully booked the table for you.
Can I get liquor there?
No, you cannot.
Thanks for the help.
Can I help you out any further?
I need to book a table at Sheba Piano in SF the 6th of this month.
Which time?
13:00.
Please confirm: table for 2 at Sheba Piano Lounge in San Francisco at 1 pm on March 6th.
Yes, perfect.
I couldn't make that reservation. I could try a table for 2 at Sheba Piano Lounge for 12:30 pm on March 6th.
Yes, try it.
Your table is booked.
I want to book a table at a restaurant. Do it for morning 11:45.
Which city? Is there a restaurant you want to go to?
In SF. It's called B Star.
Please confirm the booking details: Booking a table for 2 at B Star, March 1st, 11:45 am in San Francisco.
No, I want it on March 8th. Where did you get March 1st from?
Please confirm the following details: Booking a table B Star for March 8th.
Yes, do they have beer and live music?
They do not serve alcoholic beverages. And there is no live music. Sorry, the reservation did not go through. Shall I try again at B Star? I will make it for 2 on March 8th at 11:30 am.
Yes, that is great.
Your reservation has gone through!
I need to grab a bite out.
I'll make a reservation. Details?
Eleven AM at Wildfox in Novato.
Table for 2 at Wildfox Restaurant in Novato at 11 am On March 1st. Correct?
Yes, thats right.
You are booked.
I wish to have a reservation at a Ace Wasabi restaurant in San Francisco.
When will be the booking time?
I wish to reserve for one person on 1st of March. Confirm it at 7 o"clock in the evening.
Kindly ensure that, on March 1st, the reservation for 1 person is done at Ace Wasabi Rock-n-roll Sushi in San francisco. It will be at 7 pm.
Yes. it is good for me.
Your booking is done.
What is their contact number? What is the price?
The rate will be moderate and their number if 415-567-4903.
I want to make a restaurant reservation please!
What time is it for? Do you have a restaurant you'd like to go to?
Yes I want to go to Lisa's and make it for 17:30.
Which city should I look in?
I want to go to Napa. Change my mind and want to eat at the restaurant called Pasta Prego. Make it for March 6th.
Please confirm the following details: Booking a table for 2 at Pasta Prego, March 6th, at 5:30 pm in Napa.
Yes that works for me.
Your reservation went through!
I am in a small plan to eat food outside for which I need to search for a restaurant for 1 person. Can you help me to search for?
Yes, definitely I will help you. Is there any particular restaurant in you mind? let me know it to search accordingly.
I think Suraj Restaurant is comfortable to me.
in Which City?
I need to reserve is at Redwood city.
I need some more information to book the table. Please let me know the time of reservation that you want to book?
book it at 11:15.
Please confirm to book a table for 1 at Suraj Indian Cuisine in Redwood City on March 1st at 11:15 am.
That is confirmed to proceed.
Sorry, Unfortunately I could not make the reservation as per your wish. Shall I try it for some other time at 11 am on the same day March 1st for 1 person because Suraj Indian Cuisine is the nice place to eat.
Okay, go ahead.
Your table was booked at that time.
Im looking for a restaurant reservation on the 14th.
Which restaurant and what time?
I like Billy Berk's located in San Jose. 6:30 in the evening is perfect.
I will make a reservation for 2 at Billy Berk's in San Jose March 14th at 6:30 pm with your permission.
Permission granted.
The reservation is set.
Great.
Do you need further assistance?
I am planning on celebrating and would like to book a suitable restaurant for the occasion. Can you finalize my table booking?
Is there a specific restaurant you would like me to reserve, and do you have a time in mind for the booking?
I would like to reserve a table at Aatxe for 7 o"clock in the evening, please
And what is the location of the restaurant?
The restaurant is located in San Francisco
So to confirm, you would like reservations for 2 at Aatxe in San Francisco on March 1st at 7 pm.
That is incorrect. The reservation is for four people at Lapats Noodles
Again, confirming that you would like a reservation for 4 people at Lapats Thai Noodles Bar
Yes, that's perfect! Can you tell me if the restaurant is reasonably priced? And also, what is the exact location of the restaurant?
Your table has been successfully confirmed. The restaurant's prices are considered moderate and they are located at 601 Larkin Street
My best friend and I want to grab something to eat. Please help me make a reservation at a restaurant.
Any particular city I should search in? Is there a restaurant you'd prefer? For what time should I make the reservation?
Please make a 17:30 reservation at Noodles And Company in San Ramon.
Sure, no problem. Let me see if I got everything correctly: You'd like to book a table for 2 people at 5:30 pm at Noodles And Company in San Ramon, on March 1st.
That is correct. Please give me their contact number.
I have successfully made your reservation. Their contact number is 925-275-8105.
I want to book a table at a restaurant. Make it for eight in the night.
For which city?
In Concord.
Do you have restaurant you would like dine at?
The restaurant is La Fritanguera.
Please confirm the booking details: Booking a table for 2 people at La Fritanguera, March 1st, at 8 pm in Concord.
Yes, please do it.
Sorry the reservation didn't go through. Can I help you with another task?
Try it again please. This time make it for 6 pm at the Bronze Buddha.
Please confirm the following details: Booking a table for 2 at the Bronze Buddha, March 1st, at 6 pm in Concord.
Yes. What is their phone number?
The reservation was successful! Their number is 925-524-0768.
I would like to book a table at a restaurant.
At which restaurant?
Make it for Chouquet's.
In which city?
Search SFO please.
At what time do you want to arrive?
Book it for a quarter to 1 in the afternoon.
Please confirm the booking details: Booking a table for 2 at Chouquet's in San Francisco, March 1st at 12:45 pm.
Yes, that's what I want.
Sorry the reservation did not go through. Shall I try again at Chouquet's? I will make it for 2 people on March 1st at 1 pm.
Yes, please do.
Your reservation is complete.
Thank you so very much!
May I help you with another request?
I want to make a reservation at a restaurant on 8th of March.
Which city would you like me to search in?
I want to find something in San Francisco.
What time do you want the reservation for? Do you have a particular
Make it for evening 6:30, the restaurant Rose Pistola.
Let's confirm the details. Booking a table for 2 people at Rose Pistola in San Francisco. The reservation is at 6:30 pm on March 8th.
Yeah that works great for me.
I have made the reservation.
I want to make a restaurant reservation.
In which city should I search or do you want me to search in a preferred restaurant?
Please check The Pullman in Santa Rosa at quarter past 1 in the afternoon.
Please confirm you want me to book a table for 2 at The Pullman Kitchen in Santa Rosa on March 1st at 1:15 pm.
Actually, for March 8th.
Please confirm you want me to book a table on March 8th at 1:15 pm.
Yes. Is this in the lavish price range?
The Pullman Kitchen is in the moderate price range. I'm sorry your reservation was snot successful. Would you like me to make a reservation for March 8th at 1 pm for a party of 2 instead.
Yes, that's perfect.
Your table has been reserved.
Is there live music?
No. There is no live music.
I'd like a restaurant reservation.
Which restaurant and in which city would you like to reserve?
I would like Risibisi in Petaluma at the evening 5:45.
Please confirm for 2 people at 5:45 pm on March 1st at Risibisi in Petaluma at the evening 5:45.
Yes, that is fine.
I wasn't able to reserve. How about 2 people on March 1st at 5:30 pm at Risibisi?
Yes, that will be fine.
The reservation is a success.
What would be their contact number and is there live music?
The phone number is 707-766-7600.
Thanks so much for your help.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
I would like to eat somewhere
In which city? What kind of food would you like to eat?
In SF. I'd like some Mediterranean food
In San Francisco there's Barcha
What other restaurants are there?
In San Francisco there's also Boulibar
Can you help me find a god place to eat?
What kind of cuisine are you looking for, Italian, chinese or something else
I would like to have parisian food
Which city are you searching for?
I am looking for it in San fran
I have found 10 places in San Francisco for you. How does amelie san francisco sound?
No, how about something in san jose instead. There isn't a price preference.
Emile's in san jose is a great place
I'm looking for a restaurant.
Would you like Chinese, Indian or something else? In which city are you located?
I would like some Pizza in the city of San Jose.
There are 10 restaurants in San Jose. Al Castello Ristorante is nice.
Where are they located and do they have live music?
They do not have live music. They are located at 2083 Camden Avenue.
Could you find another restaurant?
Angelo's Italian Restaurant is located in San Jose.
Can you find a restaurant that serves alcohol?
Antonella's Ristorante is located in San Jose.
I'd like an expensive place to eat that serves alcohol.
Sure, which city and would you been interested in American or Mexican?
San Francisco and any sort of California food would be great.
How about Grill at the St. Regis in San Francisco?
Is there live music and where are they located?
No live music and 125 3rd Street.
Perfect, thanks.
Shall I make a reservation?
No
Is there anything else you need?
I'm starved! I need to find an eatery.
In what city?
Something in San Francisco.
Any specific type of food?
Yeah. I'd love to have some ramen.
Sure thing. I found 10 restaurants in San Francisco that suit your needs. I personally recommend 2g Japanese Brasserie.
That sounds good.
Want to book a table right now?
No, not now.
Is there anything else I can assist you with today?
I think I'm going to treat myself to a movie and dinner night. Can you find me a restaurant that serves Pasta that is moderate priced?
Sure, in what city?
Anywhere in SFO is fine.
Ok, I found 10 restaurants you might like in San Francisco. How about 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano?
Do they serve liquor, and what's their number?
Yes, they have alcohol. Their number is 415-543-5100.
I want some intermediate priced Cambodian food.
What city?
Oakland.
Holy Basil Pho is located in Oakland.
Do they have alcohol?
Yes, they do.
Yes, that is perfect.
Are you ready to make a reservation?
I'm meeting a friend later to go out to eat. Can you help me find a restaurant that serves Latin American food around Oakland?
Sure! You should check out Agave Uptown, it's a nice restaurant in Oakland.
Great, what's their address?
They're located at 2135 Franklin Street.
Are they expensive and do they play live music?
They have a moderate price range, and they don't have live music.
Okay, can you look for some Italian restaurants?
I found a nice restaurant in Oakland called A16.
What about any others?
How about Belotti Ristorante E Bottega located in Oakland?
I am feeling hungry, so I need to find a place to eat.
Is there a specific kind of food you want the restaurant to serve, and which city do you want the restaurant to be located at?
I am okay with the Burger type of food. I want the restaurant to be in San Fran.
There are 10 restaurants which match what you want. One of the restaurants is 1760, which is a good restaurant in San Francisco.
I need to find something to do on this date coming up. Can you look up restaurants in Palo Alto for me?
Sure, what type of food? Like Indian, Mexican, or something else?
I've been craving Japanese food.
I found 6 Japanese restaurants in Palo Alto. How about Fuki Sushi?
Hm, maybe. What's their address and number?
They're at 4119 El Camino real, and their number is 650-494-9383.
Im searching for a place to eat
What's your preferred kind of food like Chinese or Italian like that
Some deli kind will be great
In which city you want
Make it Martinez
There is 1 restaurant named McDonald's which is a good restaurant located in Martinez
Will they serve liquor
No they dont
Do they have live music
Yes they do play live music
Can you please help me find me a good restaurant?
In which city are you planning to dine and do you have any preferred cuisines?
I'd love to have Parisian food in SF.
May I recommend the Amelie San Francisco restaurant which is a very nice restaurant in San Francisco?
That sounds like a good one.
Is there anything else I can help with?
I'm hungry, let's find something to eat!
No problem, let's find the perfect spot. Would you prefer Mexican, Indian or something else? Which city should I search.
Search in Alameda for Pizza and Pasta places.
I have 3 options for you. How about C'era Una Volta in Alameda?
Ok, that will work!
Should I reserve a table for you?
No, I don't need that.
Alright, is there anything else I can help with?
Will you find some Asian Fusion?
Which city?
SFO.
Atami Sushi Bar & Grill in San Francisco.
Assistant, help me find a good place to grab a bite to eat.
What type of cuisine are you in the mood for?
Let's try something new. Please find restaurants with Cantonese dishes please.
What city do you wish to search?
I'm looking for places to get food in Palo Alto.
There are 5 restaurants with Cantonese dishes in Palo Alto. I recommend Chef Zhao Kitchen.
Tell me if they serve alcohol.
Chef Zhao Kitchen does not serve alcohol at their establishment.
That works out just fine for me.
I'm glad to hear that. Would you like to reserve a table at this establishment?
No thank you. I just wanted to know about Cantonese dishes in the area.
Do you require any more help right now?
I'm hungry. Can you look for a restaurant in San Ramon which is not very costly?
Sure. What type of cuisine do you want? Italian? Indian? Something else?
Veggie food would be great.
I see 1 place in San Ramon you might like: Favorite Indian Restaurant.
Any live music there?
No.
What's their phone number?
925-560-9310.
Sounds good.
Should I book you a seat?
No, thank you.
Do you need assistance with anything else?
I am interested in finding a place to eat. I would like a place that serves alcohol.
What is the city you want me to look in? What is the type of food you are interested in?
Italian food would be perfect and I would like it in Los Gatos.
I have located 2 restaurants, one is a nice restaurant called Gallo's in Los Gatos.
Can you give me their address?
Yes, the address is 14180 Blossom Hill Road.
Can you tell me how pricey their food is?
The price range there is moderate.
Yes, that is fine with me.
Would you like a reservation for a table there?
I want to find a restaurant.
What kind of cuisine are you craving - Italian, Mexican say whatever you want. Where should I look?
I would really enjoy some Sushi. I will be dining in Oakland.
This has been called an enjoyable place to eat and it is in Oakland its called Ginza | Japanese Sushi Restaurant.
That sounds like it would be wonderful.
Should I get a table for you?
No, I'd rather not make a reservation right now.
Are there other tasks for me to complete?
Will you find me a place to eat?
Which city? What kind of food? Chinese, Mexican or something else?
Spicy Noodles in Palo Alto.
I found 3 restaurants. One of them is Lotus Thai Bistro in Palo Alto.
Great.
You want to reserve a table?
I need a place to eat that is American and inexpensive.
What city should I search?
I would like SFO.
Chaparral is a great restaurant in San Francisco.
Can I suggest something more pricey for a restaurant.
I have 10 restaurants including 1760 which is in San Francisco.
Yes, that will be fine.
Do you want to reserve a table.
No, I don't need to do that.
Can I assist you with anything else?
I forgot I need to plan this date night. Can you see if there's an Italian place nearby with a moderate price range?
Sure, in what city?
It'll be in San Francisco.
Ok, I found 10 moderately priced Italian restaurants in San Francisco. What do you think of 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano?
What's the address and phone number?
They're at 16 Mint Plaza, and their number is 415-543-5100.
I want to find a place to eat in Sonoma.
What sort of food are you looking for? You could say Chinese, Italian or something else.
Pizza would be good.
I have 5 restaurants. Della Santina's is a good restaurant in sonoma.
What is the contact number and is live music available?
The phone number is 707-935-0576. There is no live music.
Could you suggest something else?
What about Meritage Martini Oyster Bar & Grille? That is a good restaurant in Sonoma.
That is fine for me.
Do you want to reserve a table?
What's a nice place to dine?
Where?
SFO please.
ny particular food type?
I like Latin American dishes.
One of 8 found in San Francisco is Alegrias.
Is there alcoholic beverages or live music?
Neither is available there.
That will be fine.
I can get you a reservation if you like?
Not right now.
Do you need further help?
I'm hungry. Can you find me a restaurant in Berkeley? Preferably, a place with live music.
Sure. What type of cuisine do you feel like having? American? Mexican? Something else?
A coffeehouse would be great.
How about McDonald's? It's in Berkeley.
I am looking for cheap food in San Francisco.
What kind of food like Mexican or Indian?
I like to eat Szcheuan food.
In San Francisco, Alice's is good.
Yes, I accept that.
Did you want a table?
I want to go out to eat. I'd like to try a pasta restaurant in SF.
I found 10 such places. You could try 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano in San Francisco.
Can you search for other affordable options, places which serve alcohol.
You could try A16, that's a nice restaurant in San Francisco.
What's the address and contact number?
It's located at 2355 Chestnut Street, and the phone number is 415-771-2216.
Where can I eat out for today?
What kinds of food are you interested in?
I like eating burgers in general.
Where are you located, or where shall I search for burger joints?
Find me a burger joint in SF.
How about 5a5 Steak Lounge, located in San Francisco?
You got any moderate priced places to chow down?
Depends on the food. Indian? Italian? You pick it.
Lets try Korean Hot Pot. Look in Santa Clara.
I recommend Chimek IN Santa Clara.
They got a band there?
No they do not provide live music.
Will you find a restaurant?
Which city?
San Fran.
Which kind of food? Chinese, Mexican, or something else?
Pasta.
54 Mint Ristorante Italiano in San Francisco is one of 10 restaurants found.
They Serve alcohol?
Yes.
Will you find a restaurant?
Which city?
Moraga.
What kind of food?
Quick meal.
Mountain Mike's Pizza in Moraga.
Why don't you ever get me Diner food anymore? Can you do that for me now?
Sure, what city?
How about San Fran?
Well, there are 10 there. Try 1760 in san Francisco.
Great, you finally are giving me what I want.
What else do you want?
I am totally starving.
What are you in the mood for? Mexican? American?
How about California cuisine?
In what city?
Try Oakland first.
There are 3 restaurants in Oakland. Dopo is recommended.
Do they have a singer or band?
No live music.
Where are they exactly?
4293 Piedmont Avenue.
What else do you have?
In Oakland? Mockingbird.
Keep going. Try some Korean. Intermediate Priced.
In Oakland, Azit would fit that bill.
Can you find a place to eat for me?
Sure. Please tell me in which city and also if you are looking for a specific cuisine.
I'd like you to find me a Filipino restaurant, not very costly, in Newark.
There's 1 restaurant in Newark matching your criteria - Isla Filipino Restaurant.
Do you know if they have live music and if they serve alcohol?
They don't serve liquor and they also don't have live music.
OK, that could work.
Do you want me to book a table for you?
No, thank you.
Is there anything else that I can do for you?
I'm looking for somewhere to eat.
In what city?
Somewhere in SFO.
What kind of food would you like? You can say Chinese, Indian or something else.
Chinese food sounds good.
I found 10 Chinese restaurants in San Francisco. Alice's is suppose to be nice.
What are their prices like? Can you give me their phone number?
It is an inexpensive restaurant. The number is 415-282-8999.
What is another choice?
There's the Bamboo Restaurant in San Francisco.
Any more?
There is also Bei Fang Style in San Francisco.
I am going out for lunch with friends and I am looking for a venue that is not very costly.
What type of cuisine would you prefer, Italian, American, or something else? In which city are you located?
I'm in the moon for some Halal and I am located in Union City.
I found a nice restaurant in Union City called Peshawari Kababs.
Do they play live music?
No, they do not.
It's been a long time since I've had an indulgent meal. Can you find something pricey for me?
What type of food? Indian, Mexican, or something else? Also, what city?
Search for Cambodian food in San Fran.
In San Francisco, there's a great Cambodian restaurant called Kin Khao.
Does live music play there? Can I have liquor there?
Neither of those things are there.
Okay, that works with me.
Want to book a table there?
Find a restaurant that serves alcohol.
Cuisine type and city?
Cambodian. Oakland.
I found 1: Phnom Penh Restaurant is in Oakland.
I want to find a nice restaurant.
What city would you like it in?
I need it to be in San Jose.
What type of food would you like? Maybe Italian, Indian or something else.
I want some good Asian food.
How about China Garden Restaurant located in San Jose it has good ratings. IF that does work I have 10 others you might like.
Do they have a band play?
No they don't have live music.
How extravagant is the prices? Where are they located in San Jose.
They are an inexpensive. They are located at 1890 West San Carlos Street.
Whats another option you have.
Many people say Dynasty in San Jose.
Yes that will be great.
Would you like to book a table.
I'd like to go out to eat
In which city? What kind of food would you like to eat?
In Oakland. I'd like some snacks kind of food
In Oakland there's Bellanico Restaurant And Wine Bar
I am planning to eat outside and for which I need your help to find some nice places with liquor supply. Can you search for the one now?
Do you want me to search in any particular City?
Yes, search it for me in San Francisco.
To make a fast search I need to know your interested kind of food that you want to eat now. Can you tell me the same now?.
Search for something like Burrito food.
Found 10 restaurants. What about Arguello in San Francisco. I think this is the best restaurant in this City. Tell me about your opinion to proceed further.
NO, I want something else.
Okay, Do you prefer with Cadillac Bar & Grill restaurant in San Francisco?
No, that is also not the one I want. Can you search for something else with average priced food.
Found that the restaurant named Celia's By The Beach is the nice one in San Francisco. How about that?
Let me know their phone number to decide.
Their phone number is 415-759-8741.
Can you check whether they will offer live music there?
Checked and found that they do not have live music.
That is okay with me.
Shall I go with reservation?
I am interested in finding a place to eat.
Is there a specific city where I should look for the restaurant?
I want the restaurant to be located in Oakland.
Is there a specific kind of food you are looking for? It can be American, Indian or something else.
I would be fine with the Breakfast kind of food.
There are 3 restaurants which match what you want. One of the restaurants is Lungomare which is located in Oakland.
Yes, that suits me well.
Do you want to book a table at this restaurant?
No, I do not want to make a reservation now.
Is there something else I can help you with?
I need to find a place to eat.
Can you tell me which city I should look for the restaurant? Is there a specific kind of food you want to have?
I would enjoy having some kind of Veggie type of food, and I want the restaurant to be in Berkeley.
Great Wall | Chinese Restaurant is a good restaurant which can be found in Berkeley.
Is there some other restaurant you can suggest?
Another good restaurant I can suggest is Himalayan Flavors in Berkeley.
Can you check if they have live music there?
Unfortunately they do not have live music.
Then could please find me some other restaurant in SFO?
There is a good restaurant in San Francisco called Ben Wah Restaurant.
Can you give me their phone number?
If you want to call them you can at 415-318-8000.
Alright, that would work.
Is there something else I can do for you?
I'm meeting a friend to get food together. Can you find me restaurants around SF? Price doesn't matter.
Sure, what kind of food would you like to eat? I can find places that serve Indian, Mexican or any other kind of food.
I'm in the mood to eat at a place that serves alcohol and Breakfast & Brunch food.
Okay, you should check out Absinthe Brasserie & Bar in San Francisco then.
What's their address and phone number?
You can reach them at 415-551-1590 and their address is 398 Hayes Street.
Great, sounds good to me.
Do you want me to make a reservation here for you?
No thanks, not right now.
Anything else I can help with?
I want to eat somewhere in Hayward, that has moderate priced food.
Do you have a preference in regards to types of food, such as American or Chinese?
I think I want to eat somewhere with Sichuan food.
I have 3 recommendations, how about Chef's Experience China Bistro in Hayward?
Anything else you can recommend?
Another restaurant in Hayward is the Hinata Sushi Buffet
That sounds good for me.
Would you like to make a reservation.
I would like to find a restaurant.
What kind of food would you like, Mexican, American or something else?
I would like some Diner food in San Fran.
1760 is a restaurant in San Francisco.
Yes, that is perfect.
Would you like to reserve a table at that restaurant?
I'd like to find a restaurant
Sure, which city?
Menlo Park
What style of food? Does American or Mexican sound good?
I'd like Barbecue
How about Juban Yakiniku House in Menlo Park
sure
Is there anything else you'd like?
I want to eat at a place that serves Ramen noddles. I somthing intermediate priced will be great.
What city would you like it in?
I need it to be in SFO
2g Japanese Brasserie in San Francisco is highly rated. If you would prefer something else I have 10 options for you.
Yes that will be great.
Would you like to make a reservation.
No, Not at this time.
IS there something else I can do for you?
Could you help me find a place to eat? I am looking for something new.
Sure, is there a particular type of food that you are interested in?
Well, I love noodles. If you can find a place that had pasta that would be perfect!
Ok, what location would you like to look in?
I'm in Oakland so it would be good if it was close to me.
There is a really good restaurant in Oakland called Becky's. It is highly rated by customers.
That sounds good, I've never heard of it before. I'm excited to try it.
Can I go ahead and make the reservation for you?
No, I'm not sure when I want to go.
Is there anything else you need today?
I need to find a good restaurant.
Which type of food would you like to search for, for example American, Italian, etc.? Which city would you like to search in?
I need some Szcheuan food in Antioch.
Double Dragon is a nice restaurant which matches your choice in Antioch.
Any other suggestions?
Rice Bowl is wonderful and is located in Antioch.
Yeah, that works.
Would you like to reserve a table there?
No, I don't want that.
Is there anything else that I may help you with?
I want to find a new restaurant. What do you suggest to eat in San Francisco?
What type of cuisine are you looking for? Chinese, Indian or which type?
I'm craving some Oriental food.
There are 10 restaurants you might like. There is the 8 Immortals Restaurant in San Francisco.
Do they serve liquor?
They do not.
Well, that is okay.
Do you want to book a table?
No, I do not want to.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
I would like to find a restaurant that has Tacos.
In which city should I search?
I would like a restaurant in Redwood City.
There is 7 Mares located in Redwood City.
Is there a restaurant in Union City?
Chevys Fresh Mex is a nice restaurant in Union City.
I would like a place to eat.
What city should I look in?
I would like San Jose.
Which kind of food do you like?
I would like Pho food.
There is a nice restaurant in San Jose called Bowl & Plate At White Shallot.
Tell me their contact number.
The phone number is 408-246-5251.
Tell me the address and if they serve liquor.
The address is 3143 Stevens Creek Boulevard and they serve alcohol.
Please suggest another restaurant.
I would like Dong Que Restaurant in San Jose.
Please suggest another restaurant.
In San Jose is Elevenfifty a nice restaurant.
Could you find me a Breakfast & Brunch place to eat, in Oakland?
I found Bellanico Restaurant And Wine Bar, a nice restaurant in Oakland.
Please find out whether the place is afforadable and get me their address also.
They offer a moderate price range, and are at 4238 Park Boulevard.
Find a place to eat.
Cuisine? Do you like Mexican, Chinese? In which city?
Gastropub in Sebastopol.
Gypsy Cafe is in Sebastopol.
Do they serve alcohol? Are they pricey?
They are moderate in price and do serve alcohol.
Please search for a place to eat.
In which city would you like?
I would like Berkeley.
What is your preferred food?
I am thinking Sicilian would be good!
I found 1 restaurant in Berkeley called Agrodolce Osteria.
I would like to find a place to eat.
Would you be interested in chinese, italian or something else?
Pizza sounds great.
In what city should I search?
Please look in Palo Alto.
There are 7 restaurants you may likein Palo Alto. One nice restuarant is Buca Di Beppo Italian Restaurant.
What are some other restaurant suggestions that also serve alcohol?
Vina Enoteca is 1 restaurant you may like in Palo Alto.
What is the phone number?
They may be reached at 650-646-3477.
Do they offer live music?
Unfortunately, they do not offer live music.
That's okay, it still works for me.
Would you like table reservations?
I would like to find a restaurant that is affordable and serves Barbecue.
In which city should I search?
Can you search in Oakland and a place that serves alcohol.
Chop Bar is a nice restaurant in Oakland.
What is their address?
They are located at 247 4th Street.
Could you suggest another restaurant?
Duchess Oakland is a nice restaurant in Oakland.
What is their address and do they have live music?
They have live music and their address is 5422 College avenue.
Could you suggest another restaurant?
Forge Pizza Oakland is a nice restaurant in Oakland.
Yes, that is great.
Would you like to reserve a table?
I'd like to find a good place to eat.
Sure thing. What city would you like me to search in?
I'm looking for something afforadable in Vallejo.
Okay, what type of food are you looking for?
I could really go for some Mexican food right now.
Alright, I found 1 restaurant for you. I hear Chevys Fresh Mex in Vallejo is a nice restaurant.
I would like to find a restaurant in Hayward.
What type of food are you looking for, Indian, Italian or any other food?
Some Japanese restaurant would be perfect.
Sushi Ichimoto is a restaurant located fin Hayward.
I want to find something to eat that is intermediate priced in San Jose. Thai food would be good.
I have 10 restaurants. What about Erawan Thai Cuisine? That is a good one in San Jose.
Okay, works for me.
Do you want me to reserve a table?
I'm hungry. Can you find me a good place to eat?
Sure thing. What city would you like to eat at? Any particular type of food you were thinking about?
I'd really love some Southern food. Can you find me something out in San Fran?
Absolutely. I found 10 restaurants you may like. 1760 is a really nice restaurant located in San Francisco.
Hi, I'd like to find somewhere to eat.
Okay, what type of food do you like? American, Italian, whatever you fancy.
I think Asian Fusion would be great for me.
Great, what city would you like to eat in?
I need somewhere in Santa Rosa.
I found 2 restaurants you may like. Haku Sushi is a nice place in Santa Rosa.
Hm, do you have anything else for me?
Okay, Shogun | Japanese Restaurant in Santa Rosa is a good one.
Yeah, that sounds good to me.
Do you want me to book you a table there?
No thanks, I don't need to.
Is there anything more I can do for you?
I am feeling hungry, so I need to find a place to eat.
Can you tell me, for which city should I look for?
I want for the restaurant to be in SF.
Is there a specific type of food you enjoy? It can be American, Italian or some other type of food.
I usually like having Steakhouse kind of food.
There is a good restaurant in San Francisco called 5a5 Steak Lounge.
Can you tell me the address of this restaurant?
The address of the restaurant is 244 Jackson Street.
Can you check if the price range of the restaurant is above average? What phone number can I use to call them?
The price range for this restaurant is considered as expensive. If you want to call them you can at 415-989-2539.
Yes, that suits me well.
Do you want to book a table at this restaurant?
Can you help me find a good restaurant?
Certainly! Would you like Chinese, Italian, or something else?
I'm thinking a Noodle restaurant sounds good.
Ok, what city do you want to look in?
Look for a restaurant in Berkeley please.
Kirin Restaurant is the 1 restaurant I found in Berkeley that you may enjoy.
That sounds good.
Do you want me to make a reservation for you?
I'm looking for a vegan restaurant that serves alcohol.
In which city?
Napa.
I found 1 match: Mango on Main ( A.k.a.mini mango thai bistro) is in Napa.
Do they have live music? What's their number?
707-253-8880. No live music.
My inlaws will are coming to visit and I'm trying to find a place to eat. They really like Parisian food.
Sure, where would you like for me look for a restaurant?
I am thinking that we will drive to San Francisco, there are a lot of restaurants there.
There is a very nice restaurant in San Francisco called Amelie San Francisco.
We have been there before, it is good! But do you have any other suggestions? I'd like to take them somewhere new.
Yes, have you tried Aquitaine Wine Bar & Bistro? It is also in San Francisco.
No, we haven't been there. Do they have live music?
No, unfortunately they don't have live music.
That's ok, that restaurant will work.
Would you like to make reservations now?
No, I will make them later, our plans could change.
Do you need any help with anything else today?
I need a place to eat.
Chinese? Italian? Mexican?
I want a burger joint in San Fran.
I found 4 options like Elmira Rosticceria in San Francisco.
I'm looking for a restaurant that serves Burger, that is intermediate priced and that has live music.
In which city would you like?
I would like a restaurant in San Jose.
There are 3 restaurants. There is Hukilau located in San Jose.
Could you find me a place to eat in Petaluma?
Any particular cuisine you'd prefer?
Sushi would be perfect.
I found 2 restaurants that might interest you. How about Kabuki Japanese Restaurant, a nice restaurant located in Petaluma?
Please make other suggestions.
How about Paradise Sushi & Grill , a nice restaurant located in Petaluma?
That sounds perfect.
Should I go ahead and reserve a table for you?
No, I am not interested in doing that.
Would you like my help with anything else?
I am looking for a latin american place where the food is not very costly
Which city are you searching for?
I want to search in fairfield.
How about Chevys fresh mex in fairfield
that sounds nice
should I reserve a table there
I am hungry!
What type of food do you want?
English food sounds great!
Which city should I look in?
San Leandro please.
San Leandro has an English restaurant called The Englander Sports Pub & Restaurant.
What's the address and number?
Their number is 510-357-3571 and the address is 101 Parrott Street.
Can you help me find a place to eat?
Sure. What city should I search in?
Can you search in Petaluma?
What type of food do you want? American, Indian, or something else?
I'm craving some Pasta. That would be perfect.
The Brixx Pizzeria is located in Petaluma.
You find anything else?
How about the Cucina Paradiso? It is also located in Petaluma.
Okay, that sounds good.
Would you like to reserve a table?
No, I don't.
Do you need anything else?
I'm looking for somewhere to eat, and I don't care about the cost.
Do you want Indian food, Mexican food, or something else?
Brasserie food sounds good.
What city?
SF please.
I found 3 restaurants. Belga is a good restaurant in San Francisco.
I want a restaurant that serves alcohol, so any other recommendations?
I found 1 restaurant. Volta Modern Brasserie is a great San Francisco restaurant.
Ok, that's good.
Do you want to reserve a table?
Nope.
Do you need any other assistance?
Can you help me find a restaurant?
Sure, would you like Mexican food, Indian food, or something else?
I would like to find a Korean Barbeque in Oakland.
I recommend trying Azit in Oakland.
Are the prices economical and do they serve alhocol?
The restaurant does not serve alcohol and the prices are in the moderate range.
Any place you can recommend to eat out?
Are you interested in Chinese, Mexican, or another type of specialty food?
I like eating lobster and similar sea food, but it has to be afforadable and in SFO.
From 10 possible restaurants, how about Alamo Square Seafood Grill, located in San Francisco?
That works for me, thanks.
Do you want to reserve a table now?
No thanks, I don't need to make a reservation for now.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
I want to eat at a costly place.
What city?
SF.
What kind of food?
Indian.
Amber is a restaurant in San Francisco.
Do they have alcohol?
Yes, they do.
What is their phone number? Is there live music?
The phone number is 415-777-0500.
I am planning to eat outside for which I need your help to find some good places.
What is your interested category of food and in which City do you like to search for?
I like to eat Italian food in San Fran. Search accordingly.
Found 10 results. What about your opinion on the restaurant in San Francisco named 54 Mint Ristorante italiano which is the best one that suits your interest.
Get me their address details to decide further.
Address is 16 Mint Plaza. Is that okay to you?
No, please search for some other restaurants that suit my interest.
How about your suggestion on A16 restaurant in San Francisco.
Search for something else with liquor supply.
Got 8 results. What about Ala Romana in San Francisco?
Can you check whether they offer any Live music there?
No, they do not offer any music there.
That is okay for me.
Shall I book a table in that restaurant now?
Hi there, could you help me search for places to eat in Palo Alto?
Any preference on the type of food?
Barbecue food will be great for me, have been craving that for awhile now.
Sure, there are 9 restaurants lcoated in Palo Alto, would you like to try Bazille?
Are there any alternatives? I do not have any price preferences.
Sure, there are 8 restaurants in Palo Alto, how about Bird Dog?
May I have their contact number pleasse?
You can contact them at 650-656-8180.
Sure, this works fine with me.
Would you like me to make a reservation for you?
No thanks, that is not necessary.
Do you require any further assistance?
I want to find somewhere nice to eat.
In which city and what type of cuisine?
I want to get some burgers in San Jose.
There are 9 suitable locations. Black Angus steakhouse is an excellent choice. It is in San Jose.
Do they serve alcohol? Are the burgers affordable?
Alcohol is served there and the prices are moderate.
Is there anywhere else?
There is an excellent restaurant in San Jose called Citrus Restaurant.
I need to find a restaurant that's not very costly, maybe something with an Asian Fusion menu.
In what city please?
I'd like a place in San Jose please.
The Dynasty restaurant is a nice option in San Jose.
Is there live music there? And what is the address?
It is located at 1001 Story Road, but I'm sorry, they don't have live music.
That's okay, I like that one.
Shall I make a reservation for you?
I'm looking for an average priced restaurant
Any type of cuisine you're interested in?
How about some Korean Hot pot?
In what city?
Actually, make it Cambodian food. It will be in South San Francisco
Thai Satay Restaurant & Bar in South San Francisco looks good
Is there live music there
No, they don't offer live music?
Any other ideas?
White Elephant Restaurant in South San Francisco comes recommended
What else do you have?
Sorry. That's all I have matching your preferences. Would you like to look for something else?
Try again but in Hayward
Chai Thai Noodles in Hayward looks good
Do they have a bar?
No. They don't serve alcohol.
Will you find me a place to eat?
Which city? What kind of food?
Burger in Healdsburg.
I found 5 restaurants. Bear Republic Brewing Co is in Healdsburg.
Find me costly restaurants?
Chalkboard in Healdsburg.
Address and number?
29 North Street. You can reach them at 707-473-8030.
Great.
You want to reserve a table?
No.
Anything else?
Can you help me find a place to eat
any specific cuisine you are interested in? Indian, american or something else?
No, a take-out would be great
Which city should I base my search in?
I want one in Walnut creek
I have found panera bread in walnut creek which seems nice
Can you give me its address?
Sure, its 1140 locust street
I also need their contact number. Do they have live music?
They do have live music. Their number is 925-280-5590
Okay, thanks a lot.
Should I reserve your table there
Help me find a place to eat please
Any food specifications? Mexican, chinese or something else?
Burger in san jose would be perfect
I have found 10 restaurants in san jose for you. How about 71 saint peter?
I need some help with finding a restaurant.
Sure, which city are you located in.
I am in SFO.
There are many options available, what kind of food are you looking for?
Curry sounds really good to me right now.
Amber is a very nice restaurant in San Francisco that serves curry.
I don't want to go somewhere too expensive is it afforadable?
Well, it is listed as expensive.
Can you find me a good place to eat in Walnut Creek?
What kind of food do you want? You can say Italian, American or something else.
I'd like to find some Greek food.
I found 1 restaurant that serves Greek food in Walnut Creek. It's Opa Authentic Greek Cuisine Walnut Creek. Will that work?
I need a place to eat.
Which city and food should I look for?
I would like San Carlos some snacks.
I see West Park Bistro is nice in San Carlos.
Tell me the address.
The address is 788 Laurel Street.
What is the number and do they serve liquor.
They don't serve any alcohol and the number is 650-453-3313
Where is a good place to eat?
What kind of food do you want? What city shall I look in?
Look in Daly City. I'm in the mood for breakfast food.
There's Nick's Kitchen in Daly City.
Are there any more?
Sorry, that is the only one that has an all day breakfast menu.
Korean food also sounds good, I'm looking for something that is moderate in price.
Dim Sum King is suppose to have good Korean food and is located in Daly City.
Thanks, that sounds good.
Is there anything else you need?
Can you look up restaurants for me?
Is there any kind of food you're craving? Where would you like the restaurant to be located?
I've been thinking about ramen a lot - somewhere in Mountain View.
Okay, there's 9 options here - Bushido in Mountain View has a good rating.
I heard it's expensive - can you find me something average priced?
There's 7 options, there's Gochi Japanese Fusion Tapas in Mountain View.
Okay, yeah, that sounds good.
Would you like to make a reservation?
No, thanks, I don't know when I'm going yet.
What else can I help you with?
Can you help me find somewhere to eat nearby?
Where should I look?
I want to go somewhere in Sunnyvale.
What type of food would you like? Chinese, Italian, or something else?
I think Mediterranean sounds good right now.
Obed is a good Mediterranean restaurant in Sunnyvale.
I'm looking for an economical restaurant
Sure. Any type of cuisine you're interested in?
How about some Cantonese food?
Ok, what city?
Look in Foster City
I found 1 restaurant. Cooking Papa in Foster City looks good
Can I get their phone number? Do they have a full bar?
You can reach them at 650-577-1832. They do not serve liquor.
Ok that's fine.
Would you like to book a table?
No not right now
Anything else I can help with?
I'm really feeling an itch to eat some costly lobster in Los Gatos. Can you find me somewhere where I can do just that?
Sure thing. There's 1 lobster restaurant in Los Gatos called Steamer's Grillhouse.
That sounds great!
Want to get a table there?
I need a restaurant.
In which city and are you looking for Mexican, American or something else?
I'm looking for Izakaya food in San Francisco.
2g Japanese Brasserie is located in San Francisco.
Okay. That one sounds good.
Would you like me to book a table?
Can you find me a place to it.
Sure. In which city?
Please find me something in San Rafael.
Are you looking for a specific cuisine - American, Mexican or maybe something else?
Gastrobar would be awesome.
In San Rafael I can recommend The State Room.
I have a plan to eat out side for which I need your help to find one nice place. Can you help me?
Yes. Do you have any preferred City and Category of food to search for?
Yes. Search it in San Francisco. I like Lobster very much and can you search for the one?
What about your opinion on restaurant Akiko's Sushi Bar in San Francisco?
Okay. But please try to search for some other nice places.
Found another restaurant named Alamo Square Seafood Grill in San Francisco. How about that?
Find me a restaurant to go to.
What type of food do you like and in what city do you want to eat in?
Find me some Malaysian food in Redwood City.
Erawan Thai Restaurant is in Redwood City and they serve Malaysian food.
Can you give me their phone number and their location?
They are located at 2639 Broadway and you can contact them at 650-556-9966.
What other suggestions do you have, preferably something afforadable?
Search revealed 2 places. Karakade Thai Cuisine is affordable and in Redwood City
I will be meeting with some friends and would like to find a place to eat.
What type of cuisine do you like? indian, Chinese or which one? Where do you want to look for a restaurant?
Search for something that sells Noodles in Dublin.
There is China Paradise Restaurant in Dublin.
Do they sell liquor? Where is it located?
The address is 4580 Dublin Boulevard and they do not serve alcohol.
That is alright.
Do you want to book a table?
I am wanting to find a place to eat in SFO. Spicy Indian would be perfect for my needs.
Amber is a very good restaurant in San Francisco.
I would like one in Sunnyvale, can you give me any other suggestions?
There is a nice restaurant in Sunnyvale called Amaravathi Vegetarian Restaurant.
Are there other restaurants you can suggest?
Arka Indian Restaurant is a good restaurant that is in Sunnyvale.
Can you help me find a nice place to eat?
Sure. Please tell me in which city and what type of cuisine?
Please find me some Asian Fusion restaurants in San Carlos.
In San Carlos I recommend King Chuan.
Do you have their phone number?
Sure, you can reach them at 650-593-1035.
Perfect, thank you!
Do you want me to book a table for you?
No, not at the moment.
Is there anything else I could do for you?
I will be meeting with some friends, what good place do you recommend to eat at?
What type of cuisine are you looking for? Where do you want to look for?
Look for something Italian at an afforadable price in SF.
There are 10 possible restaurants that you might like. How about 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano in San Francisco?
What other restaurants are there?
There is also A16 in San Francisco.
Do they serve liquor?
They do server alcohol.
Find me please a place to eat.
In what city do you want to eat?
In Fremont will be great.
What type of food you like? Indian, Italian or something else?
Hunan kind of food will be great.
1 nice restauant I found for you in Fremont called Hunan Cuisine.
Yes, I like it.
A reservation here will be good for you?
No.I don't want,thanks.
With something else I can help you?
I want to eat something, so I want to find a place to eat.
Can you tell me which city should I look for the restaurant?
I want the restaurant to be in Pacifica. I usually enjoy the Izakaya kind of food.
There are 3 restaurants which you might like. 8 Sushi is a good restaurant, which can be found in Pacifica.
Can you check if they have live music? Can you tell me the phone number I can use to call them?
If you want to call them you can at 650-898-8730. Unfortunately this restaurant doesn't have live music.
That's what I want.
Is there something else I can help you with?
I want you to find me somewhere to eat in San Leandro that has live music
What type of restaurant would you prefer?
I was hoping to find a Deli type.
I found 1 restaurant in San Leandro and it is Mcdonald's.
The address please.
That wold be 14823 East 14th Street.
I have a small plan to eat outside and I need your help to find some nice places to eat. Can you search the one for me.
Yes, what about your interested kind of food like Italian, American or any other kind that you liked the most?
I like Szcheuan foods and please make the search accordingly.
in which City?
Search for some restaurants in Oakland and I want the one with reasonably priced.
Found 5 results. What about Fortune Restaurant in Oakland which I think is the best one to eat.
Are any liquor supply there? let me know their contact number for my reference.
Yes, they will supply liquor and their contact number is 510-839-9697. Any more help you need from me to do?
Please help me find a place to eat.
Any particular cuisine I should search for, such as American, Indian or something else?
I'll be attending a party later, so a Light meal will work for me.
Any particular city I should search in?
It should be in San Fran.
1300 On Fillmore, a nice restaurant located in San Francisco, is among the 10 suitable restaurants I found.
That sounds perfect!
Should I go ahead and reserve a table here?
I'm looking for somewhere to eat with average priced food.
Where should I look?
I want something in Occidental. Parisian food would be good.
I found 1 restaurant you might like. It is Bistro Des Copains in Occidental.
That sounds good to me.
Should I reserve a table for you?
I am looking to eat somewhere any pick-up food would be fine
where should i search in
please search in milpitas
what about olive garden italian restaurant in milpitas
I really need some food right now. I'm looking for an eatery.
What type of food? Mexican? Indian? Something different? Also, what city?
I'd like it if you could find for me a Steakhouse in SF.
I have found 10 relevant San Francisco restaurants. One of htem is called 5a5 Steak Lounge. Does that sound appealing?
Can you find me somewhere to eat breakfast in Fairfield that serves alcohol?
Sure, there's 1 place in Fairfield called Mimi's Cafe.
Oh, that's perfect.
Should I book you a table?
No, not right now.
Anything else I can do for you?
Can you help me find a place to eat?
Where should I look? Do you have a preference for the type of food?
I'd like some American food in San Francisco.
I found 10 restaurants in San Francisco. How about 1760?
I'm starving! I'd love to eat some lobster.
In what city?
In Tiburon, to be exact.
I found 1 restaurant relevant to your needs. Specifically, Tiburon has a restaurant called Guaymas Restaurant.
Can you find me something to eat in the SF area? I'd prefer California fare.
There's Al's Place in San Francisco. How does that sound?
Okay. I'll go with that.
Do you want me to reserve you a table there?
I'm starved! Can you find me a reasonably priced eatery in Fremont?
What type of food? Indian? Chinese? Something else?
Oriental food would be great.
Okay. I found 3 Oriental restaurants in Fremont. How about Asian Pearl Seafood Restaurant?
Not so sure about that one. Find me a different restaurant.
Fremont also has Elephant Bar Restaurant.
That works for me.
Want to book a table?
No, not now.
Can I assist you further?
I am searching for a place to eat.
In which city shall I search? What type of food do you need?
I like Japanese type of food in SFO
I searched and found 10 restaurants for you. 2g Japanese Brasserie is a wonderful restaurant at San Francisco.
What is their phone number?
Their contact number is 415-292-9997
What is their contact address? Whether they have live music?
Sorry, they don't have live music. Their contact address is 601 Van Ness Avenue.
Can you give me the details of some other restaurant?
Ace Wasabi Rock-n-roll Sushi is a wonderful restaurant in San Francisco.
Can you give me the details of some other restaurant? I am searching for some afforadable price.
Akira Japanese Restaurant is a wonderful restaurant in San Francisco.
Yes. it is good for me.
Shall I reserve a table there?
Nope. Don't reserve a seat.
Shall I do anything for you?
I'm meeting a friend later to go out to eat together. Can you find me a place to eat that is economical?
Where should I look?
Look in the San Fran area.
What sort of food are you wanting to eat? I can find you restaurants that serve Indian, American or any other kind of food if you'd like.
I'm in the mood for some Pizza and Pasta food from a nice restaurant in Vacaville.
There are 2 restaurants I found that fit what you're looking for. How about eating at Evelyn's Big Italian Pizzeria & Ristorante in Vacaville?
Cool, that sounds perfect.
Should I book a table for you here?
No thanks.
Anything else I can do for you?
Please find me a place to eat.
Any particular city I should search in?
Please find something in Morgan Hill.
Any particular cuisine you'd prefer?
I'd like some Persian food.
There's a nice restaurant restaurant in Morgan Hill called Odeum.
Please let me know their address.
They are at 17500 Depot Street #180.
Can you find me some not very costly restaurants in Walnut Creek where Persian kind of food is served?
There are 2 restaurants. How about Lokanta Grill & Bar located in Walnut Creek?
Can you find me their address?
The street address of the restaurant is 1520 Locust Street.
Can you search for whether they have live music and their contact number?
They don't have live music and the contact number is 925-322-8671.
Are there any other restaurants?
How about Taheri's Mediterranean Restaurant & Catering in Walnut Creek?
Okay, That sounds good to me.
Do you want me to reserve a table for you?
I'm hungry! I'd like to get a bite at SFO.
Any specific type of food in mind?
I'd love to have some pizza and pasta.
A good place for that in San Francisco is 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano.
That works fine for me.
Want to get a table there?
No, not now.
Can I assist you with a different matter?
I'm looking for a good eatery.
Any specific food? What city?
I'd love to have some seafood in Livermore.
Okay. I found 2 restaurants in Livermore that serve seafood. How does Clay Oven sound?
Not sure about that one. Can you suggest another?
Sure. Another seafood eatery in Livermore is El Charro Mexican Food & Cantina.
Sounds good to me.
Want to book a table there?
No, not now.
How else can I help you out?
I am looking for a restaurant in Campbell.
What kind of food do you prefer?
I am interested in Pizza and Pasta.
There is a nice restaurant in Campbell called A Bellagio Italian Restaurant.
Could you find me something to eat in Cupertino? I need a place that serves alcohol and is economical priced.
What sort of food are you looking for? You could say Indian, Chinese or soething else.
Shanghai food would be good.
Shanghai Garden is a nice restaurant in Cupertino.
Is there live music?
There is no live music.
Could you tell me the address?
The address is 20956 Homestead Road.
I need to find a restaurant.
In which city and what type of food are you looking for?
I'm looking for California style food in Danville.
Bridges is one of 3 restaurants in the Danville area.
Could you suggest 1 of the other 2.
Danville Harvest is also located in Danville.
Help me find somewhere to eat. It needs to be in the moderate price range.
What kind of food would you like? Do you want me searching somewhere in particular?
Look for Burger joints in Los Gatos.
I've found 1 restaurant in Los Gatos that might work. How about California Cafe?
They they have alcohol?
They do not, no.
Okay, I'll head there.
Do you want to make a reservation now?
can you find a place to eat?
What category like Mexican, Italian or anything else do you prefer?
I prefer some Burrito kind of food.
What is your preference in city?
Search for the restaurant in San Leandro.
There are 7 restaurants. One is called Chili's Grill & Bar located in San Leandro.
Can you find me their address?
The address of the restaurant is 15555 East 14th Street Suite 366.
Can you look for any other afforadable priced restaurant?
There is nice restaurant called El Torito located in San Leandro.
Can you look for any other restaurant?
There is nice restaurant called Tequila Grill located in San Leandro.
Can you find me the contact number and search whether they have live music?
They do not have live music and the contact number is 510-895-5351.
I am looking for somewhere to eat.
What kind of food and what city should I search in?
I am looking for Ramen in Santa Clara.
I found 6 restaurants in Santa Clara. One is Amakai Japanese Cuisine.
Can you suggest another restaurant?
How about Fugetsu in Santa Clara?
Yes that will work.
Should I reserve a table for you?
Find me a korean Barbeque type of place to eat
Which city to look in?
In San Fran
ok we have Aato in San Francisco
Any thing else? looking for an average priced place
ok, i got 9 of your liking. Of them is Barnzu in San Francisco
Any thing else? looking for a fancy priced place
Yank Sing in San Francisco
Whats the address?
Its 49 Stevenson street
ok, sounds good
Should i book it?
No, not now
Any thing else?
I'm looking for a moderate priced place to eat.
Which city should I look in, and what category of cuisine? For example, there's American, Mexican, or anything else you like.
Let's do Korean Barbeque in San Leandro.
There's 1 place in San Leandro called Han Dae Gam Korean BBQ.
Yeah, let's do that.
Should I get you a table?
I'm looking for a very expensive place to eat.
What kind of food do you want?
I'm in the mood for French food.
What city do you want me to look in?
I want you to check Los Altos.
I found 1 French restaurant in Los Altos, it's called Ambience Restaurant.
Is there live music?
No, they don't.
It sounds good.
Shall I make a reservation?
Not just yet.
Is there anything else you need?
Do you have any recommendations for Greek restaurants? I'd like a place that's intermediate priced.
Sure, in what city are you looking to eat?
I'll be in Los Gatos for dinner.
People love Opa! Los Gatos in Los Gatos. WOuld you like to have dinner there?
Actually, I think I'd rather have some Cambodian food.
Got it. I've found 2 great Cambodian restaurants in Los Gatos. How about Coup De Thai?
Do you know if they serve liquor there? Also, what's their phone number?
You can reach them at 408-442-5977, and they do not serve any kind of alcohol.
Oh, okay. What was the other restaurant you had in mind?
Thai Spice is another popular Cambodian restaurant in Los Gatos.
I am in need of finding a place to eat. The place I am looking for should be above average priced.
Is there some specific kind of food you are looking for? Can you tell me the city where I should search for the restaurant?
I want the restaurant to be in SF, and I would be fine with Japanese food.
I can suggest Akiko's Restaurant which is a good restaurant situated in San Francisco.
Can you give me their phone number?
If you want to call them you can at 415-397-3218.
Alright, that suits me well.
Do you want to book a table at this restaurant?
No, I don't want to make a reservation now.
Is there something else I can help you with?
I am so starving.
What are you in the mood for?
A Gastropub would be great.
In what city?
Try San Fran.
I recommend B-side in San Francisco.
Pull up some average priced eateries please.
I would love to help with that, Are you interested in Mexican, Italian or something else? Also, which city should I search?
Sure, let's look for some awesome Taco type of restaurants in San Jose.
Alright, I've located 1 eatery in San Jose, Tacolicious. Interested?
Maybe, find out if there is live music there.
Unfortunately, there is no live music at this eatery.
Alright then, that will do.
Great, can I assist with anything else at this time?
Help me find a place to eat that's in the moderate price range.
Is there a type of food you prefer, for example American, Italian, or anything else? And what city are you looking in?
I want Greek food in Napa, that would hit the spot.
There's 1 restaurant that matches. It's Tarla Mediterranean Bar + Grill Napa Valley Restaurant which is a nice place in Napa.
Is there live music there?
I'm sorry, there's no live music.
Okay, it still sounds good.
Do you want me to book you a table?
No, that won't be necessary.
Do you need me to do anything else?
Please find me a moderate priced restaurant serving alcohol and Tacos.
Any particular city I should search in?
It should be in Hayward.
The Mexican Restaurant & Bar, a nice restaurant in Hayward, is 1 restaurant I recommend.
I'd like to find somewhere to eat.
What kind of food would you like to eat?
I'd like to try Japanese food please.
Which city would you like me to look in.
Please can you search in San Francisco.
There are 10 restaurants that you might be interested in. How about 2g Japanese Brasserie in San Francisco?
I want to find some tapas to eat.
What city do you want me to look in?
How about SF?
I found 8 restaurants. Aatxe is a nice restaurant in San Francisco.
Good. That works.
Do you want to reserve a table there?
No, I don't.
Do you need help with anything else?
Can you help me find somewhere to eat?
In what city should I search and for what type of food? You could give me a suggestion like American, Indian, or anything else that comes to mind.
I'd like a burger place in Mill Valley.
There are 3 places in Mill Valley you may like. How about Lighthouse Bar & Grill?
Yes, that place is good.
Should I get you a table there?
i am searching for a place to eat.
Is there any choice in your food ? like Chinese, American etc. Is there any particular city i should search in?
Middle eastern type of food will be okay for me and i want ot in San Leandro.
There is one restaurant at San Leandro called Moussaka Mediterranean Kitchen.
What are some good restaurants to eat out from?
Are you interested in Italian, American, or a specialty cuisines, and which city are you interested in finding restaurants for?
I want to eat somewhere that serves lobster, and in Redwood City.
Redwood city has many seafood locales, how about Oh Baby Sushi?
I almost forgot I have a date coming up I need to plan for! Can you look up some places to eat for me?
Sure, what kind of food?
Anywhere that serves Pasta would be perfect.
Ok, and in what city?
Just around SFO is fine.
Ok, I found 10 restaurants you might like in San Francisco. How about 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano?
Oh, that sounds good.
Do you want to make a reservation?
No, not right now.
Ok, anything else I can do then?
Where can I eat and drink alcohol for a moderate and average priced night out?
In which city are you going out at?
I want to go out in San Francisco.
Which style of food do you like to eat?
Cambodian food sounds delicious right now.
There are 2 Cambodian restaurants, but Anh Hong is situated in the San Francisco area.
Is there music being played there live?
No, no live bands will be playing.
Find a coffeehouse place to eat.
Which city?
San Fran.
I found 10 places. Acquolina is in San Francisco.
Do they serve alcohol?
No, they don't.
That works.
Do you want a reservation?
I need a nice restaurant.
In which city would you like to search?
I need it in San Jose. I need something priced moderate.
Which type of food would you like, for example Chinese, Italian or anything else?
I need some Freshwater fish.
There are 10 restaurants which match your selection. Ariake is a nice restaurant in San Jose.
I would like to find some food.
What city and type for example, American or Chinese?
I want Halal in Dublin.
In Dublin, I have Pamir Restaurant.
I want you to find me some restaurant. I'm not pretentious about the cost.
In what city do you prefer and what kind of food?
Some Oriental food in Berkeley will be great.
I have 8 restaurants for you.A nice place located in Berkeley is Da Lian Restaurant.
Tell me the address.
1674 Shattuck Avenue is the address.
Are there any other restaurants?
A nice one located in Berkeley is Great China Restaurant.
Tell me if liquor is served and the contact number.
510-843-7996 is the phone number.Alcohol is not served here.
Any other option? Pizza and Pasta I would like.
I have 8 restaurants which you might like.In Berkeley is a nice place called Cugini Restaurant.
I want to eat out at a joint in San Jose that serves alcohol.
What kind of cuisine are you interested in? Mexican? Indian? Something else?
pizza and pasta would be my ultimate joy.
There are 10 suitable restaurants in San Jose. Angelo's Italian restaurant would be an excellent choice.
Can you recommend something else in SF that has live music?
Fior D'italia is a wonderful restaurant in San Francisco.
Is the food expensive?
Yes, it is expensive.
That is exactly what I want.
You would like to make a reservation?
Find me some places to eat
Which city are you searching for
I am looking for something afforadable in San Fran
Any food preferences? Mexican, american or something else?
Chinese cuisine would be great
I found 10 restaurants in san francisco. How about beijing restaurant?
I might be meeting with some friends, what moderate priced restaurant do you recommend in Oakland?
What type of cuisine are you looking for?
Something that sells Freshwater fish.
There are 6 possible restaurants. How about Alamar Kitchen & Bar in Oakland?
What other restaurants are there?
There is also Judoku Sushi in Oakland.
Yes, I want to go watch a movie. Search for imax show times of a Documentary at Embarcadero Center Cinema.
There is also Lake Chalet in Oakland.
Do they sell liquor? And do they have live music?
The do have live music and they serve liquor.
I've got a date coming up and need to find somewhere for us to eat. Can you look up restaurants for me?
Sure, what kind of food and around what part of town?
Anywhere in San Francisco with Dumplings would be great.
I found 10 restaurants in San Francisco you might like. What about Alice's?
What's their number? Do they have live music?
Their number is 415-282-8999. They don't have live music.
Ok, that's fine. That sounds good.
Ok, do you want to make a reservation?
No, not yet.
Ok, anything else I can do then?
I looking to eat in Albany that is afforadable
What kind of food do you like, American or indian
i like some american food
i recommend cafe eugene in albany
yes that's perfect
do you want to reserve a table
no not yet
anything else i can do for you
I am looking for a place to eat with Pizza.
What city should I look in?
Napa
Allegria is a nice restaurant in Napa.
Can you help me find a place to eat in Lafayette?
What type of food are you looking for? You can say Indian, American or anything else.
I like American food.
I have found the American Kitchen located in Lafayette.
Can you please suggest any other restaurants that are a little more affordable in price?
I have found 3 restaurants for you. Metro Lafayette is nice and located in Lafayette.
I need a place to eat
In which city? What would you like to eat?
In Milpitas. I'd like some Szcheuan food
There are 4 restaurants in Milpitas. Do you like Koi Palace - Milpitas?
Yes, I would like it
Do I book a table?
Not now, thanks.
Do you need anything else?
I am in the mood for some coffee & light bites.
In which city?
Somewhere in SF
There are 10 suitable restaurants in San Francisco. Acquolina is a nice choice.
Is there live music and is the food expensive?
No, the prices is moderate and there is no live music.
Great, that would be fine.
Would you like me to make a reservation?
No, I don't.
Is there anything else?
Please help me find a place to eat.
Where would you like to look? Do you know what kind of food you'd like?
I would like something with freshwater fish. I'm looking for someplace near Point Reyes Station.
I have 2 possible restaurants. Would you like Due West? That is a nice place located in Point Reyes Station.
What else do you have?
Station House Cafe is also a good restaurant in Point Reyes Station.
Could you help me find a good spot for eating in San Francisco?
Which foods are you looking for, like Italian, Chinese or Mexican?
I would enjoy Pizza and Pasta right now.
There are 10 good restaurants for that in San Francisco, but how about 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano?
What other restaurants would you suggest in San Jose?
There are 10 restaurants I think you would like in San Jose like the Al Castello Ristorante.
Is there liquor and live music there?
They do not have either of those things.
Okay, that sounds nice to me.
Should I set up a table reservation there then?
No, please do not set up the reservation.
Is there anything else you want?
I want to find a Cambodian restaurant to eat at.
Sure, what city should I look in?
Concord please.
I found 2 restaurants for you. How about Bronze Buddha in Concord?
That sounds good.
Should I make a reservation for you?
No, I don't need a reservation.
Ok, is there anything else you need?
I am looking for a place to eat in Sonoma that is reasonably priced.
What type of food are you looking for? You can say Indian, American or anything else.
I would like some comfort food if possible please.
I have found the Schellville Grill in Sonoma.
Yes, that works for me.
Would you like a table there?
I'm looking for somewhere to eat. Latin American food sounds good.
Where should I search?
I want something in Milpitas.
There's a nice restaurant in Milpitas called Baja Cactus you might like.
Is there live music there? What are the prices like?
There is no live music and their prices are moderate.
I would like to find a restaurant that serves Parisian food.
In which city should I search?
I would like a restaurant in SF.
Amelie San Francisco is located in San Francisco.
Where are they located and what is their phone number?
They are located on 1754 Polk Street and their phone number is 415-292-6916.
Could you suggest another restaurant?
There is Aquitaine Wine Bar & Bistro in San Francisco.
I am interested in somewhere that serves Portuguese food in San Jose.
There is 1 restaurant called Adega in San Jose.
Where are they?
They are at 1614 Alum Rock Avenue.
Yes that sounds good.
Would you like to book a table at this restaurant?
No I don't thin so.
Do you need anymore assistance?
I want to grab a burgers in San Jose.
Black Angus Steakhouse is a good restaurant in San Jose.
Can you help me find a restaurant?
What type of food are you looking for?
American food that is intermediate priced.
In which city?
I prefer San Fran
There are 10. What about Academy Bar And Kitchen located in San Francisco? Any interest?
Is there another?
Alba Ray's is a very highly recommended restaurant located in San Francisco
I want to find an Asian restaurant.
What city should I look in?
Find an Asian restaurant in San Fran.
8 Immortals Restaurant is a nice restaurnt serving Asian food located in San Francisco.
Is there live music?
There is no live music.
Okay, that should work.
Do you want to reserve a table here?
Can you help me find a restaurant?
Sure. Please tell me the city in which I should search as well as if you prefer a specific cuisine.
I'd like an Italian restaurant in Los Gatos.
There's 8 restaurants matching your criteria in Los Gatos out of which I recommend Aldo's Ristorante & Bar.
Anything else which I might like?
In Los Gatos there's also Campo Di Bocce Of Los Gatos.
Yes, that's perfect.
Do you want me to place a reservation for you?
No, not at the moment.
Is there anything else I could do for you?
I'm looking for somewhere to eat. Can you find some affordable American food for me?
Where should I look?
I want something in Berkeley.
I found 9 places you might like. How about B&b Kitchen & Wine Bar in Berkeley?
I want to eat in Fremont.
What type of food?
I would like Thai food.
I found 2. In Fremont is Banh Thai Restaurant.
Do they have liquor?
They do not have liquor.
I'd like to find a restaurant
Sure, which city are you looking in? Also are you interested in Italian or Mexican?
San Francisco and I'd like Middle eastern
There are 10 restaurants I've found. How about Barcha in San Francisco?
What else is there? I'd like something that afforadable please.
There's La Marsa in San Francisco.
Is there life music and what's the number?
No live music and 415-872-9767
Is there anything else?
Yes, there's Lark in San Francisco.
Perfect
Shall I book a reservation?
I want to eat. I'm in the mood for some freshwater fish.
What city should I look for food in?
Millbrae.
Little Whale Seafood is in Millbrae.
I'm interested in Italian food somewhere in San Carlos.
Sure, there are 4 restaurants I've found. How about Delizie in San Carlos.
What's their location and how much?
They are a moderate priced restaurant and the address is 1107 San Carlos Avenue
Perfect
Shall I book a table?
I'd like to go out to a restaurant in SF.
Do you fancy anything in particular? Indian food, or American food, or anything else?
I fancy Japanese food.
I found 10 Japanese restaurants. You could try 2g Japanese Brasserie in San Francisco.
Mmm, yes, I'll try that.
So shall I make a reservation?
No, not yet.
Anything else you want help with?
Find me a place that serves alcohol and Cambodian food.
What city do you want to eat in?
I want to eat in Milpitas.
Search revealed 1 place. Vung Tau Ii Restaurant is in Milpitas.
What is their price range and do they have live bands?
Their prices are moderate and they do not have live music.
What time do you want to eat?
I want to eat at 18:45.
You want a reservation for 2 people at Vung Tau Ii Restaurant in Milpitas at 6:45 pm on March 1st. Is that right?
That is right.
I can't get you a table. Do you want something else?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a great day.
I'd like to find a place to eat that serves alcohol. Gastrobar sounds perfect.
What city should I look in?
I'd like to find an above average priced place in SFO.
Sessions At The Presidio is a good choice in San Francisco.
Are there other options?
The Dorian is another nice place in San Francisco.
That will work.
Do you want to reserve a table?
Maybe another time.
Is there anything else?
What time would you like the reservation at?
Please make it for 13:00.
Please confirm the following: You want a table for 3 people at The Dorian in San Francisco on March 1st at 1 pm.
Yes, that's fine. What's their address and contact number?
The table has been reserved. Their address is 2001 Chestnut Street and their number is 415-814-2671.
Thanks a lot!
Is there anything else?
No, thanks for everything.
Have a great day!
I would like to find somewhere to eat.
What city should I search in?
I would like you to search in Union City.
What sort of food do you want? Say Chinese, Italian, orsomething else.
Curry would be great.
I have 2 restaurants. Favorite Indian Restaurant is a nice restaurant in Union City.
Is there music?
There is no live music.
Would you suggest something else?
Kabila is a nice restaurant in Union City.
Is it pricey? Is liquor served there?
The price range is moderate and alcohol is not served.
That sounds like it should work.
Could I assist any further?
What time will the reservation be for?
Make the reservation at half past 1 in the afternoon.
Would you confirm the following? You would like to book a table at Kabila in Union City at 1:30 pm for 2 people on March 1st?
That sounds good.
Your reservation was made.
Thanks so much
CoudlI help with something else?
No. That is it. Thanks.
Have a great day.
Hi there, any nice places I can dine at which has live music?
Any preference on the location of the restaurant?
Something in the SFO area will be great!
Any preference on the type of food?
I would like some breakfast food, have been craving that for a while.
Sure, would you like McDonald's in the San Francisco area?
Could you help me make a reservation for the restaurant mentioned previously?
Sure, what time will you be dining in at?
I will be dining in at afternoon 12.
Please confirm your reservation for 2 at McDonald's in San Francisco at 12 pm on March 1st.
May I have their address and contact number too? Yes, the reservation sounds great.
Sorry, i was not able to make a reservation for you. Do you need any further assistance?
It's fine, thats all the help I need, thanks!
Sure, enjoy your time there!
I'd like to find a place to eat.
What kind of food and what city would you like to eat in?
I'm looking for pizza in Walnut Creek.
I found 7 pizza restaurants in Walnut Creek. Caffe delle Stelle Restaurant a good option.
I'd like to make a reservation at the pizza place.
For what time?
This evening 5:15.
To confirm: You would like to make a reservation for 2 at Caffe Delle Stelle Restaurant in Walnut Creek for 5:15 pm March 1st.
Correct. What is the address? Is it a pricey restaurant?
I wasn't able to make the reservation. Is there something else I can do?
Not right now. Thanks.
Have a great day.
Can you help me find someplace to eat?
Where would you like to search?
I am looking for something affordable in Santa Rosa. Do you have any Mediterranean restaurants?
Monti's is a nice place in Santa Rosa.
What time would you like to reserve?
I would like a table for 4 around evening 6:30.
Please confirm: you are booking a table for 4 at Monti's in Santa Rosa. The reservation will be on March 1st at 6:30 pm.
Yes, that's good. What's the address there? Do they serve liquor?
Your reservation has been made. Their street address is 714 Village Court. Sorry, they don't serve alcohol.
Thanks, that was all I needed help with.
Have a great day.
Can you help me find a place to eat?
In which city would you like to eat?
San Jose, please.
What type of food do you want? I can find American, Italian, or something else.
Some Fish or seafood cuisine would be nice.
Ariake in San Jose looks nice.
What's the address?
They're located at 1008 Blossom Hill Road.
That sounds great.
Do you want to reserve a table?
Not right now. Perhaps later.
Do you need help with anything else?
What time would you like?
Make it at morning 11:30 please.
Please confirm; you want a table at Ariake for 2 people in San Jose on March 1st at 11:30 am.
Yes, that's perfect.
I've confirmed your reservation.
Thank you for your help!
Do you need help with anything else?
No, that will be all thank you.
Have a great day!
Can you search for some nice places to eat and I need Live music there for my relaxation.
Do you have any particular City to search for?
Yes, search it in Livermore.
May I know your interested type of food like American, Chinese or Anything else you liked the most, because it will help me to search the results fast and accurate.
Search for some Spicy Indian food in Petaluma and I also want them to supply alcohol there. Can you find the one as per these details?
Found a restaurant named Shree Indian Cuisine in Petaluma, How about that? Is that suit your taste?
For what time?
I need to reserve it at 17:45.
Please confirm to reserve a table for 2 at Shree Indian Cuisine in Petaluma on March 1st at 5:45 pm.
That is confirmed to proceed.
I have booked the table successfully.
Thanks and that's all for now.
Have a great day.
Can you help me locate a cafe serving soup & salad in the SF area?
Of course. There is a nice restaurant by the name of Bask in San Francisco.
Yes, for what time?
Lets go with 6 in the evening.
To confirm: You wish to reserve a table at 6 pm, for 2 people on March 1st at Bask restaurant in San Francisco. is this correct?
Yes it is. Do they serve alcohol?
Yes they do serve alcohol. Your table is confirmed.
Thanks for your help.
Is there anything else I can do?
No that will be all.
Have a nice day.
Can you get me some economical food. Maybe Pizza and Pasta? I want something, but just don't have much of a budget.
What city will you need to dine in?
Just give me San Jose.
There are 10 in San Jose. How about Al Castello Ristorante?
What is their street number?
They're at 2083 Camden Avenue.
Close enough. I can get there.
Do you want a table?
What time do you want to eat?
Get me in at 6 in the evening.
Ok, here's what I have. 2 for dinner at 6 pm at Al Castello Ristorante in San Jose on March 1st?
Fine, that's good. Do they have any hooch up in there?
While you do have a table, they don't serve alcohol. You can reach them at 408-369-9820.
Fine, that works great.
Will you require further help?
Not right now.
Have a good meal.
Can you find a place to eat which serves Breakfast kind of food?
Which city do you want me to look in?
Search for the restaurant in San Francisco.
There are 10 restaurants. One is called Baker Street Bistro located in San Francisco.
Can you check whether the restaurant is costly and whether they have live music?
The price range is moderate and they don't have live music.
Can you look for any other budget priced restaurant in San Jose?
There is 1 restaurant called Mcdonald's located in San Jose.
What should I put the time for the reservation?
Put the timing as 12:00.
Please confirm: You want me to reserve a table for 2 people at Mcdonald's located in San Jose on March 1st at 12 pm.
Yes, That is correct.
I have successfully made the reservation.
Can you check their contact number and whether they have live music?
The contact number is 408-528-6700 and they have live music.
Thank for the help.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. That will be all.
I am glad I could help. Have a great day.
Help me looks for somewhere to eat.
What city do you want to look in? And is there a type of food that you prefer, like Mexican, Italian, or anything else?
Ramen would totally be great. And let's look in Concord.
There's Benihana in Concord which you might like.
What's another suggestion?
There's Kamrai Sushi & Thai Grill in Concord which you might like.
Can you get me a reservation at that restaurant we talked about?
What time do you prefer?
I want it in the morning 11:30.
I'll get you a table for 2 at Kamrai Sushi & Thai Grill in Concord on March 1st at 11:30 am, is that right?
Yes, please make the reservation.
I've made the reservation.
Thanks so much.
Can I don anything else for you?
No, thanks again, really.
Have a pleasant day.
I'm trying to find a restaurant.
Sure, what type of food?
I'm looking for a sushi bar.
In what city please?
In SF and I'd like something that's reasonably priced.
How about Atami Sushi Bar & Grill in San Francisco?
What's the address and phone number please?
Their address is 1662 Lombard Street and a telephone number is 415-614-1958.
What other suggestions do you have?
There is also Juban Yakiniku House Japanese in San Francisco.
Is there anything else? I need a place that serves alcohol.
Sushi Hunter is a good option in San Francisco.
Sounds good to me.
Shall I reserve a table for you?
Possibly in a bit.
What else may I help you with?
For what time?
I'd like it at half past 7 in the evening for one person.
Confirming a reservation for 1 on March 1st at Sushi Hunter in San Francisco at 7:30 PM.
Sounds good, thank you. Could you tell me how to reach them?
There seems to have been a problem with the reservation, my apologies. May I help you with anything else?
I don't think so.
Thank you very much.
I need to find a place to eat.
Do you know the name of the city you would like me to search?
Yes, I would like you to search Daly City.
What kind of food is your preference?
I love Taiwanese!
There are 2 restaurants. One is called Jade Dragon Restaurant and it is in Daly City.
I bet they are expensive, can you tell me the price?
Fortunately they have an inexpensive price range.
Can you give me their address and tell me if they have live music?
They are on 2368 Junipero Serra Boulevard. Unfortunately there is no live music there.
Ok, that will work for me anyway!
Do you want me to make a reservation for you?
Yes, but not right now.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Could you book at table at the restaurant we talked about earlier.
What time would you like your reservation for?
I would like it in the morning 11:30.
Please confirm that you would like to book at table at Jade Dragon Restaurant in Daly City on March 1st at 11:30 am for 2 people.
Yes, perfect! Do they serve liquor by the way?
I have booked your reservation. Unfortunately they do not serve alcohol.
Can you please give me their contact number?
Yes, their number is 650-756-8900.
Thank you, that is all I need for now.
Have a great day!
Can you find a restaurant for me?
Sure. Please tell me your preferred cuisine, like maybe American, Chinese or maybe something else, as well as the city in which you'd like me to search.
Please find me some Izakaya in Mountain View.
There are 9 restaurants matching your criteria in Mountain View. How about Bushido.
Sounds perfect to me.
Do you want me to book a table for you?
At what time?
Half past 5 in the evening would be great.
Can you please confirm that you want me to book a table for 2 at Bushido in Mountain View on March 7th at 5:30 pm.
Yes, that's correct.
Unfortunately I wasn't able to book your table at Bushido. I can try making the same reservation for 2 on March 7th at 5 pm.
OK, let's try.
I've managed to place your reservation.
Thanks a lot. That will be all for now.
Have a great day!
I feel hungry, so I need to find a place to eat.
Is there some specific kind of food you want to have? It can be Mexican, Indian or something else.
I would like to have the Gastropub kind of food.
Can you tell me the city where I should look for?
I would like for the restaurant to be in SFO.
I can suggest B-Side restaurant, which is a good restaurant in San Francisco.
Can you check if they serve liquor there, and if they have live music?
Unfortunately they do not have live music, but they do serve alcohol there.
Is there some other restaurant you can suggest?
Another good restaurant is Balboa Cafe in San Francisco.
Is there any other restaurant which you can tell me?
I can suggest also Bartlett Hall in San Francisco which is a nice restaurant.
Can you tell me the time for when you want the reservation be made for?
I want to have the table be booked for 10:30 am
Can you please confirm that you want to book a table for 2 people at Bartlett Hall in San Francisco on March 1st at 10:30 am?
That's right. Can you give me their address?
I apologize but I could not complete the reservation you wanted. Can I do something else for you.
Nothing. I appreciate your help very much.
Have a wonderful time!
Can you please find me a good restaurant?
In which city should I find the restaurant? Do you have any cuisine in mind, like Chinese or Italian?
I think I'll go with some Brasserie in SF.
There are 10 restaurants based on your preferences. One of them is Bistro 10un, which is a nice brasserie in San Francisco.
Is it an expensive restaurant? Can I have their contact number please?
It is an inexpensive restaurant and their phone number is 415-276-4048.
Can you find me some Barbecue restaurants?
1760 is a nice barbecue restaurant in San Francisco.
What other options do I have?
How about 25 Lusk, a barbecue in San Francisco?
That sounds good to me.
Do you want me to reserve a table for you there?
No, not now. Maybe later.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
When do you plan to arrive?
I'll be there by 6:15 pm.
Reserving a table for 2 at 25 Lusk in San Francisco at 6:15 pm on March 1st. Shall I proceed?
Yes, please do.
Your table has been booked successfully.
Thanks a bunch!
Can I do anything else for you?
No. That'll be all.
Have a great day!
I am searching for a eating place
What sort of food you need and where you want me to look in?
Any kind of fish food is good and i prefer Campbell
There is a nice restaurant called Capers Eat & Drink in Campbell
How much it costs there?
The price range is moderate
Can you look for some other restaurant?
There is a nice restaurant called Pacific Catch in Campbell
Can you book a table at restaurant of my liking at quarter past 7 in the evening on next Friday?
Please give confirmation details: Booking a table at Pacific Catch at Campbell city. It is for 2 people at 7:15 pm on March 8th
That is perfect and can i have their phone number?
Booking is done and their phone number is 408-879-9091
Do they provide liquor and how much it costs?
They do provide alcohol and price range is moderate
Thank you very much
Have a nice day
Hey, can you find me a place to eat?
Sure, where are you looking?
Somewhere in Berkeley.
Okay, what kind of food? You can ask for Chinese, Indian, or something else.
I'd like to eat Pasta.
Righto, how about Cugini Restaurant in Berkeley?
Is it a fancy restaurant? How can I contact them?
No, it's a moderate restaurant. You can call them on 510-558-9000.
Is there anywhere else?
How about Donato & Co. in Berkeley?
Is there anything else?
Okay, how about Filippo's Berkeley Elmwood, also in Berkeley.
Yeah, could you book me a table for one at the restaurant from eleven in the morning on March 2nd?
Certainly, please confirm that you'd like a table for 1 at Filippo's Berkeley Elmwood in Berkeley from 11 am on March 2nd.
Yes, that's fine.
Sorry, it didn't work. Let's try Filippo's Berkeley Elmwood for 1 from 11:30 am on March 2nd instead.
Sounds good, do it.
It was successful.
Thanks so much, that'll be all.
Okay, see you.
I would like to find an Izakaya restaurant in San Francisco please.
I have 10 options in San Francisco. Would you be interested in 2g Japanese Brasserie?
What else is there that's kind of pricey?
I have 10 San Francisco restaurants fitting that description. Perhaps you'd like Akiko's Restaurant?
Do they have alcohol? Also, what's the phone number?
No, they don't serve alcohol. The phone number there is 415-397-3218.
What other suggestions do you have?
Also in San Francisco, I would recommend An Japanese Restaurant.
For what time?
In the evening 6 on this Saturday.
Confirming a table for 2 on March 2nd at 6 pm at An Japanese Restaurant in San Francisco.
Yes, great. Now I just need their phone number and whether or not they have live music.
No, they don't have live music, I'm sorry. You can reach them at 415-292-4886. And the reservation is complete.
Thanks for all your help.
You're very welcome.
I have a plan to eat outside and I need you to find some nice places for me.
Do you have any preferred City to search for?
Search for one nice place in SFO.
Do you have any desired category of food like Mexican, Chinese or any other food that you like to eat?
I like to eat Seafood. Search the places where they have lot of variety of Sea foods.
What about a restaurant named Akiko's Sushi Bar in San Francisco. This is nice place I think, to eat Sea food.
Please check whether they will offer fancy price range.
Checked and found that the price is expensive there at that restaurant.
At what time, you want to make the reservation?
I need it at 1 pm.
Please confirm to book a table for 2 at Akiko's Sushi Bar in San Francisco on March 1st at 1 pm.
That is okay to proceed.
I have successfully confirmed your reservation.
Thanks and that's all for now.
Have a great day.
I desire excellent repast in Antioch California. I crave Cantonese please.
Well, there are 3 choices. Try the Antioch Double Dragon.
What time of day do you want to go?
Try for half past 11 in the morning.
Sure, I have: 1 for Double Dragon in Antioch. You'll go at 11:30 am on March 4th.
That's great. Thanks for your kind and patient assistance.
You are set for a reservation for 1.
Great, that'll be perfect.
Will you require additional assistance now?
None for me, I'm set.
Good day to you .
I'm not very familiar with this area and would like to find a place to eat.
I can help you find something, any particular food you are looking for?
I could really go for a burger right now.
What is the name of the city you would like me to find a restaurant in?
I believe the name of this city is Oakland.
There is 1 Mcdonald's in Oakland.
Great, you can't go wrong there.
Would you like me to call ahead for and reserve a table?
Not right now.
Is there anything else I can help you find?
Okay, what time would you like the reservation to be.
First thing at 11:45 in the morning please.
Before I proceed can you just verify the details for me? You would like a reservation for 2 people at the Mcdonald's in Oakland, on March 7th, at 11:45 am.
Yes, so far, so good. Do you know if they have liquor?
They do serve alcohol but I was not able to make a reservation at Mcdonald's for 2 at the requested day and time. Would you like me to try and make the reservation a little later on March 7th at 12 pm?
Yes, let's try that.
I have successfully made that reservation for you.
Thanks for your help.
Is there anything else I can help with?
No, that was all I needed.
Okay, enjoy the rest of your day!
Find me a restaurant to visit.
Do you prefer Italian, Indian, or some other type of food and what city shall I look in?
I want a To-go place in San Jose.
Search revealed 4 places. 4th St Pizza Co is in San Jose.
What else do you have? I want an afforadable place that has alcohol.
Mimi's Cafe meets your requirements and is in San Jose.
What else do you have? I could go for some Tex-Mex type of food.
Chili's Grill & Bar is in San Jose.
Do they have live entertainment and what is their location?
They are located at 2185 Eastridge Loop and they do not have live entertainment.
That is perfect.
Shall I book a table or you?
No, not right now.
Do you need something more?
What time do you want to eat?
I want to eat at 17:15.
You want a table for 2 at Chili's Grill & Bar in San Jose for 5:15 pm on March 1st. Is that right?
No, there is only one person.
You want a table for 1 at Chili's Grill & Bar. Is that right?
That is right.
I cannot get you a table for that time. Would you like a table for 1 at Chili's Grill & Bar at 5:30 pm on March 1st?
That is good too.
Your table is booked.
What is their phone number?
You can get in contact with them at 408-532-6727.
Thanks a lot.
Do you need something more?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a wonderful day.
Will you find a restaurant?
Which city? What kind of food? Chinese, American or something else?
Latin American in Napa.
I found 2. Don Perico Mexican Restaurant in Napa.
Please confirm a table for 2 at Don Perico Mexican Restaurant in Napa at 1:30 pm on March 1st.
Fine. Is it low priced?
Moderate. Reservation is complete.
Live music? Address?
1106 1st Street. No live music.
Thanks.
Anything else?
No, that's all.
Have a great day.
Can you help me find a sushi restaurant to eat at?
What city would you like to eat in?
I'd like something in SF.
I found 10 restaurants you might like. How about Atami Sushi Bar & Grill in San Francisco?
Could you suggest me something that's a little more affordable?
Sure, I found 9 restaurants that meet that criteria. How about Juban Yakiniku House Japanese in San Francisco?
What's the phone number for that restaurant?
You can call them at 415-776-5822.
Could you perhaps suggest something a little more pricey?
Sure, Robin is a slightly more pricey restaurant in San Francisco.
What's the phone number there?
You can reach them at 415-548-2429.
What time do you want to make the reservation for?
I'd like it to be at 7:30 in the evening for one person.
So you would like a reservation for 1 person at Robin in San Francisco for 7:30 pm on March 1st. Is that right?
I'd like to make it this saturday at evening 7 instead.
Okay, so you would like to make a reservation on March 2nd at 7 pm, correct?
Yes that's good. Is there any live music there? Is there alcohol served?
Your reservation is confirmed. They do no have live music nor do the serve alcohol.
Alright, that's all I need for now thank you.
Okay, have a great day.
Help me find a place to eat.
Sure, what city and what type of food?
I want a diner in San Fran.
I found 10 in San Francisco you may like. What about 1760?
Is it expensive? Do they serve alcohol there?
It's expensive and they do not serve alcohol.
Maybe try something else.
There's 25 Lusk in San Francisco.
Sure, first confirm you'd like to book a table for 2 at 25 Lusk in San Francisco on March 3rd at 6:45 pm.
Yes, that's fine.
I've successfully made your reservation.
What's the address and is it affordable?
It's expensive. They're at 25 Lusk Street.
Thanks, that's all for now.
Have a great day.
I want a place where I can eat.
What kind of food?
Some Oriental food.
Which city?
In Santa Rosa.
I got 3 and one is Best of Burma at Santa Rosa.
Any other option?
What about China Star in Santa Rosa?
Is there a live music there and what is the address?
Yes they have live music and their address is 2101 West College Avenue.
Any other else?
How about Khoom Lanna in Santa Rosa?
Okay, you want to reserve a table for 2 at Khoom Lanna in Santa Rosa on March 1st at 5 pm. Please confirm.
That's perfect.
Reservation done.
Thank you.
Do you still need any other help?
No, thanks.
You are welcome.
I need to look for eating place
Which city are you preferring?
I need it in Oakland
What is your choice of food?
I prefer some Vietnamese kind of food
There is a nice restaurant called Binh Minh Quan in Oakland
Can i know their address and do they provide live music?
Their location is 338 12th Street and they do not provide live music
Can you search for other restaurants
There is a nice restaurant called Holy Basil Pho in Oakland
I am looking for restaurant in San Jose, would you look for some other restaurant?
I searched 5 restaurants. There is a nice restaurant called Bowl & Plate At White Shallot in San Jose
At what time is the booking for?
Do it at quarter past 11 in the morning.
Please give confirmation details: Table booking at Bowl & Plate At White Shallot which in San Jose and the reservation time is 11:15 am for 2 people on march 1st.
No, do it at 10:45 am.
Please give confirmation details: Table booking at Bowl & Plate At White Shallot and the reservation time is 10:45 am.
Yes this is okay for me. Is there a live music and what about address?
Your booking is done. The street address is 3143 Stevens Creek Boulevard and live music is not there.
Thanks a lot.
Do you need any other help?
No, thanks for your help.
Have a great day.
Find a restaurant with live music.
Cuisine? Mexican, Chinese, etc.
California food.
Which city?
Livermore.
The Restaurant | Wente Vineyards is in Livermore.
What else? Find barbecue, any price.
I found 1: McDonald's is in Livermore.
What's the number? Do they serve alcohol?
No, they don't. Number is 925-961-9090.
please confirm: table for 4 at McDonald's in Livermore at 11 am on March 1st.
Yes.
Your table is reserved.
Thanks, that's all.
Have a nice day.
I am looking for food.
What kind of food like Chinese or Indian and what city?
I want Mexican food in San Francisco.
In San Francisco, I have Arguello.
What time would you like?
Reserve it for 13:15.
Confirm 1:15 pm on March 1st for 2 at the Arguello in San Francisco.
Change to half past 10 in the morning for this Saturday.
Confirm to 10:30 am on March 2nd.
Yes I confirm all.
Sorry, no availabiity is found. Is there anything else?
No that is all today.
Have a nice day.
I am searching for a place to eat.
In which city are you looking for?
I prefer Middle eastern type of food at San Francisco.
I searched and found 10 restaurants. Barcha is a great restaurant at San francisco.
Can you please give details of some other restaurants?
Boulibar is a great restaurant at San francisco.
Whether they have live music with liquor?
No. They don't have live music and they serve alcohol.
Yes. it is good for me.
Shall I book a table here?
Can you help me in reserving a table at the restaurant in which I like?
What is your preferred time of reservation?
Reserve it at evening 5.
Kindly ensure that, on March 1st, the reservation is done for 2 persons at Boulibar, San Francisco. The reservation time is 5 pm.
It is good for me.
Your booking is done.
Whether the price is lavish?
It is expensive price range.
What is their contact number and contact address?
The contact address is One Ferry Building #35. Their contact number is 415-399-1155
Thank you so much.
Do you need any other help?
Nope. Thank you so much for your help.
Have a fantastic day.
I want to eat somewhere that serves alcohol.
What sort of food are you into? You could say something like Mexican, Indian or something else. What city should I look in?
I want to look in San Jose. Southern food would be great.
I have 10 restaurants. 71 Saint Peter is a good one in San Jose.
Do you have any other ideas?
Bazille is a good San Jose restaurant.
What time is the reservation for?
Make it for 4:45 pm for 2 on the 3rd.
Okay, I am booking a table at Bazille in San Jose for 4:45 pm. This reservation is for 2 on March 3rd.
Yes, that sounds good.
Your reservation was a success.
Could you tell me their contact number? Is live music available?
There is no live music. The phone number is 408-261-5787.
Thank you so much.
Do you need help with other things?
No, that is all.
Enjoy the day.
Do you have any hotel in your list having average priced food items ?
What cuisine are you fond of, Chinese, Indian or else?
I would be pleased with Pizza kind food.
Do you have any preference in location>
Yes, It would be in Menlo Park.
There are 5 restaurants. You can have nice food from Angelo Mio in Menlo Park.
I am fond of music and liquor, will they provide it?
Both music and liquor service are not available there.
Any other restaurant available there?
Then you can visit Piccolo Ristorante Italiano in Menlo Park
No other choice is there?
Yes, you can either choose Ristorante Carpaccio in Menlo Park.
Can you book 1 table for 3 people on 9th of March in the selected restaurant?
When do you want reservation?
Ensure the seats at 17:15 for one person.
Please confirm, You asked for 1 seat at Ristorante Carpaccio in Menlo Park at 5:15 pm on March 9th.
Yes that would be fine.
Congrats! you got reservation.
Thanks a lot.
Do you need any other help?
No, that's all I need, Thank you.
Wish you good luck, always keep in touch.
I am looking for a costly place to eat in San Fran.
What kind of cuisine are you interested in?
I would really like some southern food.
There is a nice restaurant in San Francisco called 1760
That sounds awesome
You would like a table there?
You would like a table for 3 at 1760 in San Francisco on March 8th at 12:45 pm?
That would be fine. Can I expect to hear live music?
No, there is none. You would not be able to get a reservation for that time. You would like a table for 3 at 1760 in San Francisco on March 8th at 1 pm?
That could work also.
I have made the reservation.
I appreciate that.
Is there anything else?
No, that would be all. Thanks.
Enjoy your day.
Hey, can you find me a place to eat nearby?
Sure, what city are you looking in? What kind of food?
I'd like some California food in Berkeley.
Okay, how about Chez Panisse in Berkeley?
Is there anything else?
You could try Gather, also in Berkeley.
How much do they cost?
They have a moderate price range.
Sounds great, thanks.
No worries, would you like a table?
Nah, maybe later.
Okay, is there anything else?
Sure, please confirm that you'd like a table for 2 at Gather in Berkeley for 11:30 am on March 1st.
Yes, that's perfect. Do they have a live band?
No, they don't have a band. Your table is booked.
Thanks, how can I contact them? Where is it?
It's at 2200 Oxford Street. You can call them on 510-809-0400.
Thanks so much, that'll be all.
Okay great, see you.
I need a good restaurant in Menlo Park.
Which kind of food do you want, for example American, Italian or anything else?
I need some Dumplings.
I have found 1 restaurant. Yum Cha Palace matches your selection and is located in Menlo Park.
What is the address?
The street address for the restaurant is 1039 El Camino Real.
Yeah, that works then.
Is there anything else that I may help you with?
Please confirm the following information: Book a table at Yum Cha Palace in Menlo Park. The reservation is at 1 PM and is for 1 person on March 9th.
Yes, that sounds good. Is the price economical?
Your reservation is now confirmed and the price range is moderate.
Thank you for that?
Of course. Have a wonderful day.
I'm so hungry. Can you help me find somewhere to eat?
Sure. In which city? What kind of food do you like?
I'm in Alameda. I want pizza that's average priced please,
I found 3 restaurants. C'era Una Volta is a great one in Alameda.
What's their address? Do they serve alcohol?
They don't. Their address is 1332 Park Street D.
Sure. For what time?
At morning 11:15 please.
So a table for 2 at C'era Una Volta in Alameda on March 1st at 11:15 am?
Yes, that works.
Your reservation was successful.
What's their phone number?
510-769-4828.
Do they have alive music?
Sorry, they don't.
Thanks a lot.
Can I assist you in anything else?
No, thank you.
Have an amazing day.
I'd like to find a place to eat.
In what city should I look in?
I'd like to find something in San Fran.
What type of food were you trying to find?
Some Pizza and Pasta type of food sounds perfect.
I found 10 restaurants for you. One nice restaurant is 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano in San Francisco.
What is their phone number?
Their number is 415-543-5100.
Could you try making a reservation at that restaurant I liked?
What time did you want it for?
I'd like it on the 1st of March at eleven in the morning.
Please confirm you're booking a table for 2 at 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano in San Francisco on March 1st at 11 am.
Yes, that is correct.
Your reservation has been confirmed.
Great, thank you.
Did you need help with anything else?
No, but thanks again.
Have a nice day.
I'd like to find a place to eat.
In which city? What kind of food would you like?
I'd like Sichuan in San Jose.
Chef Li in San Jose is nice.
What's their address?
2033 Camden Avenue # F3.
Can you check on another? I'm looking for something that is intermediate priced.
I found 9 possibilities. China Delight in San Jose is suppose to be nice.
Do they serve alcohol?
They do not.
Okay that sounds good.
Would you like a reservation?
Not just now.
Is there anything else you need?
Let's go ahead and make a reservation at the restaurant.
For what time?
Evening 7:30 would be good.
Please verify: You'd like a reservation for 2 at China Delight in San Jose at 7:30 pm on March 1st.
Correct. Do they have live music?
Sorry I couldn't make the reservation. Is there anything else you need?
Try it again for 5:30 in the evening.
To verify: You would like a reservation for 2 at China Delight in San Jose at 5:30 pm on March 1st.
That is right.
You're reservation is confirmed.
Thank you. That's all I need for now.
Have a great day.
I'm planning on going out to eat with a friend later. Can you find me any restaurants in Pleasant Hill that serve Pizza and Pasta food?
Sure, how about eating at Dallimonti's Italian Restaurant in Pleasant Hill?
Okay, what kind of price range budget do they have and what's their address?
They're located at 1932 Oak Park Boulevard and their prices are pretty moderate.
Sounds good to me.
How about booking a table here?
Maybe later.
Anything else I can help you with?
Sure, what time should I make it for?
10:45 am works for me.
Please confirm that you'd like to book a table for 2 at Dallimonti's Italian Restaurant in Pleasant Hill for March 1st at 10:45 am.
Yup, that's right.
Sorry, but I wasn't able to make the reservation for you. Is there anything else I can help you with?
No thanks, that's all I needed.
Okay, have a nice day!
I need food recommendations please.
I would love to help you with this. What are you in the mood for? Do you know which city you would prefer?
I'm totally in the mood for Burrito or Mexican type of food in Antioch.
I found 2 places that may interest you. Starting with Celia's Mexican Restaurant located in Antioch.
Find out if the price range is expensive or not.
This eatery is priced at moderate.
Find out the phone number and if there is going to be live music.
Great news, live music is available and the telephone number is 925-754-1355.
Yeah, that will do.
Should we reserve tables now?
Alright, no problem. Please confirm you would like to book a table for 2 on March 2nd at Celia's Mexican Restaurant in Antioch at 11:45 am. Is this correct?
Find out if they serve liquor and what's the address. Please book this table.
Alright, table is confirmed at 523 West 10th Street. Unfortunately, they do not serve alcohol.
Alright, thanks.
Can I assist you further?
Nope, that will be all.
Ok, Have a wonderful day.
Can you find me a nice place to eat?
Which is your preferred city?
Find me something not very costly restaurant in Los Gatos.
What is your preferred category like American, Indian or anything else?
I prefer some Latin American kind of food.
There are 2 nice restaurants suitable to your choice. One is called Pedro's located in Los Gatos.
Can you check whether they serve liquor?
No, The restaurant does not serve liquor.
Okay. That sounds great to me.
Do you want me to reserve a table here?
Not now. Maybe some other time.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
What will be timing for the reservation?
Timing for reservation will be 13:30.
Please confirm: You want me to reserve a table for 4 people on March 2nd at Pedro's located in Los Gatos at 1:30 pm.
No. Please change the timing to morning 11:15 and make the reservation for 1 people.
Please confirm again: You want me to reserve the table for 1 people at 11:15 am.
Yes, That is correct.
I have successfully reserved the table.
Can you get me their address?
The address of the restaurant is 316 North Santa Cruz Avenue.
That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day!
I need to find a restaurant.
What city do you want?
The city is San Fran.
What is your food preference?
I want fast food.
I found 4. In San Francisco, I have Elmira Rosticceria.
How are prices and what is address?
They are moderate and it is at 154 McAllister Street.
What others do you have?
I have Mcdonalds in San Francisco.
I would like to go there.
Do you want a table?
What time do you want?
Book it for 18:15.
Confirm Mcdonalds in San Francisco for March 1st at 6:15 pm for 2.
Yes I confirm all.
I could not book but have Confirm Mcdonalds in San Francisco for March 1st at 6 pm for 2.
I accept that time.
You are now confirmed.
What is the address?
The address is 441 Sutter Street.
Thanks for your help.
Is there anything else?
No that is all I need.
Have a great day.
can you find me a place with some curry?
where should i look.
anywhere in fremont please.
i found a palce called paradise biryani pointe in fremont.
what time is the reservation for?
at half past 11 in the morning sounds good.
you want me to book a table for 2 at the paradise biryani pointe in fremont at 11:30 am on march 1st?
yes, that's good. what's their number?
their number is 510-598-4940. i couldn't get the table, sorry about that. do you want me to try a table for 2 at paradise biryani pointe on march 1st at 11 am?
no thanks.
is there anything else?
no that's it, thanks.
have a good day
I'm trying to find a place to eat.
What type of food were you trying to find? You can say Italian, Indian, or anything else?
Some Coffee & light bites kind of food sounds perfect.
In what city should I look in?
I'd like to find it in San Fran.
I found a nice restaurant called Acquolina in San Francisco.
Did you have another suggestion?
I also found a nice restaurant called Broadway Dim Sum in San Francisco.
Can you help me reserve a table at that restaurant I liked?
What time did you want to book it for?
I'd like to book it for seven in the evening.
Please confirm you're booking a table for 2 at Broadway Dim Sum in San Francisco on March 1st at 7 pm.
Yes, that is correct.
Your reservation has been made.
Thank you.
Did you need help with anything else?
No, but thanks again.
Have a nice day.
I want to eat out a moderate priced restaurant in SF that sells fish. I am in the mood for that.
There are 10 suitable restaurants. The Alamo Square seafood grill is a wonderful restaurant in San Francisco.
May I have a contact number? Is alcohol served there?
No, they do not serve liquor. The number is 415-440-2828
That would be great.
Is there anything else you need help with?
For what time?
I want a reservation for 18:00.
You would like a table for 2 at Alamo Square seafood grill in San francisco at 6 pm on March 1st?
That would be great. Is there live music? Where is this place at?
My apologies, but the reservation was unsuccessful. Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, but thanks anyway.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Pull up budget friendly priced eateries that serve alcohol.
No problem, for which city?
Search Mountain View.
What kind of food would you like?
Oriental is my top pick.
May I suggest Happi House Famous Teriyaki in Mountain View.
What time should I book your table for?
Let's do 1 o"clock in the afternoon if possible.
Sure, please confirm you would like to book for March 1st at 1 pm, at Happi House Famous Teriyaki in Mountain View for 2. Is this correct?
yes, you got it!
Great, your reservation is complete!
Thanks, I appreciate it.
No problem! Can I assist you with anything else?
No, that was it.
Alright, enjoy your day!
I need a restaurant.
Are you looking for Chinese, Mexican or something else?
Oriental sounds appetizing.
In which city?
Can you check San Leandro?
Creasian is in San Leandro.
Please confirm you want me to book a table for 1 at Creasian on March 3rd at 7:45 pm in San Leandro.
Actually, can you make it for two at 17:15?
Please confirm you want me to book a table for 2 at 5:15 pm.
Yes. Can you give me their address?
They're located at 1269 MacArthur Boulevard. Your reservation was a success.
Thanks. That will be it for today.
Okay. You're welcome. Goodbye.
Pull up some good eatery choices please.
I would be happy to. What kind of food are you interested in? Which city would you prefer we search?
Pull up some joints that have Burgers in Santa Rosa.
Ok, I have located 1 restaurant. I would like to recommend Cattlemens in Santa Rosa.
Sure thing, pleas confirm you would like to book a table for 2 at Cattlemens at 6 pm on March 2nd in Santa Rosa.
Great, Find out if they have live music there. I will also need a phone number for them.
I apologize, I was unable to make a reservation for you. Can I help with anything else?
No, that will be all.
Alright, have a good night.
I need to find a restaurant please.
Are you looking for American, Italian or some other kind of specific food?
I am thinking Indian food sounds good!
Do you know which city you would like to dine in?
Please search Albany for restaurants.
I found 2 nice restaurants. One is called Aangan and it is located in Albany.
Could you suggest an Oriental restaurant? That sounds good too!
Yes, I found 2, one of which is Sabuy Sabuy Ii, It is located in Albany.
I would like to know their address and if they serve liquor please.
They are located at 1233 San Pablo Avenue and unfortunately they do not serve alcohol.
Ok, that will work for me.
Do you want to reserve a table?
What time would you like the reservation for?
I would like it for 11:15 in the morning please.
Please confirm that you would like to book at table at Sabuy Sabuy Ii in Albany on March 1st at 11:15 am for 2 people.
Yes, that will work, can you give me their contact number and tell me if they have live music there?
I just made your reservation. They don't have live music but their phone number is 510-528-3932.
Ok, thank you for all your help!
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, that will be all thank you!
Have a wonderful day!
Can you find me somewhere nearby to eat?
What type of food would you like to eat?
I think Japanese food sounds good.
Okay, where should I look?
I want to go somewhere in San Jose.
I found 10 restaurants you might like. Bluefin is a good restaurant in San Jose.
Okay, that one works fine.
Should I reserve a table for you?
Sure. So you would like a reservation for 2 people at Bluefin n San Jose at 7 pm on March 1st, is that correct?
Yeah that's good. Do they serve alcohol there?
Your reservation has been made. There is no alcohol served at the restaurant.
Alright, thanks. That's everything for now.
Okay, have a nice day.
I'm looking for a good restaurant. Can you help me find one?
What cuisine would you prefer?
I think I'll go with Japanese cuisine today.
In which city are you planning to dine?
I'm in Vacaville.
I found 2 Japanese restaurants in your locality. Hisui | Japanese Restaurant in Vacaville is a very nice restaurant.
Please confirm that you want to book a table for 3 at Hisui | Japanese Restaurant in Vacaville at 12 pm on March 6th.
Perfect!
Your table has been reserved successfully.
Thanks a bunch! That's all I need for now.
Have a great day!
I need to find a place to eat in any price range.
What kind of food, perhaps Italian or Indian? In which city?
Brunch in SFO sounds good.
I found 10 places, how about 1300 On Fillmore in San Francisco?
What else do you suggest?
Absinthe Brasserie & Bar in San Francisco is nice.
What is their address?
They are located at 398 Hayes Street.
Do they have live music or liquor?
They serve alcohol but do not have live music.
What time would you like your resevation?
In the afternoon 12:30.
You want a table for 2 at Absinthe Brasserie & Bar in San Francisco on March 2nd at 12:30 pm, is that correct?
No, I need one for two people.
You want a reservation for 2 at 12:30 pm, correct?
Yes, what is the phone number please?
Your table is reserved. Their number is 415-551-1590.
Thank you for your help.
Can I do anything more for you?
No not right now thanks.
Have a great day.
I am looking for some Sushi restaurants.
What city should I search in?
Brentwood.
Shirasoni is nice in Brentwood.
I actually want it in Milpitas.
My No.1 Sushi & Tofu is located in Milpitas.
Is there live music?
Sorry, they do not have live music.
What time do you want to make the reservation?
11:30 in the morning for 4 people.
Please confirm the following reservation: One table for 4 at My No.1 Sushi & Tofu in Milpitas on March 1st at 11:30 am.
Actually make it at 7:30 in the evening for 2 people.
Please confirm the following reservation: One table for 2 at My No.1 Sushi & Tofu in Milpitas on March 1st at 7:30 pm.
No, make it on the 2nd of March.
Please confirm the following reservation: One table for 2 at My No.1 Sushi & Tofu in Milpitas on March 2nd at 7:30 pm.
Yes that will work.
Your reservation is complete.
Thanks!
Anything else I can assist you with?
No thank you.
Have a great day!
I am starving and I need a nice place to eat.
What city will you be in and what cuisine should I find? How about Indian, American or any other food?
I am a California cuisine person. Find me something in San Fran.
There are 10 restaurants. How would you like Al's Place in San Francisco?
Give me their phone and address.
It is on the 1499 Valencia Street and their contact number will be 415-416-6136.
Find me some other restaurant offering Greek food.
How do you like Ayola, a good restaurant in San Francisco?
Can you think of any other restaurant?
Would you be interested in Kokkari Estiatorio, a restaurant based in San Francisco?
That will do for me.
Shall I get you anything else?
What is the timing of reservation?
I want it at half past 11 in the morning.
So you want a table for 2 on March 1st at Kokkari Estiatorio. I should make the reservation for 11:30 am in San Francisco. Did I get that right?
Oh no! I want it for 3 people at 5 o"clock in the evening.
So you want to book for 3 people at 5 pm? Is that it?
Yes that is right. Will they be having live music?
I have made your reservation and no. you won't be hearing any live music.
Can you give me their address?
They are at 200 Jackson Street.
Thanks a lot!
Can I do anything else for you?
Nope. that will be all.
I wish a great day!
Please help me find somewhere good to eat in SF. I would love some Sichuan food.
I have 10 restaurants for you to consider. My top choice is Alice's. That's a good restaurant located in San Francisco.
What time would you like to eat?
Please make my reservation at 5:15 pm.
Okay, please confirm this request: You are reserving a table for 2 people at Alice's in San Francisco. The reservation will be on March 1st at 5:15 pm.
Yes, that's excellent. What's the phone number there? Do they serve liquor?
Sorry, they do not serve alcohol. Their phone number is 415-282-8999. I wasn't able to make that reservation at Alice's on March 1st. Would you like to try for a reservation for 2 at 5 pm instead?
No, that's all I needed. Thanks.
Have a good day!
I want to go out and eat somewhere.
Which city are you going out to?
I am thinking about eating in Vacaville.
Which cuisine style sounds best? Are you looking for something liek Mexican or American food?
I am thinking about having a burger right now, actually.
There is 1 restaurant in Vacaville that could work, and it's called Mcdonald's.
That sounds okay.
Would you like any other help?
Sure, could you confirm that you want a reservation at Mcdonald's in Vacaville at 11:30 AM on March 2nd, for 2?
That sounds great, please do.
The reservation was set up for you.
Okay,t hat is everything I needed.
Goodbye for now!
I would like to find some Korean food to eat in San Bruno. Any price range is fine.
I have 2 restaurants that are suitable. Hiro is a nice San Bruno restaurant.
Could you tell me their address and contact number?
They are located at 449 San Mateo Avenue and the phone number is 650-588-5559.
Sounds wonderful.
Do you want me to help with something else?
What about booking at a table at the restaurant I liked? Make it for 12:45 on the 8th.
Could you confirm that you want a table at Hiro booked in San Bruno for 2 at 12:45 pm on March 8th?
That works for me. Is live music available?
I have made your reservation. There isn't live musi.
Thanks so much. That is all I needed for now.
Have a good one.
I am searching for a eating place
Do you have any preference in city to search?
I need it in SF
Do you have any choice on kind of food you are searching for like Mexican, American etc
Some California kind of food is fine with me
I have selected 10 restaurants for youa nd oneamong them is Al's Place is a nice hotel located in San Francisco
That is perfcet
You need to book a table there?
Not now, later
Is there any other help?
Please give confirmation details: Booking a table at Al's Place at 7:30 pm on March 7th for 1 people at SAN frANCISCO
Fine. Do they provide live music?
Booking is done. They don't provide live music
Thank you very much
Have a nice day
I want to find a restaurant with some really good food, not very costly with a lot of frills, just good eats. Is there a place you recommend in San Fran?
Do you have a taste for any particular type of food?
I think Greek food would hit the spot.
Of the 2 restaurants showing up, the Novy Restaurant in San Francisco might be a good choice.
What about another place?
The Orexi Restaurant, also in San Francisco, seems to be popular.
How can I reach them?
You can call them at 415-664-6739.
When do you want the table reserved?
The best time for me is 12:30 in the afternoon.
Got it. Do you want to confirm a table for 2 guests at the Orexi Restaurant in San Francisco on March 1st at 12:30 pm?
That's just what I want.
Your table reservation is confirmed.
What about live music at that restaurant, and where is it?
No live music is featured at the restaurant but you can find it at 243 West portal Avenue.
Very good. We're all set, thanks to you.
Do you need more assistance at this time?
I'm calling that a wrap, my friend. A million thanks.
Cheers for a very pleasant day.
I'm looking for an average priced restaurant.
Are you looking for Mexican, Indian or some other type of food?
I want some yummy Malaysian food.
In which city?
In Redwood City.
Erawan Thai Restaurant is in Redwood City.
Yes. Sound good.
Do you want me to book a table?
For what time?
For 11:15 is great.
Please confirm you want me to book a table for 2 at the Erawan Thai Restaurant in Redwood City at 11:15 am on March 1st.
Yes. That is right.
The reservation was not a success. Would you like me to reserve a table for 2 at the Erawan Thai Restaurant on March 1st at 11 am?
No. that's okay.
Okay. Have a great day. Goodbye.
Can you find me a place to eat?
What type of food do you like? You can say Indian, Mexican, or something else. And in which city?
I'd like a buffet in SF.
In San Francisco, I found Fiery Hot Pot Buffet.
Yep, that sounds great.
Do you want me to reserve you a table.
Can you book me a table at the restaurant that I liked?
What time do you want the table?
I'd like it at 1 in the afternoon, please.
Please confirm: book a table for 2 at 1 pm at Fiery Hot Pot Buffet in San Francisco on March 1st.
Yes, that's great.
It's reserved for you.
Thank you so much!
Do you need help with anything else?
No thanks, that'll be it.
Have a great day!
Will you find moderate priced Moroccan restaurants in San Fran?
I found 3. How about El Mansour in San Francisco?
Live music? What's their number?
No live music. They can be reached at 415-751-2312.
Any Latin American?
I found 10. Arguello in San Francisco is terrific.
What time?
Quarter to 8 in the evening.
Please confirm table for 2 at Arguello in San Francisco at 7:45 pm on March 1st.
That's fine.
I wasn't able to make the reservation. Anything else?
No, thanks.
Have a wonderful day.
I want to find a nice restaurant.
In which city?
In Livermore please.
What kind of food do you want? You can say Sushi, Mexican, Chinese or another type of food.
I want Persian food.
I found 1 restaurant. Demitri's Taverna serves Persian food in Livermore.
Do you have their number? Do they have liquor?
They do not serve alcohol. Their number is 925-373-0306.
Yes, that works.
Do you want to reserve a table?
Now now.
Can I help you with something else?
What time do you want?
Make it for afternoon 1:15.
Please confirm the following reservation details: Booking a table for 2 at Demitri's Taverna in Livermore on March 1st at 1:15 pm.
Yes, that works out!
Your reservation has been confirmed!
What is the address?
It is 2235 First Street.
Thank you. I'm good.
Have a great day!
I'm trying to find a place to eat.
In what city did you want me to look in?
I'd like to find one in SF.
What type of cuisine were you looking for?
Coffeehouse food sounds perfect.
I found a nice restaurant called Acquolina in San Francisco for you.
Does the place serve alcohol and do they have live music?
The restaurant does not serve liquor and they do not have live music.
Could you help me find another restaurant?
I found a nice restaurant called Broadway Dim Sum in San Francisco for you.
Can you also help me book a table at that restaurant I liked? Make a reservation for two on Saturday this week at afternoon 1:15.
Please confirm you're booking a table for 2 at Broadway Dim Sum in San Francisco on March 2nd at 1:15 pm.
No, could you make it at half past 12 in the afternoon instead?
Please confirm your reservation for March 2nd at 12:30 pm.
Yes, that is correct. What is the restaurant's number and address?
Your reservation has been confirmed. The restaurant is located at 684 Broadway and their number is 415-989-2038.
Thanks a lot.
Did you need help with anything else?
No, but thanks again.
Have a nice day.
How about some Punjabi food?
Where should I look.
Look in San Jose. Something fancy and expensive.
I see 1. Amber India in San Jose.
Do they have entertainment, like a sitar player? Give me their digits.
No live music. You can call them at 408-248-5400.
This place looks good.
Do you want a table.
Sure, but not now.
Ok. What else do you need?
I need a a table for three at a quarter to 1 in the afternoon on March 1st.
Ok. Table for 3 at Amber India in San Jose. 12:45 pm on MArch 1st is that accurate?
Yes. Where are they at?
Sorry, I could not book anything for you. What else do you need.
Nothing. That will be it.
Ok. Speak later.
Find me a place to eat in Berkeley
Do you prefer any type of food like Italian, Indian or anything else?
Look for fish type of food
How about Akemi Japanese Restaurant in Berkeley?
That's perfect
Can I book a table?
Which time do you prefer?
Book it at quarter past 6 in the evening
Please confirm this: Booking table at Akemi Japanese Restaurant in Berkeley at 6:15 pm. the reservation is for 2 people on March 1st
That's perfect. Get me the address. Does they have liquor?
Reservation successful. The address is 1695 Solano Avenue.Yes they serve liquor
Thank you so much
Do you need anything else?
No that's all for now thank you
Have a nice day
Can you find a restaurant for me?
Sure, in which city?
Please find me one in Berkeley?
Is there a specific cuisine you have in mind, maybe Mexican, Chinese or maybe something else?
A Contemporary restaurant would be great.
I recommend going to Rivoli Restaurant in Berkeley.
Can you please confirm that you want a table for 2 at Rivoli Restaurant in Berkeley on March 1st at 12 pm.
Yes, that's right.
I've booked your table.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, thanks again.
Have a great day!
I am looking for a place to eat which serves some Freshwater fish in Union City?
There is a nice restaurant called Hong Kong Restaurant located in Union City.
Yes, That sounds good to me.
DO you want me to reserve a table there?
Can you reserve a table for one people at the restaurant I liked at quarter to 6 in the evening?
Please confirm: You want me to reserve a table for 1 people at Hong Kong Restaurant located in Union City for March 1st at 5:45 pm.
Yes, That is correct. Can you check whether they serve liquor and do they have live music?
I have successfully made your reservation. They neither serve alcohol not do they have live music.
Thank you for your help.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day.
I want to find a place to eat.
What sort of food? Say something like Italian, Mexican or something else.
Pizza would be delicious.
What city do you want me to look in?
I would like it in SFO.
54 Mint Ristorante Italiano is a nice restaurant in San Francisco.
Do they have live music? What is their contact number?
There is no live music but their phone number is 415-543-5100.
Do you have suggestions for any other restaurants?
A16 is a good restaurant in San Francisco.
How about something else? I want something that is not very costly.
I have 8 restaurants that you may be interested in. Allegro ROmano is a nice San Francisco restaurant.
What time should the reservation be for?
Make the reservation at half past 12 in the afternoon.
Okay, so you want to book a table at Allegro Romano in San Francisco. The reservation will be for 12:30 pm for 2 on March 1st.
That works for me.
Your reservation has been made.
Is liquor served there? Tell me their address.
The address is 1701 Jones Street and alcohol is not served.
Thak you so much. That is all for now.
Have a great day.
I'd like to find a place to eat. I'm looking for a place that serves alcohol
What city should I look in?
I'd like to find something in SF
What type of cuisine were you looking for? You can say Italian, Mexican, or anything else.
Some Japanese food sounds perfect.
I found 10 restaurants for you. One nice restaurant is 2g Japanese Brasserie in San Francisco.
What is their address and phone number?
Their address is 601 Van Ness Avenue and their number is 415-292-9997.
What time did you want to book it?
I'd like to book it at 7 o"clock in the evening.
Please confirm you're booking a table for 2 at 2g Japanese Brasserie in San Francisco on March 1st at 7 pm.
Yes, that sounds good.
Your reservation has been confirmed.
Thank you.
Did you need help with anything else?
No, but thanks again.
Have a nice day.
Will you find a restaurant in Alameda?
What kind of food?
Reasonably priced Middle eastern.
Found 1 restaurant, Asena in Alameda.
Address?
2508 Santa Clara Avenue.
What time?
12:15 pm.
Please confirm table for 2 at Asena in Alameda at 12:15 pm on March 1st.
Great.
I've completed your reservation.
Thanks. That's all.
Have a great day.
I'm hungry. Can you find a restaurant for me?
Sure. What city are you in?
SFO. I feel like having Southern food.
I see 10 places in San Francisco you might like. How about 1760?
Does that place have any live music? Do you know their phone number?
No live music. The number is 415-359-1212.
Hmm. What other places are there? Does anywhere serve alcohol?
From the 10 San Francisco restaurants, 25 Lusk serves alcohol.
You want to reserve a table for 3 at 25 Lusk in San Francisco for 10:30 am today, on March 1st?
Yes, please.
Sorry, I can't do that. 25 Lusk isn't opened so early in the day. Do you need assistance with anything else?
No, that's all. Thanks a ton.
Enjoy your day.
I want to find a restaurant that is moderate in price.
What city do you want to look in?
Let's look in Sonoma.
Is there a cuisine you prefer, such as American, Italian, or anthing else?
California cuisine would be great, and it's okay if it's pricey.
There's 1 restaurant that matches. It's a nice spot called Carneros Bistro in Sonoma.
Is there liquor there, and what's their phone number?
They do have alcohol and you can call them at 707-931-3405.
Okay, that sounds good.
Do you want to book a table.
Perhaps later.
Do you need me to do anything else?
What time would you like to book a table for?
I want it for 11:30.
I'll book you a table for 2 at Carneros Bistro in Sonoma at 11:30 am on March 1st, is that okay with you?
Yeah, that's exactly what I want. What's the address of the place?
I've booked you the table. Their address is 1325 Broadway.
Do they have any live music there?
I'm sorry, there's no live music.
Okay, thanks a lot. That's all for now.
Alright, take care.
I'd like to find a Latin American place to eat.
Which city should I look in?
I would like in Brentwood.
I have 2 restaurants in Brentwood including Jalisco's Restaurant.
Yes, that will be great.
Do you want to reserve a table there?
Maybe at a later time.
Is there anything else you can help with?
What time would you like the reservation for?
I'd like it at twelve in the afternoon.
Please confirm a table for Jalisco's Restaurant in Brentwood for 12 pm on March 1st for 2 people.
Yes, that will work.
The reservation is a success.
Thanks so much. That is everything I need.
Have a wonderful day.
Help me search for places to eat.
What city would you like to search in and is there a specific food you want?
Search in SFO and I really like French food.
You might like Amelie San Francisco in San Francisco.
Yeah, that sounds like it'll hit the spot.
Do you want me to book a table?
Perhaps later.
Do you need any further help.
What time is the booking for?
Let's do 11:00.
I'll book you a table for 2 at Amelie San Francisco in San Francisco on March 1st at 11 am, is that correct?
Yeah, please book it.
I have booked the table.
Thanks a lot, that's all the help I need.
Have a good rest of your day.
I would like to look for a place where I could eat during my visit at San Francisco. Can you please help me?
Sure, what kind of food do you prefer to eat?
There's no much of gastropub food in here. I think that would be perfect.
Yes, you are right. Where do you want me to check?
Juts somewhere in SFO will be okay.
I have found 10 restaurants and one of it is called B-side.It is nicely located in San Francisco.
I've tried that before. But they do not serve alcohol. Do you have any other suggestion?
How about Balboa Cafe that is located in the heart of San Francisco?
I've been there many time. I am really sorry but could you suggest a different one?
Let me see. How about Bartlett Hall at San Francisco?
Do you have their phone number? I think I shall call them first. I want to check if they have live music.
Unfortunately they do not have live music, but here is their phone number; 415-433-4332.
For what time do you want me to make the reservation?
Please have i at 2 o"clock in the afternoon.
Okay, I am about to book a reservation at Bartlett Hall in San Francisco for 2 persons at 2 pm on March 1st. Is that right?
I'm sorry but I think that would be late for a lunch. Please make it 11:30 in the morning instead.
Okay, book a reservation at Bartlett Hall in San Francisco for 2 persons at 11:30 am. Would that be all?
Let's have it like this, booking for four persons tomorrow. I will invite my parents.
So that would be a reservation for 4 persons on March 2nd, is that right?
Yes, that's right. Is it not very costly? I do not have much with me.
The price range is moderate.But I wasn't able to make the reservation at Bartlett Hall for 4 persons. Shall I try booking at 11 am on March 2nd?
That's sad, but thanks for trying. Will handle it from here.
Okay, have a good day!
I am looking for a place to eat in Oakland that serves alcohol. I need someplace economical priced.
What type of food would you like to eat?
I would prefer Non meat food.
I found 2 restaurants in Oakland, one of them is Encuentro a nice restaurant.
What time should I book for the reservation?
I would like it at two in the afternoon.
Can you confirm the reservation is for a table at Encuentro in Oakland for 2 people at 2 pm on March 1st.
No, i need it on 9th of March.
Can you confirm the reservation is at 2 pm on March 9th?
Yes, that is correct. What is the contact number and do they have live music?
Unfortunately I was not able to make the reservation. Can I assist you with something else?
No thank you.
Enjoy your day.
I'm planning on going out to eat later. Can you find me any restaurants that serve Latin American food?
Sure, where should I look?
Look in the San Jose area.
Okay, I found 10 restaurants that fit what you're looking for. How about eating at Chacho's in San Jose?
Great, that sounds perfect.
Do you want me to book a table there for you?
Please confirm that you'd like to book a table for 2 at Chacho's in San Jose for March 1st at 10:30 am.
Yup, that's right.
Sorry, but I couldn't make the reservation for you. Is there anything else I can help with?
No thanks, that's all I needed.
Okay, have a nice day!
I would like to find a place to eat.
In which city should I search, and do you prefer a certain type of food like American, Indian or something else?
Please search for something that is Barbecue in the intermediate priced rangelocated in Larkspur.
One nice restaurant in Larkspur is Belcampo Restaurant & Butcher Shop.
That sounds good.
Would you like to make reservations?
Not at this time.
What else can I assist you with today?
Please confirm you would like a table for 2 on March 1st at 4:45 pm for the Larkspur restaurant Belcampo Restaurant & Butcher Shop.
Yes. Do they serve alcohol?
Unfortunately I am unable to book that table. Is there anything else today?
No, thank you so much!
Enjoy the day!
I need an afforadable restaurant in SFO
Any type of food you're interested in?
I'm thinking Japanese, but it needs to be bargain priced for sure
I found 4 restaurants for you. Fujiyama-ya in San Francisco is good
What else do you have? Maybe a burrito?
I'd recommend El Tesoro Taqueria & Grill in San Francisco
Any other ideas?
Perhaps you'd like La Laguna in San Francisco?
Sure. What time?
I'd like to go at twelve pm
Please confirm: a table for 2 at La Laguna in San Francisco at 12 pm on March 1st
Yes that's right
I've booked your table
Do they have any live music there? Can I get their phone number?
There's no live music, but you can call them at 415-401-9420
Thanks. Appreciate it
Take care.
Can you help me find a place to eat?
Yes. What type of food do you prefer?
I think California food will be good.
Any particular city in mind?
Lets go with Los Gatos.
There is 1 restaurant. The Lexington House is a highly recommended restaurant located in Los Gatos
Can I have their address please? Do they serve alcohol?
Yes, they do serve alcohol. The Lexington House is located at 40 North Santa Cruz Avenue
That sounds perfect
Shall I reserve a table?
Yes please. I need a table for 3 on March 7th at 6 in the evening.
To confirm: You wish to reserve a table for 3 on March 7th at 6 pm at The Lexington House in Los Gatos. Is this correct?
Yes that is accurate.
Your reservation is confirmed.
I am tired of cooking and want to eat out.
Are you interested in Italian or Chinese cuisine or anything else?
Some african food would be ideal.
In which city?
I am looking for a bargain in San Fran.
Radio Africa Kitchen in San Francisco would be just what you are looking for.
Is alcohol served there?
Yes, it is.
That sounds like a plan then.
You would like reservations?
Yes, that would be cool.
For what time.
1:30 in the afternoon.
You would like a table for 2 at Radio Africa Kitchen in San Francisco for 1:30 pm on march 1st?
No, I want it on March 14th at 13:45
You want to book a table for March 14th at 1:45 pm?
Yes, for sure. Is there a number and address for the place?
The address is 4800 3rd street and the number is 415-826-9660. I apologize but the reservation was unsuccessful. Would you like me to make a reservation at Radio Africa Kitchen for 2 on March 14th at 1:30 pm?
Yes, that would be cool.
I have made the reservation.
Find me a place that serves Vietnamese food.
What city do you want to eat in?
I want to eat in Oakland.
Search revealed 5 places. Binh Minh Quan is located in Oakland and serves Vietnamese food.
Do they have alcohol?
They do not have any alcohol.
That is great.
Shall I make a reservation for you?
Yes, make me a reservation for one person at 12 o"clock in the afternoon for the 12th of March.
You want a table for 1 at Binh Minh Quan in Oakland for 12 pm on March 12th. Is that correct?
No, make it for two people.
You want a reservation for 2 at 12 pm. Is that correct?
That is correct.
Your table is booked.
I want to find a restaurant serving Brunch in Redwood City.
There is 1 restaurant. Stacks - Redwood City is in Redwood City.
Is there live music.
No. There's no live music.
Are they pricey?
They're in the moderate price range.
Please make a reservations. Sounds great.
For what time?
For 1:30 pm.
Please confirm you want a reservation for 2 on March 1st at Stacks - Redwood City in Redwood City at 1:30 pm.
Actually, it's for 1.
Please confirm you want me to book a table for 1 at Stacks - Redwood City.
Yes. That is correct.
Your reservation was a success.
I am searching for some nice place with average priced foods to eat out side. Can you search for the one that suits to me?
Let me know your interested type like Italian, Indian or any other food that you like to eat and in which City do you want me to search for the same?
I want to search for the Greek food in Millbrae. Is that possible?
Yes and found one nice restaurant in Millbrae and its name is Zorba's Pizza. What about your opinion on this?
I need the one with liquor supply and can you check whether they will supply alcohol there. Also get their address details for my reference.
No, they do not supply alcohol and their address is 1567 El Camino Real. Let me know your comments to proceed further with this restaurant.
Yes, that is Okay for me even if they will not supply alcohol. Thanks.
Shall I go with booking of table there?
Yes, do it for me now.
I need to know about your convenient time to make the reservation.
7:30 pm will be perfect.
Please confirm to book a table for 2 in Zorba's pizza restaurant in Millbrae on March 1st at 7:30 pm.
That is confirmed. Please complete the reservation process.
I have confirmed the reservation successfully.
I will be so happy If I hear any music while eating my favorite food, can you check whether they offer any live music there?
Sorry, unfortunately they do not offer live music there.
It's Okay, please tell me the contact number of that restaurant.
It is 650-875-1616. Anything else?
I'd like to find a place to get some food.
What kind would you like to eat?
Southern food sounds great.
Where should I search?
I'd like to find some Parisian food in SFO.
Amelie San Francisco is a great choice in San Francisco.
How expensive are they?
They have moderate prices.
Could you suggest another one? I'd like to find one in Walnut Creek.
Cypress Restaurant is a great choice in Walnut Creek.
Do they serve alcohol?
They do serve alcohol.
That would work great for me. I'd like to make a reservation for two people on the 5th of March at half past 5 in the evening.
Please confirm the following: You want a table for 2 at Cypress Restaurant in Walnut Creek at 5:30 PM on March 5th.
Yes, that works. Do they play live music?
The table has been reserved. They don't do live music.
I need to find a restuarant.
What kind of food are you looking for?
Something pricey, preferably Curry.
In which city?
Please find a restaurant in Burlingame.
Rasa is nice and located in Burlingame.
Do they have live music there?
No they do not.
Perfect, please book a table.
What time would you like your reservation?
Please make it at 1 pm.
Okay you want a table at Rasa on March 1st at 1 pm in Burlingame for 2, correct?
Yes that is great. What is the address please? Do they serve liquor?
Your reservation has been made. The address is 209 Park Road and they do not serve alcohol.
I want to find a place to eat please.
Certainly. What kind of food would you like, American, Italian or another option?
I think I'd like a Barbecue place.
In what city please?
I want a place in Cupertino which is intermediate priced and also serves alcohol.
There's a nice restaurant in Cupertino called Eureka! which you might like.
Maybe something else, like a place that serves Lobster?
I have 2 choices for you in Cupertino. How about Kikusushi Japanese Restaurant?
That should work. Can you make a reservation at 6 pm for two please?
Confirming a table for 2 on March 1st at Kikusushi Japanese Restaurant in Cupertino at 6 pm.
Excellent, thank you.
The table has been successfully reserved.
I am looking for an oriental restaurant that serves alcohol.
What city should I look in?
Check San Ramon.
I have 1 restaurant that should work. Pearl Garden Restaurant is a nice San Ramon restaurant.
Okay, sounds good. Make me a reservation.
What time do you want to make the reservation?
Make the reservation for 5:30 pm.
Could you confirm that you want one table at Pearl Garden Restaurant San Ramon for 5:30 pm on March 1st? The reservation will be for 2 people, right?
Yes, that is good. Is it an expensive restaurant? Is there live music?
Your reservation was made successfully. There is no live music. They have moderate prices.
I would like to eat in a place which serves alcohol
In which city? Do you prefer Indian, American or anything else?
In Mountain View. I prefer some Coffeehouse
In Mountain View there's Bajis Cafe
Yes, It's good for me
Do you want to book a table?
Yes, I want to book.
What time do you want to book?
I would like to book at 5 pm
A table for 2 people at Bajis Cafe in Mountain View, on March 1st at 5 pm. Do you confirm?
Yes, I confirm
Your table has been booked
I want to go eat somewhere, can you help me out?
Is there a type of food you prefer? And what city are you interested in?
I'd like to eat Freshwater fish in San Jose.
Ariake is a nice spot in San Jose.
Do you recommend anywhere else? And it should be a place with alcohol.
There are 4 restaurants that match. Blue Water Seafood And Crab is a nice spot in San Jose.
Can you give me their address and phone number?
They're located at 860 Willow Street and can be contacted at 408-289-8879.
Okay, cool, any other suggestions?
Olive Garden Italian Restaurant is a nice spot in San Jose.
Okay, let's go with that.
Do you want me to get you a table?
Yeah, please get me a table for two on March 10th.
What time is it for?
It's for the afternoon 1:15.
Okay, I'll get you a table for 2 at Olive Garden Italian Restaurant in San Jose on March 10th at 1:15 pm, can you confirm that?
Yeah, I confirm all of that. And what's their address?
They are located at 940 Blossom Hill Road. I'm sorry but that time in unavailable. Do you want to try a table for 2 at Olive Garden Italian Restaurant on March 10th at 1:30 pm?
Yeah, try that time.
I've booked you the table.
Oh, and do they feature live music? Also, what are the prices like?
They don't feature live music and the prices are in the moderate range.
I want to find a place to eat.
What city?
Something inexpensive in South San Francisco.
What kind of food? Chinese? Italian? American?
Szcheuan food!
King Sun Buffet in South San Francisco is a good choice.
Anything else?
New Golden Wok is also located in South San Francisco.
Yes, make a reservation for 1 person on March 4th at 12:30 in the afternoon.
Please confirm, table for 1 at New Golden Wok in South San Francisco on March 4th at 12:30 pm.
Cool.
Your reservation was successful.
Do they have live music or serve alcohol?
They do not have either.
I would like to find a Filipino restaurant in South San Francisco please.
Are you interested in Fort McKinley Restaurant, Bar & Banquet in South San Francisco?
Is it a reasonably priced place and do they play live music there?
They do have live music and they are in the moderate price range.
Sounds good. Let's reserve a table please.
For what time?
At 12:15 in the afternoon please.
Confirming a 12:15 pm reservation for 2 on March 1st at Fort McKinley Restaurant, Bar & Banquet in South San Francisco.
Can you make that for next Friday? I'd like to go at half past 1 in the afternoon.
Confirming a March 8th reservation at 1:30 pm.
Yes, that's right.
The table has been booked.
What's the address and do they serve alcohol there?
They don't serve alcohol, I'm sorry. The location is 101 Brentwood Drive.
I am trying to find a place to eat.
What type of food were you trying to find?
Some Laotian food sounds perfect.
In what city should I look in?
I'd like it to be in San Francisco.
I found 2 restaurants for you. One nice restaurant is Champa Garden Restaurant in San Francisco.
Did you have any other restaurants?
I also found a nice restaurant called Maneelap Srimongkoun Restaurant in San Francisco.
Does it have an above average price range?
It has a moderate price range.
Does the restaurant have live music?
No.
Yes, that sounds good.
Did you wish to book a table here?
Yes, I'd like to make a reservation.
When did you want to make the reservation for?
I'd like to make it for 11 o"clock in the morning.
Please confirm you're booking a table for 2 at Maneelap Srimongkoun Restaurant in San Francisco on March 1st at 11 am.
Yes, that is correct. Where is it located?
Your reservation has been confirmed. It is located at 4995 Mission Street.
Hey, can you find me a place to eat with live music at a budget price?
Which city should I check?
Please check San Jose.
What type of food do you want?
I'd like to have some coffee & light bites.
How about Mcdonald's in San Jose?
Is there anything else?
Sorry, I couldn't find anything else. Would you like me to do another thing?
Please search again. Raise the price to moderate and change the area to Benicia.
Okay, how about First St. Cafe in Benicia?
Is there anything else?
There's the Benicia famous restaurant, The Rellik Tavern.
How can I contact them? Where is it?
You can call them on 707-745-9938. They're at 726 1st Street.
That sounds good. Please reserve a table for one at afternoon 12:30 on March 4th.
Okay, please confirm that you'd like a table for 1 at The Rellik Tavern in Benicia from 12:30 pm on March 4th.
No, I need it for three people please.
Okay, the tavern in Benicia for 3?
Please change the date and time to eleven in the morning on March 13th.
Okay, 11 am on March 13th.
That's great. Do they sell alcohol?
Yes they do. Your reservation is complete.
Thanks so much.
Is there anything else?
Find an economical priced restaurant.
Cuisine? City?
Diner food in Windsor.
Charlie's Restaurant is in Windsor.
What else can you find?
KC's American Kitchen is in Windsor.
Good, make a reservation.
For what time?
One in the afternoon.
Please confirm: table for 2 at Kc's American Kitchen in Windsor at 1 pm on March 1st.
No, on the 7th.
Please confirm: table at KC's American Kitchen on March 7th.
Yes. What's the address? Do they serve alcohol?
Your table is booked. It's at 9501 Duvander Lane. There's no alcohol served.
I have a plan to eat outside for which I need your help to find some nice places with fancy prices in San Francisco.
Do you have any category of food in your mind to eat like Chinese, American or any other type of food? If you let me know your interest then it will be easy to search as per your taste.
I think I like the European Food very much and make your search based on this.
What about Bar Tartine restaurant in San Francisco which is the best place for European food?. What is your opinion?.
I want the place with live music and liquor supply. Can you check with the restaurant that they will allow these?
The will serve Liquor but they do not have any live music there. Is that okay to you?
Search for something else.
What about Bon Marche Brasserie & Bar restaurant in San Francisco?
That I think will work for me and I need you to make a reservation at this restaurant on the 12th.
At what time?
Book it for the time six in the evening on that day.
Please confirm to book a table for 2 in the Bon Marche Brasserie & Bar restaurant in San Francisco on March 12th at 6 pm.
That is confirmed to proceed further.
I have booked it successfully.
I'm looking for a restaurant.
In which city?
I'm looking for somewhere to eat small plates food in Berkeley.
Fonda is a restaurant in Berkeley.
Is it pricey?
It is in the moderate price range.
That's perfect for me.
Should I reserve a table?
Yes. Please reserve.
For what time?
Please reserve for 5 o"clock in the evening.
Please confirm you want me to book a table for 2 at Fonda in Berkeley on March 1st at 5 pm.
Actually, for 3 at afternoon 1.
Please confirm you want me to book a table for 3 at 1 pm.
Yes. Can I have their address?
Their address is 1501 Solano Avenue. The reservation wasn't successful. Would you like me to book a table for 3 on March 1st at 12:30 pm at Fonda?
Yes. Sound perfect.
Your reservation was a success.
Is there live music there? What's their direct line?
There is no live music. Their direct line is 510-559-9006.
Hi, are there any nice places where I can dine at?
Any preference on the type of cuisine or food?
Some pasta would be great, I have been wanting to eat this for ages!
Sure, any preference on the city of the restaurant?
Would prefer one which is located around Berkeley.
There are 8 restaurants, one of which is Cugini Restaurant in Berkeley.
Sure, this is fine with me.
Would you like me to make a reservation for you?
Sure, please help to do so, thanks!
What time do you intend to visit them?
I will be dining in at 18:45.
Please confirm your reservation for 2 at Cugini Restaurant in Berkeley at 6:45 pm on March 1st.
Sorry, could you change the timing to 12:45 in the afternoon instead?
Sure, please confirm your reservation at Berkeley at 12:45 pm.
This is fine with me.
Sorry, I was unable to make your reservation at Cugini Restaurant for 2. How about March 1st at 12:30 pm instead?
Sure, this is fine with me too.
Your reservation has been made!
Can you find me a place to eat?
What is your preferred category of food and the city?
I prefer some pasta kind of food with above average priced food in SF.
There are 10 restaurants. One is called Ala Romana located in San Francisco.
Okay. That sounds good to me.
Do you want me to reserve a table here?
Yes. Please reserve a table for me.
What time should I reserve the table for?
Reserve the table at twelve pm.
Please confirm: You want me to reserve a table for 2 people at Ala Romana located in San Francisco on March 1st at 12 pm.
Okay. That sounds good to me. Can you check whether they have live music?
I have successfully made your reservation and they do not have live music.
I am looking for moderate priced place to eat in San Fran.
What kind of food are you looking forward to eat ?
Some Burrito kind of food will be a perfect choice.
There are 10 restaurants available. Arguello in San Francisco i is a good choice.
Yes. That is perfect for me.
Would you like to book a table ?
Please do make the reservation.
Reservation is for which time ?
It's for next Tuesday for one person at half past 4 in the evening.
Can you please confirm the details: Hotel Arguello in San Francisco for March 5th for 1 person for 4:30 pm.
Yes. What is the contact number of the restaurant?
Sorry the reservation is not done. Is there anything else I can help you with ?
Can you please book it for March 7th for 3 people at evening 7:30.
Please confirm the details: Arguello in San Francisco for March 7th from 7:30 pm for 3 people.
Yes. That's perfect. Do they have facility of live music ?
The reservation is successful. They don't have live music.
I am looking for a afforadable place to eat that serves alcohol.
What kind of food are you looking for? You can say Mexican, Italian, or anything else. Also, what city should i search in.
I am looking for some American food in Fairfield.
Red Lobster is a nice restaurant located in Fairfield.
What is the address?
1525 Travis Boulevard.
Sounds good, I want to make a reservation.
What time would you like your reservation to be?
At 12:30 for one person.
Please confirm the following details: One table for 1 at Red Lobster in Fairfield on March 1st at 12:30 pm.
Yes that's good.
Your reservation is complete.
Find a coffeehouse with low priced food.
Which city?
San Jose.
McDonald's is in San Jose.
That works, book a table for two at 12:45.
Please confirm: table for 2 at McDonald's on March 1st at 12:45 pm in San Jose.
Yes. Do they have live music?
They have live music. I couldn't make that reservation. McDonald's has an opening for 2 people at 1 pm on March 1st, how about that?
Ok.
Your table is booked.
I'm starving. You have a cafe you recommend?
Depends on the city.
See what you got in Oakland.
I got Homestead in Oakland.
Whats their digits? Can I get loaded there?
510-420-6962. No alcohol.
Thats fine. Get me a table for 3 on the 3rd of this month.
For what time?
18:30. But make it for 1.
Table for 1 at Homestead in Oakland at 6:30 pm on March 3rd?
Yes. That's what I want.
And thats what you got.
I would like to eat something somewhere
In which city?
I'd like in Moraga
Do you prefer American, Mexican or anything else?
I would like to eat Pasta in an afforadable priced restaurant that serves alcohol
I found La Finestra Ristorante in Moraga
There's live music?
No, there isn't live music
Tell me its telephone number, please
Contact number is 925-376-4444
Ok, It's perfect. I want to book a table
What time do you want to book?
At morning 10:30, please
A table for 2 people at La Finestra Ristorante in Moraga, on March 1st at 10:30 am
Yes, that's fine!
Unfortunately it is impossible to proceed with the booking. Do you need anything else?
Yes, please try again. Book it at morning 11:30
A table for 2 people at La Finestra Ristorante in Moraga, on March 1st at 11:30 am. Is it correct?
Yes, it is.
The reservation has taken place!
What is the restaurant address?
The address is 1419 Moraga Way
I need a bite to eat somewhere.
I can find something if you give me an area.
Look in Sebastopol for sushi.
I see 2 places in Sebastopol. Try Sushi Hana first.
Whats the other one?
Sushi Tozai in Sebastopol.
Is that average priced?
More like moderate.
How can I contact them.
You can dial them at 707-824-9886.
I think they will do.
So, book a table?
Yes, Book one.
What time do you want?
6:45 pm is good.
A table for 2 at 6:45 pm at Sushi Tozai in Sebastopol on March 1st?
Yes. Give me their exact location too.
Sushi Tozai is at 7531 Healdsburg Avenue. But I could not get a table. I can try 6:30 pm on March 1st for 2 if you want.?
Yes, do that please.
Done. You have a table.
Can you help my find a restaurant with above average pricing?
What type of food would you like? Mexican, American, or something else maybe?
Italian food sounds good right now.
Where should I look?
I want to find something in San Fran.
There's a nice Italian place called Ala Romana in San Francisco.
Is there anything else? Maybe something more reasonably priced?
I found 10 more you might like. How about 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano in San Francisco?
Hmm, could you suggest something else?
Sure, what about A16 in San Francisco?
Do they serve liquor there? What is their phone number?
They do serve liquor. You can contact them at 415-771-2216.
Yeah that sounds good. I'd like to make a reservation there.
What time should the reservation be for?
I'd like to make the reservation at a quarter past 12 in the afternoon.
So you would like to make a reservation for 2 people at A16 in San Francisco on March 1st at 12:15 pm, is that correct?
No, I would like to make it for evening 5:30 on the 10th of March instead.
So you would like the reservation for March 10th at 5:30 pm, is that correct?
Yes that sounds better. Where are they located?
They are located at 2355 Chestnut Street. I was unable to make a reservation for that time. Shall a try a reservation at A16 for 2 people on March 10th at 5 pm instead?
Sure, try that.
Your reservation was made successfully.
Find me a restaurant in San Francisco.
Do you prefer Mexican, Indian, or another type of food?
I am looking for some above average priced California food.
Search revealed 8 places. Alta Msp is located in San Francisco.
What else do you have?
Central Kitchen is also in San Francisco.
What other results are there?
Grill At The St. Regis is in San Francisco.
That is perfect.
Shall I make a reservation for you?
Yes, book me a table.
What time do you want to eat?
I want to be there at 12:30.
You want a reservation for 2 people at the Grill At The St. Regis in San Francisco on March 1st at 12:30 pm. Is that right?
No, the reservation is for 1 person.
You want a table for 1 in San Francisco. Is that correct?
That is correct and can you tell me their phone number?
Your table is booked and you can contact the restaurant at 415-284-4188.
I need to find a cheap Chinese restaurant.
Where should I search for you?
I need to find something in Concord.
May I suggest Hunan Restaurant in Concord?
What's the phone number? Do they offer live music?
Unfortunately, they do not have live musical acts. The phone number is 925-827-4800.
That's fine. It sounds good anyway.
Do you want to make a reservation?
Yes, please make a reservation for me.
What time would work best for you?
Try quarter past 6 in the evening.
You'd like a table for 2 at Hunan Restaurant in Concord at 6:15 pm on March 1st. Is this correct?
I'm sorry, can we change that to 18:00 on the 8th?
Can you review the details for me? You'd like a table on March 8th at 6 pm.
That is correct. Can you tell me if they offer liquor?
They do not serve alcohol. The table has been confirmed.
Where is the restaurant located?
It is located at 4804 Clayton Road.
Generally I love to eat outside but I have no enough time to do it. But now I got some free time and I need your help to search for a nice place to eat.
What is your favorite City to search for a restaurant. If you have one in your mind then tell me the same to search there.
Yes, I was thinking of Berkeley City for a long time to eat there but I did not get any chance so please search for a restaurant there.
Oh, definitely will search there. I also want to know your interested type of food like Italian, Indian or anything else that you love to eat, so that I can search as per your taste.
I love to eat Laotian food very much. Search for the similar one.
What about a restaurant named Dara Thai/Lao Cuisine in Berkeley?
What is their address and price range. Please check and confirm that the food in this restaurant is not very costly.
Yes, they have moderate range prices only and the address is 1549 Shattuck Avenue.
Then it will be fine.
What else you need, shall I book a table there now?
Yes make if for 3 persons.
At what time?
May be evening 6:45 is the convenient time to me.
Please confirm to book a table for 3 at Dara Thai/Lao Cuisine in Berkeley on March 1st at 6:45 pm.
That is correct, please go ahead. Also check whether they will offer any live music there?
No, they do not have live music. Sorry I could not make the reservation at that time. Shall I book it for the new time 6:30 pm at Dara Thai/Lao Cuisine on the same day March 1st for 3 persons?
Yes, that is also okay for me. proceed.
I have reserved the table successfully in that restaurant.
I need help finding a place with good food, money is not a problem.
Do you have a preference of what type of food you would like?
Find a place that has a good burrito!
Where are you wanting to go to eat?
Find a restaurant in Pacifica.
I have 1 spot in Pacifica you may like, how about The Surf Spot?
Can I get the number and address to that restaurant?
Yes, the phone number is 650-355-7873 and the address is 4627 Pacific Coast Highway.
Great that sounds like a plan!
Do you want me to reserve you a table?
Yes that would be cool.
Do you have a time preference?
Yes, make it for 11:45 am.
Okay so you said table for 2 on March 1st at 11:45 am at The Surf Spot in pacifica?
Yes that is right, and also can you find out if they sell liquor and have live music?
Yes I can! So, the good news is that the Surf Spot do serve alcohol, however the only available table they have for 2 on March 1st is for 11:30 am, would that be okay?
That would be fine.
Great! I have successfully completed your reservations.
I think my roommate wants to go out somewhere to eat tonight. Can you look up some economical priced restaurants for us?
Sure, what kind of food do you like?
I'm in the mood for some Ramen.
Ok, and what city do you want to go to?
Anything in Mountain View is fine.
Ok, it looks like Bushido is a pretty popular ramen place in Mountain View. How about that?
Yeah, that sounds perfect.
Do you want to make a reservation?
Yeah, can you make it for two people at 6 pm on the 7th of March?
Sure. To confirm, you want to make a reservation for 2 people at Bushido in Mountain View at 6 pm on March 7th. Is that right?
Yes, that's perfect. What's their number?
I've made the reservation. You can reach them at 650-386-6821.
Great, thanks. By the way, do they have live music?
No, unfortunately no live music.
Can you find me somewhere to eat?
Sure, what kind of food?
I'd like an Italian restaurant.
Okay, what city?
In Lafayette, please.
I found 3 places, how about Locanda Positano in Lafayette?
That sounds great.
Okay, should I reserve a table?
Yes please. Get me a table for four from quarter past 7 in the evening.
Okay sure. Please confirm that you'd like a table for 4 at Locanda Positano in LAfayette from 7:15 pm on March 1st.
No, make it 11:30 in the morning on March 6th.
Okay, 11:30 am on March 6th?
No. I want it just for 1 person on the 11th of this month.
Okay. 1 seat on March 11th?
Yes, that's fine.
Okay, your table has been booked.
Hey, I want to eat a good burger. I want something special, so please search in the above average price range.
Okay, what city should I search?
Please check in SF.
I found 10 restaurants in San Francisco. How about 1760?
Is there anything else?
Sure, how about 25 Lusk in San Francisco?
Is there anything else?
3rd Cousin is also in San Francisco.
Do they sell alcohol?
No, they do not.
How can I contact them?
You can call them on 415-814-3709.
That sounds good.
Should I reserve a table for you?
Yes, please. Get me a table for 1 on the 6th.
Okay sure, from what time?
From evening 7.
Okay, please confirm that you'd like to book a table for 1 at 3rd Cousin in San Francisco from 7 pm on March 6th.
Yes, that's correct.
Reservation successful, enjoy.
I'm in the mood for a bite, look for a restaurant
I'll do it right away, just tell me the city and the type of food
The city is burlingame and the type of food is southern kind, if available
My research tells me that there are 4 restaurants, one of them is 37 north in burlingame
What about the price range? Is it fancy?
No, it's moderate
Then I would love to try it
I can book a table for you, if you wish.
Yes, do it please. The date is March 2nd at 6 pm
Before I do that, tell me if what I am about to do, it's what you want. I'm going to book a table for 2 people at 37 north in burlingame. The day of the reservation is march 2nd at 6 pm
N, the time is not right, it is 1:45 pm
Okay, then confirm me again the data. The day of the reservation is March 2nd and the time is 1:45 pm
Yes, proceed please.
I can't do that on the time you asked me. I may try to book a table for 2 at 37 north on march 2nd at 1:30 pm, what do you say?
Okay, try it now please
This time I succeeded
I am searching for a place to eat.
What type of food you want and in which city i should search in?
I prefer some kind of steakhouse food in San Jose
There is a restaurant called Black Angus Steakhouse in San Jose
What is its cost?
Cost of it is moderate
Perfect and i need to make booking at restaurant
What is the booking time?
I want it at 4:45 pm
Please give confirmation details: Booking table for 2 people at Black Angus Steakhouse at 4:45 pm on March 1st at San Jose
Fine.Can i have their phone number and do they provide live music?
I failed in booking, can i help in something else?
I need to try booking again at 12 pm
Please give confirmation details: Booking a table for 2 people at Black Angus Steakhouse at 12 pm in the city of San Jose on March 1st
That is fine
Booking is done
I need to find a place to eat.
Is there a specific city I should look for the restaurant? Is there some particular kind of food you prefer?
I would be fine with having the Breakfast kind of food. I would like for the restaurant to be in San Jose.
There is 1 restaurant which matches what you want. I can suggest Mcdonald's in San Jose which is a nice restaurant.
Yes, that suits me well.
Do you want to have a table booked there?
Yes I want to book a table there, and I need it for 3 people. I would like for the reservation to be for 6 in the evening.
Can you please confirm that you want to book a table for 3 people at Mcdonald's in San Jose on March 1st at 6 pm?
That suits me well. Can you tell me if the price range is not very costly? Can you give me their phone number?
Your table has been booked. The price range of the restaurant is considered inexpensive. If you want to call them you can at 408-238-4321
I need a place to eat.
What sort of food do you want to eat?
Oriental food would be great.
Whta city do you want me to look in?
Find me some food in San Francisco.
I have 10 restaurants in San Francisco. 8 Immortals Restaurant is a good one.
Does it have a lavish price rance? Is liquor served?
Their price range is inexpensive and they do not serve alcohol.
Would you suggest another restaurant?
Bai Thong Thai is a good restaurant in San Francisco.
That works for me.
Would I be able to further assist you?
I would like to make a reservation at this restaurant for the 4th of this month at 19:00.
Could you confirm that you want to book a table at Bai Thong Thai in San Francisco for 8 pm on March 4th at 7 pm? This reservation is for 2.
That is good.
Sorry, but the reservation didn't go through. How about Bai Thong Thai for 2 people on March 4th at 6:30 pm?
Yeah that is fine.
Your reservation was made.
Could you tell me their contact number and address?
Their street address is 298 Gough Street and the phone number is 415-863-9335.
Help me find somewhere to eat in San Francisco. Lebanese food would be ideal.
How about Arabian Nights? That's a nice spot in San Francisco.
Okay. Let's go with that. I need a table for 2 at 7:30 in the evening. This will be on the 6th of March.
Let's go over the details. You want to reserve a table for 2 at Arabian Nights in San Francisco. You'll get there at 7:30 pm on March 6th.
Actually, no, the date should be the 11th of March.
Sure. Revisiting, you still want a table for 2 but on March 11th?
Yup. Answer some questions for me too. Do they have alcohol or live music?
I've made the reservation. Unfortunately, though, they have neither.
Pull up local eateries.
Ok, which city will we be searching?
Search Berkeley.
Would you like Mexican, Chinese or is there another option you would prefer?
Find eateries that serve Noodles and dishes similar to that please.
Berkeley has a great spot called Crave Asia!
Oh yes, let's book a table for 12 o"clock in the afternoon.
Alright, please confirm a table for 2 people on March 1st at Crave Asia in Berkeley for 12 pm. Did I get this right?
Yes, perfect.
Great news, your reservation was successfully confirmed.
I am hungry for food.
Which city shall I look in? What kind of food?
Oriental food will work. I want it in San Francisco.
8 Immortals Restaurant is an Asian restaurant in San Francisco.
What's the address?
It is 1433 Taraval.
What else is there? I like Ramen and want it to be moderate priced.
I found 10 restaurants for you in San Francisco. 2g Japanese Brasserie serves ramen.
Yes, that sound good.
Do you want to reserve a table?
Yes please, make it for 1 at evening 5:30.
Please confirm the following details: the reservation is for 1 at 2g Japanese Brasserie in San Francisco at 5:30 pm on March 1st.
Yes, that works.
Your reservation went through!
Find me a place to eat.
What city do you want me to look in?
Find a place to eat in San Fran.
What sort of food are you looking for? Say something like Indian, Italian or something else.
Freshwater fish type of food would be good.
I have 10 restaurants. Akiko's Sushi Bar is a nice restaurant in San Francisco.
Is liquor served? What is the contact number?
Their phone number is 415-989-8218. Alcohol is served.
That is good for me.
Would you like to reserve a table here?
Yes, please make me a reservation.
What time would you like the reservation for?
How about 13:30?
Please confirm your reservation for a table for 2 at Akiko's Sushi Bar in San Francisco for 1:30 pm on March 1st.
That sounds good to me. Is live music available? Are the prices inexpensive?
Your reservation was made. There is no live music and the price range is expensive.
I'm looking for a restaurant in Healdsburg.
What kind of food would you like? American, Chinese or something else?
I would like some American food.
There are 5 restaurant in Healdsburg. Would you like Bear Republic Brewing Co?
No, can you find another restaurant?
There is Chalkboard located in Healdsburg.
Yes, please make a reservation.
What time would you like the reservation?
I would like to go around 19:00.
Booking a table for 2 at Chalkboard in Healdsburg at 7 pm on March 1st.
Yes, that is perfect.
Your reservation was made.
Fine me a restaurant to eat at.
What city do you want?
Find me a restaurant in Castro Valley.
What type of food do you like?
I would like some Thai food.
Search found 1 restaurant which is the Top Thai Cuisine in Castro Valley.
That is perfect.
Shall I make reservation for you?
Yes, book me a table.
What time do you want to eat?
I want to eat at twelve pm.
You want a table for 2 at the Top Thai Cuisine in Castro Valley at 12 pm on March 1st. Is that right?
No, I want eat there on the 6th of March.
You want to eat in Castro Valley on March 6th. Is that correct?
Yes, that is correct.
Your table has been booked.
Is there live entertainment.
They do not offer live entertainment.
I'm looking for a place to eat with Szcheuan food.
In what city?
San Fran. I'm looking for one that is budget priced.
There's Alice's in San Francisco that's suppose to be nice.
Are there others?
The Bamboo Restaurant in San Francisco is also highly rated.
What's the address?
1441 Polk Street.
Sounds good. I'd like a reservations.
For what time?
Afternoon 2 would be best.
Please verify: You would like a reservation for 2 at the Bamboo Restaurant in San Francisco at 2 pm on March 1st.
That is correct.
Sorry, I was unable to get that reservation. Can I do anything else?
Try again, make it for 17:15.
To confirm: you'd like a table for 2 at the Bamboo Restaurant in San Francisco at 5:15 pm on March 1st.
Yes, that's right.
Sorry I was unable to make the reservation. The Bamboo Restaurant is highly rated, would you like me to try a reservation for 2 at 5:30 pm March 1st?
Yes please do.
Your reservation is confirmed.
What is their phone number?
It's 415-775-3679.
Do they serve alcohol?
Yes they do.
I want to find a place to eat.
What city?
Milpitas.
What kind of food?
Pizza and Pasta.
Romano's Macaroni Grill is in Milpitas.
That is cool.
Are you ready to make a reservation?
Yes, I want it for 3 people on the 1st of this month at 11:30.
Please confirm, reservation for 3 at Romano's Macaroni Grill on March 1st at 11:30 am in Milpitas.
Yes. What is the address? What is the cost?
Your reservation is complete. The address is 110 Ranch Drive. Prices are moderate.
Could you find me a place to eat that's not very costly?
What type of cuisine did you have in mind?
A Sushi Bar would be perfect.
Any particular city I should search in?
I'd like it in Rohnert Park.
There's a nice restaurant in Rohnert Park known as Honey Cuisine.
Do you have their phone number?
You can reach them by phone on 707-795-9700.
Cool, I like that.
Should I go ahead and reserve a table?
Yes, please reserve a table.
For what time should I make the reservation?
Please reserve it for 7 in the evening.
Okay. Please confirm that you'd like to reserve a table for 2 at Honey Cuisine in Rohnert Park, for 7 pm on March 1st.
That is correct.
I have successfully made your reservation.
Can you help me find somewhere to eat?
Sure, what city are you looking in and what type of cuisine are you in the mood for. There's Indian, Chinese, or anything else you'd like.
Search for Oriental food in San Jose.
Okay, I found 10 places in San Jose that may work. How about China Garden Restaurant?
Do they serve alcohol?
They don't serve alcohol.
Well that's okay. Make a reservation for 12:30 in the afternoon.
I'll do that as soon as you confirm you'd like a table for 2 at China Garden Restaurant in San Jose for March 1st at 12:30 pm.
Yes, that's correct.
I've made your reservation.
I am fed up of cooking. I want to eat out.
In which city? What type of cuisine? Mexican? Italian? Something else?
I am in the mood for some Persian food. I am in Oakland.
For Oakland, Dyafa is an excellent choice.
Can you recommend somewhere else where the food is low priced?
There is 1 such restaurant located in Oakland. Marhaba Indian & Pakistani Halal cuisine should suit you.
Yes, it would. Make me a reservation.
For what time?
For 11:45 in the morning.
You would like a table for 2 at Marhaba Indian & Pakistani Halal Cuisine in Oakland for 11:45 am on March 1st?
That would be great. Is there live music and where is it located?
The address is 1437 Franklin street. There is not live music. My apologies, but I was not able to make the reservation. You would like a table for 2 at Marhaba Indian & Pakistani Halal Cuisine in Oakland for 11:30 am on March 1st?
That would be fine.
I have made the reservation
I would like to find a restaurant that's not very costly please.
What type of food would you like? How about Italian or Indian? And in what city please?
I'd like a Ramen place in SFO.
I have 10 restaurants which fit your needs. How about 2g Japanese Brasserie in San Francisco?
What else do you have?
Also in San Francisco, I have Ace Wasabi Rock-n-Roll Sushi.
May I have another suggestion please?
Sure. Akira Japanese Restaurant is another good San Francisco option.
I like that one. Can you book a table for one at 13:30 on the 13th of this month?
Confirming a reservation for 1 on March 13th at 1:30 pm at Akira Japanese Restaurant in San Francisco.
Sounds great, thank you.
The reservation is complete.
Can you give me the phone number and address?
Sure. It's 1634 Bush Street, 415-800-8498.
Can you help me find somewhere to eat in San Fran?
Sure, what kind of food would you like? Indian, Mexican, or something else?
I think Himalayan food sounds good.
I found a total of 5 restaurants matching your request. How about Cuisine of Nepal Restaurant in San Francisco?
Sure, that sounds good. I'd like to make a reservation there.
What time should the reservation be for?
I'd like it to be at two in the afternoon.
Okay, so you would like to make a reservation for 2 people at Cuisine of Nepal Restaurant in San Francisco for 2 pm on March 1st, is that correct?
Sure, that sounds great/
Sorry, I wasn't able to make a reservation for that time. Is there anything else you need?
Can you try making a reservation for 6 o"clock in the evening instead?
Okay, so you would like to make a reservation for 2 people at Cuisine of Nepal Restaurant in San Francisco for 6 pm on March 1st, is that correct?
Yes, that sounds right.
I was able to successfully make your reservation this time.
I would like a place that is low priced to eat.
Which city and food are you looking for?
I would like some Filipino food in San Bruno.
There is San Bruno in Cabalen.
Would you suggest another restaurant?
I would like Kuya's Asian Cuisine in San Bruno.
Yes, that is great to reserve March 14th for 3 people.
What is the time of the reservation.
I'd like it at 18:30.
Please confirm Kuya's Asian Cuisine in San Bruno for 6:30 pm on March 14th for 3.
Yes, that will be fine for me.
The reservation is a success.
I need to find a restaurant.
In which city and what type of food do you want?
I'm looking for some yummy Oriental food in Burlingame.
Barracuda Japanese Restaurant is one of 4 options in Burlingame.
Is liquor served there? What's their direct line?
No alcohol is served. Their direct line is 650-548-0300.
Yes. That's correct.
Do you want me to make a reservation?
Yes. Please make a reservation for 7 pm on the 4th of this month.
Please confirm you want me to make a reservation for 2 at the Barracuda Japanese Restaurant in Burlingame at 7 pm on March 4th.
That sounds amazing.
Your reservation was a success.
What is their address and are they in the lavish price range?
They are in the moderate price range and located at 347 Primrose Road.
I have small plan to eat outside and I am looking for some nice places. Can you help me to find the one?
Do you have any particular City in your mind to search for and also let me know your interested variety of food so that I can search places that match to your taste.
I want to search for the places with Coffeehouse food in Oakland.
Found a restaurant name Homestead which the best place in Oakland for your desired type of food.
I need something else. Please change the food category to Noodles and search for the nice restaurants.
What about Becky's which is the nice one in Oakland. Hope you like it.
yes, I think so. Please get me their contact information and also check whether they have live Music there?
No, they do not have live music there and their contact number is 510-601-9888. Is that okay.
I need to search some other restaurants, can you do it for me?
What about a restaurant name Fortune Restaurant in Oakland. You will definitely like it I think.
Yes, please reserve for a table at 5:30 pm in that restaurant.
Please confirm to book a table for 2 at Fortune Restaurant in Oakland on March 1st at 5:30 pm.
That is correct. Go ahead. Also I need some more details. Can you check about the prices offered by them and do they have any liquor supply?
Yes, They have liquor supply and the prices are moderate range. Your booking was confirmed successfully.
I would like to look for a place where I could eat. I will meet my friend there.
Which city do you prefer to eat?
I will be needing one located in Mountain View.
What kind of food do you prefer to eat?
My friend loves Sushi, so please look for a restaurant that sells them.
There is a Japanese restaurant called Bushido in Mountain View.
That's good to hear. Can you make a reservation on March 9th for two people and make it evening 7.
Please do confirm the following details; reservation in Bushido at Mountain View will be made for 7 pm for 2 persons on March 9th.
Yes, everything is good.
Booking is confirmed.
My friend's birthday is coming up and I want to find a really nice restaurant for us to go to, something expensive and memorable. So, would you help me set that up, please?
I'll be happy to help you with that. Tell me the city you want for the restaurant.
See what's available in St. Helena.
And, what's your choice for the type of food you want?
His favorite food is Barbecue, so let's go for that.
Okay. Do you think you might like the Archetype restaurant in St. Helena?
That sounds like a totally nice choice. Let's make a move on reserving a table there for Wednesday next week, please.
What time do you want the dinner reservation?
Set the time for 7:45 pm when we'll both be off work.
Setting that up for you now. Would you like to confirm a table for 2 guests at the Archetype restaurant in St. Helena on March 6th at 7:45 pm?
Oh, that date needs to be changed to the 9th, please. And make the reservation for 1 person. My friend's text says he'll have to work late.
All right. Do you want to confirm a table reservation for 1 person on March 9th?
Well, now. his new text says he can go and he wants to bring his sister. The more the merrier, right? So, it looks like we'll need the table for three persons.
Okay. Are you confirming a table reservation for 3 persons at 7:45 pm?
Yes, that's fine. Is liquor on tap there?
No alcohol is served at the restaurant, and there seems to be no reservation available at the Archetype for the time you want. Would it be okay to set up a table for 3 on March 9th at 7:30 pm?
Oh, yeah. We can make that work.
Your restaurant reservation is confirmed.
I am looking for restaurants.
What city and what kind like American or Mexican?
Santa Clara and I want Szcheuan.
I found 5. In Santa Clara is Chef Ming's.
Do they have liquor?
They do not have liquor.
I like that one.
Do you want a table?
Yes, book me a table.
What time would you like?
Book for one pm.
Confirm Chef Ming's in Santa Clara for March 1st for 2 at 1 pm.
That is good, is the price moderate?
Your are booked and yes it is moderate.
I am looking for restaurants.
What city and what kind for example American or Chinese?
San Francisco and I want Basque.
In San Francisco, I have Esperpento Restaurant.
I would like to go there.
Do you want a table?
Yes, next Tuesday at 10:45 am.
Confirm Esperpento Restaurant in San Francisco for March 5th at 10:45 am for 2.
Yes I confirm and what is the address and contact?
Sorry, no available times for that request.
How about evening 7:30 on 6th of March?
Confirm Esperpento Restaurant in San Francisco for March 6th at 7:30 pm for 2.
Yes I confirm all.
You are now confirmed.
Help me find a place to eat.
What city would you like to look in? And do you have a food preference?
I want to look in Milpitas, and I want something that's like Fondue. That would be great.
There's a nice place called Shabu House in Milpitas.
Where are they located and do they have liquor?
They are located at 1191 East Calaveras Boulevard and they do not have alcohol.
Okay, that sounds like something I would enjoy.
Do you want me to book a table?
Yeah, please do. Book it for the 7th of this month for 2 people at 6:30 in the evening.
Okay, I'll book you a table for 2 at Shabu House in Milpitas on March 7th at 6:30 pm, is that correct?
Yes, that's correct. What are their prices like and what's their phone number?
I booked you the table. They have moderate prices and you can reach them at 408-262-7888.
I am hungry! Where can I eat?
In what city? What kind of food do you want?
Some Latin American food. Look in San Leandro.
I found 7 restaurants. Chili's Grill & Bar is in San Leandro.
What's the number and address?
The number is 510-317-0323. The address is 15555 East 14th Street suite 366.
Could you find another place? Chili's isn't latin food!
El Torito serves latin food in San Leandro.
Look for another restaurant. Search in Half Moon Bay.
I found 1 restaurant you may like. Spanishtown Mexican Restaurant serves Mexican food in Half Moon Bay.
Yes, I've heard good things.
Do you want to book a table?
Yes, please do.
What time is it for?
Make it for 1 at 7:30 in the evening.
Please confirm the following reservation details: Booking a table for 1 at Spanishtown Mexican Restaurant in Half Moon Bay on March 1st at 7:30 pm.
Yes, that works. How expensive is it?
Your reservation was successful! Their price range is considered moderate.
Do they have live music.
They do not.
Thank you for the reservation.
Can I help you with something else?
I am in search ofa place to eat.
What city do I need to look in and what sort of food would you like to eat?
Please search in Redwood city for Sushi.
Otoko Sushi is a nice restaurant in Redwood City.
Is alcohol served? Is live music available?
There is no live music or alcohol.
What about another restaurant, perhaps one in Los Altos?
I have 1 restaurant in Los Altos that fits the criteria. Sumo Sushi Boat is a nice restaurant.
That is good for me.
Do you want to reserve a table here?
Yes, please.
What time will the reservation be for?
Make it for 12:45 pm.
Would you confirm that you want to book at Sumo Sushi BOat in Los Altos at 12:45 pm on March 1st? This reservation will be for 2 people.
That is fine for me. Is alcohol served? Where is it located?
They are located at 355 State Street. No, alcohol is not served there. Would you like to try to reserve for 2 people at Sumo Sushi Boat on March 1st at 1 pm.
Okay, that is good.
Your reservation was a success.
Can you help me find somewhere nearby to eat?
What type of food would you like? Maybe Italian, American, or something else?
I think some Ramen sounds good.
What city should the restaurant be in?
I want to go somewhere in Windsor.
I found 1 restaurant that matches your search. How about Qimura Sushi & Ramen in Windsor?
Sure, that sounds good.
Is there anything else you need?
I'd like to make a reservation there for two people.
What time would you like to eat?
I'd like something at five in the evening.
Alright, so you would like a reservation for 2 people at Qimura Sushi & Ramen in Windsor on March 1st at 5 pm. Is that correct?
No, I'd like to make it for 3 people.
Okay, so you'd like a reservation for 3 people at 5 pm, is that correct?
Yeah that's good.
Your reservation is confirmed.
I want to go out and eat somewhere.
In which city?
In walnut creek.
Are you interested in Chinese, Indian or anything else?
I am in the mood for diner food.
There are 7 suitable restaurants walnut creek. A'trio is an exceptional choice.
That would be great. I want a table for four on march 4th at afternoon 12.
You would like a table for 4 at A'trio in Walnut creek for 12 pm on March 4th.
That would be great.
I have made the reservation.
Hello! Can you help me find a restaurant?
I'd be happy to help. Where would you like to begin the search and what type of cuisine are you hungry for?
I'd like to find a restaurant in Petaluma that serves a great Burrito.
There is a great taqueria in Petaluma called the Plaza Tequila Taqueira Bar & Grill.
That would be great. Can you make a reservation for 12 o"clock in the afternoon on the 4th of this month?
You'd like a table for 2 at Plaza Tequila Taqueira Bar & Grill in Petaluma for 12 pm on March 4th. Is this correct?
Yes, that is correct.
Congratulations. Your table has been reserved.
Can you help me find some moderate price range asian food to eat?
What city would you like to eat in?
I am looking for something in Redwood City.
In Redwood City, there is a great restaurant called Crouching Tiger Restaurant.
That sounds like a great place to eat at.
Should I reserve a table for you there?
Yes please, could you make a reservation for 3 at about half past 7 in the evening on the 1st of March?
Yes, could you confirm that you want a table reserved for 3 at the Redwood City Crouching Tiger Restaurant at 7:30 PM, March 1st?
Yes, that is what I would like.
Okay then, the reservation was made just now.
Find me a restaurant.
What city are you interested in?
I want a place to eat in San Fran.
What type of food do you want?
I am looking for some Fish.
Search revealed 10 results. Akiko's Sushi Bar is in San Francisco.
What else do you have?
Alamo Square Seafood Grill is also in San Francisco.
That is good. Make a reservation for evening 5:30 on the 3rd.
You want a reservation for 2 people at Alamo Square Seafood Grill in San Francisco for 5:30 pm on March 3rd. Is that right?
That is correct.
Your booking is complete.
I am in a nice mood and I want to enjoy some special food out side and for which I need your help to find some nice place to eat.
Do you have any preferred category of food and any particular City in your mind to search for?
Yes, I like to have Punjabi Food and please search for the same in San Jose.
How about a restaurant named 8elements in San Jose?
Please check whether they will offer live music there?
No, they do not have that offer. What else you need?
Get me the price details and contact number to decide to proceed further.
The offer food at moderate prices. Their contact number is 408-270-2578. Do think this information will be useful to you?
Yes, but I need to search for some other places, can you help me to find the best one?
How about Amber India? which is also a nice restaurant in San Jose? Do you like it?
Yes, I like the same.
Do you want me to reserve a table in that restaurant now?
Yes, do it for me.
At what time you need to reserve the table?
Book it at 1:30 pm.
Please give your confirmation to book a table for 2 at Amber India in San Jose on March 1st for the time 1:30 pm.
Change it to 4th of this month.
Okay, give your final confirmation to book the restaurant in San Jose on March 4th.
That is confirmed to proceed and get their address for my reference.
I have confirmed your table there and the address is 377 Santana Row #1140.
Please also check for the price range is average priced?
No, it is expensive there.
I need a restaurant.
What city and what kind of food?
Palo Alto and Southern food.
In Palo Alto I have one called Bazille.
Make a reservation for me.
What time would you like?
Half past 6 in the evening.
Confirm Bazille in Palo Alto at 6:30 pm on March 1st for 2.
Yes I confirm all.
You are now confirmed.
Can you find me a place to eat?
What is your preferred city and category like Mexican, Indian or anything else?
Search for the restaurant in Palo Alto which some serves Asian Fusion kind of food.
There are 3 restaurant that you may like. One is called Burma Ruby Burmese Cuisine located in Palo Alto.
can you check whether they serve liquor?
No. Alcohol is not served there.
Can you check whether they have live music?
No, Live Music is not there.
Okay, That sounds great. can you help me in making a reservation at the restaurant at 6:30 in the evening?
Please confirm: You want me to make a reservation for 2 people at Burma Ruby Burmese Cuisine located in Palo Alto on March 1st at 6:30 pm.
Yes, That is correct.
I have successfully made your reservation.
I want to find a Pasta restaurant please.
What city would you like?
I want something in Petaluma that's affordable.
How about Brixx Pizzeria in Petaluma?
That should work.
Shall I make reservations for you?
Yes, please do.
For what time?
For 6:30 in the evening please.
Confirming a table for 2 on March 1st at Brixx Pizzeria in Petaluma at 6:30 pm.
Yes, that's right.
Your table has been booked.
Do they have alcohol and live music, do you know?
They don't serve alcohol but they do have live music.
I am searching for a place to eat.
What type of food you want and do you have any city preference that i should search in?
Parisian type of food is okay for me and i want it in san Fran city.
I searched 10 restaurant. One of them is Amelie San Francisco which is located at San Francisco and this is a nice restaurant.
Can you tell me about any other restaurant. Price is not a preference for me.
I searched 9 restaurant. One of them is Aquitaine Wine Bar & Bistro which is located at San Francisco and this is a nice restaurant.
Fine. this is perfect for me.
Do you want to book a table here?
Okay. i like to make a reservation.
Can you tell me the booking time?
Do it at half past 5 in the evening.
Please give confirmation details: Reserving table at Aquitaine Wine Bar & Bistro in San Francisco on march 1st at 5:30 pm and booikng is for 2 people.
This is perfect for me. Are they serve liquor?
Sorry, I could not make a booking. Do you need any other help?
I like to try booking again. please make it at morning 11:30.
Please give confirmation details: Booking table for 2 people at Aquitaine Wine Bar & Bistro in San Francisco at 11:30 am on March 1st
This is okay for me. Can i know the address?
Your booking has been confirmed. 175 Sutter Street is the street address.
I'm looking for a restaurant in Petaluma.
What kind of food would you like?
I would like some American food.
There are 6 restaurants in Petaluma. Do you like Bistro 100?
What is their phone number? Do they have live music?
They do not have live music and their phone number is 707-981-8228.
Yes, that works for me.
Would you like to book a table?
I would like a table for 12:30 pm on the 2nd of March for 3 people.
Booking a table for 3 at Bistro 100 in Petaluma at 12:30 pm on March 2nd.
Yes, that works for me.
Your reservation was made.
Help me find a reasonably priced place to eat.
Is there a certain kind of food you want?
I'm really in the mood for Peruvian food.
What city would you like to look in?
Look for a place in Oakland.
There are 2 matches. There's a nice place called La Furia Chalaca in Oakland.
Give me their phone number.
You can call them at 510-451-4206.
And where are they located? Also, do they feature live music?
They're located at 310 Broadway and they do have live music.
Okay, that sounds ideal.
Do you want me to book you a table?
Yes, book me a table for four people on March 10th at 12:30 pm.
I'll book you a table for 4 people at La Furia Chalaca in Oakland on March 10th at 12:30 pm, is that correct?
Yeah, book it.
I was not able to make the reservation, do you need me to do anything else?
Let's try another time. Book a table for 1 person on March 6th at 6:30 pm.
I'll book you a table for 1 person at La Furia Chalaca in Oakland on March 6th at 6:30 pm, is that correct?
Yeah, let's try that.
I've booked you the table.
I want to find a costly place to eat.
What kind of food? What city?
Barbecue in SF.
1760 in San Francisco.
Anything else?
25 Lusk is a cool place in San Francisco.
Yes, that is great.
Are you ready to reserve a table.
Yes, make a reservation for 3 people Tuesday next week at evening 7:45.
Please confirm, reservation for 3 at 25 Lusk in San Francisco on March 5th at 7:45 pm.
Cool, what is the address?
The address is 25 Lusk Street. I wasn't able to make that reservation. Should I try for 3 people 7:30 pm on March 5th at 25 Lusk?
That is good.
Your reservation is complete.
Hi, could you help me search for a place to eat? Would prefer one which is economical priced and has live music.
Any preference on the type of food and location of the restaurant?
Some diner food located in San Fran will be great for me.
There are 7 restaurants, and one of which is Biscuits & Blues which is located in San Francisco.
Are there any alternative restaurants I can visit?
Yes, how about Hard Rock Cafe in San Francisco?
May I have their address and contact number please?
You can contact them at 415-956-2013 and visit them at 39 Pier #256.
Are there any alternative restaurants?
Sure, there is Mr. Tipple's Recording Studio at San Francisco.
This works for me, thanks!
Would you like me to make a reservation for you?
Sure, please do so, thanks!
What time do you intend to dine in?
I will be dining in at 7 in the evening.
Sure, please confirm your reservation for 2 people at Mr. Tipple's Recording Studio in San Francisco at 7 pm on March 1st.
Sure, this is fine with me.
Your reservation has been made!
Do you know if they serve any liquor?
Yes, they do.
I would like to find someone where to eat please.
I can help you with that. What city would you like to dine in and what kind of food are you hungry for?
Can you find restaurants that serve brunch in Oakland?
I have located 5 restaurants in Oakland that matches what you want. How about Bellanico Restaurant And Wine Bar?
Yes, that would be fine, can you reserve a table for me?
Yes I can would you like for me to reserve your table for?
Can you get something for the afternoon 12:15?
Okay, so that was reservations for 2 on March 1st at Bellanico Restaurant And Wine Bar in Oakland for 12:15 pm, is that right?
Yes, that is correct.
I am sorry but the only time slot available for March 1st for 2 people at Bellanico Restaurant And Wine Bar is at 12:30 pm, will that work for you?
Yes that would be fine.
Okay, your table has been successfully reserved.
What is the the price range for this restaurant?
The price range is moderate.
Hi. Can you help me find a moderate priced place to eat in Santa Rosa?
Sure, what kind of food do you like to eat?
I really enjoy southern food.
I have located 7 southren food restaurants in Santa Rosa. How about Belly Left Coast Kitchen & Taproom?
No, not that one. Does any of those restaurants sell alcohol?
I have Bruno's On fourth in Santa Rosa.
Can I have the phone number, and do you know if they play live music?
No, they don't perform live music. The address is 1226 4th Street.
Great, that sounds like what I am looking for.
Would you need me to make your reservations?
Yes please and thank you.
Do you have a time preference?
Yes, I would like something for 2, 6:45 in the evening please.
Okay, so you would like reservations for 2 on March 1st at Bruno's On Fourth in Santa Rosa at 6:45 pm?
No I am sorry, I meant to say reservations for four people on the 4th of this month.
That's okay. So you would like to change the date to March 4th and instead of a table for 2 you will need a table for 4, is that right?
Yes that is correct, also can I have the phone number to the restaurant?
The phone number to the restaurant is 707-569-8222, and I am sorry, however Bruno's On Fourth only has a table for 4 on March 4th available for 6:30 pm, would that be okay?
Yes that will be fine.
Great! I have successfully completed your reservations.
Can you please find a budget restaurant in Windsor please?
Sure, what type of cuisine do you prefer?
I'd go for an American restaurant.
There's a nice Mcdonald's in Windsor.
Can you please give me their phone number and also please tell me if they have live musci.
You can reach them at 707-837-0446 and they do have live music.
That sounds perfect.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
Let's go ahead and book a table there.
Sure, for when?
For 11:15 in the morning, please.
Can you please confirm that you want me to book a table for 2 on March 1st at 11:15 am at Mcdonald's in Windsor?
Yes, that's correct.
Unfortunately I wasn't able to get you the reservation to Mcdonald's. I can try to book a table for 2 on March 1st at 11 am.
Yes, please do.
I've successfully placed your reservation.
I am looking for a place to eat with some Tacos kind of food in San Fran.
I located 10 restaurants. Arguello is located in San Francisco and is a nice restaurant.
That works. I would like a reservation for the restaurant on March 10th at 1:30 in the afternoon.
Can you confirm the following details. I will reserve 1 table for 2 people at Arguello in San Francisco for March 10th at 1:30 pm.
Yes that is correct.
I have successfully made the reservation.
I'm looking for new restaurants.
Sure, what kind of food and what city. You can give me suggestions like Chinese or Mexican.
Let's do Korean Barbeque in SF.
There's Aato in San Francisco.
Sure, make me a reservation for two on the 1st of March at a quarter past 11 in the morning.
Will do, but please confirm you'd like a table for 2 at Aato in San Francisco on March 1st at 11:15 am.
Perfect, thank you.
Sorry, that didn't work. Can I get you a table for 2 at Aato for March 1st at 11:30 am instead?
Yes, that's just fine.
I made your reservation.
Is there alcohol there?
Yes, they serve alcohol.
Have you a list of restaurants offering good food? I want to take food from outside.
Which city are you looking for?
I prefer South San Francisco.
What cuisine will satisfy you, Italian, Indian or any like that?
I prefer Mediterranean kind.
There are 2 good hotels offering such food. one is Ali Baba in South San Francisco.
Do you have their phone number and details of tariff?
Phone number is 650-871-2221. it is inexpensive.
Are there any better restaurants?
Amoura is a nice one in South San Francisco.
That's all. Thank you.
Shall I book a table for you?
Please make a reservation for three people at quarter past 5 in the evening.
Please confirm, one table at Amoura in South San Francisco at 5:15 pm on March 1st for 3 people.
Great. Could we enjoy live music there?
They do not provide live music. The reservation failed. Do you need reservation at Amoura for 3 people on March 1st 5 pm?
That is found ok.
Reservation is done.
I want to find a nice place to eat.
What city would you like?
In sunnyvale would be great.
What type of food would you like? Maybe Indian, Mexican, or something else?
I really want some Mediterranean food.
What do you like about Obed in Sunnyvale it is highly rated? if you would prefer something else I have 2 options for you.
That sounds great. I need a lunch reservation on the 2nd of March 11:30 am.
Just to make sure youwould like a table for 2 people at Obed in Sunnyvale at 11:30 am on March 2nd.
Yes that is perfect.
Your table is booked.
Do they serve beer? Is it a AFFORADABLE?
They are priced moderate. They are a nonalcoholic restaurant.
I am looking to grab a Quick Meal somewhere.
What city should I search in?
San Francisco.
I found Golden Gate Indian Cuisine & Pizza in San Francisco.
What is their phone number? Do they serve liquor?
415-564-5514. They do serve alcohol!
Could you suggest anymore affordable restaurants?
I found 5 additional restaurants. How about Jackson Fillmore Trattoria in San Francisco?
That sounds good. I want to make a reservation for 1 Sunday this week at 7:30 in the evening.
Please confirm your reservation: Reservation for 1 person at Jackson Fillmore Trattoria in San Francisco on March 3rd at 7:30 pm.
Yes that works. What's the address?
Sorry I wasn't able to make the reservation. Is there anything else I can assist with?
Try booking again but next Monday.
Please confirm your reservation: Reservation for 1 person at Jackson Fillmore Trattoria in San Francisco on March 4th at 7:30 pm.
Yes. Do they serve liquor?
Your reservation was successful! They do not serve alcohol.
Hi there, are there any nice restaurants located in Berkeley? I am starving.
Any preference on the type of food you would like to eat?
Something on the lines of Ethiopian food is great.
I have found 4 restaurants, one of which is the Addis Restaurant which is located in Berkeley.
Sure, this sounds great. Could you make a reservation for 1 person at 1:30 pm there?
Please confirm your reservation for 1 person at Addis Restaurant in Berkeley at 1:30 pm on March 1st.
Sure, thank you!
Your reservation has been made.
I'd like to find a place to eat.
What type of food were you looking for?
Some German food sounds perfect.
In what city should I look in?
I'd like to find something in San Jose.
I found a nice restaurant Ludwig's German Table in San Jose.
What is the address of the place and do they have live music?
They are located at 261 North 2nd Street and they don't have live music.
Yes, that sounds good to me.
Would you like to book a table here?
Yes, I'd like to make a reservation for March 2nd at one pm.
Please confirm you're booking a table for 2 at Ludwig's German Table in San Jose on March 2nd at 1 pm.
Yes, that is correct. What is the phone number and price range of the restaurant?
Your reservation has been confirmed. Their phone number is 408-771-9871 and their price range is moderate.
I want to find a place to eat.
What city?
Fremont.
What kind of food?
Hunan Chinese food.
I found 1 restaurant called Hunan Cuisine in Fremont.
Yes, lets make a reservation.
What time?
12:00
Please confirm, reservation for 2 at Hunan Cuisine in Fremont on March 1st at 12 pm.
Yes. Do they serve alcohol? What is the phone number?
The reservation is complete. They do not serve alcohol. Their phone number is 510-687-1222.
I want to find a place where I can eat.
Is there a specific food you want to have? It can be Indian, American or something else. Which city do you want the restaurant to be located at?
I would enjoy having some Burmese kind of food. I want the restaurant to be in Daly City.
There is 1 restaurant which matches what you want. Taste Of Burma is a good restaurant, and it is located in Daly City.
That suits me well.
Do you want to book a table at this restaurant?
Yes, I want to have a table booked for 3 people at this restaurant, and I want the reservation to be for 7:30 pm.
Can you please confirm that you want to book a table for 3 people at Taste Of Burma in Daly City at 7:30 pm on March 1st?
That's what I want.
Your requested table has been booked.
Can you check if they have live music? I want to know their address.
The restaurant can be found at 2025 Gellert Boulevard #200. Unfortunately they do not have live music.
Where can I eat?
What kind of food do you want? You can say Sushi, Mexican, Italian or another kind of food. Which city shall check in?
Shabu-Shabu is great! Look in SF.
I found 2 restaurants for you. One is called Shabu Club and it's in San Francisco.
What else is there? I want something affordable.
I found 1 restaurant for you. Shabu House is also in San Francisco and meets your requirements.
Do they have live music? And do they serve booze?
They don't serve alcohol or have live music.
Okay, that still works. Make a reservation for three people this Saturday.
What time is it for?
Do it for 12:45.
Please confirm the following details: Booking a table for 3 at Shabu House in San Francisco, on March 2nd at 12:45 pm.
No, make it for four. Cindy is coming. I also want it for the 8th of March.
Please confirm the following details: A reservation for 4 people on March 8th.
I changed my mind again. Make it for 1:15 in the afternoon.
Please confirm the following: The reservation is for 1:15 pm and on March 8th.
Yes, that works. What's the address?
The address is 2608 Ocean Avenue. Sorry the reservation was unsuccessful. I will try again at Shabu House again if you like. Shall I try booking a table at 1:30 pm on March 8th for 4 people.
Yes, that will work.
Your reservation has been confirmed.
I need to find a restaurant please.
What type of food are you interested in? Would you like Mexican, Italian or something else?
I think I would like to go to the steakhouse.
In what city please?
I'd like something in SF.
There are 10 possible restaurants in San Francisco. How about 5a5 Steak Lounge?
Are they in the budget price range and do they serve alcohol?
No, their price range is expensive but they do serve alcohol.
I'd like to find something that's intermediate priced. What else do you have?
I have 3 options for you in San Francisco. Are you interested in going to the Daily Grill?
Yes, I'd like that.
Shall I make reservations for you?
Yes, please do.
For what time please?
Let's do it at quarter to 6 in the evening.
Confirming a 5:45 PM reservation for 2 on March 1st at the Daily Grill in San Francisco.
That's perfect, thank you. Do you know if they have live music there?
I apologize, but I could not make the reservation. Is there anything else I can do for you?
Let's try the reservation again but at 6 PM.
Confirming a reservation for 2 at the Daily Grill in San Francisco on March 1st at 6 PM.
Perfect, thank you. Do they play live music there?
I'm sorry, they don't have live music. The reservation is complete.
I have a guest here and we wish to dine out? Can you help me?
What taste will make you happy, American, Mexican or something like that?
I am looking for some Freshwater fish.
Are you particular with any city?
I am looking for some around San Fran.
In san Francisco, the best choice will be Akiko's Sushi Bar.
Ok, then ensure seats for me there.
At what time you need reservation?
Arrange it on 8th of this month at seven in the evening.
Ok, please confirm that you need 2 seats at Akiko's Sushi Bar at 7 pm on March 8th in San Francisco.
How is the rate there? It is very expensive. Can we enjoy music there?
It is expensive and has no live music. Your seats are booked.
I want something to eat in San Mateo which sells alcohol.
What kind of food do you like?
I want fish.
I found 4 restaurants for you. Joy Sushi is in San Mateo.
That's good.
Would you like a table?
Yes I would.
What time would you like it.
At 7 in the evening.
A table for 2 at Joy Sushi in San Mateo at 7 pm on March 1st. Is this right?
That's it. What's their price range?
Your reservation has been made. They have a moderate price range.
What's their number?
Their contact number is 650-340-8974.
I need a place to eat.
In which city and what kind of food?
In redwood city please. Pizza would be great.
I found 5 restaurants in Redwood City. How about Chantilly?
That's fine, please make a reservation.
What time would you like the reservation?
The evening 5.
Okay you want a table at Chantilly in Redwood City at 5 pm on March 1st for 2 people, correct?
Yes that is correct.
Your table is booked.
Hi there, could you help me search for a nice Tex-Mex restaurant in San Jose?
How about Chili's Grill & Bar which is located in San Jose?
May I know their address and the price range of their food?
They are moderate priced and are located at 2185 Eastridge Loop.
This is great for me. Could you help me make a reservation for three tomorrow at 6:15 in the evening?
Sure, please confirm your reservation for 3 at Chili's Grill & Bar in San Jose at 6:15 pm on March 2nd.
That is fine with me.
Sorry, I was not able to make your reservation at Chili's Grill & Bar. Would you prefer a reservation for 3 on March 2nd at 6 pm instead?
Sure, that is fine with me.
Your reservation has been made!
Thank you so much!
Could I further assist you with anything else?
My boss's birthday is coming up and I would like to find a place to take him to eat.
What location would you like me to search in and what type of cuisine are you looking for? You can say things like Chinese, Italian, or any other food category's.
Our office is in Hayward, so close to there and his favorite food is Sichuan.
There is a restaurant that matches that description called Chef's Experience China Bistro located in Hayward.
Can you tell me if they have live music for entertainment and I will also need their contact phone number.
Unfortunately the restaurant with the contact number 510-538-2868 does not have any kind of live music.
What other suggestions do you have?
There is also a place called Frannie's Restaurant that is also in Hayward.
What else do you have?
Hayward is also home to a restaurant called Green Tea House Chinese Restaurant.
That one sounds like something I would like.
Would you like me to set you up with a reservation?
Yes, please. That would be very helpful.
What time of day should I set the reservation at?
I intend to take him out on his birthday so March 10th at 12:30 pm.
Okay before I submit this I just want to verify it with you. You would like a table for 2 at Green Tea House Chinese Restaurant, located in Hayward, on March 10th, at 12:30 pm. Is that correct?
No, i'm sorry, I need it for March 5th.
Okay, I've changed that to a table at Green Tea House Chinese restaurant on March 5th.
Yes, that's right. Can I have their address for directions please?
I was successfully able to make that reservation for you at the restaurant located at 29615 Mission Boulevard.
I am looking for a restaurant.
What kind of cuisine would you like, Indian, Mexican or something else? And in what city?
I would like to find an Italian place in Los Gatos.
In Los Gatos, I would recommend Aldo's Ristorante & Bar.
What else is there that's average priced?
Also in Los Gatos, how about Campo Di Bocce of Los Gatos?
I like that one.
Shall I make reservations for you?
Yes, on the 5th of this month in the afternoon 12.
Confirming a table for 2 at 12 pm on March 5th at Campo Di Bocce Of Los Gatos in Los Gatos.
Great. What's their phone number and do you know if they serve alcohol?
The table has been booked. They don't serve alcohol and the phone number there is 408-395-7650.
I need help finding a restaurant.
Sure, what city do you want me to search and what type of food do you like? Mexican, Italian, or something different?
I'm looking for an asian fusion place somewhere in Fremont.
Alirhgt, how about the Asian Pearl Seafood Restaurant? It's a nice place in Fremont.
Do you know if they have live music? Where are they located?
They don't have live music and are located at 43635 Boscell Road.
I'll try that one.
Do you want me to make a reservation for you?
Yes, I need a reservation.
What time should I reserve a table for?
12:15 in the afternoon would be good.
Please confirm you would like to make a reservation for 2 people at Asian Pearl Seafood Restaurant in Fremont on March 1st at 12:15 pm.
Yes, please make the reservation. What is the price range of the place?
The restaurant has moderate prices. I unfortunately could not reserve that time. Should I try a 12 pm reservation for 2 people at Asian Pearl Seafood Restaurant on March 1st?
Yes, that time is ok.
Alright, your reservation has been made.
Can you find me a place to eat in SFO?
What type of food do you want? Something like Mexican, Indian, or anything else?
I'm feeling pasta.
How about 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano in San Francisco?
Any other suggestions?
A16 is nice and also in San Francisco.
That one works for me.
Do you need help with anything else?
Sure, I'd like to reserve a table there for 2 people on the 14th of this month at 19:45.
Please confirm: you want a table for 2 at A16 in San Francisco at 7:45 pm on March 14th.
Yes, that's great. What's the contact number?
They can be reached at 415-771-2216. I couldn't reserve your table. A16 has a table for 2 people open on March 14th at 7:30 pm. Do you want to book that instead?
Sure thing, that works.
Your reservation was successful.
I am searching for a place to eat at San Jose.
What type of food you are searching for?
I am looking for some Spicy Noodles type of food will be good for me.
I searched and found 10 restaurants. Erawan Thai Cuisine is a great restaurant at San Jose.
Please suggest some other restaurants with Halal type of food. I am searching for something not very costly priced.
Cafe Eden is a great restaurant at San Jose.
Whether they have live music? What is their phone number?
The contact number is 408-753-1139. Sorry, they don't have live music.
Can you please some other restaurant?
Sorry, I am unable to search any restaurant for you. Do you need any other help?
Could you please find again? I wish to have it in Fremont.
I searched and found 2 restaurants. Li Zhou Chinese Restaurant is a great restaurant at Fremont.
Yes. it is good for me.On Thursday next week, I wish to book it in the restaurant.
When will you want to reserve for?
Reserve it at quarter past 12 in the afternoon.
Kindly ensure that, on March 7th, reservation has been done for 2 persons at Li Zhou Chinese Restaurant at Fremont. It is at 12:15 pm.
Yes. It is good for me.
I am sorry that, I am unable to book a reservation. Li Zhou Chinese Restaurant is a great restaurant. Shall I book a reservation for 2 persons on March 7th at 12 pm?
Yes. it is good for me.
Your booking is done.
I would like for a place to eat in San Carlos.
What sort of food would you be looking for?
Ostrea kind of food would be best.
There is 1 restaurant available. Rustic House Oyster Bar And Grill - San Carlos is a pretty nice restaurant in San Carlos.
Is the price range moderate? Will they have live music?
The price range is moderate. They do not have any live music.
Yes, that is perfect. I would like to make a reservation at this restaurant.
At what time will you want the reservation to be?
Make it for the morning 11:30.
Please confirm these details: Book a table for 2 at Rustic House Oyster Bar and Grill - San Carlos located in San Carlos. It will be on March 1st at 11:30 am.
No, make it for 1 person and let it be at 7:30 pm.
Please confirm these details: Reservation for 1 person at 7:30 pm.
Yes, that works for me.
Your reservation is set.
What is the address and contact number?
Their address is at 920 El Camino Real. Their phone number is 650-394-4534.
I am interested in finding a place to eat. I would like something in the moderate price range.
What type of food are you looking to get? You can specify Italian, Chinese, or something else.
Some pizza and pasta type of food would be wonderful.
What is the city you want me to search in?
I would like you to look in Santa Rosa.
A good restaurant in Santa Rosa is one called Basilico.
Yes, that is fine with me.
Would you like to make a reservation for a table there?
Yes I would like to make a reservation.
What time do you want the reservation for?
Reserve it for six in the evening.
Okay, confirm these details: booking a table at Basilico in Santa Rosa at 6 pm. This reservation will be for 2 people on March 1st.
Yes that is fine with me. Is there live music there? Can I get their contact number?
Your reservation is successfully made, and their phone number is 707-539-0260. They don't have live music there.
Help me find a good place to eat
Any food specifications? American, chinese or something else?
I am in the mood for cambodian food.
Which city should I search for restaurants in?
Find some in Danville
I found 2 restaurants in Danville. Lotus Thai restaurant is a good place.
that sounds good. Book a table for one later today.
What time should I make the booking for?
I want one for morning 11:15
Okay, booking a table for 1 at lotus thai restaurant danville on march 1st at 11:15 am
Sounds good. It is a reasonably priced place?
I am sorry, I wasn't able to complete your booking. Is there anything else I can help you with?
Try booking it again. This time for two people on the 14th.
Booking a table for 2 at lotus thai restaurant danville on march 14th at 11:15 am.
Sounds perfect to me.
Sorry, I was unable to book it. Should I make the reservation for 2 people at lotus thai restaurant on march 14th for 11:30 am instead?
That would be fine with me.
Your reservation is successfully booked.
Do they also play live music?
No, unfortunately they don't have live music.
Thanks, that is okay.
Can I help you with something else?
I'm famished! Could you find me a place to eat?
Any particular city I should search in?
Please look for some place in Albany.
Did you have a particular type of cuisine in mind?
I'd really love to eat Punjabi food.
Aangan, a nice restaurant in Albany, is one of the 2 that I found.
What is the other restaurant option?
Everest Kitchen is also a nice restaurant in Albany.
Please find out how pricey they are, and whether the serve liquor.
Their prices are moderate and they serve liquor.
That sounds good. Please reserve me a table at the restaurant.
For what time should I make the reservation?
Book it for 1:45 in the afternoon.
Okay. Please confirm that you'd like to reserve a table for 2 at Everest Kitchen in Albany, for 1:45 pm on March 1st.
That is correct.
Unfortunately, I was unable to make the reservation you requested. However, Everest Kitchen, a nice restaurant, has a table for 2 on March 1st at 1:30 pm. Would you like that?
Yes, that will be okay.
I have successfully made your reservation.
You know what? I want to find a nice restaurant, with some good food and not just a show or expensive decor but where I can eat, love it and get a little alcohol. What do you have on tap for me?
What city and type of food do you want?
Let's find an afforadable place in San Carlos where I can feast on Greek food.
Does the Agora restaurant in San Carlos interest you?
Hmm, maybe. What else is on tap?
The Mythos restaurant in San Carlos has a nice rating.
Sounds like a winner. Please set up a reservation there for Monday next week.
What's the reservation time you want?
That afternoon 1:15 is the time I prefer.
I can set that up for you now. Do you want to confirm a table reservation at Mythos in San Carlos for 2 persons on March 4th at 1:15 pm?
Oh, sorry, I forgot. I won't be able to go there until 5:30 in the evening.
Okay. Do you want to confirm a table reservation at Mythos for 5:30 pm?
I sure do. Where is this restaurant and will they have live music?
Your table reservation is confirmed at the 1201 San Carlos Avenue address, and there appears to be no live music there.
I would like a place to eat in Santa Rosa. I like pizza.
I found 10 options. Basilico is nice and it is located in Santa Rosa.
Yes, that's great.
What time would you like the reservation?
In the morning 10:45.
Please confirm a reservation at Basilico in Santa Rosa for 2 people at 10:45 am on March 1st.
Yes, that's great.
Apologizes, I was unable to make the reservation. Can I do anything else for you?
Can you try again for 5:30 pm?
Yes, please confirm a reservation at Basilico in Santa Rosa for 2 people at 5:30 pm on March 1st.
Great, what is the address?
The reservation is completed. The address is 4776 Sonoma Highway.
I would like to find a restaurant please.
What type of cuisine are you looking for? For instance, Mexican or Indian or something else? And in what city please?
I'd like something in San Fran. How about Korean Barbeque?
All right, I have 10 choices for you. How about Aato in San Francisco?
What else is there please?
Barnzu is also in San Francisco and is a nice restaurant.
That should work.
Do you want to make a reservation?
Sure, I would like to.
At what time please?
How about in the evening 7:45?
Confirming a 7:45 pm reservation on March 1st at Barnzu in San Francisco for 2 people.
That sounds great. Do they play live music there?
I apologize, but I couldn't make the reservation. Is there anything else I can do for you?
Let's try the reservation again fat 1:30 pm please.
All right. Let me confirm that with you: a table for 2 at Barnzu in San Francisco on March 1st at 1:30 pm.
That's correct. Could you tell me their address? And I'm wondering if they play live music there.
No, they don't have live music. They are located at 711 Geary Street and the reservation is complete.
Hi, any places where I can dine at?
Any preference on the dining location?
I would prefer one in Belmont please.
How about the type of cuisine?
Some seafood will be perfect for me.
How about China Village Seafood Restaurant located in Belmont?
Sure, that is fine with me. Could you reserve a table for one on the 11th of March at 12:15 in the afternoon?
Sure, please confirm your reservation for 1 at China Village Seafood Restaurant in Belmont at 12:15 pm on March 11th.
Sure, this is great for me!
Unfortunately, I was not able to make your reservation at China Village Seafood Restaurant. How about a reservation for 1 at 12 pm on March 11th instead?
Yes, this is fine to me too.
Sure, your reservation has been made.
I need to plan something for me and my friends to do when we get together. Can you find a restaurant for me?
Sure, where at and what kind of food?
Somewhere in Concord with Tacos that serves alcohol would be great.
Canasta Kitchen is in Concord and seems pretty popular.
What else can you find? It's more important that it's not very costly, so maybe Diner food would be better.
I found one in Concord called Claim Jumper Restaurants. How about that?
Do they have live music? And where is it at?
They're at 1981 Diamond Boulevard and unfortunately don't have live music.
What else is there?
There's also one called Eureka! in Concord.
Oh, that sounds good. Can you put in a reservation for four people on the 9th of this month?
Sure, at what time?
You can make it for quarter past 6 in the evening. I just remembered my one friend can't make it, so change it to three people.
Ok. To confirm, you want to make a reservation for 3 at Eureka! in Concord on March 9th at 6:15 pm. Is that right?
Actually, I think I'm busy that day. Can you change that to March 14th?
Sure. To confirm, you want a reservation for 3 people on March 14th. Is that right?
Yes, that's perfect.
Sorry, I encountered an error and couldn't make the reservation. Do you want to try making a reservation at Eureka! for 3 people on March 14th at 6 pm?
Yes, that should still work.
Ok, this time the reservation was successful.
I'm trying to find somewhere to eat.
In what city?
I'm looking for someplace in San Jose.
What kind of food are you looking for? Would you like Indian, Italian or another type of cuisine?
I'd like to find something vegetarian in the Berkeley area.
How about Great Wall | Chinese Restaurant, which is in Berkeley?
Where are they located? And you know if they play live music?
I'm sorry, they don't have live music. The address is 6247 College Avenue.
That sounds good.
Shall I make a reservation for you?
Sure, why not?
For what time please?
I think eight in the night is best.
Confirming a reservation at Great Wall | Chinese Restaurant in Berkeley at 8 PM on March 1st for a party of 2.
Excellent, thank you. Could you give me the phone number?
I apologize, but I was unable to book a table for you. Would you like anything else today?
Let's try the reservation again but at 11:30 this time.
Confirming a reservation at 11:30 AM for 2 people on March 1st at Great Wall | Chinese restaurant in Berkeley.
Perfect, thanks. Do you know if they serve alcohol and could you tell me the telephone number?
I'm afraid they don't serve alcohol. The phone number of the restaurant is 510-658-8458 and your reservation is complete.
Give me some food ideas for dining out.
What food do you like best? Where should I search?
Novato is where I am. What about Asian Fusion.
Well, there are 2. What about Sushi Tri, It's in Novato?
What about booze?
Sorry no to alcohol.
What's their street number?
You'll find them at 333 Enfrente Road.
Fine do that then.
What time will you want the reservation?
Do it at quarter to 1 in the afternoon.
Here's what I heard: 2 people at 12:45 pm at Sushi Tri on March 1st in Novato?
You heard each minute detail.
I'm sorry that didn't work. What about making your reservation for 2 at sushi tri at 1 pm instead? Still for March 1st.
Great, try it.
Ding, Ding, Ding, you have a winner.
Find me a place that serves Barbecue in Petaluma.
Bistro 100 serves barbecue in Petaluma.
That is perfect. Make a reservation for me.
What time do you want to eat?
I want to eat at seven in the evening.
You want a table for 2 at Bistro 100 in Petaluma on March 1st at 7 pm. Is that right?
Yes, that is correct.
I can't make a reservation at that time. What about a reservation for 2 at Bistro 100 at 6:30 pm on March 1st?
That is good.
Your booking is complete.
Hey, I want to find a place to eat in San Francisco.
Sure thing! What kind of food do you want to eat ( Mexican, Indian, etc.)?
I'm in the mood for some pho.
Great! I recommend Anh Hong in San Francisco.
Is the restaurant affordable?
The price range is listed as moderate.
Do they serve liquor?
Yes, they do!
Great, that should work! I'd like to make a reservation for 2 for 17:30.
No problem! Can you confirm the following details, please? You're reserving a table for 2 at Anh Hong in San Francisco on March 1st at 5:30 pm.
Yes! What's their phone number?
Your reservation is successful! The restaurant phone number is 415-885-5180.
I am searching for a place to eat around windsor and i want Burger type of food.
I searched 4 restaurant. one of them is Charlies restaurant is a nice one which is located in Windsor.
Do you know any other restaurant?
There is one nice restaurant called Kc's American Kitchen which is located in windsor.
This is okay for me. I like to book a restaurant on the 7th at 17:30.
Please give confirmation details: Booking table for 2 people on march 7th at Kc's American Kitchen which is located in windsor at 5:30 pm.
Yes. perfect. Are they serving liquor?
They don't serve alcohol. Your booking has been done.
Is there a live music and can i know the address?
No, they do not have live music and the address is 9501 Duvander Lane.
I would like to eat Malaysian food
In which city?
I'd like in Burlingame
In Burlingame there's Coconut Bay Thai Restaurant
Ok, I like it! I want to book a table
At what time?
I prefer at 12:45 pm
A table for 2 people at Coconut Bay Thai Restaurant in Burlingame, on March 1st at 12:45 pm. Is it correct?
No, I prefer at 11:30 am, please
A table on March 1st at 11:30 am. Do you confirm?
No, the date is 2nd of March
A table at Coconut Bay Thai Restaurant on March 2nd: is it correct?
Yes, It's correct now
Your table is booked!
I want to find a restaurant that serves liquor which is average priced.
In what city please? And what type of food would you like?
I want a diner type of place in San Carlos please.
I found 3 options for you in San Carlos. Maybe you'd like to go to Piacere Restaurant.
That sounds nice. Let's make a reservation please.
What time would you like that for?
At seven in the evening and it should be for a party of 4.
Confirming a table for 4 at Piacere Restaurant in San Carlos on March 1st at 7 pm.
That will work.
The table has been booked.
Where is the restaurant located and is there live music there?
No, they don't have live music, I'm sorry. Their address is 727 Laurel Street.
I finally got my tax refund back and would like to take my wife to eat at a nice, costly restaurant in Los Gatos.
What type of cuisine would you like me to search for. You can say things like Indian, Mexican, or any other category of food preference you may have.
My wife and I really like fish.
The is only 1 restaurant I was able to locate that meets your requirements and it is called Steamer's Grillhouse located in Los Gatos.
That sounds nice, let's get a table there.
What time would you like the table reserved for?
A romantic dinner sounds good so let's do 8 in the night.
Okay, just let me know if this is right, you want a table for 2, at Steamer's Grillhouse, located in Los Gatos, on March 1st, at 8 pm. Did I get that right?
I will need their phone number in case we can't make it and can you tell me if they have live music for entertaining.
I'm terribly sorry but I can not make that reservation for you at this time. Can I help with something else?
Let's try booking the table at the same place but a different time, say 6:30 pm.
Okay, I've change the details to a reservation for 2 at Steamer's Grillhouse, located in Los Gatos, on March 1st, at 6:30 pm. Is that right?
Yes, hopefully they have an opening then.
I was able to confirm that reservation for you.
Can you find me a place to eat please?
What type of food?
Some Chinese would be great.
Which city would you like me to look in?
In San Francisco please.
Alice's in San Francisco is nice.
Do they serve liquor? Do they have a very fancy price range?
The range is inexpensive and they do not serve alcohol.
What else can you find?
Bamboo Restaurant in San Francisco is nice.
That sounds good.
Would you like to reserve a table?
Yes please book a table.
What time would you like your reservation?
Make the reservation at 4:30 in the evening.
You want a table for 2 at Bamboo Restaurant in San Francisco on March 1st at 4:30 pm, correct?
Yes that is correct.
I was unable to reserve the table. Can I do anything else for you.
Try booking it at 5:30 pm.
You want a table for 2 at Bamboo Restaurant in San Francisco on March 1st at 5:30 pm, correct?
Yes that is correct.
Your table is reserved. The address is 1441 Polk Street.
I'm looking for a place to eat some Dumplings kind of food.
In which city would you like to eat?
I'd like in SF
In San Francisco there's Alice's
Could you propose another restaurant?
In San Francisco I propose Bamboo Restaurant
Ok, It's fine for me
Want to book a table here?
Yes, please, I want to book a table
What time do you want to book?
A table for 2 people on the 2nd at afternoon 1
A reservation for 2 people at Bamboo Restaurant in San Francisco, on March 2nd at 1 pm. Is it correct?
Yes, it's correct. Does the restaurant serve liquor?
Yes, the restaurant serve alcohol. Your table is booked!
What the restaurant's address?
It's 1441 Polk Street
I'm looking for a restaurant. It needs to have live music
Sure. Any preference for the type of food?
How about some tacos?
In what city
I'll go in Brentwood
La Fuente Mexican Bar Restaraunt looks good. They're in Brentwood
Yes that sounds nice
Would you like to book a table?
Yes please
For what time?
I'll go at 10:45
Please confirm: a reservation for 2 at La Fuente Mexican Bar Restaraunt in Brentwood at 10:45 am on March 1st
Yes that's fine. Can I get the address? Is it an expensive restaurant?
Sorry, I wasn't able to reserve that. Anything else I can do?
Try again but make it a 7 pm reservation instead
Please confirm: a reservation for 2 at La Fuente Mexican Bar Restaraunt in Brentwood at 7 pm on March 1st
Yes that's fine
Your reservation is successful
Hello, I am hungry. Could you help me find a place which serves nice fodo?
Any preference on the type of food and the area of the restaurant?
I would prefer some Greek food in Oakland, thanks.
There is 1 restaurant called Ikaros Greek Restaurant which is located in Oakland.
Sure, this works for me.
Would you want me to make a reservation for you?
Sure, could you make one at 17:30 please?
Please confirm your reservation for 2 people at Ikaros Greek Restaurant in Oakland at 5:30 pm on March 1st.
That is fine with me! Is this a restaurant with a budget price range?
Your reservation has been made. Their food is moderate priced.
Can you find me a good restaurant in Santa Clara?
Do you have a specific cuisine in mind?
I want to have some American food.
Of the 4 restaurants that match your preferences, Bennigan's is a nice restaurant in Santa Clara.
What are my other options?
Want to try Birk's in Santa Clara? It is a good restaurant.
Can you find some restaurants in Pleasant Hill?
There is 1 restaurant called Black Angus Steakhouse in Pleasant Hill.
Do they serve alcohol? Can you get me their contact number?
Yes, they do serve alcohol and their phone number is 925-938-9900.
That sounds good. I'd like to reserve a table there.
By what time are you planning to get there?
I'll be there by morning 10:45.
Reserving a table for 2 at Black Angus Steakhouse in Pleasant Hill at 10:45 am on March 1st. Please confirm.
Please go ahead. How expensive is the place?
The restaurant is classified in the moderate price range. Sorry, the table could not reserved. Shall I try to reserve a table for 2 at Black Angus Steakhouse at 11 am on March 1st?
That works for me. Give it a try.
Your table has been reserved successfully.
I am searching for a place to eat.
In which city shall I search?
I want to be in San Fran.
What type of food do you need? It may be like Mexican, American or anything else.
I like some Take-out type of food.
I searched and found 7 restaurants. Golden Gate Indian Cuisine & Pizza is a wonderful restaurant at San Francisco.
What is their phone number? Whether they have live music?
Their contact number is 415-564-5514. Sorry, they are not having live music.
Yes. it is good for me.
Shall I book a table here?
Yes. I want to book a reservation on 12th of March.
Which is your most preferred time?
Reserve it at 12:30 in the afternoon.
Kindly ensure that, on March 12th, the reservation for 2 persons is done at Golden Gate Indian Cuisine & Pizza is a wonderful restaurant at San Francisco. The time is 12:30 pm.
yes. it is good for me. What is their price? Whether they serve liquor?
Your booking is done. The price is moderate. Yes. they are serving alcohol.
Can you help me find a place to eat?
Sure, in which city?
Look in Millbrae for some restaurant serving Noodles.
In Millbrae I can recommend Asian Pearl.
Is there anything else available?
In Millbrae you could also go to Chef Wang's Restaurant.
Sounds good. Let's make a reservation.
For what time.
19:00 would be perfect.
Can you please confirm that you want me to place a reservation for 2 at Chef Wang's Restaurant in Millbrae for 7 pm on March 1st.
Yes, that's correct.
Unfortunately I wasn't able to place your reservation at Chef Wang's Restaurant. I can try to book a table for 2 on March 1st at 6:30 pm.
OK, please do.
I've successfully placed your reservation.
I'd like to find a place to eat.
What kind of food would you like to eat? For example you can say Italian or Indian. Which city would you like to eat in?
I'd like to find Sushi in SFO.
There is a nice place called 2g Japanese Brasserie in San Francisco.
Do you have any other suggestions?
How about Ace Wasabi Rock-n-roll Sushi in San Francisco.
That sounds nice.
Would you like to make a reservation?
Yes please. I'd like a table at 12:30.
Okay so you would like a table for 2 at Ace Wasabi Rock-n-roll Sushi in San Francisco on March 1st at 12:30 pm.
That's correct. What is their telephone number?
Your reservation has been made successfully. Their phone number is 415-567-4903.
I need a restaurant.
In which city? Are you looking for Italian, American or some other type of food?
I'm looking for a steakhouse in Pacifica.
Vallemar Station is 1 restaurant in Pacifica.
Yes. Sounds yummy.
Do you want me to reserve?
Yes. Please book a table for 4 at seven in the evening on the 5th of March.
Please confirm you want me to book a table for 4 at the Vallemar Station in Pacifica on March 5th at 7 pm.
Actually, the reservation is for three people at 5:45 in the evening.
Please confirm you want me to reserve for 3 people at 5:45 pm.
Yes. That is correct.
Your reservation was not successful. Would you like me to make a reservation at Vallemar Station on March 5th at 6 pm for 3 people.
Yes. That is correct.
Your reservation was a success.
Help me find a low-cost place to eat.
Which city are you looking for?
One in SF would do
Any food preferences? American, mexican or something else?
I really like ethiopian food.
I found 1. How about cafe ethiopia in san francisco?
Do they serve alcohol? what is their number?
They don't serve alcohol. Their number is 415-285-2728
That sounds perfect.
Should I reserve your table?
Yes, book a table for one.
What time should I schedule it?
Book one for 1:30 in the afternoon
Booking a table for 1 at cafe ethiopia san francisco on march 1st 1:30 pm
Actually shift it to the 5th for 3 people.
Booking a table for 3 on march 5th
That would be perfect
Your booking is confirmed.
Does it have live music? What's its address?
They don't have live music and are based out of san francisco
I'd like to find a place to eat.
In which city would you like to dine?
I'd like it in San Fran, please.
What type of food? I can find you Mexican, Italian, or something else.
I'd like some Moroccan food please.
I found El Mansour in San Francisco.
Any other suggestions? I'm looking for something reasonably priced.
Khamsa is also located in San Francisco.
That sounds great to me.
Do you want me to reserve a table for you?
Yes, please make a reservation.
At what time?
2 pm would be great.
Please confirm: a 2 pm reservation for 2 people on March 1st at Khamsa in San Francisco.
Yes, that's perfect.
Sorry, I can't make that reservation. Can I help you with something else?
Let's try booking it again, at 1:30 pm instead.
Please confirm: a 1:30 pm reservation for 2 people on March 1st at Khamsa in San Francisco.
Yes, that's great.
Your reservation is confirmed.
I have a plan to eat out side for which I need to search for some place which should be reasonably priced. Can you search it in Santa Rosa.
Do you have any desired category of food that you have in your mind like American, Chinese or anything else?
Yes, I like Cambodian food and search for place with this type of food.
Found 1 result which is Kettles Vietnamese Bistro in Santa Rosa. Hope this is very much liked by you as it was the best one.
Yes, I like it.
Do you want me to book table there?
Yes, I need to book it for 3 persons on the 5th at 1:30 in the afternoon.
Please confirm to book a table for 3 in the hotel Kettles Vietnamese Bistro in Santa Rosa on March 5th at 1:30 pm.
That is confirmed to proceed and check whether they will supply liquor there?
No, they do not supply liquor and your reservation was successfully made.
Find an afforadable restaurant.
Which city and cuisine?
Greek in Oakland.
Ikaros Greek Restaurant is in Oakland.
Do they serve alcohol? Where are they?
No alcohol. The address is 3268 Grand Avenue.
Ok that works.
Do you want to book a table?
Yes, for one on the 5th of this month at 6 in the evening.
Please confirm: table for 1 at Ikaros Greek Restaurant in Oakland on March 5th at 6 pm.
Ok.
Your table is booked.
I'm new to town and would like to find a good place to get some food.
What area would you like me to search in and what type of cuisine are you looking for?
I would like some Persian food somewhere between my work and home in South San Francisco.
Ali Baba is one of 2 restaurants that I found located in South San Francisco.
I will need their phone number and do you know if they play live music or any kind of entertainment?
The establishment with phone number 650-871-2221 does not have live music, sorry.
That's find, I prefer the quiet.
I can help you book a table there if you like.
Thank you, that would be great!
Can I have the time you would like me to reserve the table for?
Just myself, 1 person on the 3rd at 18:00.
Let's make sure I have this right before I proceed. You would like a table for 1 at Ali Baba, located in South San Francisco, on March 3rd, at 6 pm. Does that all sound correct to you?
Yes, those are all the details.
Your reservation is all set and ready to go.
I need to grab some chow somewhere.
Mexican? Italian? What's your pick?
Maybe Diner. As in food. Not Micky Rourke.
Ok. A Diner where?
Find one in Lafayette.
I got 5 Lafayette. Try American Kitchen.
What else is there?
In Lafayette? Duck Club Restaurant.
I need to get drunk and listen to a good band. Is this the place for that.
Maybe. They serve alcohol but no live music.
Let see what else you have.
In Lafayette, I have Metro Lafayette.
Bingo. Book it.
For what time?
Eleven in the morning.
A table for 2 at Metro Lafayette in Lafayette at 11 am on March 1st. Correct?
That is correct.
You have a table.
Is this going to dent my wallet? Where is this place?
They are at 3524 Mount Diablo Boulevard. It is moderate priced.
Can you find a restaurant for me?
Sure, in which city.
In SF, please.
What kind of cuisine do you prefer?
I'd go for some Brunch.
There are 10 restaurants meeting your criteria. How about 1300 On Fillmore in San Francisco?
That sounds great.
Do you want me to place a reservation for you?
Yes, please do.
For when do you want your reservation?
Afternoon 12:45, please.
Can you please confirm that you want me to book a table for 2 at 1300 On Fillmore in San Francisco on March 1st at 12:45 pm.
Yes, that's correct.
Unfortunately I wasn't able to book your table at 1300 On Fillmore as requested. Are you OK with a table for 2 on March 1st at 1 pm?
Yes, that could work.
I've successfully placed your reservation.
Can you find me a nice restaurant that serves American food?
In which city?
I prefer San Fran
1760 is a well rated restaurant located in San Francisco
Yes sounds great. Please make a reservation for two people, on 12th of this month at quarter to 1 in the afternoon.
To confirm: You wish to make a reservation for 2 people, at 12:45 pm on March 12th at 1760 in San Francisco. Correct?
Yes sounds great
Sorry that time is not available. Shall I try a reservation for 2 people on March 12th at 12:30 pm at 1760 ?
Yes please do
Reservation is confirmed.
Can you give me their address? Do they by chance have live music?
They do not have live music. 1760 is located at 1760 Polk Street.
Can you help me find an intermediate priced place to eat?
Any food specifications? Chinese, American or something else?
I love brazilian food actually
Which city should I search for it?
I want something in San Francisco.
Minas Brazilian is a great place in San Francisco.
Do you have something else?
No, I couldn't find anything else that matches your preferences. Can I help you with something else?
How about some lobster at a place that serves alcohol?
Sure, betty lou's seafood & grill is a great place in San Francisco.
Cool, make me a reservation there.
What time should I book the slot for?
Something around 19:30.
Booking a table for 2 at betty lou's seafood & grill in San Francisco on March 1st at 7:30 pm
That sounds perfect.
Your booking is done.
Find me a place to eat.
What sort of food are you in the mood for? Say something like Mexican, Italian or something else. What city do you want me to look in?
Spicy Indian food is yummy. Look in Mountain View.
Chaat Paradise is a nice restaurant that is in Mountain View.
Would you suggest something else?
Dosa Paratha Indian Cuisine is a nice restaurant in Mountain View.
Is anything else available? Search in Newark.
I have 4 restaurants. Biryani Pot is a good restaurant in Newark.
Is liquor served there?
Alcohol is not served.
Could you tell me their contact number?
Their contact number is 510-745-9870.
That sounds good to me. Could I make a reservation at a restauranat for one on the 9th of March? Have it be at 18:15.
Okay, confirm that you want to book a table at Biryani Pot in Newark at 6:15 pm for 1. This will be on March 9th.
No, make it March 13th.
Please confirm that you want to make a reservation on March 13th for 1 person.
No, it should be for two at 19:45.
Okay, please confirm your booking for 7:45 pm for 2 people.
That sounds good to me.
Sorry but I could not make a reservation. Biryani Pot is a good restaurant. Do you want to make a reservation for 2 people on March 13th at 7:30 pm?
That works fine for me.
Your reservation has been made.
I am in a nice mood and I want to eat something out side for which I need your help to fine some nice place.
Do your have any preferred City to search for the restaurant and also let me know your interested category of food like Indian, American or anything else?
I love Seafood and I like to have the similar one and please search it in Pittsburg.
Found 1 result for the sea food restaurant that is Red Lobster in Pittsburg. How about that?
Yes, that is the one I am looking for.
Do you want me to book the table there now?
Yes, I need to reserve a table in that Restaurant.
Let me know which is your convenient time to book for the table in that Seafood restaurant.
I want to book it at Morning 11:45.
Please confirm to book a table for 2 at Red Lobster restaurant in Pittsburg on March 1st at 11:45 am.
That is confirmed to proceed.
Sorry, I could not book the table in Red Lobster restaurant at that time. Shall I book it for another time that is 12 pm on the same day on March 1st for 2 persons?
Yes, that is also okay for me.
I have reserved the table as per your requirement.
I'm looking for a quick bite.
What type of food, exactly? Mexican, Indian, something else?
I'd love to have some to-go food.
In what city should I search?
I'll be in SF.
I found 7 to-go restaurants in San Francisco. There's Golden Gate Indian Cuisine & Pizza, for one.
That one sounds good.
Want to book a table?
Sure. I'll book a table.
At what time?
At half past 1 in the afternoon?
Okay. You want a table for 2 at Golden Gate Indian Cuisine & Pizza in San Francisco for 1:30 pm on March 1st?
Indeed. Do they serve alcohol? What's the typical cost?
I booked the table. Have a great time there! Their cost is moderate, and they do serve alcohol.
I will be meeting with some friends to eat, where do you recommend to go?
What type of cuisine are you looking for? Chinese, Indian, or which one?
We are big fans of Cantonese food. Is there anything like that?
Where do you want to look for?
Find something in Santa Clara.
There are 5 possible restaurants you might like. How about Chef Ming's in Santa Clara?
Sure, lets go with that one. I want to book a table for three people. Make it for the 12th of this month at 5 pm.
Please confirm: Booking a table for 3 people on March 12th at 5 pm at Chef Ming's in Santa Clara.
That sounds great.
The reservation has been booked.
Hi, could you help me search for a place to eat which serves burger and alcohol?
Sure, any preference on the restaurant location?
I would like Japanese food located in Pleasanton please.
How about Meiko Sushi in Pleasanton?
Are there any economical priced alternatives?
Would you like to eat at P.f. Chang's restaurant in Pleasanton?
May I have their address please? Also, do they play live music at their venue?
You can visit them at 1330 Stoneridge Mall Road, and unfortunately, they do not play live music.
Sure, this is fine with me.
Do you require further assistance?
Sure, could you make a reservation on 13th of this month please?
May I know what time would you like to dine in at?
Could you make a reservation at afternoon 1:45 please?
Sure, please confirm your reservation for 2 people at P.F. Chang's at Pleasanton at 1:45 pm on March 13th.
Sure, may I have their contact number please?
You can contact them 925-224-9916. Unfortunately, I am not able to make a reservation for you. Would you like a reservation for 2 people at P.F. Chang's at Pleasanton at 1:30 pm on March 13th instead?
Sure, this is fine for me as well.
Your reservation has been made.
I would like to find a restaurant?
In which city should I search?
I would like to find a restaurant in south San Francisco.
What kind of food are you looking for?
I would like some Filipino kind of food.
There are 5 restaurants. There is Fort Mckinley Restaurant, Bar & Banquet located in south San Francisco.
Yes, can you make a reservation for three people at 12:30 on the 6th of March?
Booking a table for 3 at Fort McKinley Restaurant, Bar & Banquet on March 6th at 12:30 pm in South San Francisco.
Yes, that is perfect. Do they have live music?
Your reservation was made and yes, they have live music.
What is their phone number and address?
Their phone number is 650-871-2222 and they are located at 101 Brentwood Drive.
I want to spoil myself. Please find a costly restaurant that sells Italian food please.
Where do you want to look for?
Find something in Fremont.
There is a restaurant in Fremont called Massimo's.
Sure, that sounds good. Make a reservation for the 14th of March.
At what time?
Make it for the morning 11 for 1 person.
Please confirm: Booking a table for 1 person on March 14th at 11 am at Massimo's in Fremont.
That is correct. Do they serve liquor? And how can I contact the restaurant?
The reservation has been done. Their phone number is 510-792-2000 and they so not serve alcohol.
Could you assist me in finding a place to eat in Redwood City?
Sure, what food are you looking for?
I would like something on the lines of Izakaya please.
There are 2 restaurants, one of which is Sakura 2 Teppanyaki And Sushi in Redwood City.
Sure, this is fine with me.
Would you like me to make a reservation for you?
Sure, please do so, thanks!
When will you intend to dine there?
I will be dining there at 19:00.
Please confirm your reservation for 2 at March 1st on 7 pm at Sakura 2 Teppanyaki And Sushi at Redwood City.
Sure, do you know if they play live music.
Your reservation has been made, and unfortunately they do not play live music.
I need a place to grab a bite to eat.
Where? And what kind of food.
Look for Japanese in Pacifica.
I would recommend 8 sushi in Pacifica.
That sounds like a winner.
Should I book a table?
Yes. A table for 1 on March 13th.
For what time?
Seven in the evening.
A table for 1 at 8 sushi in Pacifica at 7 pm on March 13th?
That sounds right.
You are booked.
find me some good place to eat and that should not very costly priced?
in which city i should search for?what kind of food do you like whether indian, american or any other thing?
i need in san jose and i like noodles kind of food.
There is a nice restaurant name Chef Li located in San jose.
Will you find any other restaurant?
How about china delight which is a nice restaurant located in san jose?
ok that works for me.
Whether i need to reserve a table over there?
Ok will you make a reservation for 1 people and make it at evening 7 ?
please check and review the following details. Book a table at china delight in city san jose and the reservation is at 7 pm for 1 people on date March 1st.
Ok that works for me. Do they serve liquor and they have live music?
reservation is successful. they do not serve alcohol and they do not have live music.
I want to eat somewhere! I want Barbecue!
In what city?
In SF.
I found 10 restaurants that you may like. One is called 1760 in San Francisco.
Do they have alcohol?
Yes, they serve alcohol!
What is the address?
1760 Polk Street.
Yes, make a reservation there.
What time do want it?
At afternoon 12:45.
Please confirm the following details: Booking a table for 2 at 1760 in San Francisco for March 1st at 12:45 pm.
No, make it for next Monday at 10:45 am.
Please confirm the following details: The reservation is for March 4th at 10:45 am.
No for 4 people.
Please confirm the following: the reservation is for 4 people on March 4th.
Yes, are the prices very fancy?
Their prices are expensive. Sorry the reservation was unsuccessful. Shall I try again at 1760? This time it be at 11 am for 4 people on March 4th.
Yes, that works well.
Your reservation was successful!
I am really hungry and I enjoy expensive food. I could really use some Gastropub food.
What city are you looking at?
Check for something in SF.
In San Francisco I can recommend the Sessions At The Presidio restaurant.
Give me some other restaurant.
Would you like The Dorian restaurant in San Francisco?
Find out if they have live music and if they offer liquor?
They won't have live music but they do have alcohol.
That is fine. Book me a table at that restaurant.
What time should I make the booking for?
I will be there at 18:15.
So you want a table for 2 at The Dorian in San Francisco. You will be there at 6:15 pm on March 1st. Is that right?
Perfect. Give me their phone number.
Their contact number will be 415-814-2671. I failed to book you a table, sorry! Would you like me to reserve a table for 2 at The Dorian restaurant on March 1st at 6 pm instead?
That will also work.
I have made your reservation.
Give me the location address.
It is on the 2001 Chestnut Street.
Can you please help me to find a good restaurant?
What cuisine do you prefer? American, Chinese or something else?
Anything is fine as long as it is Non meat food.
In which city are you planning to dine?
Find me a restaurant in Pleasant Hill that has live music.
El Morocco is a nice restaurant in Pleasant Hill, which has live music and vegetarian options.
That sounds like a plan!
Shall I reserve a table for you there?
Yes, please get me a table for two on the 7th of this month.
When do you plan to arrive at the restaurant?
I;ll be there at six pm.
Reserving a table for 2 at El Morocco in Pleasant Hill at 6 pm on March 7th; shall I proceed?
Yes, please go ahead.
Your table has been reserved successfully. Enjoy the food and ambiance!
I want to find a place where I can enjoy eating something.
Is there a specific kind of food you would enjoy? It can be Italian, American, or something else. Is there a particular city where you want me to look for the restaurant?
I would be fine with having some Taiwanese food. Though keep in mind that the restaurant should serve alcohol and be located in SFO.
There are 10 restaurants which match what you want. A good restaurant in San Francisco is Bamboo Restaurant.
Can you give me their phone number? Can you tell me if the price range of the restaurant is considered as costly?
The price range of the restaurant is considered as inexpensive. The phone number you can use to call them is 415-775-3679.
Is there some other restaurant you can suggest? The restaurant I am looking for should be afforadable priced.
Another good restaurant which I can suggest is Chili House Sf in San Francisco.
That would suit me well.
Do you want to make a reservation for a table at this restaurant?
Yes I want to book a table at this restaurant.
Can you tell me the time for when you want the reservation be made for?
I want for the reservation to be for seven in the evening.
Can you please confirm that you want to book a table for 2 people at Chili House Sf in San Francisco at 7 pm on March 1st?
That's not right, because I want the reservation to be for Saturday this week.
Can you please once again confirm that you want to have a table booked at Chili House Sf for March 2nd?
That suits me well. Can you give me their phone number?
Your request for a booked table at the restaurant has been made. If you want to call them you can at 415-387-2658.
Hello! I'm looking to have my dinner in a good Taiwanese restaurant. Do you have any suggestions?
Where is your location?
I'm looking in Hayward.
Okay! I can find 7 restaurants suitable to you. The best one in Hayward is Chef's Experience China Bistro, that provides the standards of Chinese cuisine, including dim sum items, served in a spacious dining room. Do you wish to dine here?
Is there any other restaurant which is average priced?
Yup, there is a Sprawling Japanese restaurant, named Hinata Sushi Buffet, with an outdoor deck featuring all-you-can-eat sushi & other seafood. The restaurant is at Hayward. Do you wish to dine here?
Do they have phone number? Where is their exact location?
They are located at 1071 B Street and you can reach them at 510-881-8868.
Yup! Sounds great to me.
So, would you like to reserve a table for your dinner, here?
Yup! I wish to reserve a table here.
At what time you wish to go for your dinner?
Please can you make it at 7:45 in the evening?
Sure! Please confirm me that you wish to book a table at Hinata Sushi Buffet, in Hayward at 7:45 pm on March 1st for 2 people, right?
Yup, you're correct.
Sorry I couldn't reserve the booking for 7 pm. Can I make the reseravation at 7:30 pm on March 1st for 2 people at the hotel Hinata Sushi Buffet? Will that be okay for you?
Yup, please go ahead.
Okay! I've made your reservation successfully.
I wish to know whether they serve liquor?
Nope, they do not serve alcohol
I'm meeting some friends for dinner. Where should we go eat?
What city is convenient for you?
We'll be in Los Gatos?
Would you prefer, Indian, Italian, or something else?
I want some kind of Lobster dish.
I found 3 options in the Los Gatos area. The first is Billy's Boston Chowder House.
Can we get drinks there, too? Where are they located?
They have a full bar and they are located at 29 East Main Street.
That sounds awesome!
Would you like to make a reservation?
Yes, but I guess it is just me after all, so for one person. Make it for the 11th of March at evening 7:30. (evening 7:30 is a not a natural statement).
You want a table for 1 at Billy's Boston Chowder House in Los Gatos for 7:30 PM on March 11th. Is this correct?
Yes. is this a fancy restaurant, based on price?
The price range of this restauarant is moderate. Your reservation is confirmed.
I am looking for an Asian restaurant in Santa Rosa.
Best of Burma is one of 3 options in Santa Rosa.
Okay. Sounds great.
Do you want me to reserve a table?
Yes. Please book a table.
For what time?
Half past 1 in the afternoon works for me.
Please confirm you want me to book a table for 2 at Best of Burma in Santa Rosa on March 1st at 1:30 pm.
Yes. That is correct.
Your booking was a success.
Can you find me a good restaurant?
In which city are you planning to dine and what cuisine do you prefer?
Find me some Spanish food in or around Union City.
There is 1 restaurant called Pinoy Handaan in Union City.
Is alcohol served there?
Yes, they do serve alcohol.
Do they have live music? Can you get me their address?
Sorry, they do not have live music. Their address is 31014 Union City Boulevard.
Thank you. That sounds good.
Shall I reserve a table for you there?
Yes, please. Get me a table.
At what time do you plan to arrive at the restaurant?
I'll be there by 7:30 in the evening on the 1st of March.
Please confirm that you want a table for 2 at the Pinoy Handaan restaurant in Union City at 7:30 pm on March 1st.
That sounds perfect. Can I have their contact number please?
Your table has been reserved successfully. Their phone number is 650-580-5111.
I want to eat out in San Jose, preferable at somewhere not very costly.
Would you like italian or indian food? Or maybe something else?
I want to try some latin american food.
Chacho's is a lovely restaurant in San Jose.
What number can I get them at and what is their location?
The number is 408-293-4321 and the location is 87 east san fernando street.
Can you recommend somewhere else.
How about Chevys Fresh mex in San Jose?
That would be fine. Make me a reservation.
For what time?
5 o"clock in the evening.
You would like a table for 2 at Chevys fresh mex in San jose for 5 pm on March 1st?
That would be fine. Is alcohol served?
No, it is not. I have made the reservation.
What is the address?
It is on 5305 almaden expressway.
I am tired of this house. I want to go out to eat.
In which city?
In half moon bay.
What kind of cuisine?
I am in the mood for indian food.
There is a lovely restaurant in half moon bay called india beach.
That would be great. I want to eat there.
At what time?
Book it for 18:30
You would like a table for 2 at india beach in half moon bay for 6:30 pm on March 1st.
Yes, that would be fine.
I have made the reservation.
Is there live music.
Yes, there is.
I'm hungry. Can you find somewhere I can eat?
What kind of food? Mexican, Italian? In which city?
Breakfast in Pleasanton would be great, please.
I found 1 restaurant. Beer Baron Bar & Kitchen in Pleasanton.
So they serve alcohol? What's their address?
They do. They're located at 336 Saint Mary Street.
That works. Please set a reservation for me.
In what time?
At 10:30 am please.
So a table for 2 at the Beer Baron Bar & Kitchen in Pleasanton on March 1st at 10:30 am?
Actually, make it at evening 5:30.
So a table at the restaurant in Pleasanton on 5:30 pm?
Yes, that's it.
Your reservation was successful.
I am feeling hungry, so I want to find a restaurant to eat in San Carlos.
Is there some specific kind of food you want to have at the restaurant?
I would enjoy the Brunch kind of food.
There is 1 restaurant which matches what you want. I can suggest West Park Bistro which is a good restaurant in San Carlos.
I like this restaurant, and I would like to make a reservation for two people on Wednesday next week at half past 5 in the evening.
Can you please confirm that you want to book a table for 2 people at West Park Bistro restaurant in San Carlos on March 6th at 5:30 pm.
That suits me well. Can you check if they have live music, and also tell me how pricey are they?
Your table has been booked. The price range of the restaurant is considered as moderate. Unfortunately they do not have live music there.
I appreciate it very much.
Is there something else you want me to help you with?
I am looking for an average priced restaurant in SF please.
Would you like Mexican, Italian, or something else?
Taiwanese would be great!
Beijing Restaurant is in San Francisco.
That would be great.
Would you like a reservation?
Yes please, for 3 people on March 8th at 12:30 pm.
Okay you want to book a table at Beijing restaurant on March 8th at 12:30 pm for 3 people in San Francisco, correct?
Yes, do they have live music? Can you get me their number?
Your reservation has been made. The number is 415-333-8182. They do not have music.
Can you help me find somewhere to eat that is not very costly?
Where should I look?
I want to go somewhere in Walnut Creek.
What kind of food sounds good?
I'd like to eat a burrito or something.
I found 3 places you might like. How about Fuego Tequila Grill in Walnut Creek?
Could you suggest something else, perhaps in SF?
I found 10 restaurants that match your search. How about Arguello in San Francisco?
Yeah that sounds good. I'd like to make a reservation there.
What time would you like the reservation?
Let's make it for afternoon 1:30.
Okay, so you would like a reservation for 2 people at Arguello in San Francisco for 1:30 pm on March 1st. Is that correct?
Yeah that sounds good.
I'm sorry but I was unable to make a reservation for that time. Can I help you with something else?
I'd like to try making a reservation again, but try it for evening 7.
So you'd like a reservation for 2 people a Arguello in San Francisco for 7 pm on March 1st, is that correct?
Yeah that's good. What is their phone number?
I was able to make your reservation. You can reach them at 415-561-3650.
Find me a place to eat.
Do you want Mexican, Indian or another type of food and what city do you want to eat in?
Find me some Brasserie in SF.
Belga serves Brasserie in San Francisco.
What is their price range?
Their prices are moderate.
What else do you have?
Marlowe is a restaurant in San Francisco.
That is great.
Shall I make reservations for you?
Yes, book me a table.
What time do you want to eat?
I want to eat at half past 7 in the evening.
You want a reservation for 2 at Marlowe in San Francisco on March 1st at 7:30 pm. Is that right?
Yes, that is right.
Your table is booked.
Are they pricey?
Their prices are expensive.
Is there live entertainment?
No, there is no live entertainment.
I want to find a burger joint.
In which city?
In Mountain View.
Eureka! restaurant is in Mountain View.
Are there any others?
Michaels at Shoreline is also in Mountain View.
Is liquor served there? What's their address?
Alcohol is served there. Their address is 2960 North Shoreline Boulevard.
Are there any other restaurants in the moderate price range?
Paul Martin's America Mountain View is in Mountain View.
That one sound good.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
I would like to book a table for the day after tomorrow.
For what time?
I need it for three at 6 in the evening.
Please confirm you want me to book a table for 3 on March 3rd at Paul Martin's America Mountain View in Mountain View at 6 pm.
Sounds great. Can I get their address?
Their address is 545 San Antonio Road Suite 31. Your reservation was a success.
Find me a reasonably priced place to eat.
What city do I need to look in? What sort of food are you looking for? Say something like Mexican, Indian or something else.
I would like a restaurant in Daly City. Pizza and Pasta would be excellent.
Papa Ray's Pizza is a good restaurant in Daly City.
Is live music available?
There is no live music.
Is liquor served?
No liquor is served.
That sounds good to me.
Do you want a table here?
Yes, make me a reservation.
What time would the reservation be for?
Make it for March 13th at evening 6:30.
Okay, confirm that you want to book a table at Papa Ray's Pizza in Daly City at 6:30 pm. The reservation is for 2 on March 13th.
Yes, that is fine.
Your reservation has been made.
What is the phone number?
Their phone number is 415-468-5300.
Could you tell me their address?
The address is 2731 Geneva Avenue.
Can you help me find somewhere to eat?
Sure, what city do you want to eat in?
Look in San Jose.
Okay, which type of food do you want?
I want Lobster.
There's Ariake in San Jose.
Oh perfect, that works.
Should I reserve you a table?
Yeah, make a reservation for three at 6:30 pm.
Okay, please confirm you'd like me to book a table for 3 at Ariake in San Jose for 6:30 pm on March 1st.
Yes, all of that is right.
I've made your reservation successfully.
I am looking for a reasonably priced place to eat in sebastopol
Any specific food preferences? Italian, American or something else.
I would love a burger, no price preferences
I have found 2 restaurants in sebastopol, fork roadhouse is a good place.
That sounds good.
Should I reserve a table there?
Yes, I want a table for 4 on 14th of March
What time should I book it for?
Half past 5 in the evening works for me
Booking a table for 4 at fork roadhouse sebastopol on march 14th at 5:30 pm.
sounds good to me
Your booking is confirmed.
Im looking for a restaurant with Southern food in Half Moon Bay.
Cetrella is locaed in Half Moon Bay.
What is the price range is it affordable?
The price range is very expensive.
Yes, that works for me.
Would you like to reserve a table at the restaurant?
Yes, I would like to make a reservation.
What time would you like your reservation?
I would like to go in the morning 11:45 just for 1 person.
Booking a table for 1 person at Cetrella in Half Moon Bay at 11:45 am on March 1st.
I would like it for next Thursday.
The city is half moon bay and the date is March 7th?
Yes, that is correct. Do they have live music?
I was unable to book a table at that time for 1 person at Cetrella, would you like to go at 12 pm on March 7th?
Yes, that works for me.
Your table was booked.
Can you have me find a nice restaurant?
What kind of cuisine are you in the mood for? For example, Mexican or American. And in which city should I conduct my search?
A good Lobster place in SF would be great.
I was able to locate 10 restaurants for you. One of which, Akiko's Sushi Bar is located in San Francisco.
That sounds great.
Should I reserve a table for you?
Yes, that's be great. Make it for one person on the 3rd of March for the afternoon 12:45.
To confirm: You'd like a reservation for 1 person on March 3rd at 12:45 pm at Akiko's Sushi Bar in San Francisco, correct?
Yes, that is correct.
Sorry, that reservation wasn't available at Akiko's Sushi Bar. Should I make it for 1 person on March 3rd at 12:30 pm instead?
Yeah, that's fine.
Your reservation is confirmed.
Can you help me find a Szcheuan restaurant to eat at?
Where should I look?
I'd like something in Morgan Hill.
There's a nice play in Morgan Hill called China Palace Restaurant.
Is there liquor served there?
They do not serve any liquor?
Where are they located?
They are located at 65 West Main Avenue.
Are there any other places you could suggest?
Sure, how about Pearl River Restaurant in Morgan Hill?
That sounds better. I'd like to make a reservation there for 10:45 am.
So you would like to make a reservation a Pearl River Restaurant in Morgan hill for 2 people at 10:45 am on March 1st. Is that correct?
I'd like to make it at 5:30 in the evening instead.
Okay, so a reservation for 2 at 5:30 pm, is that correct?
Yeah that sounds good.
Your reservation is confirmed.
What is their phone number?
You can reach them at 408-778-9898.
Can you help me find a place to eat?
In which city?
Something in Alameda please.
What type of food?
Something reasonably priced. Preferably Cuban cuisine.
I found 1 restaurant. Habanas Cuban Cuisine is a nice place in Alameda.
Yes, that sounds great to me.
Do you want to reserve a table?
Yes please, I'd like a table on the 10th.
At what time?
How about eleven am?
Please confirm: A table for 2 on March 10th at 11 am at Habanas Cuban Cuisine in Alameda.
Sounds great.
I reserved your table.
Could you help me find a good place to eat at that is not very costly and maybe has a diner atmosphere?
What city are you looking for?
Something in Forestville.
There is 1 restaurant in Forestville that comes to mind called Backyard.
Could you set a reservation there for the 10th of this month?
Which time works best for you?
Could you set the appointment for 17:30 military time?
Okay, so at the Backyard in Forestville you would like an appointment at 5:30 Pm on March 10th for 2, could you confirm this?
That sounds great!
The reservation was just made for you.
I would like to find a place to eat.
What sort of food do you want to eat? How about Mexican, Chinese, or something else? What city should I look in?
A burrito would be great. Check in San Mateo.
Celia's is a good restaurant in San Mateo.
Do you know of ay others?
El Sinaloense Restaurant is another nice restaurant in San Mateo.
That works for me. Make a reservation at that restaurant.
For what time?
Make it for 12:30 in the afternoon for 3 people.
Okay, confirm that you want to book a table for 3 people on March 1st at 12:30 pm at El Sinaloense Restaurant in San Mateo.
That is good.
Sorry, but the reservation didn't go thorugh. Do you want to book at El Sinaloense Restaurant for 3 peopleon March 1st at 1 pm?
That should work.
Your reservation was made successfully.
Can you find me a place to eat and drink some alcohol?
Sure, what type of food would you like?
I'd like to eat some seafood thanks.
Which city will you eat in?
Please check Mountain View.
Okay, how about Kappo Nami Nami in Mountain View?
How can I contact them? Is it very expensive?
No, their price is moderate. You can call them on 650-964-6990.
Thanks a look, please make a reservation.
What time would you like to book?
I'd like to go at 19:30.
Okay, please confirm that you'd like a table for 2 at Kappo Nami Nami in Mountain View from 7:30 pm on March 1st.
Yes that's perfect. Do they have a band?
Your reservation is complete. No, they don't have live music.
What's the address of the restaurant?
It's at 240 Castro Street.
Find me a place to eat.
What sort of food do you want to eat? Say something like Italian, Indian or something else.
I am in the mood for Korean Hot pot.
In which city should I look?
Find something reasonably priced in Milpitas.
Cj House Korean Bbq should be good. It's in Milpitas.
What is the address of the restaurant?
The address is 260 South Abel Street.
Tell me their contact number. Is live music available?
The phone number is 408-263-6705. No, there is no live music.
That works! I would like to make a reservation there.
What time would you like the reservation?
Make it at 11:45 in the morning on the 10th of this month.
Okay, so you want to book for 2 people at Cj House Korean Bbq in Milpitas for 11:45 am on March 10th?
Yes, that is right.
Sorry, but the reservation didn't go through. Do you want to try making a reservation for 2 on March 10th at 12 pm at Cj House Korean Bbq?
That sounds okay.
Your reservation was made successfully.
I need a place to eat that is afforadable in Larkspur.
How about Indian or Mexican?
I want to eat Barbecue.
I found 2. In Larkspur I have Belcampo Restaurant & Butcher Shop.
I like that one.
Do you want a table?
Yes, I want a table.
What time do you want it?
I want it for 13:00.
Confirm March 1st for 2 at Belcampo Restaurant & Butcher Shop in Larkspur at 1 pm.
Yes, what is address and do they serve liquor?
You are confirmed at 2405 Larkspur Landing Circle and no alcohol.
I am searching for a place to eat.
In which city do you need? What type of food do you need? It may American, Italian or any other thing?
I like Latin American type of food at Berkeley.
Fonda is a wonderful restaurant at Berkeley.
Yes. it is good for me. I wish to have a reservation at a restaurant.
When will you want to have the reservation?
Book it at 5:30 in the evening.
Kindly ensure that, on March 1st , booking has been done for 2 persons at Fonda restaurant at Berkeley. The required time is 5:30 pm.
Nope. Book it at evening 6:30
Kindly ensure that, the reservation has been done for 2 persons at 6:30 pm.
Yes. it is good for me.
Your booking is done.
I'm looking for a restaurant to go to in San Fran.
Is there a specific cuisine you had in mind?
I really love Burmese food.
There's B Star in San Francisco which you might enjoy.
What's their telephone number?
You can call them at 415-933-9900.
Okay,that sounds good. I want to book a table there.
What time would you like to book it for?
I want it for 18:30.
Okay, I'll get you a table for 2 at B Star in San Francisco on March 1st at 6:30 pm, is that right?
Yeah, book it please. And do they have live music there?
I've booked your table. I'm sorry but there's no live music.
Can you help me look for a restaurant?
Sure, but first please tell me in which city and what cuisine would you prefer - maybe Mexican, Chinese or maybe something else.
I'd like you to find me a nice average priced Oriental restaurant in San Fran.
There's 10 restaurants meeting your criteria in San Francisco. How about Bai Thong Thai?
Can you please give me their phone number and address.
Sure, they're located at 298 Gough Street and you can reach them at 415-863-9335.
OK. Any other restaurant which I might like?
There's Burmese Kitchen, also in San Francisco.
This one sounds good. Let's make a reservation?
For what time, please?
7:45 pm, please.
Can you please confirm that you want a table for 2 at Burmese Kitchen in San Francisco on March 1st at 7:45 pm?
Yes, that's correct. Can you please give me their phone number.
You can reach them at 415-474-5569 but unfortunately I wasn't able to book your table at Burmese Kitchen. I can try to book a table for 2 om March 1st at 7:30 pm, if it's OK with you.
Yes, that will do.
I've successfully placed your reservation.
I want to find a place to eat.
What kind of food? Indian, Italian or something else? What city?
I want to find Asian food in Palo Alto.
Burma Ruby Burmese Cuisine is a restaurant in Palo Alto.
What's the phone number?
The phone number is 650-285-2770.
What's a bargain priced restaurant?
Siam Royal Authentic Thai is in Palo Alto.
Yes, make a reservation for 1 at quarter to 7 in the evening.
Please confirm: table for 1 on March 1st at Siam Royal Authentic Thai in Palo Alto at 6:45 pm.
Yes, sounds good.
Sorry, couldn't make the reservation. What about a reservation for 1 on March 1st at 6:30 pm at Siam Royal Authentic Thai.
Yes sounds good.
Your reservation was made.
I'd like to eat some Brasserie kind of food
In which city?
I'd like in Larkspur
In Larkspur there's 1 restaurants: Left Bank Larkspur Brasserie
What's the phone number?
Phone number is 415-927-3034
Is there live music? Is it an expensive restaurant?
No, there isn't live music. It is a moderate priced restaurant
Ok, It's fine for me
Do you want to book a table?
Yes, I want to book
At what time?
I'd like at 6:30 pm
A table for 2 people at Left Bank Larkspur Brasserie in Larkspur on March 1st at 6:30 pm. Is it correct?
Yes it is! Tell me their address
507 Magnolia Avenue. Your table is booked!
Hi, I want to find somewhere to eat.
What type of food do you like? American, Indian, whatever you want.
I like diner food a lot.
Great, which city do you want a restaurant in?
It needs to be in Oakland.
In Oakland, Chop Bar is a good restaurant to go to.
Yeah, that sounds good. I'd like to reserve a table there.
Perfect, what time would you like to eat?
Make the reservation for 13:00, please.
Please confirm for me: booking a table for 2 people at Chop Bar in Oakland at 1 pm on March 1st.
Yes, perfect. What's the address? Does it cost a lot to eat there?
The reservation has gone through. They're priced pretty moderate, and the address is 247 4th Street.
I need recommendations for something to eat.
I can help you with that. What are you in the mood to eat.
I was thinking Italian.
Great choice! Which city would you like to dine in?
Let's go to San Fran please.
Excellent choice. May I suggest 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano in San Francisco.
Let's go ahead and book now.
Great idea, what time we're you thinking?
How about today at 18:30?
Ok, I'll find out, but first please confirm a reservation for 2 at 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano in San Francisco at 6:30 pm on March 1st. Did I get the details right?
Yes you did. Find the telephone number for them please.
Great news, I was able to confirm your table for 2! The telephone number is 415-543-5100.
Can you help me find a good spot to eat?
Sure, I can help. Did you want Italian, Chinese, Mexican....
I am just looking for somthing that is afforadable, good burgers and sells alcohol.
Okay, What city did you want to dine in?
Somewhere in San Jose.
I found 3 places you may like. How about Black Angus Steakhouse, located in San Jose?
What else do you have?
How about Rok Steakhouse & Grill located in San jose?
No, what else?
The last one I show in San Jose, is The Grill On The Alley.
Let's do that one!
Did you want me to make your reservations for you?
Yes that would be great!
Do you have a time preference?
Yes I would like something for 11:00.
So that is reservations for 2 on March 1st at 11 am, at The Grill On The Alley in San Jose?
Yes that is right.
Okay, your table has been reserved.
Do they play live music, and I also need the phone number.
They do not have live music and the number is 408-294-2244.
Thank you so much for that information.
You are welcome, did you need anything else today?
i am looking to eat somewhere
what city would you like to go to
i want to eat in san fran
do you prefer indian or mexican?
i want some moroccan food that are lavish priced
i found 1 moroccan restaurant called mourad in san francisco
ok perfect
do you want to reserve a table
yes please reserve for 1 people at 12:30 pm
please confirm your booking for 1 people at mourad san francisco on march 1st at 12:30 pm
it is actually for three people
please confirm your booking for 3 people at mourad
ok. can you find out if they serve liquor
they do not serve alcohol. Your booking is confirmed
Can you help me find a place to eat?
Which city should I be searching in?
I want to find one in Berkeley.
Any cuisine preferences? Indian, mexican or something else?
I just want breakfast in San Ramon.
There is 1 Taco bell in san ramon.
That sounds fine
Should I reserve a table there?
Sure, make a reservation for three people on March 9th at 1 in the afternoon.
Booking a table for 3 at taco bell in san ramon on march 9th at 1 pm
Do they have liquor or live music?
Taco Bell does serve alcohol but I was unable to make your reservation. Should I try booking for 3 people for march 9th at 12:30 pm instead?
Okay. That's fine by me.
Your booking is confirmed.
I need a restaurant.
What kind of food like Italian or Chinese?
I want to eat a burrito.
What city do you want?
Petaluma is the city.
I found 1 in Petaluma called Plaza Tequila Taqueira Bar & Grill.
Is price above average and what is contact?
Price is moderate and phone is 707-776-4949.
That is perfect for me.
Do you want to book it?
Yes go ahead and book.
Book for what time?
Book at quarter to 6 in the evening.
Confirm booking for March 1st for 2 at Plaza Tequila Taqueira Bar & Grill at 5:45 pm in Petaluma.
That is good for me, what is address?
Address is 600 East Washington street. Does a reservation at 6 pm for 2 on March 1st at Petaluma called Plaza Tequila Taqueira Bar & Grill work?
Yes that works for me.
You are now confirmed.
Get me the list of restaurants to dine out.
Which city do you prefer?
Look for one in Windsor.
What flavor do you like, American, Mexican, like that?
I want Thai food.
1 Thai restaurant is there in Windsor, the Tomi Thai.
Is it costly or not?
It is having a moderate price range.
That will do, make a reservation there.
What time do you wish get booking at?
I need booking at quarter past 1 in the afternoon.
Please verify the details, Booking one table at Tomi Thai in Windsor at 1:15 pm for 2 people on March 1st.
Make it on March 2nd at 1:30 in the afternoon.
Ok, please verify that you asked for a reservation at 1:30 pm on March 2nd.
Right, that's confirmed.
You got a successful reservation.
Shall I get liquor there?
You will not be provided alcohol
Is there music? Do you have their address.?
There is no live music. It is located at 426 Emily Rose Circle.
Can you find me somewhere to eat an economical breakfast?
Sure, what city?
I'm in Oakland.
I found 2 restaurants for you. How about Lungomare in Oakland?
Do they serve booze?
No, there is no alcohol on premises.
Do they have live music? Where is it?
No, there is no live music. They're at 1 Broadway.
Okay, that sounds fine.
Should I reserve a table?
Yes, please do.
From what time?
From two in the afternoon, for four people.
Okay. Please confirm that you'd like a table for 4 at Lungomare in Oakland from 2 pm on March 1st.
Yes, that's great. Can I call them?
Sorry, I couldn't make the reservation. Is there anything else?
Try again for 2 people at morning 11:15.
Okay, table for 2 at Lungomare in Oakland from 11:15 am on March 1st.
Thanks. What's the phone number?
Sorry, I couldn't make the reservation. How about trying Lungomare again for 2 at 11 am on March 1st? You can call them on 510-990-7007.
That sounds okay.
The table is booked.
I want to visit a restaurant! Sushi is the best! Look in SF.
I found 10 restaurants 2g Japanese Brasserie serves Sushi is San Francisco.
What else is available?
Ace Wasabi Rock-n-roll Sushi is also in San Francisco.
Anything else?
Akiko's Restaurant is nice and located in San Francisco.
What's the address?
It is 431 Bush Street.
Okay, that works.
Do you want to reserve a table?
Yes, please do.
What time is it for?
Make it for 12:30 pm.
Please confirm the following: Booking a table at Akiko's Restaurant for 2 in San Francisco on March 1st at 12:30 pm.
Yes, that's what I want.
Your reservation is now confirmed.
I would like a place to eat.
Do you prefer Italian, Chinese or something else?
I prefer Mexican food.
Which city, please?
I would like Dublin.
I found 1 in Dublin at On the Border Mexican Grill & Cantina.
That sounds good.
Would you like a reservation?
Yes, for two people later today in the afternoon 1:45.
OK, please confirm the reservation for 2 people on March 1st at 1:45 pm in Dublin at On The Border Mexican Grill & Cantina.
Yes, that is correct.
Apologizes, but I was unable to make a reservation. How about this: 2 people on March 1st at 1:30 pm in Dublin at On The Border Mexican Grill & Cantina
That is fine.
The reservation is confirmed.
Can you help me look for a place to eat?
Which city are you looking for?
I need one in mountain view.
is there any specific kind of food you are searching for?
Noodles on a budget would be perfect
I have found 2 places in mountain view for you. How about hunan chili
Sounds perfect. Make a reservation of march 3rd at 11 am
Booking a table for 2 at hunan chili mountain view on march 3rd at 11 am
sounds perfect. Whats their number? do they serve alcohol?
Booking confirmed. They do serve alcohol. Their contact number is 650-969-8968
Can you help me look for a place to eat?
Sure, which city should I look for?
Anything in san francisco would be fine
Any cuisine preferences? American, Italian or anything else?
I am craving some chinese food right now.
Okay, Alice's in San Francisco is a great place.
Is it a lavish place with live music?
It's an inexpensive place with no live music unfortunately
Okay, Make a reservation there.
What time should I book a slot for?
Book it for 1:45 pm
Booking a table for 2 at Alice's San Francisco on March 1st 1:45 pm
That sounds fine. What is the address?
I was unable to make the booking. Should I book a table for 2 at Alice's on March 1st at 1:30 pm instead. The address is 1599 sanchez street
Yes, That sounds great.
Booking is confirmed.
Can you help me find a restaurant, please?
Sure, please tell me in which city and also if you prefer a specific cuisine, like maybe Chinese, American or maybe something else.
Please find me a Halal restaurant in Milpitas.
There's 1 restaurant meeting your criteria in Milpitas - Darda Seafood.
Perfect. Let's make a reservation for 2 there on the 4th.
At what time, please?
Twelve in the afternoon.
Can you please confirm that you want me to book a table for 2 for you at Darda Seafood in Milpitas on March 4th 12 pm.
On second thought, make it for 3 persons.
Can you please confirm that you want your reservation to be for 3 people on March 4th?
Yes, that is correct.
I've successfully placed your reservation.
Looking for a place to eat
which city to look in?
Search in San fran
Any particular cuisine like American or Chinese or something else?
Any kind of Diner food is good.
In San Francisco there is 1760
Is there Live music?
No, they dont
Any other restaurant?
ok there is 25 Lusk in San Francisco
Is there Live music and Liquor?
No, they dont live music but serve liquor
Any other restaurant, looking for something very fancy priced
I have 10 restaurants of your liking and Acquerello in San Francisco
That is good
Should i book there?
Yes, please
at what time?
Please book at evening 7:30
Please confirm: Booking a table for 2 at Acquerello in San Francisco on March 1st in 7:30 pm
Make it for 3
Please confirm: Booking a table for 3 March 1st
that is right
Done, its booked
Thanks a lot
any thing else?
Finding some good eats is a top priority right now. Would you look up a place for me, please?
I'll take care of that for you. Where do you want to go and what do you have a taste for - Mexican, Indian or some other kind of food, perhaps?
I want to go to Rohnert Park and feast on a nice juicy Burger.
All right. Would you like to go to the the Bear Republic Brewing Co. in Rohnert Park?
is live music on tap there?
No live music is noted.
I'll go for it.
Do you want to make a table reservation now?
Sure do. A table on next Friday would work out great.
You want the reservation for what time?
If I can get the table reserved for 11:15 in the morning, that would suit me just fine, please.
All right. Do you want to confirm a table for 2 guests at the Bear Republic Brewing Co. in Rohnert Park on March 8th at 11:15 am?
Oops, thinking about my calendar, that time is not going to work. Change that to a quarter past 6 in the evening, please.
Okay. Are you confirming a table reservation in Rohnert Park at 6:15 pm?
On point, my friend.
Oh, apologies. That reservation time could not be confirmed. Can you change it to March 8th at 6 pm at the Bear Republic Brewing Co. for 2 guests?
That'll be fine.
Your table reservation is confirmed.
Now, how do we get to this place?
The restaurant is located at 5000 Roberts Lake Road.
How do I reach them?
You can call them at 707-585-2722.
Help me find somewhere to eat in Mountain View please.
What kind of food?
I want Japanese.
There's 9 restaurants in Mountain View. How about Bushido?
Do you know if they have live music?
No, they don't.
Can I get the number and is the price range above average?
It's in the moderate range and their number is 650-386-6821.
Okay, let's make a reservation for two on the 12th at afternoon 1.
Will do, please confirm you'd like a table for 2 at Bushido in mountain View at 1 pm on March 12th.
Yes, that's right.
I've made the reservation.
I need a place to eat with some Russian food, in SF.
Red Tavern matches your selection and is located in San Francisco.
Is there any live music?
No, there is not live music.
OK, that's still fine though. I need a reservation, please.
At what time would you like to make your reservation?
I need it at a quarter to 1 in the afternoon.
Please confirm the following information: Book a table at Red Tavern, in San Francisco. The reservation is at 12:45 PM. The reservation is for 2 people. The date is set as March 1st. Is this correct?
Yeah, that works. What's their contact number?
Their phone number is 415-750-9090. Sorry, but I was unable to make your reservation at this time. Red Tavern is a favorable restaurant. Shall I try to make a reservation for 2 people on March 1st at 1 PM?
Yes, I would like that.
Your reservation has been successfully made.
Do you have list of restaurants with mouth-watering dishes. We are planning to eat outdoors.
Can you tell me the city and kind of food you are interested?
Ok, I will be happy with Asian food and somewhere around Palo Alto
3 restaurants offer you the desired dishes. One is Burma Ruby Burmese Cuisine in Palo Alto
Nice, that may the one I am looking for.
Do you need any other help?
Get my seats reserved there.
At what time you will be there?
I think half past 7 in the evening will do.
Please confirm, you need reservation for 2 people at Burma Ruby Burmese Cuisine at 7:30 pm in Palo Alto on March 1st, right.
Correct, give me their address.
Sorry, failed to reserve. Do you need any other service?
Try to get a reservation there at 1:30 in the afternoon.
Ok, Please confirm the details follow: You need 2 reservations at Burma Ruby Burmese Cuisine in Palo Alto at 1:30 pm on March 1st.
Fine, what is the total cost, expensive? can I enjoy live music there?
You got reservation as you suggested. It is moderate in expense. they don't have live music.
I want to get some food and booze. Is there California style food in Menlo park?
There is 1 option. It's called Bradley's fine Diner, its there in Menlo Park.
What street is that on?
It's at 1165 merrill Street.
How can I call there?
Just phone them at 650-494-4342.
Great. I love that.
How about a table there?
Yes, do that, for 1 please.
What time will you go?
How about 20:00 military time?
I have: 1 for dinner at 8 pm, March 1st at Bradley's fine Diner in menlo park?
You have every detail perfectly.
I'm sorry that's not working. Anything else?
Try the booking at seven pm.
Sure, here's what I heard: Try a table for 1 at Bradley's fine Diner in Menlo Park at 7 pm on march 1st.
No, I said 2 people.
Sure, here's what I have: 2 people for Bradley's fine Diner.
You made the correction thanks.
You are reserved.
Hello! Please can you find me a good place to eat for I and my friend is searching for the best one in our locality.
Please can I have the Zipcode or city in which you wish to find a good place to eat.
Please can you find in San Mateo?
Sure! Do you prefer Italian, Mexican, thai, Japanese or any other kind of food offering restaurant?
I would prefer to have some tacos kind of food. Please find one where I can have this one.
Okay! The Celia's is a good one located in San Mateo. Do you wish to taste your food here?
Will they serve liquor and is live music available at this place?
Nope, they don't serve either of both.
Okay! it works for me. Please can you make a reservation at this restaurant.
Can I have the time to make the reservation?
Please can you make it at eight pm.
Sure! Please can you confirm me that you wish to book a table at the hotel Celia's in San Mateo for 2 people on March 1st at 8 pm. Is that right?
Yup, you're right.
Sorry, unfortunately, I couldn't make the reservation. Do you need any other help?
Please can you try the booking again for 7:15 pm?
Yup! Please can you confirm me that you wish to book a table at Celia's in San Mateo at 7:15 pm on March 1st for 2 people. Is that right?
Yup, sounds good. Is it economical or highly priced?
It's moderate. Sorry, your reservation is unsuccessful. Do you want me to book a table at Celia's restaurant for 2 people on March 1st at 7:30 pm?
Yup, please do that for me.
Okay! now your reservation is successfully made.
I'm so hungry. I need to find somewhere to eat.
In which city?
Portola Valley, I want pizza.
Parkside Grille is a great place in Portola Valley.
Yes, that's good.
Can I help you in anything else?
I want a reservation for two there to Tuesday next week. Make it at 18:30.
So a reservation for 2 at Parkside Grille in Portola Valley at 6:30 pm on March 5th?
Yes, that's correct.
Your reservation was successful.
My friend is visiting from out of town and I need to find a place for us to eat. Can you look up some inexpensive restaurants in SFO for me?
Sure, what kind of food?
We usually like Diner places.
Ok, I found 6 Diner options in San Francisco. How about Chaparral?
Sure, that sounds great.
Anything else I can do?
Can you put in a reservation for us?
Sure, for what time?
7:15 in the evening would be perfect.
Ok. To confirm, you want to make a reservation at Chaparral in San Francisco for 2 people at 7:15 pm on March 1st. Is that right?
Yes, that's perfect.
Sorry, Chaparral wouldn't let me reserve that time. Do you want to try to make it for 2 people on March 1st at 7 pm instead?
Yes, try that.
Ok, that time the reservation was successful.
I'm on a budget and would like help finding a place to eat. Please search for a cheap place with live music.
Any particular city I should search in?
Please find something in San Jose.
Would you like Chinese or Mexican, or would you prefer another type of cuisine?
Any place with Soup & Salad on the menu works for me.
The 1 suitable and nice restaurant I found is Mcdonald's in San Jose.
Sure, that's perfect.
Should I go ahead and reserve a table here?
Yes, please go ahead and make a reservation.
For what time should I make the reservation?
Please book it for 19:30.
Okay. Please confirm that you'd like to reserve a table for 2 at Mcdonald's San Jose, for 7:30 pm on March 1st.
No, sorry. My date just cancelled, so it's for one person.
No problem. Please confirm that you'd like to make a reservation for 1 at 7:30 pm.
That's correct. What's their phone number?
I have successfully made your reservation. You can reach them by phone at 408-265-5567.
What's their street address?
They are at 2434 Almaden Road.
Find me a place to eat that is intermediate priced. Parisian food is great.
What city should I look in?
Find places in SFO.
Amelie San Francisco is a nice San Francisco restaurant.
Is liquor served? What is the address?
Alcohol is served and the street address is 1754 Polk Street.
That works fine.
Could I reserve a table here?
Yes, make a reservation for two at 12:30 pm.
Could you confirm that you want a table for 2 booked at Amelie San Francisco in San Francisco? The reservation will be at 12:30 pm on March 1st.
That sounds good.
Your reservation went through successfully.
I want a place to eat
what kind of food? chinese, american or what?
cantonese is good
what city do I need to look in?
I want it in Burlingame
there is 1 place, yangon in burlingame
Yes that is fine. I want a reservation there
what time for?
I want it for 11:45
confirm yangon in burlingame for 11:45 am for 2 people on march 1st
yes that is fine
anything else for you?
make it 11:30
confirm yangon in burlingame for 11:30 am for 2 people on march 1st.
yes that works
reservation went through
what is the contact info?
phone is 650-348-8848
Hi, could you help me search for a nice place to eat?
Any preferred city to search in?
I would like to eat in SFO, thanks!
What types of cuisine or food will you prefer?
Something on the lines of Pho will be great.
There are 10 restaurants, one of which is Anh Hong at San Francisco.
This is fine for me.
Do you need a reservation there?
Yes please, please reserve a table on the 1st of March please.
When will you be visiting them?
I will be visiting them at afternoon 12:30.
Sure, please confirm your reservation for 2 at Anh Hong in San Francisco at 12:30 pm on March 1st.
This is perfect, may I have their contact number and do they play live music?
Your reservation has been made. You can contact them at 415-885-5180 and sadly, they do not play live music.
I'm trying to find a place to eat.
What type of food were you trying to find?
Some Oriental sounds perfect.
What city did you want me to look in?
I'd like to find something in Daly City.
I found a nice restaurant called Egg Roll King in Daly City.
Where are they located at?
They are located at 6811 Mission Street.
Does the place serve alcohol and do they have a phone number?
Their number is 650-992-0771 but they do not serve liquor.
Yes, that sounds good.
Did you want to book a table there?
Yes, I'd like to make a reservation for two at evening 6:15.
Please confirm you're booking a table for 2 at Egg Roll King in Daly city on March 1st at 6:15 pm.
Yes, that is correct. What is their price range and do they have live music?
Sorry, the reservation was unable to be booked. The place is inexpensive and they don't have live music. Should I try another reservation for 2 people at Egg Roll King on March 1st at 6 pm?
Yes, that sounds good to me.
Your reservation has been confirmed.
Can you help me find somewhere to eat?
Where city would you like to eat in?
Find me something in Palo Alto.
What type of cuisine do you want to eat? Maybe Mexican, Indian, or something else?
I'd like to go to an extravagant Japanese restaurant.
I found 1 you might like. Nobu Palo Alto is a great place located in Palo Alto.
Sure, that sound perfect. I'd like to make a reservation there for 12:15 in the afternoon on March 9th.
So you would like to make a reservation for 2 people at Nobu Palo Alto in the city of Palo Alto for 12:15 pm on March 9th. Is this correct?
Sounds good to me.
I was unable to make a reservation for that time. Would you like to try a reservation for 2 at Nobu Palo Alto at 12 pm on March 9th instead?
Sure, try that instead.
I was able to successfully reserve you a table this time.
I would like to eat somewhere
Do you prefer Italian, American or other kind of food?
I'd like some Cafe kind of food
In which city?
I'd like to go to eat in Alamo
There is 1 restaurant in Alamo: Alamo Cafe
Is it a pricey restaurant? Do they serve alcohol?
No, It's an inexpensive restaurant. No, they don't serve alcohol
Ok, It's fine for me! I want to reserve a table for two people
At what time?
At 11 am, for one people
A table for 1 people at Alamo Cafe in Alamo on March 1st at 11 am. Do you confirm?
Yes, thanks. Can you tell me its address?
Sure! 1 Alamo Square Drive. Your table is reserved!
I am searching for eating place around Sunnyvale
What type of food you are searching for? like American, Chinese etc
Any type of food like Mediterranean is fine
I have selected 2 restaurants and Obed is one among them which is located in Sunnyvale
I need something intermediate priced food and need can you to look for some other restaurant?
I have looked into 1 restaurant called Taverna Bistro in Sunnyvale which is very good
Fine for me
Do you require to make table reservation here?
Yes, i need booking for 4 people on the 4th at 1 pm
Please give confirmation details: Booking table for 4 people at Taverna Bistro at Sunnyvale on March 4th at 1 pm
Fine.Can i have their address and what is their phone number?
Booking is done. Their location is 133 South Murphy Avenue and they do not provide live music
Can you find me some place to eat?
In which city?
How about San Francisco?
What type of food would you like? Something like Mexican, Chinese, or something else.
I'd like some Brasserie food.
Bistro 10un is a nice place in San Francisco.
Do they have live music? And is their price range above average?
No, they don't have live music, and they're inexpensive.
Do you have any other suggestions?
Bistro Boudin is a nice place in San Francisco as well.
Yes, that one works. I'd like you to reserve a table.
At what time?
How about 12 pm?
Please confirm: book a table for 2 people on March 1st at 12 pm at Bistro Boudin in San Francisco.
Yes, that works well.
Your reservation was successful.
Can you find me a Latin American restaurant that has live music?
Sure, in what city?
Look in Fairfield.
I found 1 place in Fairfield called Favela's Fusion.
That's fine. Make me a reservation for four for next Tuesday at 6:30 pm.
Will do, but first confirm you'd like a table for 4 at Favela's Fusion in Fairfield at 6:30 pm on March 5th.
Yup. Do they serve alcoholic drinks and is it expensive?
I've booked your table. It's in the moderate price range and they don't serve any alcohol.
I want to find restaurants.
What city and type of food?
San Fran and I want pizza.
I found 10 in San Francisco. How about 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano.
What else do you have?
In San Francisco there is A16.
What is address and do they have music?
They do not have live music and address is 2355 Chestnut Street.
I want to go there.
Do you want reservations?
Yes, make the reservations.
What time do you want?
Make it for March 14th at 18:30 for 4.
Confirm March 14th at 6:30 pm for 4 at A16 in San Francisco.
Great and what is price range and do they have liquor?
You are confirmed and they are moderate and serve alcohol.
I am searching for a place to eat.
What type of food you searching for ? like Indian, Chinese etc.
Burger type of food will be okay.
On which city i should search in?
I want in Sunnyvale city.
I searched 7 restaurants. One of them is Black Angus Steakhouse located at Sunnyvale is a beautiful restaurant.
Are they provide liquor? Can you tell me their contact number?
They provide liquor and the contact number is 408-245-4501.
Fine. this is okay for me. I like to make a reservation at a restaurant.
What is your reservation time?
Do it at 12 pm.
Please give confirmation details: Table booking at Black Angus Steakhouse in Sunnyvale city and the reservation is for 2 people at 12 pm on march 1st.
Sorry, I like to book on 12th of march.
Please give confirmation details: Reservation date is march 12th for 2 people.
This is perfect for me. Is there a live music?
No, there is no live music. Your booking is dine.
Help me looks for a place to eat that's not very costly.
Is there a city that you prefer to search in? And is there a specific kind of food you like such as American, Chinese, or anything else?
Let's look in Oakland, and I'm could go for some Seafood.
There's a nice place called Alamar Kitchen & Bar in Oakland.
Yeah, that sounds good.
Would you like me to make a reservation?
Yeah, make a reservation for 1:15 in the afternoon.
I'll make a reservation for 2 people at Alamar Kitchen & Bar in Oakland for March 1st at 1:15 pm, is that okay?
No, the reservation is actually for three people. And make it for 1:30 in the afternoon.
I'll make the reservation for 3 people at 1:30 pm, is that okay?
Wait, sorry. It's just for one person.
I'll make the reservation for 1 person in Oakland, is that what you want?
Yeah, that's it.
I've made you the reservation.
I need to find a place to eat that's reasonably priced. I prefer French food.
In which city are you looking?
In Sonoma, please.
I found 1 restaurant you might like. How's The Girl & The Fig in Sonoma?
What's their phone number?
They can be reached at 707-938-3634.
Yes, that sounds great. I need to reserve a table.
Sure thing, at what time?
Please make it at 10:45 am.
Please confirm: Book a table for 2 at The Girl & The Fig in Sonoma at 10:45 am on March 1st.
Yes, that's great.
Sorry, I can't reserve that for you. Can I help you with anything else?
Please try it again for afternoon 12.
Please confirm: Book a table for 2 at The Girl & The Fig in Sonoma at 12 pm on March 1st.
Yes, that's great. What's the address?
That one was successful! Their address is 110 West Spain Street.
I am searching for eating place
What type of food you wanted like Chinese, Italian etc
I prefer Latin American Food
Which is your preferred city?
I wanted it in Newark city
There is a nice restaurant called La Cabana in Newark
That is perfect
Do you want to book a table there?
Yes, i need to book for one people on 14th of March at 11 am
Please give confirmation details: Booking a table at La Cabana for 1 people at 11 am on March 14th in the city of Newark
That is perfect
Your booking is done
I need a place to eat.
What time of food? Perhaps Mexican or American?
No Parisian would be better.
In which city?
Something in SFO please.
I found 10. How about Amelie San Francisco in San Francisco?
What is their contact number and address?
They are at 1754 Polk Street and the number is 415-292-6916.
What other restaurant do you suggest?
Aquitaine Wine Bar & Bistro in San Francisco is nice.
What else can you find?
Atelier Crenn in San Francisco is nice.
Yes that is good, please make a reservation.
What time would you like the reservation?
In the evening 6:30.
You want a table for 2 at Atelier Crenn in San Francisco on March 1st at 6:30 pm, correct?
Yes that's correct, do they serve liquor? What is the price range?
Your reservation has been made. The price is very expensive and they do serve alcohol.
I'm so hungry, I'm looking for somewhere to eat. Find me something bargain priced.
In which city? What kind of food do you want?
Oriental food in Richmond would be nice.
I found 1 restaurant in a Richmond. It's called Eurasia.
What's their number? Do they play live music?
Their number is 510-234-9898. Unfortunately, they don't.
I'm good, that works for me.
Would you like to make a reservation?
Yes, reserve me a table for 5:30 pm.
So a table for 2 at the restaurant Eurasia in Richmond at 5:30 pm on March 1st?
Actually, make it on the 3rd of this month at 18:15 please.
So a table for March 3rd at 6:15 pm?
Yes, that's good. Do they serve liquor? What's their address?
They don't serve alcohol. Their address is 12221 San Pablo Avenue. I could book your table in Eurasia at the time you wanted. Shall I get a reservation for 2 on March 3rd at 6:30 pm?
Yes, that's fine too.
Your reservation was successful.
its boring to eat our daily routine food , i need a change in eating food. find some good places to eat?
what kind of food whether italian , chinese or any other food you search for?
some non meat kind of food will be good.
in which city i should search for?
Please search it in Berkeley.
i found 4 restaurants. Great wall | chinese restaurant which is a nice restaurant located in berkeley
what is their address? Is the price range is expensive?
their price range is moderate. their street address is 6247 college avenue.
ok its work for me
whether i need to reserve a table over there?
yes i want to make a reservation
In which time do you need to book a table?
Make it at 7 o"clock in the evening.
Ok please check and review the following details. Booking a table at Great wall | chinese Restaurant. THe city is Berkeley. The reservation is at 7 pm. The reservation is for 2 people and date is on March 1st.
Ok thats good and it works for me. Do they have live music?
Table reservation is confirmed. They do not have live music.
I would like to go somewhere to eat
In which city would you like to eat?
I'd like in San Bruno
Do you prefer American, Mexican or other food?
I prefer some Filipino food
In San Bruno there's Cabalen
I need something bargain priced: what do you suggest?
There's 1 restaurant in San Bruno: Kuya's Asian Cuisine
Ok, It's fine!
Do you want to book a table there?
Yes, plesase. I want to book a table.
What time do you want to book the table?
Book for 17:00 please
A table for 2 people at Kuya's Asian Cuisine in San Bruno, on March 1st at 5 pm. Is it correct?
No, the table is for one people; I prefer at 12:30 pm
A reservation for 1 people at 12:30 pm. Do you confirm?
Yes, I confirm. There's live music? What's teir telephone number?
No, there isn't live music. Their number is 650-952-5739. Your table is booked
I want to find a place to eat.
What city do you want me to look in?
Search in Walnut Creek.
What sort of food are you looking for?
I would love to eat some Asian food.
I found 2 restaurants. Bombay Indian Restaurant is a nice restaurant in Walnut Creek.
Do you have something else? I would like something affordable in Berkeley.
Da Lian Restaurant is a nice Berkeley restaurant.
Is there live music? Will liquor be served?
Liquor will not be served and there is no live music.
Do you have other ideas? I need something low priced.
Mehak Indian Cuisine is a nice Berkeley restaurant.
Yes, that sounds good.
Do you want me to get you a table here?
Yes, make a reservation please.
What time should the reservation be for?
It should be at eleven am.
Could you confirm that you want to book a table at Mehak Indian Cuisine in Berkeley for 2 people at 11 am? The date will be March 1st.
That sounds good to me.
Your reservation has been made.
I want food
what city do I need to look in?
I want alameda
what kind of food? Italian, indian?
brasserie will be good
1 restaurant and pappo is a good one in alameda
any liquor and how pricey
they are expensive
yes that is fine
wanna get a table?
four people on the 6th
what time for you?
seven in the evening
booking at pappo in alameda at 7 pm for 4 people on march 6th
what is there number and address?
510-337-9100 at 2320 central avenue and pappo is nice. want a reservation for 4 people on march 6th at 6:30 pm
yes that is good
the reservation was good
My sister is coming into town and I need to find somewhere to take her out to dinner. Can you see where we could go that's not very costly and serves alcohol?
Sure, what kind of food? Like Chinese, American, or something else?
We both love Spicy Indian food, so that would be perfect.
Ok, what city will you be in?
Any place in Concord would be fine.
Hot Basil Cafe is a pretty popular Indian restaurant in Concord. How about that?
Sure, that sounds perfect. Can you put in a reservation?
Sure, for what time?
It'll be fore evening 6 on March 1st.
Ok, to confirm, you want to make a reservation at Hot Basil Cafe in Concord for 2 people at 6 pm on March 1st. Is that right?
Yep, that's perfect. What's their address and phone number?
They're at 790 Oak Grove Road, and their number is 925-288-0000.
Great, thank you.
Sure, anything else I can do?
I'm trying to find a place to eat.
What city did you want me to look and what type of food were you trying to find? You can say American, Indian, or anything else.
I'd like to find something in Berkeley. Some Diner food sounds perfect.
I found a nice restaurant called B&b Kitchen & Wine Bar in Berkeley.
Where is it located?
It is located at 2116 Shattuck Avenue.
Did you find another restaurant?
I also found a nice restaurant called Beer Baron Bar & Kitchen in Berkeley.
Does the place serve alcohol?
The place does serve alcohol.
Yes, that sounds good to me.
Did you need help with anything else?
I'd like to book a reservation for the restaurant on the 5th of March.
What time did you want to book it for?
I'd like to book it for half past 6 in the evening.
Please confirm you're booking a table for 2 at Beer Baron Bar & Kitchen in Berkeley on March 5th at 6:30 pm.
Yes, that sounds good. What is their phone number?
Your reservation has been confirmed. The number is 510-338-3464.
I'm hungry. Can you find me a nice Sushi place?
Sure thing. Which city would you like to search in?
Find me some Sushi in San Francisco.
I hear the 2g Japanese Brasserie is considered a really nice restaurant in San Francisco.
Do they serve liquor? What's the contact number?
Yes they do serve alcohol. The phone number is 415-292-9997.
Okay thanks for the information. I'd like to go ahead and make a reservation now.
No problem. What time do you want to make your reservation for?
Make it for half past 11 in the morning.
Okay, please confirm the following details for me: Booking a table for 2 at the 2g Japanese Brasserie in San Francisco on March 1st at 11:30 am.
Yes that works for me. Thanks a ton.
Your reservation in successful. Have fun!
What's the address? How affordable are the prices?
The price range is moderate. The address is 601 Van Ness Avenue.
I am searching for eating place
What food type you want?
Any type of food like Cantonese is okay
What city you prefer?
I need it in Fremont
I have searched for 7 restaurants and one among them is a nice restaurant called B K's Bistro in Fremont
Can you tell me the name of other restaurant?
There is one nice restaurant called Boiling Hot Pot which located in Fremont.
Can you tell me the name of other restaurant?
There is one nice restaurant called Chong Qing Xiao Mian which located in Fremont.
What about the price range ? Is it very expensive ? Are they provide liquor?
Inexpensive price range and they don't provide alcohol.
This is okay for me.
Do you want to book a table there?
Yes, i like to book the table for 3 people at 4:30 pm
Please give confirmation details: Booking table for 3 people at Chong Qing Xiao Mian on March 1st at 4:30 pm in the city of Fremont
Yes. this is okay for me.
Sorry, i could not make a reservation. Do you need any other help?
I like to try booking again. Do it at 11:30.
Please give confirmation details: Table booking at Chong Qing Xiao Mian in Fremont city for 3 people on march 1st and the reservation time is 11:30 am.
Fine. this is okay for me. Can you tell me their address?
Your booking is confirmed and street address is 34420 Fremont Boulevard.
I'm looking to dine out. I want a really ritzy, fancy upscale place in Bodega Bay.
What style of food do you want? Seafood - Bodega Bay has a lot of that.
American, generic..whatever.
Try Drakes Sonoma Coast. It's nice and it's in bodega Bay.
Fine, set me up. I want a table for two on the 8th of March at 7:30 pm.
To be clear: 2 people for Drakes Sonoma Coast in Bodega Bay at 7:30 pm. on March 8th.
That's great. We're celebrating and this will make it special.
Your reservation at Drakes is all lined up.
I'd like to find a place to eat in Mill valley.
What kind of food would you like to eat?
I'd like to eat some Diner food.
I have found 3 restaurants. Lighthouse Bar & Grill is a great choice in Mill Valley.
That'll work for me.
Would you like to get a table?
Yes, I'd like to make a reservation for 1 on the 12th at 7 in the evening.
Please confirm the following: You want a table at Lighthouse Bar & Grill in Mill Valley for 1 person on March 12th at 7 pm.
Yes, that's correct.
The table has been reserved.
It would be fine for me if you find a nice restaurant to have food.
Which cuisine will attract you, Indian, Mexican or anything else?
I would like to get Pakistani Food.
Are you particular with any city?
Yeah, search it in San Ramon.
In San Ramon Cafe Tandoor will be fine.
Ok, then get me a seat there?
At what time you will be present?
Do it at 11:00
Please confirm, you need a table at Cafe Tandoor in San Ramon at 11 am for 2 people on March 1st.
Correct, go on.
The process successful, your table booked.
very good service, thank you.
Its our pleasure, any other service you need?
I want to meet some friends for dinner. Where can we go to eat?
In what city?
Let's try SF.
What kind of food did you have in mind?
I don't know. Maybe Peruvian?
I found 5 restaurants in San Francisco thatserver Peruvian cuisine. How about Destino?
Is the food their very costly?
Destino's prices are in the moderate range.
How about live music?
Sorry, Destino's does not feature live music.
Ok. No big deal. I need a table for 3 next Friday.
What time would you prefer?
Maybe 17:00 or so?
You would like a table for 3 at Destino in San Francisco at 5 pm on March 8th. Is that correct?
No. Cjange in plans. Let's try March 13th at 1 PM.
You would like a table for 3 at Destino in San Francisco at 1 pm on March 13th. Is that correct?
Well, now it is only for 2 people.
You would like a table for 2 at Destino in San Francisco at 1 pm on March 13th. Is that correct?
Yes. Do they serve alcohol?
Your reservation is confirmed. It does not appear that Destino serves alcohol.
I do not feel like cooking. Any good places out there I can eat at?
Would you like chinese or mexican cuisine?
A burrito for me would be ideal
In which city?
In mountain view.
There are 9 such restaurants in mountain view. How about Agave Mexican bistro. It is a wonderful establishment.
Yes, why not.
You would like to make a reservation there?
Yes, go ahead. I want a table for 2 for the 13th of March at 12:30
You would like a reservation for 2 at Agave Mexican bistro in Mountain view for 12:30 pm on March 13th?
That would be fine. Would there be live music?
There is no live music. My apologies, but the reservation was unsuccessful. Should I try for a reservation for 2 at Agave Mexican Bistro for 1 pm on March 13th?
Yeah, that would work.
I have made the reservation.
Is alcohol served? What is the address?
Alcohol is served. It is located on 194 castro street.
Hello! I'm a newbie that I came abroad recently. Please can you help me to find some good restaurants to have food?
Sure! Do you preference for food?
Yup! I would love to have some Barbecue kind of food.
So, where you wish to dine?
San Fran would do great.
Okay! There is a restaurant where you can have BBQ joint serving ribs & other meat-centric fare in a quirky space within a repurposed brownstone and its name is Baby Blues Bbq located in San Francisco. Do you prefer this one?
Might be. Do they provide liquor? Can I have their address?
Nope, they don't. They are located at 3149 Mission Street.
Is there any other good restaurants?
Yup, the Camp Bbq is also a nice one in San Francisco.
Hmmmm..... Still, do you have any other suggestions for I'm looking for a economical priced restaurant.
Okay! There are 2 restaurants which will fit your price limit. The Hardwood Bar & Smokery will suit your taste and is located in San Francisco.
Oh!!! if so, it would work for me.
So, do you wish to reserve a table here?
Yup, I wish to book a table here.
What is your preferred timing for the reservation?
Please can you make it by 10:30 am.
Sure! Please can you confirm me that you wish to book a table at Hardwood Bar & Smokery in San Francisco at 10:30 am for 2 people on March 1st. Is that right?
Yup, that would work for me.
Sorry, I couldn't make the reservation. Do you want me to help you with anything else?
Please can you try the booking again. Please can you make it at 11:30?
Sure! So, you wish to book a table at Hardwood Bar & Smokery in San Francisco at 11:30 am on March 1st for 2 people. Is that correct?
Yup, you're correct. Do you have phone number? Will they provide liquor?
Nope, they do not serve alcohol. You can reach them at 415-796-2437. Your reservation is successfully made.
I am looking for a place to eat.
What sort of food are you looking for? You can choose American, Chinese or anything else available.
Any kind of Freshwater fish would be perfect.
In which city should I search in?
Look for it in Union City.
Hong Kong Restaurant is a nice restaurant in Union City.
Do they serve any liquor?
They do not serve any alcohol.
What is their phone number and how pricey are they?
The phone number for the place is 510-487-1033. Their price range is inexpensive.
Yes, that works fine. I would like to make a reservation at this restaurant.
At what time will the reservation be for?
Book it for half past 11 in the morning.
Please confirm these details: Table for 2 at the Hong Kong Restaurant in Union City. The reservation will be on March 1st at 11:30 am.
Yes, that works.
Your reservation is all set.
I want some food. Can you find me an eatery with live music?
I need a city and a preferred food, if any.
I'd love to have some lobster in Oakland. Also, make sure the place serves alcohol.
I found 1 restaurant in Oakland relevant to your specifics. It is Lake Chalet. How does that sound?
Sounds good. I'd like to book a table for three for 16:45 on Monday next week.
Okay. You want me to book a table for 3 at Lake Chalet in Oakland at 4:45 pm on March 4th?
Actually, make it on the 14th of this month.
Sure. You instead want to eat at Oakland on March 14th?
Yes.
Sorry, I couldn't reserve your table. Would you instead like for me to book a table for 3 at Lake Chalet at 5 pm on March 14th?
Sure, that's good.
I have booked your table.
I want something average priced that is latin american
what city do I need to look in?
I want something costly in san fran
I located 3 in barcino in san francisco
tell me their contact number
number is 415-430-6590 and it is at 399 grove street
yes that is good
anything else for you?
I wanna make a reservation at the restaurant.
what time is it for?
it's at a quarter past 7 in the evening
confirm booking at barcino in san francisco. it is for 7:15 pm for 2 people on march 1st
yes, do they have live music?
they do not. I could not make it at barcino. want me to try for 2 on march 1st at 7:30 pm?
yes that is good
the reservation wenr through
I'd like to find a place to eat.
What kind of food would you like? Please say Italian, American or any other kind of food.
A burger would be great.
Where should I search for it at?
I'd like to find one in SF.
1760 is a great option in San Francisco.
What are some other options? I'd like to find one that is expensive and serves alcohol.
I have found 10 restaurants that might work. 25 Lusk is a great choice in San Francisco.
Could you tell me some more choices? I'd like to find one in Danville.
Blackhawk Grille is a great place in Danville.
What's their phone number? And do they play live music?
They don't play live music. Their number is 925-736-4295.
That'll work for me. I'd like to make a reservation.
What time would you like it at?
Please make it for 6:30 pm.
Please confirm the following: You want a table for 2 people at Blackhawk Grille in Danville on March 1st at 6:30 pm.
Yes, that'll work. What's the address?
The reservation has been made. The address is 3540 Blackhawk Plaza Circle.
Please find me an economical restaurant serving American fare.
Do you have a particular city I should search in?
It should be in SFO.
I found Academy Bar And Kitchen, a nice restaurant in San Francisco.
Please find out whether they serve alcohol and get me their phone number.
They don't offer alcohol, and their contact number is 415-775-1800.
Okay, sounds good.
Should I go ahead and reserve a table?
Yes, please reserve a table.
For what time should I make the reservation?
Please reserve it for one pm.
Okay. Please confirm that you'd like to reserve a table for 2 at Academy Bar And Kitchen in San Francisco, for 1 pm on March 1st.
That's correct. May I have their address please?
They are at 1800 Fillmore Street. Unfortunately, I was unable to make your preferred reservation at the nice Academy Bar And Kitchen restaurant. There's an open table for 2 on March 1st at 12:30 pm. Will that be fine?
Yes, that's fine with me.
I have successfully made your reservation.
I want to eat food out side for some days when I have free time. So I need your help to find nice places to eat.
Let me know your desired City to search for and also please inform your desired type of food like Mexican, Chinese or anything like that?
I want to search for the places to eat in Palo Alto especially for the Breakfast.
Found 3 nice restaurants and Bistro Maxine restaurant is the best one for you in Palo Alto.
Get their address details to confirm the same.
The address is 548 Ramona Street.
Let me know their contact number.
It is 650-323-1815. Any more details you need to decide.
That's enough and this looks fine for me. Please book for a table at that restaurant.
At what time?
I need to book it at 2 pm.
Please confirm to book a table for 2 at Bistro maxine in Palo Alto for the time 2 pm on March 1st.
Yes, that is confirmed. Check whether the price is in fancy range?
Unfortunately I could not make the reservation as per your wish. May I help you in any other way?
Yes, please try to get the reservation for different time that is 12:30.
Please confirm to book a table for 2 at Bistro maxine in Palo Alto for the time 12:30 pm on March 1st
That is correct to proceed further.
I have successfully reserved the table in that restaurant.
I want a place to eat
what city to look in?
look in Oakland
what food is it?
I want it afforadable and cambodian
4 restaurants found and one is holy basil pho in oakland
suggest another place cause I don't have a price preference
4 restaurants. One is binh minh quan in oakland
what is the address?
the address is 338 12th street
is there liquor there?
No alcohol there
yes that is good
wanna get a table there?
yes I want one
what time is it?
4:30 pm please
confirm Binh Minh quan in Oakland for 4:30 pm and for 2 people on March 1st
yes that is good
I could not make reservation
I wanna try again at 6:15 pm
confirm binh minh quan in Oakland at 6:15 pm for 2 people on march 1st
yes, what is the number?
number is 510-893-8136 and at binh minh quan for 2 people on march 1st at 6 pm
yes that works
reservation was good
How about some good food in Concord?
What style would you like?
Maybe some Tex-Mex with alcohol. Tequila might hit the spot.
There are 2 options. What about Chili's Grill & Bar in Concord?
Ugh, they aren't really mexican.
What about Guadalajara Grill? It's the other choice. It's in Concord.
Is it low priced? What street are they on?
It's moderate. They're on 5446 Ygnacio valley Road.
Fine, get me a reservation.
What time do you want to eat?
What about 18:30?
Fine, I have: 2 for Guadalajara Grill in Concord. It's for 6:30 pm, march 1st?
Fine, what about mariachi or live music?
Sorry no on the tunes but their phone is 925-672-4430.
I will be meeting with some friends and we want to go to eat. What places do you recommend?
What type of cuisine are you looking for? And where do you want me to look for a restaurant?
Search for something in Albany that sells Szcheuan food.
There are 2 restaurants that you might like. How about China Village Restaurant in Albany.
That sounds good.
Do you want to book a table?
Yes, I want to book it at eleven in the morning on the 13th.
Please confirm: Booking a table for 2 people on March 13th at 11 am at China Village Restaurant in Albany.
You know what, make it at 12:30 pm.
Please confirm: Booking a table for 2 people on March 13th at 12:30 pm at China Village Restaurant in Albany.
That is correct. I just wanted to know the price, is it affordable? And does it have live music?
The table has been booked. They do not have live music and the price range is moderate.
Could you help me find a place to eat?
Any particular city I should search in?
Please find a place in San Francisco.
What's your cuisine preference? Do you prefer Chinese, American or another type of cuisine?
Please find Diner type food served.
Among the 10 nice San Francisco restaurants I found, is 1760.
What other options do you have?
How about 25 Lusk, another nice San Francisco restaurant?
Could you suggest a restaurant that serves alcohol?
Okay. What about Alba Ray's, a nice restaurant in San Francisco?
Is there live music?
No, there isn't live music.
Okay, I like that.
Should I go ahead and reserve a table?
Yes, please reserve a table.
For what time would you like the table reserved?
It should be for half past 6 in the evening.
Okay. Please confirm that you'd like to make a 6:30 pm., March 1st reservation for 2, at Alba Ray's in San Francisco.
No, there's been a change of plans. Please make it 14th of March at 11:30.
Sure, no problem. Please confirm that the reservation is for March 14th at 11:30 am.
That is correct. May I have their phone number?
I have successfully made your reservation. You can call them on 415-872-9409.
Where are they located?
They are at 2293 Mission Street.
Find an economical priced restaurant in San Francisco.
Cuisine?
American.
Academy Bar and Kitchen is in San Francisco.
Good, reserve a table.
What time?
For seven pm.
Please confirm: table for 2 at Academy Bar and Kitchen March 1st in San Francisco at 7 pm.
Yes.
Your table is booked.
Find me a restaurant to eat at.
What city do you want to eat in?
I want some intermediate priced food in San Francisco.
What type of food do you like?
I want to eat some Cambodian food.
Search revealed 10 results. Baan Thai House & Wine Bar serves Cambodian food in San Francisco.
That is perfect.
Do you need something more?
Book me a table reservation there.
What time do you want to eat?
I want to eat in afternoon 12:15.
You want a table for 2 at Baan Thai House & Wine Bar in San Francisco on March 1st at 12:15 pm. Is that right?
That is correct. Can you give me their phone number and their location?
You can contact them at 415-379-4505 and they are located at 534 Irving Street. I could get you table there. Do you want to make a reservation at Baan Thai House & Wine Bar for 2 people on March 1st at 12:30 pm?
Yes, that is fine.
Your table is booked.
I want to make a restaurant reservation for 2 people at half past 11 in the morning.
What city do you want to dine in? Do you have a preferred restaurant?
Please find restaurants in San Jose. Can you try Sino?
Confirming: I will reserve a table for 2 people at Sino in San Jose. The reservation time is 11:30 am today.
Yes, thanks. What's their phone number?
Your reservation has been made. Their phone number is 408-247-8880.
What's their address? Do they have vegetarian options on their menu?
The street address is 377 Santana Row #1000. They have good vegetarian options.
Thanks very much.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that's all. Thanks.
Have a great day.
I am not in the mood to cook today. I want to eat out at a restaurant instead.
Which area would you like me to look in? Which restaurant would you like to eat in and at what time?
Look for a restaurant in Saratoga. Check to see if I can have a table for 1 at Sipan for 11:30.
You would like a table for 1 person for today at 11:30 am at the Sipan Peruvian Restaurant & Bar in Saratoga?
I would like to book at table at Rosie Mccann's for March 2nd.
You would like me to book a table at Rosie Mccann's Irish Pub & Restaurant for tomorrow?
I want the eat there on the 4th of this month.
You would like to reserve a table for 11:30 am for next Monday?
That would be fine. Is the restaurant costly?
My apologies. The reservation was unsuccessful. Is there anything else I can assist you with?
No thanks. You have been very helpful.
Enjoy your day.
I want to reserve a table at a restaurant, specifically Bourbon Steak.
Which location of Bourbon Steak do you want to save a table?
Find Bourbon Steaks in San Francisco please.
What time do you want to book the table for?
Please do it for one in the afternoon.
Okay. Just to be clear, you want a table at Bourbon Steak Restaurant in San Francisco for 2 people today at 1 pm.
Yes, that is correct.
Alright. Your reservation has been made.
Thanks for your help. That will be it.
Have a great day.
I would like to make a restaurant reservation at morning 11:15.
Which restaurant do you want to go to?
Can I get a reservation at Andes Cafe?
Which location do you want to get the reservation at?
Find a restaurant in San Mateo.
Please confirm you want to make a reservation for 2 people today at 11:15 am at Andes Cafe San Mateo in San Mateo.
The reservation is just for 1 person.
Please confirm you want a reservation for 1 person today.
That is correct.
The reservation could not be made. Do you want to make a reservation for 1 person today at 11 am at Andes Cafe San Mateo?
Not at this time.
See you soon!
I want to make a dinner reservation on March 5th.
What area are you looking in? What time do you want the reservation for?
I want a restaurant in San Jose, for 18:30, please.
Which restaurant do you want to book a table at?
Can you get me a table at Ludwig's German Table?
So you want a table for 2 people next Tuesday at 6:30 pm at Ludwig's German Table in San Jose?
Yes, that's right.
Your table has been reserved.
What type of food do they serve, and what's the address?
They serve German food. They are located at 261 North 2nd Street.
Thanks. That's all.
Have a nice day.
I want to make a reservation at a restaurant.
Okay, I can do that. Is there a particular restaurant that you wish to visit?
Can you look at Villa Romano in Napa?
Yes. What time?
Try for afternoon 12:45.
No problem, please confirm: reservation for 2 at Villa Romano in Napa, today at 12:45 pm.
Make it for 4 people.
Okay, please confirm: reservation for 4 people at Villa Romano.
Actually, can we change it to Big 4.
Please confirm: table for 4 people at The Big 4.
Yes, that's right.
I'm sorry, I couldn't make that reservation for you. Is there anything else I can help you with today?
No, that's it.
Have a great day.
I need to taste good food , i am very much eager to taste different food varieties from my normal routine food. Will you book a table at a restaurant?
At which location i should search for and at what time i need to book a table ? whether any special restaurant you like to book a table?
Find restaurants in SFO and at time 13:00 ? Can you try booking a table at Tuba?
ok please check and review the details for confirmation. Table need to be booked at Tuba Authentic Turkish Restaurant in the city San francisco at time 1 pm and number of people is 2 for the date is today.
No Find restaurants in Livermore and Book a table at simply fondue?
Ok please once again check and review the following details. Table need to be booked at Simply Fondue at the city Livermore.
Ok That's correct.
Reservation is successful.
Thanks a lot for your help. thats all i need
Take care have a great day
I want to go out to eat somewhere.
Do you know what restaurant you would like to go to? Or at least what city you want to eat in?
I want a restaurant in SF. I heard that a place called Zaoh is really good. I wonder if it has any free seats?
What time would you like to eat there at?
I'd love to go there for lunch, so 12 o"clock in the afternoon.
You want to make a reservation for 2 at Zaoh in San Francisco for 12 pm today. Is that correct?
No. The reservation should be for 4 people, and it should be for the 8th of this month.
You want me to book a table for next Friday for 4?
Yeah. I wonder what I should wear? Is Zaoh an ultra high-end restaurant?
Sorry, I can't book a table for you. Do you need anything else?
That's all, thanks.
Enjoy your day.
I'd like to make a restaurant reservation.
What's the restaurant, where is it located, and what time would you like the reservation for?
It's called House Of Genji and you can look for it in San Jose. I want the reservation for evening 6:15.
I'll make a reservation for House Of Genji in San Jose today at 6:15 pm for 2 people, is that correct?
Yeah, that's right. Do they do outdoor seating?
They don't have outdoor seating. I also was not able to make the reservation. How about today at 6 pm for 2 people at House Of Genji instead?
That won't work for me.
Do you any other kinds of help from me?
No, thanks a lot.
Okay, have a pleasant day.
I wanna book a restaurant reservation on the 14th of March
What restaurant do you want?
Can you find me a table at Mcdonald's
What time do you want me to reserve?
Try for 12:30
Which branch do you want?
Find me one in Livermore
There's a Mcdonald's in Livermore than I can reserve at 12:30 pm for 2 people on March 14th.
Yes that works, but do they have vegetarian options?
Your reservation is made, and no they don't have any vegetarian options unfortunately.
What is their phone number and address?
It's 925-961-9090 and it's at 805 North Vasco Road
Thank you so much, that's it for now.
Sure thing, have a good one
I want to book a table at a restaurant. Is there anything available at Uncle Yu's. I don't care what date.
Which location do you want? What time would you prefer?
Please look in Livermore for a reservation at 7 in the evening. I'd prefer Wednesday next week.
Confirming: I'm booking a table for 2 at Uncle Yu's At The Vineyard in Livermore, for next Wednesday at 7 pm.
Sorry, please make it 3 people. Can you look at Mai instead?
Please confirm: I am booking a table for 3 people at Mai Vietnamese Cuisine.
Yes, that's correct.
Sorry, there are no tables available at that time. Can I help you with anything more?
Can you try again? This time look for 5:15 pm.
Confirming: I am booking a table for 3 people at Mai Vietnamese Cuisine in Livermore, at 5:15 pm next Wednesday.
Yes, please. What type of food is on their menu? Do they have vegetarian options?
Sorry, I was not able to make that reservation. Anything else I can do for you?
No, that's all. Thanks.
Have a good day.
Can you book a table at a restaurant?
Sure, in which city and which restaurant?
I would like a table at the Tacolicious in San Jose for 7:30 in the evening.
Confirm: table for 2 at Tacolicious in San Jose for 7:30 pm today.
Can you find a table at Isushi in Castro Valley instead please?
Booking a table at Isushi in Castro Valley.
Can you make it for the 14th of this month please?
Yes, the date is March 14th in Castro Valley.
Yes, that is perfect.
Your reservation was made.
Thank you for your assistance.
Is there anything else you need?
No, that is all thank you.
Have a good day.
I need help with a reservation in a restaurant.
What is the time of your reservation?
It's for 6:45 in the evening.
Where do I have to look for your restaurant?
Look around San Jose.
Do you have a favorite restaurant in mind?
Yes, go for Lalla.
Read the data and give me the green light. You are looking for a table for 2 at Lalla Grill in San Jose for today at 6:45 pm
Yes, you can proceed.
Unfortunately, I can't do that. Do you want me to see if there's a table for 2 available at Lalla Grill today at 6:30 pm?
Yes, try that.
This time you got it!
That's wonderful.
Do you still need me?
No I don't, thank you.
Enjoy your evening out. Bye.
Can You help me in booking a table for four people at a restaurant?
Do you have a preference in restaurants?
Can you look for Taverna restaurant in Sunnyvale?
What time would you like me to reserve the table for?
Book the table for evening 5:45.
Please confirm: You want me to reserve a table for 4 people at Taverna Bistro in Sunnyvale for today at 5:45 pm.
Yes, That sounds good to me.
Regretfully I would like you to inform you that your reservation at Taverna Bistro was made. Do you want me to try for 4 people for today at 6 pm?
No. Don't do thst.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. That will be all. Thank you.
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day.
Please make a dinner reservation in Livermore.
Which venue do you prefer?
I like Sai's T.
What time?
12:00 please.
I understand I am making reservations today for 2 at Sai's T Restaurant in Livermore at 12 pm.
I changed my mind. How about Kiku restaurant.
You want a table for 2 today at Kiku Sushi. Is that right?
Exactly. What food type is on the menu?
Making a reservation was not posible. Is there something else you need?
No, that's all.
Have a lovely day.
Can you help me reserve a table at a restaurant? I'd like to book at Royal Rangoon.
What time would you like your reservation to be? Which city is the restaurant in?
I'd like the reservation at quarter to 12 in the morning. The restaurant is in Berkeley.
So you would like a reservations for 2 at the Royal Rangoon Restaurant in Berkeley? The reservation is today is at 11:45 am.
No, I'd like to reserve it on the 3rd of this month.
So you'd like to make a reservation at Royal Rangoon Restaurant the day after tomorrow?
Yes, that sounds correct. What's the restaurant's rating, and what kind of food do they serve?
Sorry, I wasn't able to make a reservation. Royal Rangoon Restaurant serves Chinese food and their rating is around 4.5. Should I try to make a reservation for 2 at 12 pm on the day after tomorrow?
Yes, sounds good.
Your reservation is confirmed.
Thank you.
Is there anything else I can help with?
No, thank you.
Have a nice day.
I am making dinner plans with a friend and would like to book a table at a restaurant.
Which location shall I search and what time would you like the reservation for?
The reservation will be for 7 in the evening for a restaurant in SFO.
Which restaurant would you like?
Can you try to book it for Kittea Cat?
You would like a reservation for 2 at at Kittea Cat Cafe in San Francisco for today at 7 pm. Is that correct?
Yes, that is correct.
The reservation was successful.
Thank you. That is all I need for now.
My pleasure. Have a great day.
I'd like to book a restaurant table.
Where should I look?
Look for restaurants in Albany.
Is there a particular restaurant you would like to book at?
I want to try out Kathmandu Restaurant.
What time do you want the reservation to be?
Make it at two pm.
Okay, please confirm these details. You would like to book a table at Kathmandu Restaurant in Albany for 2 people. This reservation is for 2 pm today.
No, actually I want a table on the 11th of March. Would you try booking at Rokko?
Okay, so you would like me to book a table at Rokko for March 11th?
Yes, that is fine. Is the restaurant pricey?
Sorry, I could not make a reservation. Do you need help with something else?
No, that is all.
Have a great day.
I'd like to find a table for a restaurant in SFO.
Okay, which restaurant would you like to look at, and when would you like to go?
I'd like to go to El Tesoro at 11:45 am.
Please confirm: You'd like a table at El Tesoro Taqueria & grill in San Francisco for 2 people at 11:45 am today.
Works for me, do they have vegetarian options?
Reservation made, and yes, they do.
Thank you very much.
Do you need anything else?
Nope, thank you so much.
Have a great day.
I haven't eaten there for a while. Can you make a reservation for me at that restaurant for 12:30 pm.
Sure, but what restaurant are you talking about? And what city is it in?
Ah, sorry. I want to go to Tonayan in Rohnert Park. I need a reservation for three people.
You want a reservation at Tonayan in Rohnert Park for 3 at 12:30 pm today. Is that correct?
Actually, I just remembered my friends aren't big fans of Mexican food, so I'll only need a reservation for one. I'll go somewhere else with them today, so can you book me a table for tomorrow, on the 2nd of March?
Sure. You want a table for 1 at Tonayan tomorrow?
Yeah, that's right.
Your table has been booked.
Thanks a lot. I don't need anything else.
Enjoy your day.
Can you make me a restaurant reservation?
What time do you want a table for?
Can you make one for 7:15 pm
Which city are you interested in?
Find one in San Jose
What restaurant would you like to make a reservation at?
Try to book me a table at Tanchito's on March 8th please
So a 7:15 pm table for 2 at Tanchito's Restaurant in San Jose next Friday?
Yes that's food, what kind of cuisine is that?
Sorry I couldn't book a table actually, can I do anyth`ing else?
Can you book another table? Find places in Albany.
How about the Tanchito's Restaurant in Albany next Friday at 7:15 pm for 2?
No, try the 3rd of March
Confirming that you want a table at Tanchito's Restaurant for the day after tomorrow
Yes that's good, do they have outdoor seating?
Sorry I couldn't book that either, what else can I do?
Try to book again but at 12:30 pm
Confirming that you want a 12:30 pm table for 2 at Tanchito's Restaurant in Albany for the day after tomorrow yes?
Actually I changed my mind, let's try Dickey's
OK, so a table for 2 at Dickey's Barbecue Pit?
Yes that's good
Sorry I couldn't book that either, what else can I do?
No nothing else for now, thanks for trying
OK, take care
I would like to eat something in a restaurant on the 8th of this month.
Have you thought about the time you want to be there?
Yes, 1 in the afternoon is fine.
Do you have a favorite restaurant?
Yes, see if there's room at Koryo.
Where is it located?
It's in Oakland.
Confirm your request. You need to make a reservation for 2 at Koryo Sushi in Oakland at 1 pm next friday.
Yes, can you send me the address? Can you also provide me the ratings?
The reservation has been made. The restaurant is in 4390 Telegraph avenue D and the rating is around 4.0
Thanks a lot, I'm done.
Bye sir.
Hi i need a help, One of my friends coming to this city for meet me, I am looking to book a table at a restaurant for him?
Sure, I will help you, at what time should i try to book for?
book at 6:45 pm
Which city should i search in? Which restaurant do you want to book a table at?
Try to book a table at Sakana Sushi in SF
please confirm the following details: Booking a table at Sakana Sushi bar & Grill at San francisco on today 6:45 pm, The reservation for 2 people
no, book for only one people
please confirm the following details: The reservation is at 6:45 pm and the reservation for 1 people
Yes, that's right, what is the address of the restaurant?
Congrats, your reservation is successful, Restaurant address is 605 Post Street
Ok, Could you give their phone number?
Sure, Their phone number is 415-775-7644
thank you very much for your help, That's all i need.
you are welcome, Shall i help you with anything more?
No, thanks, bye
Have a wonderful day, bye
Today is my wedding anniversary and I want to book a table at a restaurant as a surprise to my wife.
I am happy to help. What area would you like me to search for restaurants in?
I would like it to be close to my wife's office in Oakland.
Do you have a specific restaurant in mind and what time would you like me to set the reservations for?
Yes, Sidebar is her favorite restaurant so let's book the table there at seven in the evening.
Okay, before I make those arrangements for you please confirm that the details I have are correct. You want a table for 2 at Sidebar, located in Oakland, today at 7 pm. Is that correct?
Yes, that's perfect. She will be so surprised.
I have confirmed those reservations for you and you should be all set for this evening.
Thank you for your help, I couldn't have done it with out you.
Have a great day and enjoy your meal.
I have a plan to eat outside for which I need some nice restaurant. Please help me to book a table.
What is your desired location to eat?
I like to eat at some nice place in Lafayette.
Let me know your convenient time to eat, so that I can search according to you.
11:45 in the morning is the convenient time for me and make the booking accordingly.
Any preferred restaurant?
Yes, try to book a table in The Cooperage, that was the nice place.
Please confirm to book a table for 2 in The Cooperage American Grille in Lafayette at 11:45 am today.
Yes, that is great. continue.
Your reservation was successfully made at this place.
Thanks and that's all.
Have a great day.
Man, I'm starving. I'd love to have a hearty meal out tonight. Can you reserve me a restaurant at 6 in the evening?
Do you have a specific restaurant in mind? Where should I search?
I'd like for you to check out what's available in Walnut Creek. I'd particularly like it if you could book me a table at Vanessa's Bistro 2.
Okay then. You want to reserve a table for 2 at Vanessa's Bistro 2 Vietnamese Restaurant in Walnut Creek, at 6 pm today?
Actually, make it at 18:15 on the 12th.
Okay. The reservation should instead be at 6:15 pm on March 12th?
That sounds right. Also, I'm a vegetarian. Does their menu have options that will be okay for me?
You have successfully booked a table. Vanessa's Bistro 2 does have vegetarian meals.
Can I have my meal outdoors at Vanessa's?
Unfortunately, you cannot.
Thanks for the answer.
How else can I assist you?
Not for anything else right now. Many thanks.
Hope you enjoy your meal at Vanessa's.
I'd like to make a restaurant reservation, can you help me?
What restaurant do you need the reservation for? Also, what time is the reservation and where is the restaurant located?
The restaurant is Blue Gingko Blackhawk. Look for it in Danville. The reservation is for next Monday at 5:30 in the evening for one person.
Okay, please confirm this for me, I'll make a reservation for 1 person at Blue Gingko Blackhawk in Danville next Monday at 5:30 pm?
No, sorry. It's for 3 people for next Thursday.
Okay, so it's for 3 people next Thursday, is that right?
Yes, that's right. Do you know if they have outdoor seating, and what's a phone number I can reach them at?
They have outdoor seating available and you can reach them at 925-648-7838 by phone. I'm sorry I couldn't make the reservation. Do you want me to try to make a reservation at 5 pm next Thursday for 3 people at Blue Gingko Blackhawk?
Yeah, try that.
I've made the reservation for you.
Thanks a lot, I don't need any more help.
Have a good rest of your day then.
I want to book a table in a restaurant for 3 people
Which is the restaurant you like and the location?
I am interested in San Francisco. Can you please try booking a table at Hakka.
What is your timing?
Please book at evening 4:45.
Please give confirmation details: Booking a table for 3 people at Hakka restaurant at 4:45 pm today in the city of San Francisco.
This is perfect. Does the restaurant have vegetarians options on the menu and can you provide me their address?
Sorry, your booking can not be done and the hotel does not provide vegetarian option. Their address is 4401 Cabrillo Street. Should i book for 3 people today at 5 pm as Hakka restaurant is nice.
yes that is perfect.
Your booking has been done.
Thanks a lot
Do you need any help from me?
No, thanks a lot.
Have a great day.
Let's do some restaurant exploring right now. I need a nice, ambient dining spot for a business meeting. Let's get a reservation booked and checked off my to-do list, please.
Okay, I can help you with that. Do you want me to find a particular restaurant at a specific location? And, what is the time you want for the reservation?
You're right on it, aren't you? That's great. Let's book a table at a restaurant in San Fran for 5:30 in the evening. Oh, wait. I remember the name of the restaurant I'm looking for. It's called The City.
Got it. A table is being reserved for 2 persons at The City Taqueria in San Francisco for today at 5:30 pm. Shall I confirm that for you?
Uh, hold that, please. I've got to change the reservation to one person. And, what's my chance of getting a table at The Grill instead?
A table is being reserved for 1 person at The Grill. Do you approve of that?
Yes, you have my approval to do it now. And, I need the phone number, too.
Apologies. Your table could not be booked at this time. Would you like any other assistance?
Well, I guess we'll have to table that and I'll let you know later. Thanks so much.
Of course. Enjoy your day.
I want to check the weather in El Sobrante on the 6th of March 2019.
The average temperature for the day should be 76 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 9 percent chance of rain.
Okay, how about the weather in Guerneville on the 1st of March 2019?
The average temperature for the day should be 89 degrees Fahrenheit with an 11 percent chance of rain.
How humid is it supposed to be?
There should be around 28 percent humidity.
Okay.
Do you need anything else?
No, that's all. Thanks.
Goodbye.
Can you tell me what the weather is like in Nairobi, Kenya.
The temperature average during the day is 105 degrees Fahrenheit. And there's also a 0 percent chance it will rain.
Alright, how's the weather for Kenwood on March 5th 2019?
It will be 90 degrees Farhrenheit on average during the day, and there's a 27 percent chance it will rain.
Alright, can you tell me the weather for 1st of March 2019.
It will be 92 degrees Fahrenheight on average during the day, and there's a 23 percent chance it will rain.
Okay, that's all I need. Bye!
Take Care.
Can you check the weather in Montara?
The average temperature for today is 89 degrees Fahrenheit, and there is a 8 percent chance of rain.
Thank you. That's all I needed.
Have a nice day.
Please check the weather.
What city do you need?
Please check in Clayton.
The temperature is forecasted to be 70 degrees with a 1 percent chance of rain.
What about Forestville on March 12th.
The temperature should be 75 degrees with a 14 percent chance of rain.
How windy is it suppose to be?
The wind should be around 10 mph.
What is the humidity going to be?
The humidity is expected to be around 36 percent.
Yes, that is ok.
Anything else today?
No, that is all.
Have a nice day.
I wonder if it's gonna rain. Can you check the weather?
In which city?
In San Pablo.
The average temperature should be 73 degrees Fahrenheit with a 2 percent chance of rain.
Sure, good to know.
Can I help you in anything else?
No, that's all. Thanks.
That's great. Have a good day.
I want to do weather check at San Anselmo
The average day temperature need be 89 degrees Fahrenheit.There it is 28 percent chance of rain
How much windy and humid it might be there
The humidity level there is 23 percent with average wind speed around 3 miles per hour
ok, that is all. Bye then
Cheers for now
Give me the weather update for the 1st of March 2019 please.
Sure, for which city?
Please check the city of Stanford.
Sure thing. On March 1st 2019 the weather is estimated to be 73 degrees Fahrenheit. Please keep in mind there will be a 29 percent chance of rain.
Find the humidity expectation for that day please.
Sure, humidity is expected to be around 47 percent.
ok, thanks for that information.
your welcome. Will there be anything else?
Nope, that's it.
OK, Have a good one.
I'm trying to decide what to do today. Can you tell me what the weather is suppose to be like?
I can help you with that. What location would you like me to check the forecast in?
Can you tell me the forecast for Pinole on March 1st 2019?
I can see that the average temperature for the day you specified should be 91 degrees Fahrenheit with an 18 percent chance of rain.
Great, thanks for all your help. Goodbye.
Goodbye.
I want to check the weather for the 12th of March 2019.
Which city?
In El Cerrito, please.
The average temperature for the day should be 88 degrees Fahrenheit, with an 18 percent chance of rain.
What's the humidity, and how windy will it be?
The humidity should be around 25 percent, with an average wind speed of 1 mile per hour.
Okay.
Is there anything else you want?
No, that's all, thanks.
Goodbye.
Could you check the weather in Alamo?
The average temperature today should be 81 degrees. There's also a 12 percent chance of rain.
How about Novato on the 12th of March 2019
The average temperature should be 77 degrees and there's a 6 percent chance of rain.
What about March 2nd 2019?
Average temperature should be 71 degrees with a 1 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy?
Wind speed should be about 3 miles per hour.
Okay, thank you.
Is there anything else you need?
No thanks, that'll do it.
Have a great day.
Please check the weather in Discovery Bay
77 degrees Fahrenheit is the average temperature and a 9 percent chance of rain
What about on March 12th
70 degrees Fahrenheit is the average temperature and there is 23 percent chance of rain
What about on 10th of March 2019
85 degrees Fahrenheit is the average temperature for the day and 15 percent chance of rain
OK perfect. That's all for now. Bye
Cheers
I require to do weather check in San Jose on March 10th 2019
The average day temperature have to be 74 degrees Fahrenheit and there is 18 percent chance of rain
sure that is ok
you need anything more?
No, thank you
Cheers for now
What is the weather like in Bodega Bay.
The average temperature at daytime is 80 degrees and there is only a 28 percent chance of rain.
What about the humidity level?
Humidity is around 44 percent.
Okay great. That's all for now.
Thanks.
What's the weather forecast for March 9th 2019 in Seattle?
The average temperature for the day will be 64 degrees. There's a 14 percent chance of rain.
How humid will it be?
The humidity is forecast at 13 percent.
Will it be windy?
The average wind speed will be around 5 miles per hour.
Okay. Thanks. Bye!
Have a good day.
Please tell me the weather forecast for March 4th.
Can you name the city you wish to know the forecast for?
I want to know the forecast for Toronto.
On March 4th, the temperature should be 70 degrees Fahrenheit with a 38 percent chance of rain.
I better make sure to dress cool for that day. Thanks for the information. That will be all for now.
You are quite welcome. Have a nice day.
I have to do weather check in Moraga.
The average day temperature is running at 70 degrees Fahrenheit and the chances of rain is 23 percent.
What is your opinion on March 7th 2019
The average day temperature is running at 73 degrees Fahrenheit and the chances of rain is 12 percent.
That is perfect. Bye
Be happy always.
I need to see the weather in Windsor
The average temperature will be 86 degrees Fahrenheit with a 21 percent chance of rain
OK, what about the weather in Las Vegas
It will be 84 degrees Fahrenheit and will have an 18 percent chance of rain
Ok, that's good, bye for now
Ok, have a good day
Can you get me a weather report for Yountville California?
Sure, the average temperature will be 75 degrees. There's only a 7 % chance of rain.
What's happening in Morgan Hill, March 4th?
The average temperature there is 72 Degrees F. There is a 29 % chance of rain.
Great, now I know.
Cool, (I think).
What is the weather going to be like on the 10th of March 2019?
What city should I check?
Please look at Lafayette.
There's a 14 percent chance of rain and the temperature will average 75 degrees.
Cool. What about March 6th?
The temperature will be 86 degrees on average and there's only a 1 percent chance of rain.
Alright. Can you check in Bolinas?
There's a 22 percent chance of rain and the temperature will average about 92 degrees.
Cool. Thanks! That'll be it.
Have a good day!
I want to do weather check in San Mateo.
There the average temperature for the day is at 80 degrees Fahrenheit and there is also 13 percent chance of rain.
What is your opinion on Larkspur on March 3rd.
There the average temperature for the day is at 85 degrees Fahrenheit and there is also 23 percent chance of rain.
That is cool.
Any other information you want me to look in?
No, thank you very much.
so be happy
I have a plan to make a trip but if weather is good i wish to travel. So will you find and check the weather on March 6th?
In which city do you wish to check the weather ?
In Petaluma city.
The average temperature for the day is 91 degrees fahrenheit and there is a 10 percent chance of rain.
Okay, Tell me how about the temperature in Union City?
In union city the average temperature for the day should be 71 degrees Fahrenheit. There is a 19 percent chance of rain.
Okay, How about the temperature is on March 9th?
The average temperature for the day will be 79 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 1 percent chance of rain.
Ok thats great.
whether i need to find any other thing?
No. thanks a lot!
take care have a great day
Can you tell me the weather in KL?
The average temperature should be 102 Fahrenheit with an 8 percent chance of rain.
How about Clayton on March 14th?
The average temperature should be 72 degrees Fahrenheit with a 6 percent chance of rain.
How windy will it be?
10 miles per hour on average.
Sure, okay.
Is there anything else?
No, thank you very much!
You're welcome!
I would like to check the weather for the 5th of March 2019.
In which city should I check?
Please check in Tomales on the 11th of March 2019.
The average temperature for the day is 89 degrees and there is a 23 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy? How humid will it be?
The humidity is low at 25 percent as is the wind at around 2 miles per hour.
Thank you.
Is there anything else that you need?
No thank you.
Cheers, have a nice day.
I want to plan something outdoors, so I want to check the weather for March 4th.
Can you tell me the city where you would like to check the weather forecast?
I am planning to go in Tomales, so that's the location for which I want to know the weather forecast.
I can see that the average temperature in Tomales for the day will be 85 degrees Fahrenheit, and there is a 28 percent chance that there will be rain.
Alright, can you also look into Toronto, Ontario for March 13th 2019?
I can see that the temperature in Toronto, Ontario for the day will be 62 degrees Fahrenheit, also there is a 1 percent chance that it will be raining.
Fine, that's good. That's all I needed. Later then!
It was a pleasure!
Check the weather in Olema, California for me.
The average temperature for the day in Olema is 91 degrees Farenheit. Today, there is a 21 percent chance of rain.
Alright, yea. How about on the 3rd of March 2019?
On the 3rd of March 2019 in Olema, California, the temperature is expected to average around 87 degrees Fahrenheit, and there will be a 23 percent chance of rain.
How about in Marshall on March 1st 2019?
In Marshall on that date the average temperature is expected to be around 86 degrees Fahrenheit, and there will be a 5 percent chance of rain.
Alright, cool. Thanks a bunch.
You're welcome, will that be all?
Yea that's it for now.
Okay, enjoy your day.
I need some quiet, outdoor harmony to balance out a wild day of back-to-back meetings. What kind of weather do you show for March 10th 2019, please?
Ready to assist you. Tell me the city you want to check and I can let you know.
Yes, take a look at Tiburon.
Okay. It is reported that the average day's high is expected to be 85 degrees Fahrenheit with a 15 percent possibility that it will rain.
Well, now, and what's the weatherman saying for the 5th of March 2019?
It is reported that the average high fo that day is expected to be 94 degrees Fahrenheit with a 20 percent possibility that it will rain.
I see. Take a look at Calistoga for me, please.
The report for that city is showing an average high of 73 degrees Fahrenheit for the day with a 12 percent possibility that rain will come.
Okay, well done.
Would you like any more assistance at this time?
You've provided all the info I need for now. Many thanks.
That's all for now. Enjoy the rest of your day.
I'd like to check the weather report in Rutherford.
Today's average temperature in Rutherford will be 86 degrees Fahrenheit with a 28 percent chance to rain.
How windy will it be?
The average wind speed will be around 10 miles per hour.
Alright, thanks! That will be all for today.
Thank you, have a great day!
Can you tell me what the weather will be like in San Bruno on the 8th of March 2019?
The average temperature should be 91 degrees Fahrenheit with a 10 percent chance of rain.
Okay, how about in Fresno, CA on March 3rd 2019?
The average temperature should be 77 degrees Fahrenheit with a 18 percent chance of rain.
Okay, that's all I need. Bye for now.
Have a good day!
Can you tell me if it is going to rain?
What city would like to check?
LAX please.
It will be a nice 76 degrees Fahrenheit with a 28 percent chance of rain.
What about on March 2nd.
It will be 93 degrees Fahrenheit with a 29 percent chance of rain.
Ok thanks
IS there anything else I can do for you.
No that will be all.
Have an enjoyable day ahead.
I want to check the weather in Palo Alto.
The average temperature should be 79 degrees Fahrenheit for the day and chance of rain is 4 percent.
How windy and humid is it expected to be?
The wind average speed should be 4 miles per hour and humidity is around 19 percent.
Sure. It is okay.
Do you like anything else?
No, thanks for your help.
Best wishes.good bye
What is the expected weather in Inverness on March 10th?
The temperature is expected to be 90 degree Fahrenheit with a 3 percent chance of rain.
What about in Union City?
The average temperature is 86 degrees Fahrenheit with a 9 percent chance of rain.
What are the humidity and wind suppose to be like?
The humidity is expected to be around 23 percent, wind 6 mph.
Sure, that will be great.
Anything else today?
No, that will be all.
Have a wonderful day.
What is the weather forecast on March 4th in Alamo?
There is a 24 percent chance of showers with an average temperature of 94.
What is the forecast the 1st of March 2019?
A 12 percent chance of showers with an average temperature of 81.
What is the forecsst in Hayward?
A 9 percent chance of showers with an average temperature of 80.
Thank you. That's all I need.
Have a lovely day.
What's the weather in Napa?
The daily average should be 85 degrees with a 24 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy?
Predicted wind speed of 6 miles per hour.
Oh okay.
Anything else I can do?
No, thanks.
Cheers.
I want to know what the weather will be like on March 2nd.
Sure. What city's weather do you need to know?
I want the weather of Nairobi.
The temperature of Nairobi has an average of 86 degrees for March 2nd.There's also a slight 6 percent chance that it will rain.
Not bad. Now, can you tell me the temperature of Valley Ford for the 12th of March 2019?
Valley Ford's average temperature for March 12th is 92 degrees. The percentage of precipitation is 11.
What's the wind going to be like? And what about the humidity?
The wind has an average of just 1 mile per hour, and the humidity is expected to be about 34 percent.
That seems fine.
Do you need help with anything else?
That's all. Thanks!
Have a nice day.
Hi I'm having guests over to BBQ. Can you check the weather in Discovery Bay?
The temperature today will be around 77 degrees Fahrenheit with a 9 percent chance of rain.
Thanks, and what about 9th of March 2019?
The temperature for your requested day will be around 89 degrees Fahrenheit with an 11 percent chance of rain.
Great, thanks.
Is there anything else you need?
No, that's all.
Have a nice day.
Do you know of any good places to eat?
Sure. What type of food are you interested in and where should it be?
I've got a hankering for some Burmese food. It should be in San Fran.
I've found 5 restaurants in San Francisco you may want to check out. The first is B Star, which is a very nice restaurant.
Yeah, that sounds good. Can I get a reservation for a table there?
Sure. What time do you want to go?
Please book the table for this afternoon 12:30.
Okay, to confirm: You want a table at B Star in San Francisco today at 12:30 pm. It will be a reservation for 2 people.
Yes, that sounds perfect.
Alright. Your table is booked.
Thanks a lot! That's all I need.
Have a great day!
Can you help me find a place to eat?
What type of food are you looking for and where would you like me to look?
Please find some average priced italian restaurants in Berkeley.
I have located Cugini Restaurant in Berkeley.
Can you recommend other ones?
Donato & Co. is a nice restaurant located in Berkeley.
Yes, that sounds good. Can you please book a table for one?
What time would you like?
Please make the reservation for 12:15 in the afternoon.
Please confirm the following: Booking a table today at 12:15 pm for 1 at Donato & co. in Berkeley.
No, the table needs to be for a party of four, and please make the reservation for 12:30 in the afternoon.
Please confirm the following details: The reservation is at 12:30 pm and for 4 people.
No, please look for a table on the 5th of March.
Please confirm the following details: The reservation is next Tuesday at 12:30 pm.
Yes, that is correct. What is the restaurant's rating?
Your reservation is successful. The restaurant has an average rating around 4.3.
Thank you very much.
Is there anything else that I can help you with?
No thank you.
Have a nice day.
I'm in the mood to eat something find me anything that have available serving Pick-up.
In what city you want to be?
In Santa Clara would be perfect.
A nice restaurant in Santa Clara is Chili's Grill & Bar .
Yes sounds good.
You want to reserve a table there?
Yes make it for 3 people,please.
At what time you want to be?
On 7 in the evening.
Book a table at Chili's Grill & Bar in Santa Clara at 7 pm today for 3 people.I'm right?
Yes perfect.Is the restaurant very expensive?
Reservation is successful .Is a moderate restaurant.
Thank you for help
Can I help you with something else?
No.Thank you very much.
Have a great day!
I'm searching for a place to eat
What kind of food do you want to eat?
I would prefer restaurant tagged ultra high-end for price serving diner
How about the location?
In San Fran
Acquerello is a good restaurant in San Francisco
Yes that's perfect
Would you like to book a table there?
Yes I want to reserve it
At what time should I reserve it?
Make it at 11:30
Please confirm this: Booking a table at Acquerello in San Francisco at 11:30 am today for 2 people
No make the table for one people
Please confirm this : The date is today for 1 people
No. Look for a table on 12th of this month
Please confirm this : The city is San Francisco on March 12th
Yes that's perfect for me
Your reservation has been made successfully
Thank you so much
Can I assist you something else?
No. Thanks a lot
Have a wonderful day
I feel like treating myself today. I plan to take myself out to a restaurant.
What type of cuisine are you interested in?
Asian sounds pretty good.
Where would you like to go out to eat?
I want to eat in Palo Alto.
There are 3 suitable restaurants. How about Burma Ruby Burmese Cuisine located in Palo Alto? It is a lovely restaurant.
Is there anything else, perhaps in Santa Clara?
There are 7 suitable restaurants there. I wish to recommend Beijing Restaurant, which is located in Santa Clara.
Do they serve vegetarian food.
No, they do not.
Is there anything else? I am a vegetarian, so that is very important to me. I do not mind the price.
There are 2 suitable options for vegetarian food. I wish to recommend Mayuri Indian Cuisine located in Santa Clara.
Does the restaurant have good reviews? Do they provide outdoor seating?
There is no outdoor seating. The restaurant has a 3.5 user rating.
That sounds great.
Would you like me to make a reservation for you?
Yes, I want a table for 7 in the evening.
You would like a table for 2 at the Mayuri Indian Cuisine in Santa Clara for today at 7 pm?
That sounds perfect.
I apologize, but the reservation was unsuccessful. Anything else I can assist you with?
See if you can book it for half past 6 in the evening instead.
You would like a table for 2 at the Mayuri Indian Cuisine in Santa Clara for today at 6:30 pm?
That would be fine. May I have a contact number and the address for the restaurant?
I have made the reservation. There number is 408-248-9747 and the location is 2232 El Camino Real
Thanks a lot. That is everything I need.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
I'm searching for a restaurant; get me one that serves pizza and pasta at San Fran.
I discovered 10 restaurant you may enjoy. There is a lovely diner called 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano at San Francisco.
Can you tell me their contact number, and their user rating?
Their contact number is 415-543-5100, and the rating is near 4.4
Could you suggest alternative diners?
There is a lovely diner called A16 located in San Francisco.
That's perfect. I want to reserve a spot at the restaurant for 3 people.
When do you wish for me to make the booking for?
Make the booking for six in the evening.
Please verify the following information: Rserve a table for 3 people at A16 in San Francisco for today at 6 pm.
Nope. I want a table for one person on the 5th of this month.
Please verify the following information: a booking for 1 person on next Tuesday.
That's fine by me. What's their address,a nd do they offer outdoor eating?
The booking has been made. The address is at 2355 Chestnut Street, and they do not offer outdoor seating.
Thank you for your assistance; that's all.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
I need a place to eat
What would you like to eat? In which area?
I would love a Sushi Bar, in Concord
In Concord I've found Ozora Sushi
Is there also a vegetarian menu?
For vegetarians they have many options
Can you give me the address and phone number of the restaurant?
Sure! 785 Oak Grove Road. Telephone number 925-691-6009
Very well. I would like to book a table
What time would you like to book?
At evening 6, please
A table for 2 people at Ozora Sushi in Concord, today at 6 pm: do you confirm?
Yes, that's right. Is it a cheap or expensive restaurant?
A moderate restaurant. Your table is booked
Thanks a lot!
You need anything else?
No, thanks! It's all
Have a nice day
I am feeling hungry, so I need to find a place to eat.
Is there a specific kind of cuisine that you are looking for?
I would like to be eating some Thai cuisine.
Can you tell me the location where you would like for the restaurant to be in?
I would like for the restaurant to be situated in SF.
I see that 10 restaurants match to what you might like. For example Baan Thai House & Wine Bar is a good restaurant and it can be found in San Francisco.
Can you see if some other restaurant is available? The restaurant I am looking for should be reasonably priced.
I see that 9 restaurants match to what you are looking for. One of the restaurants is Basil which is a good restaurant, the location of which is San Francisco.
Can you tell me the address of this restaurant?
The restaurant can be found at 1175 Folsom Street.
Alright, that seems nice. I would like to book a table at a restaurant.
Do you have a specific time for when you want the table booked?
I will be eating in the afternoon so make the booking to be for afternoon 1.
Can you please confirm that you want to make a booking for 2 people for a table at Basil restaurant which is in San Francisco, and you want the booking to be for today at 1 pm.
That suits me well.
Your booking has been made without errors.
Can you inform me, regarding the rating that users have given the restaurant, and also can you tell me if it has outdoor seating?
Unfortunately the restaurant doesn't have outdoor seating and the rating from it's users is 4.2.
I appreciate it very much! That would be all.
Have a good time!
I will be meeting with a friend and I need to find a place to eat.
Where do you want to look for?
If possible near San Jose.
What type of cuisine do you want?
I am craving some Soup & Salad.
There is 1 restaurant that you might like. McDonald's is in San Jose.
What is the phone number?
The phone number is 408-298-6533.
Are there vegetarian options in the restaurant? And do they have outdoor seating?
They neither have vegetarian options nor outdoor seating.
I want to book a table for the 4th of March?
At what time to you want to book it?
I changed my mind, change it to the 13th of March at afternoon 1.
Please confirm: Booking a table for 2 people at Mcdonald's in San Jose at 1 pm in March 13th.
Make it 3 people. And make it at half past 10 in the morning.
Please confirm: Booking a reservation for 3 people at 10:30 am.
No, make it for 4 people.
please confirm: Booking a reservation for 4 people at Mcdonald's.
That is correct.
Sorry, could not make a reservation. Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that would be all.
Have a great day.
I am hungry!
Where should I search? What kind of food would you like?
How about Diner style food. Please search in Lafayette.
American Kitchen is great and located in Lafayette.
Yes, that is great.
Do want to reserve a table?
Yes, please do.
What time should I book the table for?
Make it for 8 in the night.
Please confirm the following details: Booking a table for today at American Kitchen in Lafayette. The reservation is for 2 people at 8 pm.
Yes, that is fine. Is it ultra high-end?
Sorry, I was unable to book a table. Can I assist you with something else.
Try again please. But this time, book it for the evening 5:45.
Please confirm the following details: Booking a table for today at American Kitchen in Lafayette. The reservation is at 5:45 pm and for 2 people.
Yes, that works well.
Your reservation went through.
Thanks.
May I help you with something else?
No thanks.
Have a great day.
I want to find a place to eat
What location should I check?
Can you find some restaurants in Oakland?
What kind of food do you like?
I need Latin American with vegetarian options
I found 3 you might like. How about Agave Uptown in Oakland?
Can you find me some others? I want something not very costly
I found 2 you might like, how about Bar Cesar in Oakland?
What is their rating?
They have a rating of 4.1
Can you book me a table?
What time would you like?
Make it for 7:15 pm
Just to confirm, you want a table for 2 at Bar Cesar in Oakland at 7:15 pm today?
That works, what's the address?
I can't make that reservation, anything else?
That's all, thank you
You're welcome, have a great day
We're famished and would like to find some place to eat, preferably something serving Diner.
Which city should I search in?
Please look for restaurant in San Carlos.
Among the 4 suitable restaurants I found is a nice one in San Carlos called Izzy's San Carlos.
Sounds interesting, but let me hear your other restaurant recommendations.
Another nice restaurant in San Carlos is Piacere Restaurant.
Thanks. Please give me more restaurant recommendations.
Okay, the other nice restaurant I would recommend is The Cask Wine Bar in San Carlos.
Please find out whether they have outdoor seating.
Yes, they offer outdoor seating.
Sounds perfect. Please book me a table.
For what time should the reservation be?
Please reserve a table for 17:00.
Please confirm that you're making a reservation for 5 pm today, for a party of 2, at The Cask Wine Bar in San Carlos.
Yes, that's correct. Please find out whether they have vegetarian options on the menu.
I have successfully made your reservation. No, there are no vegetarian options.
Thank you very much.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. Thank you very much. You've been very helpful.
Have a great day.
I want to eat somewhere.
What kind of food do you want?
Find some place that serves tacos.
What location do I look in?
Find restaurants in San Jose.
I have 10 restaurants there that you should like. Chacho's is a nice on in San Jose.
Do you have something else you could recommend?
Chevys Fresh Mex is a good one in San Jose.
Okay, that is fine.
Do you want to make a reservation?
Yes, please.
For what time should the reservation be made?
I want my reservation to be made at quarter past 7 in the evening.
Please confirm that you want to book for 2 people at Chevys Fresh Mex in San Jose at 7:15 pm today.
No, it needs to be for 1.
So you want to make a reservation at 7:15 pm for 1?
No, make that March 6th at one in the afternoon.
So you would like your reservation to be at 1 pm next Wednesday?
Okay. Is outdoor seating available?
Your reservation has been made. There is no outdoor seating.
Thank you, that's it.
Have a great day.
I'd like to find a restaurant.
Sure, which location?
In SFO.
What style of food would you like?
Pizza and make sure they cater to vegetarians.
Ok, I've found a wonderful restaurant called 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano in San Francisco.
Hmmm, anything else? In fact, I'd like Southern food at any price range.
There's 25 Lusk in San Francisco.
What's there number and is there an outdoor seating area?
The number is 415-495-5875 and unfortunately there's no outdoor seating.
Ok, I'll go with this restaurant.
Great, what time should I reserve a table?
12:00
Please confirm your restaurant booking: A table for 2 today at 25 Lusk in San Francisco for 12 pm.
No, change it to the morning 10:45.
Please confirm the update: A reservation at 10:45 am in San Francisco.
Please change that to Saturday this week, thanks.
Please confirm the updated change: A table for 2, tomorrow.
Perfect
Sorry, this book is not confirmed. How about a table for 2 at 25 Lusk tomorrow at 11 am?
no
Is there anything else?
Nope, thanks.
Have a wonderful day, enjoy.
I want to go out to eat a barbecue place!
Which city are you visiting?
Find something in Redwood City.
I found 6 options you may like- how about Aly's On Main in Redwood City?
Is there outdoor seating?
No, there isn't.
What else can you recommend, I'm easy on price.
I have 5 alternatives- how about John Bentley's Restaurant in Redwood City?
Can you find some alternatives in Los Gatos?
California Cafe is a nice place in Los Gatos.
Are there vegetarian options available? What's the user rating?
It has a 4.1 rating, with good options for vegetarians.
I like the sound of it.
Shall I reserve a table here?
Yes, go ahead, make it for 5:15 in the evening.
So I'll book a table for 2 people at California Cafe in Los Gatos, for 5:15 pm today. Is that okay?
Actually, make the reservation at 17:45.
So I've amended the reservation at California Cafe to 5:45 pm, okay?
No, I want a table for four on 12th of March.
So to confirm, you want a table for 4 people on March 12th, okay?
Yes please, what's the address?
The street address for California Cafe is 50 University Avenue #260. Sorry, I couldn't make your reservation at 5:45 pm, I could try a reservation for 4 people at 6 pm on March 12th instead.
No, don't bother!
Anything else I can help you with?
No, thanks a lot for all you've done.
Have a good day!
Can you find me a place to eat?
What type of food do you prefer?
Find me something where persian food is served.
In which location you want to be?
In San Fran i would like .
I have 10 restaurants according to your requirements.First is located in San Francisco.Is a nice restaurant named Barcha.
Ye sounds good.
You want to reserve a table?
Yes I want please.
At what time you want to be?
Make it for me at 7:15 pm.
Book a table at Barcha in San Francisco today at 7:15 pm for 2 person.Is OK?
Yes is perfect.
The reservation was made.
Tell me the address please.
You can find them at 28 Fremont Street.
Thank you for all.
Anything else I can do?
No.Thank you!
Have a great day!
I want to find somewhere to eat.
What type of food sounds good tonight?
I'd like somewhere with sushi.
What location would you like to find a restaurant in?
Please find me places in San Fran.
Atami Sushi Bar & Grill in San Francisco looks like a nice restaurant.
What's its user rating and where is it located?
It's rated about 4.5 and the address is 1662 Lombard Street.
Yeah, that sounds great. Please book me a table.
What time would you like the reservation?
Please set it for 5:45 pm.
Great, please conform that you would like a table for 2 people today at 5:45 pm at Atami Sushi Bar & Grill in San Francisco.
Yeah, that sounds good.
My apologies, I couldn't make a reservation. Atami Sushi Bar & Grill is nice, should I make a reservation for 2 people today at 6 pm?
Yeah, that's fine with me.
The reservation was successful this time.
Thanks for your help, that's it for now.
Have a great day.
I want to eat out in San Fran.
What style food do you want?
I want Pizza and Pasta.
San Francisco has 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano and it's supposed to be good.
Give me a more moderate priced place please.
Give A16 a try. They are also in San Francisco.
Do they have Al Fresco seating? Where are they?
No on the Al Fresco but they are on 2355 Chestnut Street.
I'll just have to live with that.
Do you want a table?
Please set aside a table for me.
What time will you go?
How about in the evening 6.
Ok, I think I have it: table for 2 at A16 today at 6 pm in San Francisco?
I confirm it. Give me their number please.
You are hereby reserved. Call them at 415-771-2216 if you wish.
That seems ideal.
What else would you need? a Ride?
No, I'm good.
Bon appetite.
Help me please to find a place where I can serve Cambodian food.
Where to be?
In Oakland I would like to be.
In Oakland i found a nice restaurant named Binh Minh Quan.
Are other good restaurants available?
A nice restaurant located in Oakland is Holy Basil Pho.
Can you tell me please the phone number?
you can find them at 510-601-8818.
Yes perfect.Book for me a table at this restaurant please.
At what time you want to be?
Make it at 12:45 in the afternoon.
Book a table at Holy basil Pho in Oakland at 12:45 pm today for 2 person.I'm right?
Yes is good for me.
I'm sorry the reservation failed.You want me to try again for 2 people today at 1 pm because Holy Basil Pho is a nice place.
No.Thank you very much.
Can I still be useful in something else?
No.Thank you.
Have a great day!
I want a Japanese food place.
What location do you want me to look in?
Find restaurants in Cupertino.
I have 4 restaurants for you. What about Amami Shima Sushi in Cupertino?
Tell me about the other ones.
Azuma Japanese Cuisine is a nice one in Cupertino.
Do they have vegetarian choices and outdoor seating?
There is no outdoor seating nor vegetarian options.
Could you recommend something else then?
Pokeworks is a nice on in Cupertino.
Yes, that is great.
Could you reserve a table here?
Yes, please reserve a table for 2.
What time do I need to make the reservation?
Make it for quarter past 12 in the afternoon.
So you want to book at Pokeworks in Cupertino? You would like a reservation or 12:15 pm today for 2. Is that right?
Yes that is good. Is the restaurant pricey? Where are they located?
Sorry, the reservation did not work. Need help with something else?
Could you book a table again for 3 at 18:45?
SO you want to book at Pokeworks in Cupertino, at 6:45 pm today, and it is for 3 people, right?
Yes, good.
Your reservation was successfully made.
Thanks a bunch
Do you need more help?
No, that is it.
Have a great day.
Where is a good dining place?
What town would you like to search?
I want somewhere Al Fresco in Livermore.
What style food do you like?
How about Mediterranean?
1 option for you is Demitri's Taverna. It's a nice place in Livermore.
Whats the rating there?
The user rating is 4.4.
Got it. That's great.
Do you want a table there?
Yes, I need a table on the 10th. I want to eat at 19:15
Ok, to be clear: Table for 2 at Demitri's Taverna in Livermore at 7:15 pm. on March 10th.
No, I'm sorry you misheard. I want the table on the 3rd of this month. I want to go at 6:30 in the evening.
Ok, I think I have it. 6:30 pm. day after tomorrow?
You nailed it, thanks.
You're table is reserved now.
How can I reach them? Where are they?
Location is 2235 First Street. Phone them at 925-373-0306.
Perfect, thanks.
What else would you like?
Nothing, I'm good.
Enjoy your meal.
I need somewhere to eat tonight. Can you help me find a place?
Sure, where should I search? What kind of cuisine would you like?
Please find me some Malaysian restaurants in San Jose.
There is a lovely restaurant called Erawan Thai Cuisine in San Jose.
Is there anything else you can recomment? I'd like something that's not very costly.
I think you'll like Krungthai in San Jose.
What is their contact number? And what about their restaurant user rating?
The restaurant is rated 4.2 stars and you can contact them at 408-260-8224.
That sounds good.
Should I book a table there?
Yes, please book a table for Sunday this week.
What time should the reservation be for?
Make it for one in the afternoon for 4 people.
So you'd like a table for 4 people at Krungthai in San Jose for 1 pm the day after tomorrow. Is this correct?
Yes that's perfect.
The reservation has been made.
Thank you, that'll be all.
Have a great day.
I think it will be better to me if I eat outside once, and I need to search for a nice place to eat.
What is your present location? If you inform me your desired location, I can search for the best place to eat.
I like to eat at some good place in San Jose, will please search here for me?
Is there any particular type of food you are looking for?
Yes, I prefer something with spices like Spicy Noodles.
Found 10 restaurants as per your wish. Among them Erawan Thai Cuisine is the best I think which is located in San Jose.
Is there something else?
Yes, How about a restaurant Krungthai at San Jose?
No, please check with some other Vegetarian Restaurants.
found 8 and Lanna Thai Restaurant is the nice one which is located in San Jose, is that Okay to you?
Is this expensive one? let me know their address.
No, their rates are moderate and their address is 2043 Camden Avenue.
This will be a good one and please book me a table there.
At what time?
Make it at 6:45 pm.
Please confirm to book a table for 2 at Lanna Thai Restaurant in San Jose at 6:45 pm on today.
change the date to 5th of March.
Okay, please confirm to book on next Tuesday at 6:45 pm.
Yes, confirmed, continue with booking.
Sorry, I could not make it on that time, how about a booking for 2 on the same Lanna Thai restaurant on next Tuesday but for the time at 6:30 pm?
No thanks, that's for now.
Have a great day.
I am looking for a restaurant.
Where should I look?
Find restaurants in Benicia.
What kind of food do you want to eat?
I want something that serves Coffee & light bites.
I have 3 restaurants you may like. How about First St. Cafe? That is a nice restaurant in Benicia.
Is outdoor seating available?
There is outdoor seating.
Okay, that is fine.
Would you like to reserve?
Yes, I would. I want a table at 11:30 am this Sunday.
Could you confirm that you want to book at First St. Cafe in Benicia? The reservation is for the day after tomorrow for 2 people at 11:30 am.
No, it needs to be for four. Make me a reservation at half past 1 in the afternoon.
So you would like to make the reservation at 1:30 pm for 4?
Yes that is right.
Sorry, the reservation could not be made. Could I help with another thing?
Could you try that again? I want a table for March 11th.
Please confirm that you want to book at First St. Cafe in Benicia for 1:30 pm on March 11th for 4.
No, it needs to be for 1 person.
So you would like to book for 1 person in Benicia?
Yes, that is good. Cold you tell me the restaurant's user rating and phone number?
Sorry, the reservation could not be made. Shall I help with something else?
No, that is it.
Have a great day.
Can you find me a Moroccan restaurant?
Where should I search?
Find a restaurant in SFO that has outdoor seating.
I found 1 place called Khamsa in San Francisco.
That sounds good. Can you make a reservation at 19:15?
Can you confirm that you want to book at table at Khamsa for 2 in San Francisco for today at 7:15 pm?
Yes, that works.
Sorry, I couldn't book your table for that time. How about a table at Khamsa for 2 people today at 7:30 pm?
Yes, that works.
I reserved your table; can I help you with anything else?
Do they have vegetarian options there and how expensive is the restaurant?
They have many vegetarian options and they have moderate prices.
Thank you so much.
Can I help you with anything else?
No; that's all.
Have a good day.
I'm looking for somewhere to eat vegetarian food.
What kind of food would you like and where would you like me to search?
I like Pizza and Pasta and am looking for moderate priced restaurants in Sunnyvale.
Gumba's in Sunnyvale is a nice restaurant.
Do you have any other recommendations?
Il Postale is also a nice restaurant in Sunnyvale.
How about other restaurants?
Pezzella's Villa Napoli in Sunnyvale is a nice place to eat.
Great. I'd like to reserve a table.
What time would you like me to make the reservation?
I'd like to go at 8 in the night.
Sure no problem. So just to confirm: You would like to book a table for 2 people at Pezzella's Villa Napoli in Sunnyvale today at 8 pm.
Actually no, I'd like to change the date to the 13th of this month and I only need a reservation for 1.
So that's March 13th for 1 person.
I've changed my mind again. Please make the reservation for morning 11:45 for three people.
So that's a reservation at 11:45 am for 3 people.
Perfect. What is the customer rating for the restaurant and do they have outdoor seating?
Unfortunately I have been unable to make a reservation. The restaurant does have outdoor seating and customers have given Pezzella's Villa Napoli restaurant a rating of 4.3. Would you like me to book a table for March 13th at 12 pm instead?
Sure that's fine.
Your reservation has been successful.
Thanks
Do you need help with anything else?
No thanks
Enjoy your day.
I'm searching for a restaurant; get me something from SF.
What type of cuisine are you searching for?
Get me a place that serves pizza.
I discovered 10 diners you may enjoy. There is a lovely diner called 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano in San Francisco.
Can you tell me its address?
The restaurant address is 16 Mint Plaza.
Yup, that's perfect for me.
Do you wish to book a table there?
Yeah, I'd like to book a table.
When do you want me to book it for?
Book a table for one person at 18:00 of March 9th.
Please verify the following information: a booking for 1 person at 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano in San Francisco for 6 pm on MArch 9th.
Nope. Make the booking for 20:00.
Please verify the following information: a booking for 1 person at 8 pm.
Yeah, that's perfect. What's the diner's user rating?
I apologize, but I could not make the booking. Could I assist you with something else?
Could you try making the reservation once more for one person?
Please verify the following information: a booking for 1 person at 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano in San Francisco on March 9th of 8 pm.
Nope. Get me a table for Tuesday next week.
Please verify the following information: a booking for 1 person on next Tuesday.
Yeah, that's perfect. Does the diner offer outdoor seating?
I apologize, but I could not make the booking. Could I assist you with something else?
No, thank you for your assistanace.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
Fine me a place to eat.
Where do you want and what kind of food to you like?
Find me Sushi places in San Jose.
Search revealed 10 results. Do you like Bluefin in San Jose?
What else do you have?
Dan Izakaya Restaurant is in San Jose.
Does their menu have vegetarian food?
They do not have vegetarian food.
What is their contact number and their rating?
Their contact number is 408-249-6020 and it is rating 4.4.
That works for me. Make a reservation.
What time do you want?
I want a reservation for evening 6:30.
You want a reservation for 2 people at Dan Izakaya Restaurant in San Jose today for 6:30 pm. Is that right?
No, I want it on the 10th for 1 person.
You want a reservation for March 10th for 1 person. Is that right?
That is right. What is their address and do they offer outdoor seating?
Your booking is confirmed. Their location is 1306 Saratoga Avenue and they don't offer outdoor seating.
Thanks a lot.
Do you need anything more?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a great day.
I'm starving! I need to get myself some food.
Any type of food in mind? Where should I look?
I'm in the mood for lobster right now. Is there anywhere that serves that in Walnut Creek?
Andy's Sushi sells lobster, and is at Walnut Creek.
I'd like to be aware of some other restaurants. Can you find me some reasonably priced restaurants in San Jose?
How about Ariake? It has some inexpensive food, and is located at San Jose.
That sounds good.
Would you like to reserve a table at Ariake?
Yes I do.
What time would you like?
I'd like to reserve a table for 1 at morning 11:30.
Okay. So, I should book you a table for 1 at Ariake in San Jose, at 11:30 am today?
Actually, I need some extra time to prepare, and a few of my friends want to come along. Can you instead make the reservation at 1:15 pm for 3 people?
Okay. You would rather book at table for 3 at 1:15 pm?
Yes. What's the user rating of the restaurant? Can I have their meals outdoors if I so desire?
I'm so sorry! I couldn't reserve your table. As for your questions, the users rank it highly, with an average of 4.0. Outdoor seating is unavailable. Now then, would you be okay with me instead booking your table for 3 at Ariake on today at 1:30 pm?
Yes, that would be fine.
I have successfully reserved your table.
Great! Many thanks.
Can I do anything else for you?
Nope! That'll be all. Thanks.
I hope you have a wonderful time at Ariake.
I'd like to find a place to eat.
Okay. Can you tell me what kind of food you'd like, and the area you want the restaurant to be?
I want to eat at a Southern restaurant, in SF.
I've got a good one here, called 1760. It's in San Francisco, as you wanted.
Can you give me their phone number? How expensive a restaurant are we talking?
The number there is 415-359-1212. They are pricey, in term of cost.
Could you recommend any other restaurants?
Okay, how about 25 Lusk? That's a nice place in San Francisco.
Can you give me the name of any other restaurants? I want to go someplace pricey.
Here's one, 3rd Cousin. It's in San Francisco.
That sounds good.
Do you want me to reserve you a table there.
Yes, please reserve me a table. I want to eat there on Wednesday next week.
What time do you want me to try to get a reservation for?
I'd like to eat at 6:45 pm.
Okay, let me confirm. You want me to make a reservation at 3rd Cousin in San Francisco, next Wednesday at 6:45 pm, for 2 people.
That sounds great. Can you check if they have outdoor seating?
I couldn't make a reservation, sorry. They don't have any outdoor seating. But 3rd Cousin is really a nice nice restaurant. Want me to try again for a reservation, maybe next Wednesday at 6:30 pm for 2?
That will work.
This time the reservation was successful.
Great, thanks.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, thanks. That's all.
I hope you have a great day!
Could you help me find places to eat that serves breakfast?
Any preferred location you would like to visit?
I would prefer one that is located in Vacaville.
I have found 2 restaurants, one of which is Los Reyes Restaurante Y Cantina located in Vacaville.
That sounds great.
Do you need me to reserve a table for you?
Yes, please do so.
At what time would you like to reserve the table for?
Please make the reservation at 17:15, thanks.
Please confirm your reservation for 2 at Los Reyes Restaurante Y Cantina at Vacaville today at 5:15 pm.
Could you change the date to next Friday instead?
Please confirm your reservation next Friday at 5:15 pm.
That's fine. May I have their address please?
They are located at 21 Town Square Place # A. Unfortunately I was not able to make the reservation. Would you like to reserve a table of 2 next Friday at 5:30 pm at Los Reyes Restaurante Y Cantina instead?
Sure, that is fine with me.
Your reservation has been made.
Thanks a bunch, that's all I need.
Sure, have a great day ahead!
I would like to go to a restaurant.
Where would you like to go?
Look for places in Berkeley.
Are you in the mood for a particular food?
Yes, scan the area for Freshwater fish.
There are 4 restaurants that can satisfy your cravings. What about Akemi Japanese Restaurant in Berkeley?
Look on the menu if they also offer vegetarian food. What are the ratings?
The rating is 4.3 and the vegetarians have so much to choose from the menu.
That's excellent. Book a table please.
What time do you want to be there?
Book at evening 4:45
Confirm me the details before I proceed. You want a table at Akemi Japanese Restaurant in Berkeley. You want it for today at 4:45 pm and it must be for 2 people.
Yes, you can go on.
The table has been reserved.
Where do we have to go?
You need to reach 1695 Solano Avenue.
Can we seat outside?
No, they don't offer this option.
Thanks a lot.
How can I help you now?
You can't, I'm good.
Bye sir.
Hey! We have a business lunch outing this month and I would prefer to reserve table for the business lunch outing. Can you find some good hygienic dining?
Sure! which is your preferred location?
We would like to have in Danville. Please find some good restaurants there.
Do you have any food preference like Thai, American, Chinese etc or looking for an ordinary lunch?
We would love to have some Italian specials.
Okay! There is a good rating restaurant, Incontro Ristorante located in Danville. Do you wish to have your lunch here?
Yup! Sounds good.
Can I help you in reserving a table at this restaurant?
Sure. Please reserve a table for the 10th of this month.
At what time you people will be available?
We will be available for the reservation at around 6:45 pm.
Let me give you the booking details. Please confirm me. So you would like to book a table at the restaurant Incontro Ristorante in the city Danville at 6:45 pm on March 10th. The reservation for time being would be for 2 people, right?
Yup. You're correct.
Okay! I made the reservation for you. It's successful.
Thanks a lot. I am done with.
Have a wonderful day.
I need to find a play to eat
Sure, what kind of food do you like? What area are you looking for?
I like Asian Fusion. I want something not very costly in Oakland
I found 5 that you might like. How about Battambang Restaurant? It is in Oakland.
Any other restaurants that are good in SF?
I found 10 you might like. How about Bai Thong Thai in San Francisco?
Sure, that works
Should I reserve a table?
Yes, go ahead
What time works best?
Make it for 13:00
Just to confirm, you need a table for 2 at Bai Thong Thai in San Francisco at 1 pm today?
Make it for four people
Ok, so for today and for 4 people?
Can you make it for the morning 11?
Ok, so just to confirm, you want the reservation for today and 11 am?
Yes! What is their phone number and rating?
Sorry, I can't make that reservation, anything else?
Can you try again, make sure it is or four people
Just to confirm, you need a table for 4 at Bai Thong Thai in San Francisco at 11 am today?
That is correct
Sorry, I can't make that reservation, anything else?
No, that's all, thanks.
Have a great day
I would like to eat in a restaurant.
Do you also have a specific food request?
Yes, I would love to try Himalayan
Where do I have to look?
Look in the San Rafael area.
There 1 restaurant called Napoli Pizza-taste of the Himalayas and it's in San Rafael.
Do they serve vegetarians food?
No, I'm afraid they don't.
It's fine with me. Get a table for three people at 13:00
Okay, confirm me the following before I go on. I'll book a table at Napoli Pizza-taste of the himalayas in San Rafael for 3 people. The table is for today at 1 pm
Yes, you can go on now.
I apologize, the reservation is not possible. Can I assist you in some other procedure?
Try to make the reservation at evening 6.
Okay, read the specifics and tell me if they are correct. You want a table at Napoli Pizza-taste of The Himalayas in San Rafael for 3 people. You want to go today at 6 pm.
Yes, it's correct. Do you know if the restaurant is pricey? Can you tell me the address?
The reservation is confirmed. The location is 869 4th street and it is classified as a moderate restaurant.
That's great, bye for now.
Enjoy your evening.
I want to go out to eat, please find a restaurant.
Please indicate the type of food you'd like to eat and the location where you would like to eat.
I'd like to eat somewhere in San Mateo. Sushi sounds good.
There are 7 results that meet your criteria. There is a restaurant in San Mateo called Daiki Sushi. How does that sound?
That sounds good.
Do you want to reserve a table for this restaurant?
Yes, please make a reservation at this restaurant.
For which time would you like to make this reservation?
Please reserve a table at 17:30.
Please verify the following details. You would like to reserve a table for 2 today at 5:30 pm. The restaurant is Daiki Sushi in San Mateo. Is this correct?
Yes, that's correct. Please tell me the reviewer rating of the restaurant, and their contact number.
The reservation request has been made successfully. The average rating of this restaurant is 3.9. You can contact the restaurant at 650-522-9698.
Thank you, I don't need anything else.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
I'm feeling peckish, can you find me somewhere to eat?
I sure can. Where would you like to eat? And what kind of food do you fancy?
Can you see if there's anything in Mountain View that serves Turkish food?
I've found 1 in Mountain View called Cafe Baklava, it looks nice
Yeah that sounds great. Can you book me a table?
Sure, what time?
Half past 5 in the evening please
Okay, just to confirm, do you want me to book a table for 2 today at Cafe Baklava in Mountain View? I'll book it for 5:30 pm.
Yes please. Do you know if they have vegetarian options, and do they have outdoor seating?
Table booked! Yes they have outdoor seating and it looks like they have some good vegetarian options
Great, thank you. I don't need anything else.
No problem, have a lovely meal!
I'd like to find a place to eat.
Where would you like me to search?
I'd like to eat in San Jose.
What kind of food would you like?
I'd like to eat Barbecue.
There are 10 restaurants that meet your criteria. There is a nice restaurant in San Jose called 71 Saint Peter.
Does the restaurant have outdoor seating.
Yes outdoor seating is available.
Do you have any other recommendations?
Another option in San Jose is Bazille.
How about other restaurants?
Billy Berk's in San Jose is a nice place.
Do they have outdoor seating?
Unfortunately they don't.
Okay Fine. I'd like to book a table for March 13th.
What time would you like to book a table for?
Please make the reservation for 12:15.
Sure so just to confirm: You would like to book a table for 2 on March 13th at 12:15 pm at Billy Berk's in San Jose.
Perfect. What is the customer rating of the restaurant and where are they located?
Your booking has been confirmed. The restaurant has a customer rating of 3.7 and the address is 99 South 1st Street.
Thanks a lot.
Do you need help with anything else?
No thanks.
Enjoy your day.
My best friend is in town and I'd like to take him out for a meal. Please recommend some restaurants for me.
Which city should I search in?
Please search for restaurants in Moraga.
Do you have a particular cuisine in mind?
A restaurant serving Pizza and Pasta works for me.
I found 2 nice restaurants that you may be interested in. How about La Finestra Ristorante, in Moraga?
I've dined at La Finestra Ristorante several times and would like a change. You mentioned 2 restaurants. What is the other recommendation?
Ristorante Amoroma is also another nice Restaurant in Moraga
Please give me their address and phone number.
They are at 360 Park Street, and you can call them on 925-377-7662.
Sounds good to me.
Will there be anything else?
Please help me book a table for two at the restaurant.
What time would you like to reserve it for?
The reservation should be for afternoon 1.
Let me see if I got everything correctly: Reserving a table for 2 for today at 1 pm, at Ristorante Amoroma in Moraga.
That is correct.
I have successfully made your reservation.
Thank you very much. You've been very helpful.
Do you need help with anything else?
No. Thank you very much.
Have a great day.
I'd like to find a place to eat in Santa Rosa. Can you find a restaurant that serves Barbecue?
I've found 9 results. How about Belly Left Coast Kitchen & Taproom in Santa Rosa?
Do you have other options? How about in Newark?
I've found 1 result. How about Chuck E. Cheese's in Newark?
Yes, sounds good.
Would you like to reserve a table?
Yes, please. I'd like a table on March 12th.
What time would you like the reservation?
I'd like to book a table for one at quarter past 11 in the morning.
So you'd like to book a table for 1 at Chuck E. Cheese's in Newark? The reservation is at 11:15 am on March 12th.
Yes, sounds good. What's the address?
Your reservation has been confirmed. The address is 39839 Mowry School Road.
Thank you, that's all I needed.
Have a nice day.
I'm kinda hungry. Can you help me find a place where I can eat?
What kind of food do you feel like eating?
Something Latin American.
In what location?
Milpitas, please.
Baja Cactus is one of the good ones in Milpitas.
Do they have vegetarian options?
They have a few good ones, yes.
Do they have outdoor seating?
Unfortunately, they don't.
I think that's good for me. Can you book me a table for the 12th?
Around what time?
At 11:30 am, if possible.
Please confirm: you want to book a table at Baja Cactus in Milpitas on the March 12th. A table for 2 at 11:30 am.
That works. What's their user rating and address?
Your reservation was successful. They have a 4.3 rating and are located on 338 South Main Street.
Thanks a lot.
Can I assist you in anything else?
No, that's all. Thank you.
Have a great day.
I would like a restaurant in SF
What kind of food should it serve?
I'd like a Diner
In San Francisco there's 1760
Is it an intermediate priced or expensive restaurant?
It's a pricey restaurant
Ok, It's good for me! Reserve a table at one in the afternoon
A table for 2 people at 1760 in San Francisco for today at 1 pm: do you confirm?
No, I prefer a table on 5th of March at six pm.
A table at 6 pm next Tuesday: It's correct?
Yes, It's correct, thanks
Unfortunately it is not possible to make a reservation. Can I look for something else?
Try to book for the 14th of this month
A reservation for 2 people at 1760 in San Francisco, for March 14th at 6 pm: It's correct?
Yes, It's correct
It is not possible to make a reservation. Can I look for something else?
No, thank you very much
Have a nice day
I will be gathering with some friends, what restaurants do you recommend?
What type of cuisine do you want to eat? And where do you want to look for?
If possible in Oakland and that they serve Freshwater Fish.
There are 7 restaurants that match your criteria. There is a restaurant in Oakland called Alamar Kitchen & Bar.
Do you know of any other restaurant?
There is also a restaurant in Oakland called Judoku Sushi.
What is the price range of the restaurant?
It is a moderate price range restaurant.
Are there other restaurants?
There is also a restaurant in Oakland called Lake Chalet.
What is their phone number?
The phone number is 510-208-5253.
That sounds great.
Do you want to make a reservation?
Yes, please. If possible for next Wednesday for three people.
At what time do you want your reservation?
Looking to book a table for the 9th of March at afternoon 12.
please confirm: Booking a table for 3 people at 12 pm on March 9th at Lake Chalet in Oakland.
Yes, that is correct. Are there vegetarian options?
The table has been booked. And they do have vegetarian options.
What is the price range of the restaurant?
It is a moderate price range.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that would be all.
Have a great day.
I am looking for a place to eat that serves Oriental.
Should I search any particular location?
Can you find restaurants in Orinda?
Siam Orchid is a nice restaurant in Orinda.
Is it an ultra high-end restaurant?
It is a moderate one.
Ok, that will be good.
Would you like a table reserved?
Yes, I would like to reserve a table for the 3rd of March.
Do you know what time you would like it reserved for?
Yes, please make it for in the evening 6:45.
Please confirm that you would like to book at table at Siam Orchid in Orinda the day after tomorrow at 6:45 pm for 2 people.
Yes, perfect, can you give me their user rating?
Their user rating is about 4.4 and I have made your reservation.
Thank you, that is all I need for now.
Ok, have a wonderful day!
I'm in the mood for some good music, can you find me something?
Sure. Do you like Connar Moon? There's a good song called Annie on the Oxford album
When did it come out?
It was released in 2018
What genre is it?
It's a folk song
I'm not really feeling Folk. Do you have anything else?
Do you like Halsey? I think you might like the song Colors, it's on the Badlands album
Oh yes, that one sounds perfect. Can you play it on the speaker in the kitchen?
Of course! Just to confirm that you're happy for me to play Colors on the kitchen speaker?
Actually can you play it in my bedroom?
Sure. Just confirm that you're happy for me to play Colors on your bedroom speaker?
Yes please!
No problem! I've put it on for you, hope you enjoy.
Thank you. What year is it, '11? And what genre is it?
It's an electropop song from 2015.
Cool, thanks - I don't need anything else
Great. Enjoy the music!
I need to hear some nice songs, Country songs will be better.
found 10 results that suit you and All on me by Devin Dawson in album Dark Horse is the nice one.
Yes, this will be a good one.
Shall I play it now?
Yes, do it for me now.
Please confirm to play All On Me song on TV.
No, I like to listen it in the Kitchen speaker.
Then, please confirm to play All On Me song on Kitchen speaker.
Sorry to trouble you, please play it on my bedroom device.
It's okay, please confirm to play the song All On Me on Bedroom speaker.
Yes, that works fine.
Started playing the song, you can enjoy it now.
What is the year of release of this song?
It was released in the year 2017.
Thanks for your information, that's enough.
Have a great day.
I'm searching for music. There are plenty of wonderful music in the album Stories.
I discovered 1 music for you. What is your opinion about Broken Arrows by Avicii in the album Stories?
What type of song is it, and it it from nine years back?
It is pop music from 2015.
Yeah, that's perfect for me. I'd like to listen to songs.
Please verify the following information: cast the song Broken Arrows on TV.
Yeah, that's right.
Have fun with your song.
Thank you so much! that's all.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
I'm after some music!
Okay what about Open Up by Matt Simons from his album After the Landslide?
What else is there?
You could try She Loves Control by Camila Cabello from her album Camila.
What about a song from Wake up Dreaming?
Okay I've got 1 song here, The Zombie Song by Stephanie Mabey from her album Wake up Dreaming.
What kind of music is it?
This is pop music
Okay great sounds good.
Do you want me to play it?
Yes please, can you cast it to the kitchen speaker
Confirming you want to hear The Zombie Song on the kitchen speaker.
Yes please. Is this song from five years ago?
Now playing your song! It was released in 2012.
Thanks so much.
Do you need anything else?
No, that's all.
Enjoy your music.
I'd like to hear some music, please find a song for me.
Okay, how about the song Before I Cry by Lady Gaga off of the album A Star is Born Soundtrack. Would you like to hear it?
No thanks, please find another song.
Okay, how about the song Barefoot in the Park by James Blake off of the album Assume Form. Would you like to hear it?
No, please find another song for me. I like the artist Limbo.
Okay, how about the song Airplane Mode by Limbo off of the album Holo. Would you like to hear it?
Is it that song from nine years back?
This song is from 2017.
Yeah that's it, I want to hear that song. Please play it on any device.
Please verify the following details. You would like to hear the song Airplane Mode on the TV. Is this correct?
Yeah that's right.
Please enjoy the song.
Thanks.
Do you require any further assistance?
No that's all.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Can you help me find a song? I enjoy country music.
I have 10 recommendations. How about All On Me by Devin Dawson in the album Dark Horse?
That sounds good.
Should I play the song?
Yes, play it on the kitchen speaker.
So I should play All On Me on the kitchen speaker?
Actually, play it in my bedroom instead.
So I should play All On Me on the bedroom speaker?
Yes, please do.
The song has begun.
Thank you, that's all I wanted.
Have a nice day.
I want to find a song from about six years back.
What about Alive by Sia in the This is Acting album?
What sort of music is it?
The song is a pop song.
Yes, that's it.
Do you want to play this song?
Yes.
Could you confirm that you want to play the song Alive on the TV?
No, put it on the kitchen device.
Please confirm that you want to play the song Alive on the kitchen speaker.
Yep, that is right.
Enjoy listening.
Thanks! That is just what I needed.
Have a great day.
Can you find me a song?
Sure. How about Small Town Boy by Dustin Lynch from the album Current Mood?
What genre of music is that?
It's a Country song.
Okay, that should work.
Do you want me to play it?
Yes. Please go ahead.
To confirm, you want to play Small Town Boy on the TV.
Yes, that would be perfect.
Playing it now. Enjoy!
Thank you so much.
Do you need help with anything else?
Nope. That will be all. Thanks.
Have a great day!
I want to hear a good song.
How about Only You by Ric Hassani from The African Gentleman.
Do you have something else?
How about Focus by Ariana Grande from Dangerous Woman.
How about something from '14?
How about Addicted by Popcaan from Where We Come From.
yes that is good.
Please confirm Addicted on the TV.
Change to play on speaker in the kitchen.
Confirm Change to play Addicted the kitchen speaker.
change to play on my bedroom speaker.
Confirm to play Addicted on my bedroom speaker.
I confirm. What is the genre?
It is a Reggae song and enjoy.
Thank you that is all I need.
Have a great day.
I'd like to listen to some music. Please find me some pop music from two years ago.
There are 10 results that fit your criteria. Would you like to hear Airplane Mode by Limbo off of the album Holo?
Yes, that's the song I want to listen to. Please play it on the speaker in the kitchen.
Please verify the following details are correct. You would like to hear Airplane Mode on the Kitchen speaker. Is this correct?
No, I'd rather hear it on the speaker in the bedroom.
Please verify the following details are correct. You would like to hear Airplane Mode on the bedroom speaker. Is this correct?
Yes, please do that.
Please enjoy the song.
Thanks.
Do you require any further assistance?
No, that's all.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Can you find me some Electropop songs?
There are 10 songs. How about Battle Symphony by Linkin Park from the album One More Light?
Can you find me the year of it's release?
The song was released in the year 2017.
Is there some other songs by Halsey from 2015?
How about Colors by Halsey from the album Badlands?
Yes, That is the song I want to listen.
Do you want me to play the song?
Yes please, Play it on kitchen device.
Please confirm: You want me to play Colors on the Kitchen speaker.
Yes, That is right.
Your song is playing. Enjoy the music.
That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day.
Hi, i need a help, I love for listening songs, Could you find some songs for me?
Sure, i will help you, I found 10 good songs for you, Do you like Still Ridin Shotgun by Tyler Wood In the album outlaw Soul
Find another song for me?
Do you like Stupid Deep song by Jon Bellion in the album Glory Sound Prep.
Yes, I like that song very much.
Can i play the song for you?
yes, play it
please confirm the following details: play the song Stupid Deep on TV
No, Play it on Kitchen speaker
please confirm the following details: play the song Stupid Deep on Kitchen speaker
Sorry, play it on speaker in the bedroom
please confirm the following details: play the song Stupid Deep on bedroom speaker
Yes, that's right
Started playing the song on Bedroom speaker, enjoy
Ok, thank you very much for your help, That's all i need.
you are welcome, Shall i help you with anything more?
No, thanks bye
Have a wonderful day, bye
I am looking for songs.
I found 10 songs including Sorry from the the Justin Bieber album Purpose.
Do you have any songs by Shatta Wale?
There is a song called Shatta Movement on the Shatta Wale album Foundation.
What is the genre? Did it come out one years ago?
It is a reggae song from 2015.
That is the song.
Do you want to hear it?
Please play it on any device.
Please confirm you want to play Shatta Movement on the TV.
Actually, play it on the kitchen speaker.
Please confirm you want to play Shatta Movement on the kitchen speaker.
That is perfect.
Enjoy the song!
Thank you very much.
May I further assist you?
No, that will be all.
See you soon!
I'd like to listen to some music, please find a song for me.
Okay, how about the song Must be the Whiskey by Cody Jinks off of the album Lifers. Would you like to hear it?
Please find a different song.
How about the song Hotel Key by Old Dominion off of the album Happy Endings. Would you like to hear it?
Please find a different song, I'd like to hear something from the year '16.
Okay, how about the song Another Day of Sun by La La Land Cast off of the album La La Land. Would you like to hear it?
What genre of music is this song?
This song is a soundtracks style of song.
Sure, that's the song I'm looking for.
Would you like me to play this song for you?
Yes, please play that song.
Please verify the following is correct. You'd like to her Another Day of Sun and you want to play it on the TV. Is this correct?
Correct, I want to hear it.
Please enjoy the song.
Thanks, I don't need any more help.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
I'd like to find a song to listen to.
How about Hate Me by Eurielle from the album Arcadia?
What year was it released?
Arcadia was released in 2015.
Ok, that's the one. Cast the song to my speaker in the kitchen.
Please confirm the following: Play song hate me on the Kitchen speaker.
Yes that's right. By the way, what kind of music is it?
It is a Pop song. Enjoy your music.
Thanks! That's all for today.
Have a good day.
I need to find some new music for my phone, any suggestions?
How about I Do Adore by Mindy Gledhill from the album Anchor?
Eh, i'm not a big fan of Mindy Gledhill. Find me something else.
Okay. How about Carry Me by Kygo from the album Cloud Nine?
Oh my god I haven't heard that song in forever. Play that for me.
You would like me to play the song Carry Me on the TV, is this correct?
Yes, that's correct. Also can you tell me what year this came out and like what genre this was considered back then.
Your music will begin playing shortly. The song is from the year 2016 and was listed as a Downtempo song.
Alright great, thanks.
Enjoy the music.
I'm in the mood for music! Can you find me some pop?
Sure! What about Adorn by Miguel? It's on the album Kaleidoscope Dream.
No, I don't like that one. I really like Ben Platt, especially the Sing To Me Instead album. Can you find me something from that?
I've got 4 for you on the Ben Platt album Sing to me Instead. Do you like the song Bad Habit?
I do but can you see if there's anything else?
What about the Ben Platt song Ease My Mind? That's also on the Sing to me Instead album
When was that released? 2013?
No that was from 2019.
Ah ok. But yes, I want that one, can you stick it on the kitchen speaker?
Sure, can you just confirm that you want me to play Ease My Mind on the kitchen speaker?
Yes, that would be perfect, thanks
No problem. It's playing for you now
Lovely, thank you!
Can I do anything else for you?
No thanks
No problem. Enjoy the music!
Help me find a song, something from '15 would work.
Would you like Aftertaste by Shawn Mendes from the album Handwritten?
Is there anything else?
There's Back it Up by Prince Royce from the album Double Vision.
What else is there? Do you have anything by Ryutaro Nakahara?
From Ryutaro Nakahara there is Din Don Dan from the album Seventh Heaven.
Yeah, that sounds good. I want to listen to in on the kitchen device.
I'll play Din Don Dan on the Kitchen speaker, is that correct?
No, can you play it on my bedroom, sorry.
I'll play Din Don Dan on the Bedroom speaker, is that correct?
Yeah, that would be great.
Okay, enjoy the song.
Oh, what kind of song is this?
It's an Anime song.
Thanks a lot!
Do you need any more help?
No, thanks.
Have a pleasant day.
I am looking for something to listen, recommend me some songs.
I found 10 you may enjoy. How about Ridin High by the Jawga Boyz in the album Kuntry?
What kind of music is it?
It's Country Music.
Do you have anything else?
There's also Out Of Love by Alessia Cara in the album The Pains Of Growing.
I want to listen to it.
Should I play it?
Yes, on my kitchen speaker. Please.
So you want to listen to Out of Love on the kitchen speaker?
Yes, that's exactly it.
Enjoy the song.
Thanks a lot, that's all.
Have an amazing day.
Hello, Pretty, do you mind searching for some good Pop songs to me?
Sure, I will search for you.. I've got a playlist of 10 songs. Do you like to hear the song Adorn by the Song Writer Miguel from his studio album Kaleidoscope Dream?
Thanks for the information, but do you have anything more? I would love to hear the songs by Hayley Kiyoko. Is it available?
Yup! Would you prefer to listen to Curious by Hayley Kiyoko from the album Expectations?
Yup! I prefer this one.
Would you want me to play this song for you?
Yup! Please can you play on the speaker in the kitchen?
Sure! Please confirm me that you like to listen to Curious song in your Kitchen speaker, right?
Nope, sorry.... Please can you play in my bedroom?
Sure! So, you wish to listen to the song Curious in your Bedroom speaker. Am I right?
Yup. you're right.
Have fun with the music.
Thanks for your time.
Do you want any other songs to be played?
Nope, thanks.
Have a fantastic day.
My favorite is Marshmello. can you search some songs of three years back for me?
Do you have any opinion on Blocks by Marshmello in the album Joytime.
Yes that is perfect.
You want me to run this song?
Yes i want to play.
Please give confirmation details: To play the song Blocks on TV
That is perfect. What type of music is it?
Have fun. The music is a House Song.
Thank you very much.
Have a great day.
I want to search for a song.
I have 10 songs for you. What about Always Remember Us This Way by Lady Gaga in the A Star is Born Soundtrack album?
Do you have anything else? Any album should be fine.
I have 10 songs for you. How about Mercy by Shawn Mendes in the Illuminate album?
Could you show me other options?
How about Glow by Madcon in the album Contraband?
Yes, that sounds good. I would like to listen to music on my kitchen device.
Could you confirm that you want to play Glow on the kitchen speaker?
Yes, that is right.
Please enjoy the song.
Thanks!
Would you like any further assistance?
No, that is all.
Enjoy the day.
I would like to listen to some music, maybe from the album Mercury Lane
Got it. I've found 1 song from the album Mercury Lane by Jimmie Allen, it's called Best Shot.
It is exactly the one I wanted to listen to.
Can I play it for you?
Absolutely. Play it on any device.
Confirm me the operation. I'll play the song Best Shot on TV.
Yes, you got it right.
Enjoy the tunes
Can you tell me what kind of music is this?
It's Country.
Wonderful! I don't need anything else.
Bye Bye.
I want to listen to a song by Madilyn Bailey
I have found 1, how about Titanium by Madilyn Bailey from the album Muse Box
Yes that sounds good
Do you want me to play it now?
Yes, play it on the Kitchen speaker
Please confirm: playing Titanium on the Kitchen Speaker
Yes, that's good
Ok, enjoy the music
Thanks a lot
Is there anthing else you need?
No, that's all thanks
Ok, have a nice day!
Will you find me a song?
I found 10 songs. How about Let It Go by The Piano Guys in the album Wonders.
What genre? Is this from nine years back?
Classical from 2014.
Great.
Do you want to play the song?
Yes. Play it on any device.
Please confirm playing of Let It Go on TV.
Play it on Kitchen speaker.
Please confirm Let It Go playing on Kitchen speaker.
That's right.
Enjoy.
Thanks, that's it for now.
Have a nice day.
Can you find a song?
There is 10 songs. Do you like Dance Macabre by Ghost from the album Prequelle?
Yes, I like that song.
Would you like to play this song?
Yes, play the song.
Play the song Dance Macabre on the TV.
What genre of music is this and is it from 2013?
No, it's from 2018 and it's a metal song.
Thank you for the information.
Have a good day.
I am looking for songs.
Do you like Open Up from the Matt Simons album After The Landslide?
What is the genre?
The song is pop.
I am looking for songs from nine years ago.
There are 10 songs including Alone from the Alan Walker album Different World.
Do you have any country songs by Jason Aldean?
I found 1 song: Dirt Road Anthem from the Jason Aldean album My Kinda Party.
That is the song I am looking for.
May I further assist you?
I want to hear the song.
Please confirm you want to play Dirt Road Anthem on the TV.
Can you play it on the kitchen device?
Please confirm you want to play Dirt Road Anthem on the kitchen speaker.
That is correct.
Enjoy the song!
Thank you very much.
May I further assist you?
No, that will be all.
See you soon!
Please help me find a song.
Do you like Ya Layali by Sherine from the album Ana Keteer?
What genre is it?
It's a Pop song.
In which year was it released?
It came out in 2014.
Do you have something else? I like Country songs from the album You Get What You Give.
Shall I play Knee Deep by Zac Brown Band from the album You Get What You Give?
Right. That's the one I was looking for.
Do you want me to help with anything else?
I'd like to listen to the song.
Please confirm that you want to listen to the song Knee Deep on your TV.
No. Can you play it on my kitchen speaker please?
Sure. Playing Knee Deep on your Kitchen speaker.
Please go ahead. Do you know when that song was released?
Playing the song now. It is from the year 2010. Enjoy your music!
Thanks a lot.
Can I assist you with anything else?
No. That's all I need for now. Thank you.
Have a great day!
Can you help me find a song? I like Zayn Malik.
I have 6 recommendations. How about Dusk Till Dawn by Zayn Malik, from the album Icarus Falls?
Is there anything else?
How about Good Years by Zayn Malik, from the album Icarus Falls?
That sounds good. I'd like it played.
Should I play Good Years on the TV?
Yes, please do.
The song has begun, please enjoy.
Thank you. That's all I needed.
Have a nice day.
I am looking for songs. I like Carly Rae Jepsen.
I have 2 songs you may like. How about Call Me Maybe by Carly Rae Jepsen, from the album Kiss?
What kind of song is that?
It's a pop song.
Yes, that's good.
Do you want to play it now?
Yes. Send it to my kitchen speaker.
Confirming: I am playing Call Me Maybe on the kitchen speaker.
Yes, that's good. Is that from 2011?
Yes, it's from 2011. Enjoy your music!
Thanks, that's all.
Have a good day.
I am looking for songs, preferably Latin
How about Baby Sexy by Cindy Santos? It's from the Try Again album
When did it come out?
In 2018
That's what I am looking for, can you play it
Sure, should I play Baby Sexy on the TV?
That is correct
Ok, it is playing, hope you like it
Thanks so much
Is there anything else I can help you with?
That's all I need
Have a great day
Please find songs for me.
Are you ok with Reggae Music by Kabaka Pyramid in the album Kontraband. Or you can select any from 10 songs available.
What is the year of release of that song?
It is a 2018 song.
Yeah that will do.
You need the song played.
Yes, Make it on my kitchen speaker.
Please confirm, You need Reggae Music on Kitchen speaker.
Surely, thats fine.
It started. Please be comfortable.
Great favor. Thanks a lot.
Have a funny day.
I'm searching for a song.
How about Miss Me More by Kelsea Ballerini off of her album Unapologetically?
That's it. Let's give it a listen.
Just to make sure, you want to hear Miss Me More on TV.
You got it. What type of song is this?
Enjoy your Country song!
Thanks a bunch. That'll do it, for now.
Enjoy the rest of your day!
Find me a Country song from 2018.
How about Best Shot By Jimmie Allen from the album Mercury Lane.
Yes, that will work.
Do you want to hear the song?
Yes, play it on my kitchen speaker.
Please confirm; playing Best Shot on Kitchen speaker.
Yes, that is correct.
Enjoy your song!
Thank you, that will be it.
Have a nice day.
Hi i need a help, I am interesting in listening songs, Can you find songs in the album Honky Tonk Time Machine?
Sure, I will help you, I found a 3 songs for you, One of the nice song is Codigo by George Strait in the album Honky Tonk Time Machine.
Could you tell me what type of song is it?
It is a Country song
Any other songs do you have?
Do you like the song Every Little Honky Tonk Bar by George Strait in the album Honky Tonk Time Machine
it is from four years ago? What type of music is that?
It is a country song from the year 2019
Find another song from 2019
I got 1 another song for you, Do you like The Weight of the badge by george strait in the album Honky Tonk Time Machine
Yes that on i liked
Can i play the song for you?
yes, play it on speaker in the kitchen
please confirm the following details: Play the song The weight of the badge on kitchen speaker
no, play it on my bedroom speaker
please confirm the following details: play the song The weight of the badge on bedroom speaker
yes, that's good
Enjoy your music
Thank you very much for your help
Shall i help you with anything more?
No, thank you very much for your help, That's all i need.
you are welcome, Have a wonderful day.
11th of this month in london, england
71 degrees 15 percent chance
how humid though?
11 miles 41 percent
I would like to check the weather on 8th of March.
What city should I check in?
Check Sydney, Australia.
The temperature on average for the day would be about 99 degrees Fahrenheit with a 7 percent chance of rain.
How humid will it be?
The humidity would be around 21 percent.
I would like to check the weather for the day after tomorrow in Paris, France.
The temperature for the day should be 93 degrees Fahrenheit with a 6 percent chance of rain.
How windy will it be?
The average wind speed will be 4 miles per hour.
I'd like to check the weather on the 3rd of March.
Where would you like to check?
I'd like to find the weather on the 14th of this month in Los Angeles.
The average temperature will be 86 degrees Fahrenheit and there's a 17 percent chance of rain.
How humid and windy will it be?
The average wind speed will be about 4 miles per hour and the humidity will be around 29 percent.
That will work.
Is there anything else I can help with?
I must verify the weather on March 2nd in SFO
The mean temperature on that date ought to be 72 degrees Fahrenheit, and there is a 15 percent likelihood of rain.
What is the weather in London, England?
The average for today is 81 degrees with a 23 percent chance of rain.
How humid and windy will it be?
The average wind speed is estimated at 10 miles per hour with humidity at 35 percent.
Hello. I want to see what the weather is like on the 11th of this month.
At what location?
In KL.
The temperature there is going to be about 99 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 2 percent chance of rain.
I must verify the weather on 4th of March in Portland.
The mean temperature for the date ought to be 68 degrees Fahrenheit. There is a 18 percent probability of raining.
What is the humidity level?
The humidity will be near 32 percent.
How strong will the winds be?
The wind ought to be 12 miles per hour.
What is the weather like today in Nairobi Kenya?
The temperature for the day is 105 degrees and there is 0 percent chance of rain.
What is the humidity level and how windy is it supposed to be?
The humidity is around 15 percent and the wind is 7 miles per hour.
What is the weather like on the 13th of March?
In which city should I look.
The weather in New York.
The temperature should be around 59 degrees and there is a 33 percent chance of rain.
Hi, can you check the weather for me?
Sure what city do you want to know the weather for?
I want the weather in Vancouver.
In Vancouver it will be around 75 degrees Fahrenheit today with a 15 percent chance of rain.
I'd like to check the weather.
Where would you like to check the weather for?
I'd like to know the weather in Toronto, Canada.
The average temperature will be 58 degrees Fahrenheit and there's a 13 percent chance of rain.
I want to know how the weather will be in Philadelphia for March 12th?
For your requested location the average temperature should be 83 degrees Fahrenheit, and the chance of rain at 25 percent.
Can you tell me how windy is it going to be there, and what humidity should I expect to find there?
The average wind speed for that location is expected to be 4 miles per hour, and the humidity at around 27 percent.
Can you check the weather on March 9th in NYC?
The temperature should be around 70 degrees and there is 38 percent chance of rain.
Tell me the weather next Wednesday in San Francisco.
It will be 72 degrees with a 3 percent chance of rain.
What is the humidity going to be?
It will be near 16 percent.
Can you tell me what the weather will be like in San Diego on the 13th of March.
The average high is 75 on that day and you'll have a 19 % chance of rain.
I must verify the weather on March 5th.
What metropolis would you like to verify the weather in?
The metropolis is Phoenix
The mean temperature for the date ought to be 73 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 12 percent chance of raining.
What is the humidity and wind level?
The wind level ought to be 5 miles per hour, while humidity ought to be around 31 percent.
Hey, what'll the weather be like in Delhi on the 2nd of this month?
It'll be around 95 degrees Fahrenheit with a 0 percent chance of rain.
Thanks a lot. How windy and humid will it be?
The average wind speed will be 5 miles per hour, the humidity will sit at around 15 percent.
I want the weather in Paris.
It is 77 with a 26 percent chance of rain.
Forecast for Vancouver, BC.
The average temperature will be 75 and the chance of rain will be 15 percent.
Humidity and wind?
Average wind speed of 8 miles per hour and humidity of 19 percent.
What's the weather for the 7th of this month in Cotati?
The forecast is for an average temperature of 89 degrees Fahrenheit with a 1 percent chance of rain.
What about the humidity and wind?
Humidity is expected to be 15 percent, with 8 mile per hour winds.
How about the weather in Seattle, WA?
The forecast is for a temperature of 69 degrees Fahrenheit with a 16 percent chance of rain.
Check for me please the weather.
In what city do you want to check the weather?
Toronto, Canada will be great.
For the day the average temperature should be 58 dergrees Faherenheit and 13 percent chance of rain.
Can you tell me what the weather forecast is for Paris next Thursday?
It is expected to be 87 degrees Fahrenheit with a 12 percent chance of rain.
Check the weather for me please.
In what city you want?
In Portland will be okay.
For the day the average temperature should be 75 degrees Fahrenheit and 9 percent chance of rain.
Tell me the weather in Chi-town on March 12th.
The daytime average temperature is 61 degrees with a 26 percent chance of precipitation.
los altos march 11th
73 degrees 28 percent rain
delhi sounds good
103 degrees 7 percent
how windy then?
10 miles per hour 19 percent
Check the forecast on the 3rd of March in San Lorenzo.
Average of 78 degrees with a 23 percent chance of rain.
Humidity and wind?
Average windspeed of 9 mph and humidity of 43 percent.
Check it in Mexico City.
Average of 102 degrees and 7 percent chance of rain.
I want to check on the weather for the 13th of this month.
What city do you want to check the forecast for?
Check it for Paris, France.
The average temperature is forecasted to be 88 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 23 percent chance of rain.
I must verify the weather on the 11th.
What metropolis do you wish to verify the weather for?
The metropolis is Vancouver, BC.
The mean temperature for the date ought to be 66 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 22 percent likelihood of raining.
Hi, could you help me check the weather in Portland, OR please?
Sure, the temperature is 75 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 9 percent chance of rain.
I see, thank you!
Could I further assist you?
I need the weather in Paris on the 7th of March.
Sure, the high is going to be 87 and there's only a 12 % chance of rain.
I need to see what the weather is like in Paris.
Paris will have temperatures averaging 77 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 26 percent chance of rain.
I need to know the expected weather in Seattle, WA on the 2nd of this month.
The average temperature is 70 degrees with a 23 percent chance of rain.
What is the humidity going to be?
13 percent!
Could you check the weather forecast for me for the day after tomorrow?
Which city will I check?
For Chicago please.
There is a 36 % of rain and the ave temp will be 67 degrees Fahrenheit.
Give me a weather report for Seattle, WA today.
The high temp is going to be about 74 degrees and there is about a 32 % chance of rain.
Great, thank you.
I can help with something else if you want?
I want to know how the weather will be in San Diego on March 6th.
For the location you asked for, the average temperature should be 80 degrees Fahrenheit. The chance of raining is at 6 percent.
Can you tell me how windy is it going to be there, and at what percentage will the humidity be?
The average speed of wind there will be 1 miles per hour, and the humidity is expected at around 23 percent.
What's the weather like on the 12th of this month?
In what city?
In Portland, OR.
The temperature there on that day should average 72 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 16 percent chance of rain.
What's the weather going to be like on the 11th of March?
What city do you want me to check in?
Check in Vancouver.
The day's average temperature will be 66 degrees Fahrenheit. The chance of rain is 22 percent.
I would like to find out the weather on the 11th of this month.
What city should I check?
Find out what the weather will be like on the 14th of this month in Las Vegas.
On that day the temperature should be around 71 degrees fahrenheit with a 15 percent chance of rain.
How humid and windy will it be?
Wind speed should be 6 miles per hour with humidity around 39 percent.
Hi, could you help me check the weather in phoenix, AZ please?
Sure, it will be 89 degrees fahrenheit with a 15 percent chance of rain.
What's the weather going to be on the 3rd?
What city do you want me to look in?
Look in SD.
The predicted temperature is 82 degrees F with a 7 % chance of rain.
And how humid will it be?
Humidity is estimated at 28 %.
And what about wind?
The average wind speed will be 11 mph.
What is the weather like?
What city am I checking the forecast in?
Seattle, please.
There is a 32 percent chance of precipitation and an average daily temperature of 74.
What is the humidity index?
Today the humidity is about 25 percent.
Can you check the weather for me?
Which city would you like me to check?
The Phoenix weather.
The average temp is 89 degrees and there is a 15 percent chance of rain.
How humid will it be?
Around 23 percent humidity.
How windy will it be?
The average wind is around 11 mph.
Hi! Can you tell me what the weather forecast is for Duncans Mills on the 11th?
I'd be happy to. The forecast predicts an average temperature of 91 degrees Fahrenheit with a 4 percent chance of rain.
Is it going to be windy?
Wind speeds should average 7 miles per hour.
Is it supposed to be humid?
Humidity is hovering around 19 percent.
What does it look like for Toronto, Canada on the 13th of March?
It should be 62 degrees Fahrenheit with a 1 percent chance of rain.
Can you find me the weather for the 1st of this month?
For what city?
For CDMX.
The temperature should be around 102 degrees Fahrenheit with a 0 percent chance of rain.
I would like to know how the weather is in Nairobi, Kenya.
For your requested location the average temperature should be at an average of 105 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 0 percent chance of raining.
I would like to check the weather in SD.
The temperature for the day will be 90 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 1 percent chance of rain.
Can you check the weather on next Friday for me?
Sure, but first i'll need to know the location.
Look it up for Atlanta.
There is expected to be a 12 percent chance of rain and the average temperature for the day is expected to be around 79 degrees Fahrenheit.
I'm getting hungry but I don't want to cook. I need to find a place to eat.
What area should I search in?
Find some restaurants in Pleasanton.
What type of food would you like?
Look for something that serves Brasserie.
I found Nonni's Bistro that's located in Pleasanton.
That sounds good. Let's reserve a table there.
What time would you like a reservation for?
Let's make the reservation for 12:30 pm.
Okay, let's confirm: We're booking a table for 2 on March 1st at 12:30 pm at Nonni's Bistro located in Pleasanton.
Yes, sounds good.
I've made your reservation.
Hi, are there any nice places I can eat at?
Any preferred locations?
Something in SF is fine.
Any food preferences you might have?
Something which serves sushi will be fine.
There are 10 restaurants in San Francisco, how about Atami Sushi Bar & Grill?
Where are they located at?
You can find them at 1662 Lombard Street.
I see, are there any alternatives?
How about Juban Yakiniku House Japanese in San Francisco?
Are there any vegetarian food served and do they have outdoor seating?
Unfortunately, they do not have vegetarian options nor have outdoor setting.
I see, that is fine. Could you make a reservation for one on the 12th at 12:15 in the afternoon?
Sure, please confirm your reservation for 1 at Juban Yakiniku House Japanese in San Francisco at 12:15 pm on March 12th.
Sure, what is the price range of their food and how are they rated?
Sorry, your reservation could not be made. Could I further assist you?
Could you try reserving on the 13th instead?
Sure, please confirm your reservation for 1 at Juban Yakiniku House Japanese in San Francisco at 12:15 pm on March 13th.
Could you reserve the table for two instead?
Sure, please confirm your reservation for 2 at 12:15 pm.
Could you reserve it at twelve pm instead?
Sure, please confirm your reservation at Juban Yakiniku House Japanese in San Francisco at 12 pm.
Sure, that is fine with me.
Your reservation has been made.
Find me a place to eat.I want to be a restaurant tagged intermediate priced for price.
In which location you want to be?
In Dublin will be great.
What type of food you want to eat?
Something where is serving Sushi.
I have 2 option for you that you may like.A nice restaurant called Halu Shabu Shabu licated in Dublin.
Ye that sounds great.
With something else I can help?
Yes help me book a table at a restaurant.
At what time you want to be?
On evening 6:30 will be okay.
Book a table for 2 people at Halu Shabu Shabu in Dublin in March 1st at 6:30 pm.
Perfect.I also need to know if they serve vegetarian food and the contact phone.
Reservation was made.They don;t have vegetarian food.925-833-9833 is the contact phone number.
Find me a place that serves Coffee & light bites.
What city do you want to eat in?
I want to eat in San Leandro.
Mcdonalds' serves Coffee & light bites in San Leandro.
That works for me.
Shall I book you a table there?
Yes, book me a table for three people on the 8th of this month.
What time do you want to eat?
I wish to eat at 10:30.
You want a table for 3 at Mcdonald's in San Leandro for 10:30 am on March 8th, correct?
That is right.
I can't book you a table. Do you require more help?
Try to get a table on the 1st of March for evening 7.
You want a table for 3 at 7 pm on March 1st at Mcdonald's in San Leandro?
No, make it for 1 person.
You want a table for 1 in San Leandro, correct?
That is right.
Your table is booked.
Is this a ultra high-end place?
No, they have cheap prices.
Hello! Please can you find me some good restaurant to have food?
Sure, where are you searching for?
I'm looking in San Leandro.
What type of cuisine are you looking for - American, Indian or anything else?
Please can you find a moderate priced restaurant that can serve English food.
Sure. Do you wish to dine at The Englander Sports Pub & Restaurant, which is a nice one located at San Leandro?
Yup, sounds good.
Do you wish to reserve a table at this restaurant?
Yup, Please can you reserve a table for three people on 2nd of March at 12:45?
Okay! Please can you confirm me that you wish to book a table at the hotel The Englander Sports Pub & Restaurant in San Leandro on March 2nd at 12:45 pm for 3 people, right?
Nope, please can you reserve only for two people at eleven in the morning?
Please can you confirm me that you wish to reserve a table for 2 people at 11 am, right?
Yup, sounds good.
Okay! your booking is successful
my mouth is watering for the outside food. find me a good place to eat?
in which location are you searching for and what kind of food are you looking for?
find some good restaurants in sunnyvale? find halal kind of food ?
i found 1 restaurants as per your taste. how about kabul afghan cuisine which is a nice restaurant ? It is located in sunnyvale.
ok thats good. please book a table at a restaurant?
at what time should i reserve for ?
the reservation should be at 11:30 in the morning.
please check and confirm the following details. book a table at kabul afghan cuisine. the city is sunnyvale. the reservation is at 11:30 am for 2 people and the date is march 1st.
ok that works for me.
reservation is successful.
I'd like to eat out at a not very costly restaurant in Petaluma. Any suggestions?
What type of cuisine did you have in mind?
Please find me one that offers Szcheuan cuisine.
How about City Chopsticks, a good Petaluma restaurant?
Where are they located?
They are located at 127 North McDowell Boulevard.
Do they offer vegetarian dishes?
They have a wide selection of vegetarian dishes.
That works for me.
Should I go ahead and reserve a table here?
Sure. Please reserve a table for 1 this evening 7:30.
Okay. Please confirm that you'd like to reserve a table for 1 at City Chopsticks in Petaluma, for 7:30 pm on March 1st.
That is correct.
I have successfully made your reservation.
I'm trying to find a restaurant. I'd like someplace pricey.
What location are you thinking of?
In San Francisco please.
And what type of cuisine?
I'd love to find a nice steakhouse.
I recommend 5a5 Steak Lounge in San Francisco.
Okay, great. Would you please make a reservation for me?
Certainly, when would you like it?
I'd like it at 11:15 in the morning.
All right, confirming a table on March 1st at 11:15 AM at 5a5 Steak Lounge in San Francisco for 2 people.
Yes, that's correct.
I apologize, there was a problem booking that reservation. Would you like to try March 1st at 11 AM for 2 at 5a5 Steak Lounge?
Sure, that's fine.
That table has been booked.
Thanks, and the address please.
Sure, the restaurant is located at 244 Jackson Street.
Do they have any outside tables? I'd also like the phone number.
I'm sorry, they have no outside seating. The telephone number is 415-989-2539.
Thanks for your help.
My pleasure. Anything else?
Find me somewhere to dine.
Which food type would you like?
Spicy Indian would be great.
Where are you looking>
Walnut Creek is fine.
Sargam Indian Cuisine in Walnut Creek is 1 good choice for you.
What is the pricing like? Where exactly are they?
They are a moderate priced restaurant located at 140 North Civic Drive.
Perfect, make a reservation there.
What time would you like the reservation at?
The morning 11:30 works.
I will reserve a table for 2 this March 1st at the Sargam Indian Cuisine in Walnut Creek at 11:30 am if that is correct.
I need the reservation for 3 people.
If I am correct the date is March 1st and the number of people is 3.
You are correct.
The table has been reserved for you.
You're such a help.
What else do you need?
I need to find a place to eat.
What type of food would you like?
Something Persian.
Where should I look?
Find something in Morgan Hill.
I found 1 you may like. Odeum in Morgan Hill.
Sounds good thanks.
Would you like to make a reservation?
Yes please.
What time would you like your table reserved?
Make it for the morning 11:30.
You want a table for 2 at Odeum in Morgan Hill on March 1st at 11:30 am, correct?
No actually I need a table for 3 next Monday.
You want a table for 3 on March 4th, correct?
Yes that's correct. How expensive is it?
Your table has been booked. They are pricey.
I want pizza
what location then?
find in redwood city
donato enoteca redwood city 3 places
yes that works
wanna get a table there?
5:30 in the evening
donato enoteca redwood city 5:30 pm 2 people march 1st
yes that is fine
4.3 rating donato enoteca march 1st 5 pm 2 people
yes that is fine
it went through
Help me find a good place to eat
which city and what king of food are you looking for?
I want to have coffee & light bites in Newark
Sure, I have found 1 place for you in Newark. How about Mcdonald's there?
What's its rating?
It is 3.2
Tell me the address. Do they have vegetarian options?
They don't serve vegetarian and are located on 35192 Newark Boulevard
Cool, book a table for 2 there on march 6th morning 11:30
Booking a table for 2 at Mcdonald's Newark on March 6th at 11:30 am
Cool, is it an expensive place?
Booking confirmed. It is a cheap restaurant
I'm looking for a cheap restaurant in Redwood City. I'd like to eat some Middle eastern food
In Redwood City there's Rocknwraps And Kabobs
Perfect! I want to book a table here on March 13th
What time do you want to reserve the table?
I want to reserve at 11:15
A table for 2 people at Rocknwraps And Kabobs in Redwood City, on March 13th at 11:15 am. Is it correct?
Yes, it is. What's the restaurant's address? Are there outdoor seats?
Isn't possible to reserve the table. Can I do anything else for you?
Yes, please. Try to book a table at 11:00
A table for 2 people at Rocknwraps And Kabobs in Redwood City, on March 13th at 11 am. Is it correct?
Yes, It's correct. Thanks
Your reservation is confirmed
Thanks a lot!
Do you need anything else?
Find me a place that serves Veggie.
What city do you want to eat in?
I want to eat in Oakland.
Search revealed 4 results. Cafe Romanat serves veggie in Oakland.
That works for me.
Shall I book you a table there?
Yes, book me a table for one person.
What tiem do you wish to eat?
I wish to eat at afternoon 12:30.
You want a table for 1 person at 12:30 pm on March 1st at Cafe Romanat in Oakland, correct?
That is correct. What is their price range?
Your table is booked and they have moderate prices.
Can you find me a place to eat?
What kind food do you prefer?
Search for a restaurant which serves Taiwanese.
Which city should I look for?
Search for the restaurant in Pinole.
There is a nice restaurant called China Delights located in Pinole.
Do you have any other restaurants?
There is a nice restaurant called China House Restaurant located in Pinole.
Okay, That sounds good to me. Can you help me in booking a table for 2 people on 11th of March?
What time should I put for the reservation?
I would like to reserve the table at 1 pm.
Please confirm: You want me to reserve a table for 2 people at China House Restaurant located in Pinole at 1 pm on March 11th.
Yes, That is correct. Can you confirm whether the restaurant is ultra high-end?
I have successfully booked the table for you And they are moderate restaurant.
Thank you for the help!
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Looking for a place to eat
in which location?
search in Palo alto
what kind of food?
search for Take-out
Palo Alto has Pizz'a Chicago
ok, please book me a table for four on the 11th of march
whats the time?
Book it at Five in the evening
Please confirm: Booking a table for 4 at the Pizz'a Chicago in Palo Alto at 5 pm on March 11th
yes, thats correct
your booking is done
I need a place to eat
What kind of food would you like to eat?
I'd like some Taiwanese food
In which city?
I'm looking a restaurant in San Jose
There are 10 restaurants in San Jose. What about Chef Li?
Can I get the contact number and the address, please?
Sure! Contact number: 408-377-8310. Address: 2033 Camden Avenue # F3
Thanks a lot. Are there other restaurants in the area?
In San Jose there's China Delight
This is ok! I want to book a table for 1 people on 11th of this month at evening 6:30
A table for 1 people at China Delight in San Jose, on March 11th at 6:30 pm. Is it correct?
No, I prefer to reserve at 1:30 in the afternoon
A table on March 11th at 1:30 pm. Do you confirm?
Yes, I confirm. China Delight is an ultra high-end restaurant?
No, it's a moderate restaurant. Your table is booked!
Are there outdoor seats? Are vegetarian dishes also served?
Unfortunately no outdoor seats. Yes, there are many vegetarian dishes.
I need to find a place to eat.
What are you in the mood for and where should I search?
Something Parisian in SFO.
I found 10 you may like. How about Amelie San Francisco in San Francisco?
What is the adrdress?
They are located at 1754 Polk Street.
Do they offer vegetarian options? What is the number to the restaurant?
The do not offer vegetarian options and the number is 415-292-6916.
Can you recommend another with a moderate price.
I found 9 others. How about Aquitaine Wine Bar & Bistro in San Francisco?
Sounds good. Can you book me a table.
What time would you like your reservation?
Make it evening 4:30.
You want a table for 2 at 4:30 pm on March 1st at the Aquitaine Wine bar & Bistro in San Francisco, correct?
Yes that is correct.
I was unable to book the table. Can I do anything else for you?
Can you try again for 5:30 in the evening?
You want a table for 2 at 5:30 pm on March 1st at the Aquitaine Wine bar & Bistro in San Francisco, correct?
Yes that's correct.
I was unable to book the table. How about 5 pm on March 1st for 2 at Aquitaine Wine Bar & Bistro?
Yes that will work.
Your reservation has been made.
Hi, I want to find a Sichuan restaurant please.
In what area?
In San Fran please.
I have 10 places for you. How about Alice's, which is in San Francisco?
Okay, I like that.
Anything else today?
Can you make a reservation for me for two at 13:00?
Confirming a table at Alice's for 2 on March 1st at 1 pm in San Francisco.
Thank you. Do they make vegetarian meals?
Yes, they sure do. And the table has been booked.
What's their price range, by the way?
They are cheap.
I want to find a place to eat in San Leandro that is cheap and has vegetarian options.
Is there a type of cuisine you prefer?
I like Latin American food.
Taco Bell in San Leandro is nice.
Is there outdoor seating there? What's their user rating like?
There's no outdoor seating there. They have a 3.2 user rating.
Okay, I'll go there.
Do you need help with anything else?
I want to book a table there.
What time do you want the table?
I want it at 7:15 pm.
I'll book you a table for 2 at Taco Bell in San Leandro for March 1st at 7:15 pm. Is that correct?
No, it's just for one person.
I'll book you a table for 1 at Taco Bell, is that right?
That's right.
I'm sorry but the reservation didn't go through. Do you want to try to book a table at Taco Bell for 1 for March 1st at 7:30 pm?
Yeah, that's good too.
I've booked the table for you.
I'm in the mood for some sichuan in san fran, find me something where I can sit and enjoy the food
if you're in san francisco, you can go to alice's
will I find a vegetarian menu once there?
they take good care of vegetarians
I like this place, book me a table there on the 5th of this month at 1:30 in the afternoon
confirm me the booking before it's final. you are looking for a table for 2 at alice's in san francisco. the date you'll need that table is march 5th at 1:30 pm
yes, I'm really looking forward that day
the reservation is not done, ask me any other thing
I have to ask you to insist for that table see if there's one on the 11th at one pm
I'll recap this to see if it is right. You want a table for 2 at alice's in san francisco. you want it on march 11th at 1 pm
yes, see if we have better luck this time
you do actually, the table has been reserved
Where can I dine with a vegetarian choices on the menu?
Where am I looking? Do you have a food type preference.
I am looking for Cantonese restaurant in Millbrae.
Tai Wu Restaurant in Millbrae is 1 choice you may like.
That sounds perfect.
What else can I do for you?
I would like a restaurant reservation.
Is there a time you prefer?
Half past 7 in the evening would be great.
I will reserve a t table for 2 at the Tai Wu Restaurant in Millbrae this March 1st at 7:30 pm with your permission.
Permission granted.
The table has been booked.
Is the establishment pricey. Do they have a rating?
The restaurant is moderate in pricing with a rating of 3.7.
it's about time for me to start looking for a restaurant
if there's a particular type of food you wish to eat, you can tell me. I also need to know where do I have to look for it
the area is fairfield and I'm looking for american type of food
in fairfield you can try chuck e. cheese's
I've hard of this one, yes, I want to go
tell me the time for your reservation
4:30 pm would be wonderful
read and carefully consider what I am about to do. you want a table for 2 at chuck e. cheese's in fairfield on march 1st at 4:30 pm
yes, you may go on with the procedure
the reservation was not confirmed. can I help you some other way?
I'm still very interested in this reservation so it's fine if you can book it at 12:30 pm
this is what I'm going to try again. you want to book a table for 2 at chuck e. cheese's in fairfield. the date is march 1st and the reservation is 12:30 pm
yes, let's hope they have a table for me. can you tell me if vegetarians can find something to meets their taste on the menu?
you're request has been satisfied and vegetarians may enjoy a nice meal there too!
another thing I would like to know is if I can sit outside and if you can retrieve the address
they are at 1027 oliver road and there's no chance for you to sit outside
Please help me find a place to eat.
Which location do you prefer?
In San Jose.
What food do you want?
I like Ramen.
How about Bluefin in San Jose?
That one is good.
Will I reserve you table there now?
Yes, please.
What time do you prefer to go there?
At 11:30 in the morning.
Okay, you want to reserve a table for 2 at Bluefin in San Jose on march 1st at 11:30 am. Please confirm.
Yes, do they cater vegetarians foods on their menu? What is their address?
No, they don't have vegetarian options and they are located at 754 The Alameda #10. Your reservation is now confirmed!
I'd like to find a restaurant.
What type of restaurant are you looking for?
I think I'm in the mood for a Cantonese place.
In what city please?
I'm thinking of Dublin.
I have 7 possibilities for you in Dublin. Would you be interested in China Paradise Restaurant?
Yes, please make a reservation for next Tuesday at twelve PM for a party of 3.
Confirming a reservation at 12 PM for 3 people on March 5th at China paradise restaurant in Dublin.
Is there any outside seating and what is the phone number?
They don't have outdoor seating, I'm sorry. The telephone number is 925-556-9988 and the reservation is complete.
I'm looking for a place to go eat
What kind of food are you craving?
I want some Pizza and Pasta!
Sure, where should we look?
How about in San Fran?
I found 10 places in San Francisco including 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano
Yes, that's fine
Want me to book you a table?
Sure, please do
At what time then?
Make it for 12 pm
Confirming a table for 2 on March 1st at 12 pm at 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano in San Francisco
No, make that for three people for next Monday
OK, so a table for 3 on March 4th?
Yes that's better
OK, it's booked!
I am searching for a place to eat which serves Ramen.
In which place shall I search?
Search it in Berkeley.
Iyasare is a great restaurant in Berkeley.
It is good.
Shall I book the table there?
Yes. Please.
When shall I reserve it?
I wish to reserve a table at 12:00.
Kindly ensure that, On March 1st, booking is done for 2 persons at Iyasare in Berkeley at 12 pm.
It is good. What is their user rating?
Your booking is done. The user rating is 4.5
Thank you very much.
Do you need any other help?
Hello! Please can you help me to find some good restaurant in Napa?
Sure. What type of cuisine are you looking for?
Please can you find something which would serve Greek?
Sure. What about Tarla Mediterranean Bar + Grill Napa Valley Restaurant located in Napa?
Is there outdoor seating available?
Yup, you have.
Is it an economical restaurant?
Nope, the price is moderate.
That sounds good.
So, do you wish to book a table here?
Yup, Please can you book a table at this restaurant?
At what time you wish to reserve?
I wish to make the reservation at 8 o"clock in the night.
Please can you confirm me that you wish to book a table at Tarla Mediterranean Bar + Grill Napa Valley Restaurant located in Napa for 2 people on March 1st at 8 pm. Is that right?
Yup, you are correct.
Sorry, your booking is unsuccessful. Do you want me to assist you with anything else?
Please can you try booking the table again for I wish to reserve 12 in the afternoon?
Sure. Please can you confirm me that you wish to book a table at Tarla Mediterranean Bar + Grill Napa Valley Restaurant for 2 people on March 1st at 12 pm in Napa, right?
Yup, that sounds good.
Okay! Your booking is confirmed.
I need to find a place to eat.
What type of cuisine do you want?
Something Jamaican would be great.
Where should I look?
I need to find something in SFO.
Kaya Restaurant in San Francisco is a nice place.
Sounds good thank you.
Would you like a reservation?
Yes I need a table for 3 on the 2nd at 19:00.
You want a table for 3 at Kaya Restaurant in San Francisco at 7 pm on March 2nd, correct?
Yes that is correct.
Your reservation has been made.
Do they have vegetarian dinners on the menu? Where are they located?
They don't offer vegetarian. They are located at 1420 Market Street.
Hi, could you help me search for some nice places to eat please.
Sure, any preferred locations of your restaurant?
Something in Saratoga will suffice.
Sure, what type of food will you prefer?
A restaurant which serves some fresh lobster will do.
How about Sushi Heaven in Saratoga?
That is fine with me, could you assist in making a reservation there?
When will you be dining in?
Some time at 19:00.
Please confirm your reservation for 2 at Sushi Heaven in Saratoga at 7 pm on March 1st.
Sure, I am fine with that.
Your reservation has been made.
I want to search for a nice restaurant.
what type of food do you fancy?
Somewhere that has Asado.
Which city do you want?
Something in SF.
There is a lovely restaurant called Precita Park Cafe & Grill in San Francisco.
Where are they located and are they expensive?
They are considered moderate price range and are located at 500 precita Avenue.
that suits fine could you book me a table?
What time works best?
1:15 in the afternoon.
To confirm then that is a table for 2 at 1:15 pm on March 1st, at Precita Park Cafe & Grill in San Francisco.
Yes that is perfect. Do you have a contact number for them?
Unfortunately I was unable to book that for you, can I do anything more for you?
Could you try again but try for 1:30 in the afternoon.
To confirm then that is a table for 2 on March 1st at 1:30 pm at Precita Park Cafe & Grill in San Francisco.
Yes that is correct.
Your booking is now confirmed.
I am interested in finding a place where I can eat, and the place I am looking for should be considered as moderate regarding the price.
Is there some particular kind of food you are interested in? In which location should I look for the restaurant?
I am interested in restaurants in Fremont, and that serve Quick meal.
A good restaurant in Fremont I can recommend is Olive Garden Italian Restaurant.
Yes, that is nice.
Do you want to book a table at this restaurant?
Yes, I want to book a table for four people on Wednesday next week at 12:15.
Can you please confirm that you want to book a table for 4 people at Olive Garden Italian Restaurant in Fremont on March 6th at 12:15 pm?
That is not right, because I want to have the table booked for March 11th.
Can you please confirm that you want to book a table at Olive Garden Italian Restaurant for March 11th?
That is not right, because my frieds cancelled so I need to have the table for one person at half past 11 in the morning.
Can you please confirm that you want to book a table for 1 person at 11:30 am?
Yes, that suits me well.
I apologize but I could not make the reservation you asked for. Do you want me to try again book a table for 1 person at Olive Garden Italian Restaurant on March 11th at 11 am?
Yes that works for me too.
Your requested reservation has been made.
I'm looking for a place to eat at any price range
What kind of food, and where?
I'd love to visit a Diner in San Jose
I found 10 places including 71 Saint Peter in San Jose
What's their rating, and do they have vegetarian options?
They have a pretty solid 4.0 rating and yes, they do have vegetarian options
Yes, that sounds awesome
Would you like to reserve a table?
Yes please, for two on March 9th at 5:30 pm
Confirming a table for 2 at 5:30 pm on March 9th at 71 Saint Peter in San Jose
Yes that works
Your reservation is booked
Find me a place where vegetarians can eat.
What city do you want to eat in?
Find places in San Jose.
What type of food do you like?
I want an economical priced place serving Asian in San Francisco.
Search revealed 10 places. Bai Thong Thai is in San Francisco.
Can you eat outdoors there?
No, you can't eat outdoors there.
That works for me. Book me a table for 6 o"clock in the evening.
You want a table for 2 at Bai Thong Thai in San Francisco for 6 pm on March 1st?
No, I want to eat there on the 12th of this month.
I should book at table at Bai Thong Thai on March 12th?
That is right.
Your table is booked.
How can I contact them and can you tell me their rating?
You can contact them at 415-863-9335 and they have a 3.7 rating.
Please help me to find restaurant in Gilroy.
What find of food do you prefer?
I want European.
I found 1 restaurant and that is Tasso's Old House Restaurant and it is located in Gilroy.
That's good.
Will I reserve you a table now?
Yes at 11:15.
Okay, You want to reserve a table for 2 at Tasso's Old House Restaurant in Gilroy on March 1st at 11:15 am. Please confirm.
Yes that's good.
Apologies I fail to make a reservation. Anything else can I help you with?
Can you help me to book a table again and make the reservation at 6 pm.
Okay, You want to reserve a table for 2 at Tasso's Old House Restaurant in Gilroy on March 1st at 6 pm. Please confirm.
That's good.
Your reservation is successfully booked.
Is this a cheap restaurant.
No, but they are moderate restaurant.
May I know the address?
Their address is 383 1st Street.
I'm searching for a restaurant.
What kind of place?
I'd like someplace that's reasonably priced that also has a vegetarian dishes where I can pick-up my food.
In what city?
How about in Fremont?
I'd like to suggest Olive Garden Italian Restaurant in Fremont.
All right, that's fine.
Should I make a reservation?
Yes, I'd like one.
When would you like it?
I'd like it at 12:30 in the afternoon.
Confirming a 12:30 PM reservation in Fremont for 2 people on March 1st at Olive Garden Italian Restaurant.
That all sounds great.
That table has been booked.
Could you tell me the phone number and the address?
Yes, the contract number is 510-796-5102 and the address is 39145 Farwell Drive.
Find me an economical priced place that Serves southern food in Glen Ellen.
Search revealed 1 result which is Glen Ellen Inn in Glen Ellen.
What is their location and contact number?
You can find them at 13670 Arnold Drive and you can get in touch with them at 707-996-1174.
That is great. Book me a table for 2 at 5 o"clock in the evening on the 5th of March.
You want a table for 2 at 5 pm on March 5th at the Glen Ellen Inn in Glen Ellen, correct?
That is right. Can vegetarians eat there and what is their rating?
Your table is booked. They do have any food for vegetarians and they are rated 4.5 stars.
Hey! Please can you find me some hotels to have food?
Where are you searching for? What type of cuisine do you wish to have?
Please can you search for restaurants serving Asian Fusion in Mountain View?
Yup, I've 4 restaurants for you in Mountain View. Do you wish to dine at Hangen Szechuan?
Do you have any other recommendations, for I'm looking for a economical priced restaurant.
Okay! there are 2 restaurants for you. Do you wish to dien at Kirin located in Mountain View.
Yup, I'm looking for this kind of restaurant only. Please can you book a table here?
At what time?
Please can you make it at twelve in the afternoon?
Please can you confirm me that you wish to reserve a table for 2 people on March 1st at 12 pm at Kirin in Mountain View, right?
Yup, that sounds good. Is it a vegetarian or non-veg hotel?
It's a pure vegetarian restaurant and your booking is successful.
Help me find a place to eat.
Is there a kind of food you prefer?
I want a place that serves lobster.
What area would you like to search in?
I want a place in San Mateo.
Andes Cafe San Mateo in San Mateo is nice.
That sounds like it'll hit the spot.
Do you want me to book a table?
Yeah, book a table for two for the 9th of March at 1:15 pm.
I'll book a table for 2 at Andes Cafe San Mateo in San Mateo for March 9th at 1:15 pm, is everything correct?
Yeah, you got it.
I'm sorry but the reservation didn't go through. Would you like to try a table for 2 at Andes Cafe San Mateo on March 9th at 1 pm?
Yeah, try that.
I've booked the table for you.
I need to find a restaurant in SFO.
What sort of food would you like to eat.
I am in the mood for japanese cuisine but at a restaurant that is not very costly.
I have found 10 suitable choices in San Francisco. There is a lovely restaurant called 2g japanese brasserie.
Great. I would like to book at table for 3 at eleven in the morning.
You would like a table for 3 at 2g japanese brasserie in san francisco for March 1st at 11 am?
Yes, that would be great. May I have an address?
I have made the reservation. The address is 601 van ness avenue.
What is the user rating for there and may I have a contact number
The rating is 3.5 and the numbe is 415-292-9997.
Thanks a lot.
Would you need anything else?
I want to eat out side once and I need your help to find some nice places in Oakland. Can you find the best one which should supply Burrito type food.
How about the one like Agave Uptown restaurant in Oakland which is the best I think among the 8 results that I found.
This is good to me I think. I want to book a table in that restaurant. Can you help me to do so?
Which time will be perfect to you to book the table?
Book it at 13:45.
Please confirm to book a table for 2 at Agave Uptown in Oakland on March 1st for the time 1:45 pm.
That is correct to proceed. Also check whether they have outdoor seating there?
Unfortunately I could not book the table for 2 at Agave Uptown at that particular time. Shall I try it for some other time on the same day March 1st like the time 1:30 pm? and also for your information please not that they do not have outdoor seating.
That's Okay, try for the new time.
That is confirmed and booked successfully.
Thanks for the same.
Anything else you need?
I am interested in finding a restaurant.
in which city?
In Berkeley please.
What type of food do you like?
Somewhere serving Pick-up.
There is 1 restaurant called Gaumenkitzel in Berkeley.
Where are they located?
at 2121 San Pablo Avenue.
yes I like the sound of there.
Will I book a table for you?
please, could you make it for half past 7 in the evening.
To confirm then that is a table for 2 at 7:30 pm on March 1st at Gaumenkitzel in Berkeley.
that suits me fine, do they have vegetarian options.
Your booking is confirmed and yes they have lovely vegetarian options.
Do they have tables outside and what is their contact number?
There is no ouside tables and their contact number is 510-647-5016.
Can you find me a restaurant that serves Asian Fusion that has moderate prices?
In which city should I find the restaurants?
Find me the ones in Petaluma.
Of the 2 restaurants that I found, Flowering Tea House in Petaluma is a nice restaurant.
Is outdoor seating available and do they serve vegetarian dishes?
They do have good options for vegetarians, but they do not have outdoor seating.
Okay. That sounds good.
Should I reserve a table for you there?
Yes, please get me a table for 1 at five pm on the 3rd of March.
Please confirm that you want a table for 1 at the Flowering Tea House restaurant in Petaluma at 5 pm on March 3rd.
Hold on. Make it a table for 4 on next Thursday.
Okay. So you want a table for 4 on March 7th. Is that correct?
Right. Can you get me their phone number please?
Your table has been reserved successfully. Their phone number is 707-775-3088.
I'm going out with some friends for dinner and I want to find a good restaurant.
What kind of cuisine are you interested in and what area should I search in?
Let's search in El Cerrito for a place with pizza and pasta.
I found 1 restaurant you might like. Romano's Macaroni Grill is a good restaurant located in El Cerrito.
Yes, that'll work just fine. I'd like to reserve a table there for 3 people on the 6th of March at 11:30.
Okay, let's confirm: You are booking a table for 3 at Romano's Macaroni Grill in El Cerrito on March 6th at 11:30 am.
My friends just cancelled. So on second thought, let's get a table for 1 on March 14th.
Okay, let's confirm: You are booking a table for 1 on March 14th.
Yes, that's great. Can you tell me what this restaurant is rated and if they have vegetarian options?
Your table has been reserved. They have good vegetarian options and the restaurant received a user rating of 3.9.
I refuse to cook, find me a restaurant
nice idea, give me a city and a type of food and I'll do the rest
the city is sf and the food I want to eat is tapas
there are 8 places in san francisco where you can satisfy your cravings, one is aatxe
I'm not really happy with the one you suggested me, I was thinking to seat outside and pay a moderate price for my food
there is a good 1 in san francisco and it's picaro
can you tell me where is this place? may them take good care of vegetarians?
No, vegetarians won't find anythings for them. the restaurant's location is 3120 16th street
I'm still interested in booking a table for one person at 6:45 pm
confirm me the specifics of your plan. you want to eat a picaro in san francisco on march 1st at 6:45 pm so you need a table for 1 person
it is partially correct, the time for the reservation must be 12:30
I've fixed the time, please check. you want a reservation for 1 people at 12:30 pm
better now
you got your table for 1
perfect, now I need rating and phone number
rating is 4.4 and the number to call if needed is 415-431-4089
Hi, could you help me search for places to eat please?
Where will you prefer to dine at?
Something in Pinole will be great!
Any preferred type of food?
Could you find one which serves up some steaming hot dumplings?
Sure, there are 3 restaurants in Pinole, how about China Delights?
That is fine with me!
Would you like me to make a reservation for you?
Could you do so for 1 on the 6th of this month at 6:30 in the evening please?
Sure, please confirm your reservation for 1 at China Delights in Pinole at 6:30 pm on March 6th.
That is fine with me.
Your reservation has been made.
Do you know if they have outdoor seating?
No, they do not.
How can I contact them?
You can try calling them at 510-964-1882.
I need to find a place to eat.
Where should I look?
Find something is San Francisco please.
What kind of food would you like?
A light meal please.
I found 8 you might like. How about Aatxe in San Francisco?
What else can you find?
Barvale is a nice restaurant in San Francisco.
Can you recommend anything else?
Beso Bistronomia is a nice place in San Francisco.
Yes that is perfect.
Would you like to make a reservation?
Yes please do.
What time would you like your table reserved?
Make it in the evening 6.
You want a table for 2 at Beso Bistronomia in San Francisco on march 1st at 6 pm, correct?
Yes that sounds good.
Your reservation has been made.
What is the restaurant's rating?
They are rated about 4.3.
Find me a restaurant tagged as intermediate priced.I love outdoor seating.
What kind of food you want and in which location you want to be?
I would like to be in San Fran and Southern food to be served.
10 option I have for you.A nice restaurant called B located in San Francisco.
Tell me the user rating please.
Around 4.1 is the user rating at this restaurant.
You can suggest me other?
A nice restaurant is Catch located in San Francisco.
That sounds very good.
You want a table there?
Yes make a reservation for two people on March 7th at 13:00.
Book a table for 2 people at Catch in San Francisco on March 7th at 1 pm.
Sounds great.Tell me the phone number.
Reservation was made.415-431-5000 is the phone number.
They have food for vegetarians?Tell me please the address.
Yes they have very good options for vegetarians.2362 Market Street is the address.
Thank you very much.
With something else I can help you?
i wish to eat outside rather than from home. find a good place to eat?
in which location should i search for?
find restaurants in gilroy?
what kind of food are you searching for?
find something like light meal?
what about mimi's cafe which is a nice restaurant? it is located in gilroy.
ok thats fine. book a table at a restaurant? the table is for two people. looking for a table on 5th of march and the time of reservation should be six in the evening.
please check and confirm the following details. book a table at mimi's cafe in the city gilroy. the reservation timings is at 6 pm for 2 people and the date is march 5th.
ok that suits for me.
reservation is successful.
Find me a place to eat
Which type of food do you prefer? Do you prefer any place?
Look for serving Diner around Saratoga
There is 1 restaurant that is Sent Sovi Restaurant in Saratoga
That's good one
Do you want to reserve?
Yes sure. Reserve it on Thursday next week
Please mention the time
Time is 11:30
Please confirm this: Booking a table at Sent Sovi Restaurant at Saratoga at 11:30 am for 2 people on March 7th
Make the table for 2 people
Please confirm this: The reservation time is 11:30 am for 2 people
That's perfect
Reservation successful
I'd like a outdoor seating restaurant that serves pasta in san fran
How about 54 mint ristorante italiano in san francisco
Hmmm what are they rated and are there vegetarian options?
4.4 and yes they have vegetarian options
Ok, great. Reserve me a table
What time?
12:30 pm
Please confirm your table: a 12:30 pm table for 2 at 54 mint ristorante italiano in san francisco on march 1st
Perfect
This reservation is now complete
I have a plan to eat outside for once and I need your help to search for a good place to eat. Can you help me in this regard.
Yes, always. What about your favorite food and in which City do you want me to search for?
I like to eat Sushi Bar and I want to fine some nice restaurants in San Francisco.
What about a restaurant like Atami Sushi Bar & Grill which is located in San Francisco? Do you like this place?
Yes, I like this restaurant and I want to book a table there for 4 persons on the 13th. Can you do it for me?
Yes, what is your comfortable time to book the table?
Book it at evening 5:30.
Do you want to book a table for 4 at Atami Sushi Bar & Grill in San Francisco on March 13th at 5:30 pm? I want your confirmation.
Yes, confirmed to proceed with booking. Can you check about the price range in that place?
They offer food for moderate prices and I have successfully booked the table.
I need to find a place to dine.
What foods do you like best?
I like Pizza.
Where are you?
I'm in San Francisco.
There are 10 options. First in the list is 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano, it's in San Francisco.
Sure do that then?
When do you want to eat there?
Try for six in the evening.
Fine, I have 2 for Dinner at 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano in San Francisco at 6 pm on March 1st.
Wrong, 1 person and I want twelve in the afternoon like I said.
Ok to be clear: 1 person ad 12 pm.
Fine, just do that. Do they have vegetarian choices?
Your set to dine. Sure they have options for vegetarians. They also have outdoor seating.
Please help me find a reasonably priced restaurant.
Which location and food do you prefer?
I want restaurants in Oakland that serves Pizza and pasta.
How about Belotti Ristorante E Bottega in Oakland?
What's the address?
It's 5403 College Avenue.
Any other option?
How about Contrasto in Oakland?
I like that one, please help me book a table there.
What time do you prefer?
At six pm.
Okay, you want to reserve a table for 2 people at Contrasto in oakland on March 1st at 6 pm. Please confirm.
Yes, What's their rating and their address?
Their rating is around 4.5 and they are located at 388 Grand Avenue. Your table is now reserved!
What is the weather forecast in Atherton on 13th of March?
The forecast average temperature for the day will be 80 degrees Fahrenheit, with an 11 percent chance of rain.
Can you check the weather in Bodega Bay on Wednesday next week?
The average temp that day is 82 degrees with a 19 percent chance of rain.
How windy will it be?
Wind is estimated at 5 miles per hour.
Okay, what about on the 9th of March?
The average temp that day is 74 degrees with a 14 percent chance of rain.
check next friday
what city then?
it is millbrae
92 degrees 0 percent
I'd like to know the Newark forecast on the 10th please.
The temperature will average 92 degrees Fahrenheit with a 16 percent rain possibility that day.
Hi, could you help me check the weather in Foster City please.
It is currently 80 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 22 percent chance of rain.
What is the expected humidity and windiness there?
The humidity is around 38 percent and the wind speed is 8 miles per hour.
I need to check the weather on the 12th of March.
in which city would you like to see weather for?
The city of Novato on the 6th of this month.
The average temperature for that day is predicted to be around 71 degrees Fahrenheit. There is also a 20 percent chance of rain.
Can you check the weather for me?
In what city
Check Gilroy on the 3rd of March.
The temperature is expected to average 86 degrees with a 7 percent chance of rain.
I would like to know the weather in Tiburon on 9th of March.
82 degrees Farenheit is the average temperature for the day. The chance of rain is 27 percent.
Sure. How about the weather in San Rafael?
90 degrees Farenheit is the average temperature for the day. The chance of rain is 9 percent.
How windy and humid is it gonna be?
25 percent is the humidity and it should be 10 miles per hour for the wind speed.
What is the weather in East Palo Alto?
The temperature should be around 92 degrees Fahrenheit with a 19 percent chance of rain.
What's the weather going to be like in Pescadero on the 1st of March?
The forecast average temperature is 86 degrees Fahrenheit with a 0 percent chance of rain.
I want to check the weather for Tuesday next week.
What location do you want to check the weather?
I want to know the weather in Montara.
The average temperature in Montara should be 87 degrees Fahrenheit with a 2 percent chance of rain.
What is the wind and humidity going to be like?
The wind should be around 3 miles per hour and the humidity around 16 percent.
Okay, thanks.
Is there anything else you need?
Hi there, may I know how is the weather like at ATL?
The weather is 86 degress Fahrenheit with a 28 percent chance of rain!
I want to find weather on the 4th of this month.
What city do you want to check in?
Check Glen Ellen.
The temperature for the day should be 90 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 15 percent chance of rain.
How windy will it be?
The wind speed on average will be 11 miles per hour.
I want to know how the weather will be in Duncans Mills for next Thursday.
The average temperature for your requested location should be 87 degrees Fahrenheit, and with a chance of raining of 13 percent.
Whats the weather supposed to be on the 12th?
Which city are we checking the weather for ?
Check in Calistoga.
Alright, I show should be 80 degrees with 0 percent chance of rain.
Great, find out how windy it will be.
The average wind factor is 9 miles per hour.
I want to find out what the weather is.
What city are you interested in finding out the weather for?
I want to find it for San Leandro.
The average temperature for the day should be 83 degrees Fahrenheit. There is also a 1 percent chance of rain.
I'll be spending the day in Cupertino. Can you check what the weather is like there?
Sure, it looks like it's an average of 92 degrees Fahrenheit with a 13 percent chance of rain today.
How windy will it be?
It looks like there will be an average wind of 2 miles per hour.
Could you check the weather forecast for me in Washington DC.
There is a 13 % chance of rain and the ave temp will be 75 degrees Fahrenheit.
Check for me the weather on 5th of this month in Santa Rosa.
For the day the average temperature should be 80 degrees Fahrenheit and 20 percent chance of rain.
Humidity how will it be?
Will be around 41 percent.
Tell me how windy will be.
6 miles per hour will be the average wind speed.
Hey, what's the weather like in Nairobi?
It's around 105 degrees with a 0 percent chance of rain.
Hello, Please can you check the weather forecast for 7th of this month?
Please may I know in which city you wish to look for?
I wish to look in Nairobi, Kenya.
Okay! as per the forecast, there is a chance of 8 percent rain and the average temperature will be around 86 degrees Fahrenheit.
Thanks. Will it be humidity and windy?
About 23 % it will be humidity and the average wind speed will be around 7 miles per hour.
Please check the weather on 10th of this month
which city to check?
San Diego please
There is a 1 % chance of rainfall with 87 degrees temperature
ok, and next thursday?
There is a 17 % chance of rainfall with 90 degrees temperature
What will be the wind conditions like and the humidity?
the wind speed is 8 mph and humidity is at 36 %
What is the weather supposed to be like on the 10th?
Weather for where?
I was talking about Vancouver, BC
Okay the temperature is expected to reach 68 degrees with a 25 percent chance of showers.
Do you have any information on the humidity or wind speed?
The wind is expected to be 6 miles an hour average and 26 percent humidity.
What will it be like outside in San Francisco on the 11th?
It will be 72 degrees on average with a 7 percent chance of it raining.
What about humidity and wind?
21 percent humidity is forecast and wind will be around 12 mph.
I wish to find the weather.
In which city shall I search in?
Search in San Diego.
The temperature is 90 degree Fahrenheit and only 1 % chance of rain.
Can you tell me what the weather is expected to be in Paris the 8th of this month.
The temperature should average 78 degrees with a 25 percent chance of rain.
I want to find out what the weather will be on the 12th.
What is the city that you would like to know the weather for?
The city is Pinole.
The average temperature on that day should be 70 degrees Fahrenheit. There will be a 17 percent chance that it will rain.
Okay, what about in Toronto, Ontario on March 10th?
The average temperature on that day should be 73 degrees Fahrenheit and there will be a 26 percent chance of rain.
Okay, thanks for that.
Is there anything else that you would like?
I want to check the weather in Long Beach, CA on the 2nd.
The average temperature should be around 77 degrees Fahrenheit with a 15 percent chance of rain.
I'm hoping the weather is ok on the 4th. Can you check the whether in Anaheim on that day?
The temperate for that day should be about 89 degrees Fahrenheit with a 20 percent chance of rain.
Awesome, that's fine.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
What's the weather suppose to be for the day after tomorrow in Paris, France?
I show the average temperature as 93 degrees with a 6 percent chance of rain.
Can you tell me what the weather is expected to be like on the 11th of March?
Where would you like me to check the weather?
Please check the expected weather in New Delhi.
The weather report is estimating the average temperature will be 103 degrees Fahrenheit with a 7 percent chance of rain.
That will be hot. What is the humidity and wind factor expected to be like?
The humidity is around 19 percent and the wind speed is estimated at 10 miles an hour.
Find out what the weather is like in SFO on March 12th.
The weather reads an average temperature of 76 Fahrenheit for the day with a 23 percentage possibility of raining.
What is the humidity like and what is the wind like?
It is about 35 percent humid and wind speed on an average is about 6 miles an hour.
What will the weather in Anaheim, CA be on the 1st of this month?
The average temperature will be 78 degrees Fahrenheit with a 29 percent chance of rain.
I need to see the weather on Friday next week in CDMX
The average temperature there is 102 degrees with a 6 percent chance of rain
I want to know the weather on the 10th in Long Beach, CA
The temperature will be 75 degree Fahrenheit and 20 % chance of rain.
What about the windy?
The windy speed shall be 11 miles per hour.
I need to check the weather in Delhi, India next Monday
The temperature is gonna be 97 degrees with an 8 percent of rain
Assistance, can you tell me the forecast for Seattle, WA?
There is a moderate chance of rain at 32 percent. The temperature will be around 74 degrees Fahrenheit.
I'm hoping the weather is ok for Friday next week. Can you check for me?
What city should I check the weather in?
Please check in San Rafael.
The forecast for that day should be around 74 degrees Fahrenheit with a 8 percent chance of rain.
Please check the 3rd of March in Philly.
The forecast for that day should be around 85 degrees Fahrenheit with a 21 percent chance of rain.
I must verify the weather for next Wednesday.
What metropolis do you wish to verify the weather for?
The metropolis is SD.
The mean temperature for that date ought to be 80 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 6 percent likelihood for rain.
What is the humidity level and wind level?
The humidity level is close to 23 percent, while the wind level is 1 mile per hour.
What's my intention for wanting to go to San Diego on the 5th of March during my vacation? No particular reason other than just relax. Would you tell me what weather I'll encounter there?
Happy to help. You can expect the day to average about 84 degrees Fahrenheit and a forecast of just 8 percent rain.
I see. What are the wind and humidity going to be like?
The wind is expected to average 4 miles an hour with humidity about 21 percent.
I will be visiting my sister soonest, can you please check the weather for me?
On which city do you want me to check the weather?
Check it in Washington D.C.
Okay, the temperature on that would be 75 degrees Farenheit. And do not forget to bring an umbrella even there's just 13 percent chance of rain.
i have a plan to travel . find the weather condition on march 10th in anaheim.
the average temperature for the day should be 76 degrees fahrenheit. there is a 9 percent chance of rain.
Whats the weather like?
Well, it depends where.
In SD on March 9th.
It should be around 83 degrees with probably no rain, or just a 25 percent chance of it.
What about wind and humidity?
Humidity should be around 40 percent and you don't really have to worry about your hat since wind will likely clock in at 7 mph.
I need to check weather on the 5th of March.
Which city would you like to check in?
I need to check in San Francisco.
The average temperature is expected to be 87 degrees Fahrenheit. There is expected to be a 23 percent chance of rain.
How windy is it expected to be?
The average wind speed is expected to be roughly 1 mile per hour.
Hey, how's the weather in SF?
It's around 91 degrees with a 29 percent chance of rain.
What is the weather going to be like on the 13th of this month?
Which city would you like to check.
I need to know the weather in NY.
The average temperature for the day should be 59 degrees. There is a 33 percent chance of rain.
Hey! Please can you check the weather forecast for Long Beach on 8th of March?
Sure. Its found that there can be 10 percent chance of rain with an average temperature of about 80 degrees Fahrenheit.
I want to check weather on march 9th in Sacramento.
The average day temperature is running at 92 degrees Fahrenheit and the chances of rain is 23 percent
Fine, what about the weather on the 5th.
The average day temperature is running at 93 degrees Fahrenheit and the chances of rain is 2 percent
Is there windy? What about the humidity?
The wind speed is 12 miles per hour and humidity is 17 percent.
What is the weather forecast in New York on the 14th of this month?
The forecast is predicting an average temperature of 60 degrees Fahrenheit with a 6 % chance of rain.
Can you look up the weather in Washington D.C. for March 7th?
It will be 81 degrees with a 20 percent chance of rain.
Will it be humid?
It will be about 27 percent humidity
Will it be windy?
Wind speed will be about 2 miles per hour.
I want to see what the weather will be like on the 1st of this month in Fresno.
The temperature should average 72 degrees for the day and there is only a 2 percent chance of it raining.
How will the wind and humidity be on this day?
The humidity will be around 18 percent and the winds should average around 10 miles per hour.
What kind of weather can I expect on the 11th of this month?
Where did you have in mind?
I was thinking about Atlanta.
There is 0 chance of showers with the day's average being 87 Fahrenheit.
Oh well, what about next Friday?
The average for that day is expected to be 79 and a 12 percent chance of rain showers.
Hi I have plans today so I'm hoping the weather is ok. Can you check for me?
Which city should I check the weather in?
Please check in Chicago.
The forecast today should be about 73 degrees Fahrenheit with a 29 percent chance of rain.
Can you also check for the 7th of this month?
The forecast for that day should be around 74 degrees Fahrenheit with a 23 percent chance of rain.
What is the humidity supposed to be? Will it be windy?
The humidity prediction for that day is around 30 percent. The wind speed should also be about 14 miles per hour.
I want to know the weather in Sydney on next Monday. My mother will go there.
There's a 7 % chance of rain that day and the average temperature is at 96 degrees.
Thanks, how about March 6th in San Fran. I will go there on that day.
Low chance of rain at 3 % and the average temperature is at 72 degrees.
Is it that windy or how humid it is? I want to know so that I could plan my itinerary.
Humidity is at 16 % and the wind speed is at 12 miles per hour.
Hello! Please can you tell me how the weather will be for tomorrow?
Please can I've the zip code or city in which you are looking for?
I'm looking for New York.
Okay! I can see that there is 29 % chance of rain and the average temperature will be around 57 degrees Fahrenheit.
Is it gonna be windy or humidity?
About 26 % its gonna to be humidity and the wind speed will be 6 miles per hour on an average.
I would like to check the weather please.
What city are we weather checking?
Long Beach, CA please.
The average temp is 80 degrees with a 17 percent chance of rain.
What about for March 12th?
I am showing the average temp to be 90 degrees with a 26 percent chance of rain.
Thanks for that information.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
check weather march 3rd fresno
77 degrees 18 percent rain
how humid though?
31 percent rain 8 miles per hour
check weather on the 12th
what city then?
next monday chicago
65 degrees 35 percent rain
I am going to SD soon. Can you check the weather in there?
The temperature should be around 90 degrees Fahrenheit with a 1 percent chance of rain.
Check to weather for the 3rd of this month.
For what city?
Duncans Mills
It will be 93 degrees with a 20 percent chance of rain.
How about on the 5th of this month?
It will be about 90 degrees with a 1 percent chance of rain.
How about in Mexico city?
It will be 87 degrees with a 3 percent chance of rain.
I have a couple trips coming up. Can you check what the weather will be like at Muir Beach on the 10th of this month?
Sure, looks like the average temperature will be 92 degrees Fahrenheit with a 22 percent change of rain.
Ok, great. Can you also check the weather in Ciudad de Mexico on the 6th of March?
Sure, it'll be an average of 95 degrees Fahrenheit with a 4 percent chance of rain.
I want to check the weather.
What city are you checking the weather for?
I want to find the weather in Sydney, NSW.
The temperature should be 94 degrees Fahrenheit and a 4 percent chance of rain.
What's the wind going to be like?
The wind speed will be 2 miles per hour.
What would the weather be like on the 12th of this month?
In which city?
In atlanta, GA.
It would be 78 degrees fahrenheit with a 19 percent chance of rain.
How windy would it be?
The average wind speed is expected to be 9 miles per hour.
I will be visiting my sister on Morgan Hill on the 12th, can you please check the weather for me?
Sure, there's a 10 % chance of rain on that day and the average temperature is at 87 degrees.
That's not so cold, how about in Nairobi, Kenya?
There's a 9 percent chance of rain and the average temperature is 103 degrees.
I will be going to Philadelphia and would like to know the weather on March 10th.
The temperature should be around 91 degrees Fahrenheit and around 4 percent chance of rain.
How will the humidity be?
It will be around 17 percent.
Hello, Please can you check the weather forecast for SF on March 11th?
Sure. It's found that there can 7 % chance of rain and the average temperature will be around 72 degrees Fahrenheit.
Can you tell me what the weather will be like in Los Angeles on the 12th?
The average temperature will be 77 degrees Fahrenheit with a 27 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy?
The wind speed will be 9 miles per hour.
I am very interested in knowing about the weather in Vegas.
You will have temperature averaging 84 degrees Fahrenheit and there is an 18 percent possibility of raining.
What's the weather going to be like this Saturday in Chi-town?
The average temperature on that day is expected to be 61 degrees Fahrenheit with a 33 percent chance of rain.
Okay, how windy is it supposed to be?
Average wind speed for that day is expected to be around 6 MPH.
I have a day off and was thinking about going on a day trip. Can you check what the weather is like in Toronto, Ontario?
Sure, it looks like it'll be an average of 58 degrees Fahrenheit with a 13 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy?
Not too bad, looks like an average of 9 miles per hour.
I must verify the weather in Los Angeles.
The mean temperature for the date ought to be 76 degrees fahrenheit. There's a 28 percent likelihood of raining.
Can you check the weather on the 3rd of March
What city do you want to check?
Let's look in Fresno
It'll be 77 degrees with an 18 percent chance of rain
Can you help me check the weather on the 14th in Sydney, NSW
The average temperature is 100 Degrees and a 2 percent chance of rain
How humid is it gonna be?
It's around 16 percent humidity
How windy is it gonna be?
The average wind speed will be around 8 miles per hour
Hi, could you get me a restaurant booking on the 8th please?
Any preference on the restaurant, location and time?
Could you get me a reservation at P.f. Chang's in Corte Madera at afternoon 12?
Please confirm your reservation at P.f. Chang's in Corte Madera at 12 pm for 2 on March 8th.
Sure, that is great.
Sorry, your reservation could not be made. Could I help you with something else?
Could you try booking a table at Benissimo instead?
Sure, please confirm your reservation at Benissimo Restaurant & Bar in Corte Madera at 12 pm for 2 on March 8th.
Sure, may I know if they have vegetarian options and how expensive is their food?
Your reservation has been made. Unfortunately, they do not serve vegetarian options, although they are moderate priced.
I see, thanks alot!
No worries, could I further assist you?
No, that is all. Thank you!
Have a great day ahead!
Can you book a table for me at the Ancient Szechuan for the 11th of this month at 11:30 am?
In which city are you trying to book the table?
Can you book a table at the Butterfly restaurant in San Francisco?
Please confirm that you need a table for 2 at the Butterfly Restaurant in San Francisco at 11:30 am on March 11th.
That's perfect. What cuisine do they offer?
Your table has been booked successfully and they serve Asian cuisine.
Can you get me the user rating of the restaurant? Is it expensive?
Their prices are moderate and they have a user rating of 4.0.
Thanks a bunch!
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No. Thank you. That's all I need.
Have a great day!
Can you check restaurants in Pacifica, I'm looking to make a reservation.
Is there a particular restaurant you want? What time did you want the reservation?
See if you can get one at Puerto 27 for 1:15 pm.
To verify: You would like a reseravation at Puerto 27 in Pacifica for 1:15 pm on March 1st for 2.
Yes that's right.
Your table is reserved.
Thanks so much. That's all I need for now.
Have a great day.
I need to book a dinner reservation for a date. Help me reserve a table at a restaurant.
What time and location do you have in mind?
Something around 8 in the night should be fine. Oh, and look in the San Jose area.
Do you have a specific restaurant in mind?
Let's try booking a table at Little Hunan.
You wish to reserve a table for 2 at Little Hunan in San Jose on March 1st at 8 pm. Is that correct?
It sure is. Please make the reservation right away.
I was not able to process your reservation. I apologize for any inconvenience.
Okay. Try booking a table at Little Hunan again but make it at a quarter past 5 in the evening.
Booking a table at Little Hunan located in San Jose. The reservation is for 2 people on March 1st at 5:15 pm. Is that right?
That's correct. Let's hope the reservation goes through this time.
I was unable to book your table with those details. If you like, I can make a reservation for you at Little Hunan on March 1st at 5 pm for 2 people.
Really? That'll work just fine. Please try that.
I have made your reservation and successfully reserved your table.
At last. Thank you so much. Before I let you go, can you tell me the restaurant's user rating?
The user rating for Little Hunan is 3.9.
Are there any vegetarian dishes available at that restaurant?
I apologize but they do not have vegetarian dishes.
That's alright. Thanks for the information.
My pleasure. What else do you require?
Oh nothing. Booking the table was all I needed. Thanks again.
Have a wonderful evening.
Can you book a reservation for a restaurant at this evening 5:30?
At which restaurant would you like to make a reservation?
See if you can get a table at Mi Zacatecas.
In which location is Mi Zacatecas?
It's in American Canyon.
Please confirm the following: Book 1 table at Mi Zacatecas Family Restaurant in American Canyon for 2 at 5:30 pm on March 1st.
Confirm. Can you tell me what type of food they serve there?
The reservation has successfully been made. They serve Mexican food.
Great, that will be all.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
I need to book a table at a restaurant.
At which time would you like to reserve it for?
I want it at 1:15 in the afternoon, please.
In which location would you like it? What is the restaurant name?
I need a table at Saap Ver, in San Francisco.
Please confirm the following information: Book a table at Saap Ver, in San Francisco at 1:15 PM on the day of March 1st. This is for a party of 2, correct?
Yes, that is everything. Address?
Sorry, but the reservation could not be placed. Is there anything else to help with?
No, but thanks.
Of course. Have a wonderful day.
I'm looking to book a table. Can you try Triptych in SF?
Of course, what time would you prefer?
Give me 6:15 in the evening please.
Here's what I heard: 2 people for a table at triptych in San Francisco at 6:15 pm on March 1st.
No, wrong. Give me Friday next week instead.
Sure, I have booking table at Triptych on March 8th.
No, one more time. One person.
I have March 8th 1 person.
Yes, that's a winner thanks. Do they have vegetarian options?
Well, good news bad news. First they DO have vegetarian options at Triptych. Bad news, no availability at your preferred time. How about March 8th at 6 pm for 1?
No, that will not do.
Sorry about that, have a good day.
I would like to make a reservation at a restaurant for half past 1 in the afternoon.
In which restaurant would you like a table?
I would like a table at Left Bank.
In which location would you like?
I would like a restaurant in Larkspur.
Booking a table at Left Bank Larkspur Brasserie in Larkspur for 2 people on March 1st at 1:30 pm.
Yes, that reservation is good.
Your reservation was made.
Thank you for your assistance.
Have a good day.
I need to make a reservation for a restaurant in Oakland. The reservation should be for next Wednesday at 6:45 pm.
Which restaurant would you like me to make a reservation for?
Can you book me a table at Mcdonald's?
Please confirm: Reserve 1 table at Mcdonald's in Oakland for 2 people on March 6th at 6:45 pm.
That is correct. How expensive is the restaurant and does it have outdoor seating?
Your reservation has been made. It is a cheap restaurant. It does not have outdoor seating.
Thank you.
Can I assist you with anything else?
No thanks.
Enjoy your day.
I want to make a restaurant reservation.
What's the name of the restaurant and what time would you like the reservation?
It's name is La Hacienda and I want the reservation for 2 o"clock in the afternoon.
And where is the restaurant located?
It's in Cloverdale.
I'll make a reservation for La Hacienda Mexican Restaurant in Cloverdale for March 1st at 2 pm for 2 people, is that good for you?
Yeah,that's good. What's the user rating of the restaurant?
I'm sorry, but the reservation couldn't be completed. Is there anything else you need?
No, thanks a lot.
You're welcome, have a fine day.
I am trying to book a dinner reservation in San Fran for one. Can you try booking a table at Lers Ros?
What time would you like me to make a reservation for?
If you could, please make the reservation for 12:15 in the afternoon.
Confirm the following about your reservation: I am booking a table for Lers Ros Thai in San Francisco. The reservatin is on March 1st at 12:15 pm for 1 person. Is this acceptable?
That will work just fine.
I was unable to make a reservation with these details. I can book a table at Lers Ros Thai on March 1st at 12 pm for 1 person. Is that okay?
No that's all the help I needed. Thanks.
You are welcome. Have a great rest of your day.
I want to book a table at a restaurant in Danville please
Do you have a particular restaurant in mind?
Yeah actually, can you try Lotus for me
For what time do you want to go?
Let's do it before lunch at 11:45
Confirming that you want a table for 2 at 11:45 am on March 1st at the Lotus Thai Restaurant in Danville?
Yes that's all correct
Sorry I couldn't book that one, do you want me to try for 12 pm on March 1st instead? Still for 2 at Lotus Thai Restaurant
Yes please do that
That one worked! It's booked!
Is it cheap over there? Also give me their address
It's in the moderate price range, so not so bad. And find them at 115 Hartz Avenue
OK, thanks that's it for now
Enjoy your meal there!
My boss from headquarters is coming to town and I would like to treat him and his wife to dinner. Can you help me find a restaurant in San Francisco with available seating for four people, next Tuesday?
That shouldn't be a problem. Is there a specific time you had in mind?
Yes, a general dinner time is fine, so let's try to book a table for 6:30 pm.
Okay, and what about the venue, Is there a particular restaurant you want me to search for first?
Yes, I'm told that Aq is very good. Let's try that one first.
No problem, before I check into reservations, let me just make sure that the details I have are correct. You would like a table for 4 at Aq, located in San Francisco, on March 5th, at 6:30 pm. Is that right?
No, I'm sorry, I forgot he is not bring his wife so lets book a table for 3 at Ming's instead.
Okay, I've changed those details to a table for 3 at Ming's Diner. Is that correct?
Perfect, and can you also tell me the the establishment's rating as well?
The rating of the restaurant I was able to confirm your reservation for is 4.0.
Great, I believe that will be all fr now. Thanks!
My pleasure, enjoy the rest of your day!
Help me to find hotel in Petaluma to book a table at evening 7:30.
Do you have any particular restaurant to choose?
yeah, get me at Cattlemens.
Then please confirm, you need a table for 2 people in Cattlemens in Petaluma at 7:30 pm on March 1st.
Good, thats all.
It is booked.
Shall I get veg food there. What is their phone number?
No, you won't get veg. Their address is 5012 Petaluma Boulevard North.
Great service, thank you.
Do you need any other help?
No, thats all.
Have a great day.
Can you help me book a table at Thai Chili on March 11th? Please find restaurants in Santa Clara.
What time do you prefer?
I want 5:45 in the evening.
Okay, you want to book a table for 2 people at Thai Chili Cuisine in Santa Clara on March 11th at 5:45 pm. Please confirm.
Yes, that's good.
Sorry, I fail to make a reservation. Thai Chili Cuisine is a good restaurant, do you want me to book a reservation for 2 again on March 11th at 6 pm?
Yes, that's fine.
Your booking is now confirmed!
Thanks a lot.
You are welcome!
Could you look at restaurants for me to reserve a table?
Sure! Where would you like me to search? Is there a particular restaurant?
How about Chianti Cucina in Novato.
Okay, what time would you like to reserve?
For 4:45 pm please.
Okay, please confirm the details: one table in Novato at restaurant Chianti Cucina for 4:45 pm on March 1st. Reservation is for 2.
Yes, perfect. Book it please. Is there any outdoor seating there? What kinds of foods do they have?
They have Italian. Unfortunately, there is no outdoor seating. It looks like I will be unable to make the reservation for that time at Chianti Cucina. How about reserving a table for 2 people on March 1st at 5 pm
Yes please.
Your table has been reserved.
Thanks so much. That's all.
You're welcome, have a wonderful day.
I want to book a table for 4 people on March 10th in Petaluma.
On what restaurant you want to be and at what time?
Try please at Izakaya Kitaru.At 17:30 will be very good for me.
Book a table at Izakaya Kitaru in Petaluma for 4 people at 5:30 pm on March 10th.Is that okay for you?
Yes is okay.Outdoor seating are available?
The reservation was made.Outdoor seating is not available.
Tell me the phone number and the address.
707-789-9068 is the phone number and the address is 212 Western Avenue.
Thanks for the help. That's what I wanted for the moment.
Have a great day!
Can you book a table at a restaurant for me?
What is the location and time for the booking?
I am looking for restaurants in Mountain View for the reservation at seven pm.
What is the name of your preferred restaurant?
I would like to go with Sushi 85.
Please confirm: You want me to book a table for 2 people at Sushi 85 located Mountain View at 7 pm on March 1st.
Okay, That sounds great! Find me the address please.
I have successfully booked the table and the address is 1350 Grant Road.
Can you find me their phone number?
You can call them on 650-965-8898.
Okay, Thank you for the help!
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day!
I need to reserve a table at a restaurant in SF for 7 pm.
What restaurant do you want to reserve a table at?
Can you reserve a table at Regent?
Please confirm: Reserve a table at Regent Thai in San Francisco for 2 people on March 1st at 7 pm.
That is correct.
Your reservation has been confirmed.
Thanks, that is all.
Enjoy your day.
I'd like to make a reservation at a restaurant.
Is there a specific restaurant you'd like to make the reservation for?
It's a restaurant called Amalfi, please try that.
Where is the restaurant located and what time do you want the reservation for?
I want it for 5:30 in the evening and it should be in Larkspur.
I'll make you a reservation at Amalfi in Larkspur for 5:30 pm on March 1st for 2 people. Is that correct?
Yeah, that sounds awesome.
I've booked the reservation.
Thanks a lot. That's it for now.
Have an excellent rest of your day.
Can you help me to book a table at a restaurant for 2 people at evening 6:30
Is there any choice of restaurant you want to book?
Would you kindly book the table at Mcdonalds?
In which place you want me to search?
Search restaurants in Morgan Hill and it is for next monday
Please give the confirmation details:your table booking at Mcdonalds in the city Morgan Hill on march 4th for 2 people at 6:30 pm.
Okay..this is cool
Your booking is confirmed.
Is there outdoor seating in that restaurant and can i know the phone number
There is no outdoor seating and telephone number is 408-779-8182.
This is cool..thanks a lot.
Have a nice day.
I would like to reserve a table for 1 at La Briciola tomorrow morning 11.
What city should I search?
Search in SFO, please.
You would like to reserve a table for 1 at La Briciola in San Francisco on March 1st at 11 am, is this correct?
No, please make it a table for 3.
Please confirm, you would like the reservation for 3 people in San Francisco.
Yes, that sounds great. What type of food do they serve?
It is an Italian restaurant. Sorry, I was unable to reserve the time you selected. Would you like to reserve a table for 3 at La Briciola on March 1st at 11:30 am?
That sounds fine.
Your reservation is successful.
Thank you, I'm all set.
Have a great day!
Can you find me a restaurant table for 3 people in Alameda, please?
What time would you like a reservation?
I'd like it for 11:30 in the morning on March 13th. It'll just be one person dining.
Do you want a particular restaurant?
How about Cafe Jolie?
Please confirm: reserve a table for Cafe Jolie in Alameda for 11:30 am on March 13th. The reservation will be for 1 person.
Yes, that's perfect.
I've successfully confirmed your reservation.
Thank you very much!
Will that be all?
Yes, that's everything for today.
Have a nice day!
Looking to book a table at the Academy bar?
Which location to look in and at what time?
Find in San Fran at 19:00
Please confirm: Booking a table for 2 at the Academy Bar and Kitchen in San Francisco at 7 pm on March 1st.
Yes, thats right
it is done
Any vegetarian options there?
yes, there are good options
thanks a lot
any thing else?
no, thanks again
have a great day!
I need to book a table at a nice restaurant.
Sure thing, what are the specifics? Time, place and which restaurant?
I kinda want to eat at Namu Gaji at one pm, the branch in SFO
Just confirming you want me to search for a 1 pm reservation for 2 people on March 1st at the Namu Gaji in San Francisco yes?
Yup that's right. Can you check how pricey it is and what their user rating is?
Sure, they are in the moderate price range and have a 4.3 average user rating, however I was unable to book your table for 2 at Namu Gaji. Do you want me to try for March 1st at 12:30 pm instead?
No, I'm not available then
Can I try something else for you?
No, not right now, thanks for your assistance
My pleasure, let me know if I can do anything else for you
I want to reserve a restaurant table for 1 at 1 in the afternoon.
What restaurant would you like the table at? Where should I look for it?
I'd like a table at Yin Keng. Look in Windsor.
A table for 1 at Yin Keng Restaurant in Windsor at 1 pm on March 1st. Is this correct?
That's it. Do they have vegetarian meals? Where is the restaurant?
Your reservation has been made. They have vegetarian meals. The address is 8840 Lakewood Drive.
Thanks for your help.
Do you need anything else?
No, that is all.
Have a nice day.
Please book one table at Tandoori Mahal at 12:30 in the afternoon. The date is 13th of this month.
What is the location sir?
I am looking for one in San Francisco.
Look through your request. You need a table at Tandoori Mahal Indian Restaurant in San Francisco at 12:30 pm on March 13th. There will be 2 people, right?
Fine, what about food category.
You will get Indian food. Your booking confirmed.
Get me their phone number. What is their rating?
Contact them on 415-951-0505. they have 3.4 rating.
Good service, thank you.
Have a great day.
I want to have a table booked for me at a restaurant, because I want to have a meal.
Can you tell me the restaurant you are interested to have a table booked at?
Can you check if you can make a booking of a table at Castle Rock?
Can you tell me the time that you want to have the table booked for you?
I prefer to have the booking be made for 12:00.
Is there a specific location you are looking for?
I am interested in restaurants which are located in Livermore.
Can you please confirm that you want to book a table for 2 people at Castle Rock Restaurant in Livermore, and that you want the table to be booked for you for 12 pm on March 1st?
That is not right. Could you please see if you can make a booking at Mcdonald's?
Can you please confirm that you want to have a table booked for you on March 1st at Mcdonald's?
I don't want that either. See if you can find me restaurants in Pittsburg.
Can you please confirm that you want to have a table booked for you at 12 pm in the city of Pittsburg?
Yes that suits me well. Could you inform me about the fact how expensive is the restaurant?
Your requested booking has been made, and the restaurant is considered as cheap.
I appreciate it very much. That would be all.
Have a wonderful day.
I'd like to book a table for 1 this sunday somewhere in half moon bay.
Which restaurant? And what time should the booking be for?
Could you find something at Miramar Beach, quarter past 11 in the morning?
Please confirm: You want to book a tale at the Miramar Beach Restaurant in Half MOon bay at 11:15 am on march 3rd for 1.
Exactly. What is their address, and what's the user rating?
Their address is 131 mirada road, and they have a rating of 4.2 Sorry, I couldn't make that reservation at the Miramar Beach restaurant, however, they have an opening for 1 on march 3rd at 11:30 am, would that work?
Yes.
Your reservation was successful.
Thank you so much.
Do you need anything else?
Nope! Thank you!
You're very welcome, have a good day.
I would like to take this girl I like out for a casual meal on the 3rd of this month, when I get paid so something around eleven am would be perfect. Can you help me locate a restaurant in Palo Alto?
Not a problem, is there a specific restaurant you had in mind?
Yes, I've heard really good things about a restaurant called Lotus.
Great, before I get you set up with a reservation can you just confirm that everything I have is correct? I have a table for 2, at Lotus Thai Bistro located in Palo Alto on March 3rd, at 11 am. Does this sound correct?
Yes everything you have is correct.
I'm sorry to inform you that I was not able to make that reservation for you, however, would you like me to try to set a new reservation for 2 at Lotus Thai Bistro on March 3rd for 11:30 am?
No, that won't work but thank you any way.
My pleasure, again I am sorry and have a nice day!
I want to make a restaurant reservation somewhere please.
What is the location you'd like?
I am in Palo Alto.
Is there a restaurant in particular you would like?
Yes, Anatolian please for 3 people, if you would.
A reservation for what time please?
Would you try for 12:30?
Confirming a table for 3 on March 1st at 12:30 pm in Palo Alto at Anatolian Kitchen.
Oops, please change that to one person.
Confirming a 12:30 pm reservation for a party of 1.
Okay, thanks. I'm wondering if they have vegetarian choices on their menu. Also, what kind of menu do they have in general?
They serve Mediterranean cuisine and they also do offer vegetarian selections. Congratulations, your table has been booked.
Wonderful. Thank you for helping me.
Is there anything else you need?
No, that's all I needed.
Thank you very much.
Hi there, could you get me a table at a restaurant on the 14th of March at 1:30 pm please?
Sure, any particular restaurant are you interested in ?
Could you get me a reservation at Schroeder's please?
Sure, and which location would you prefer?
A table for two at San Francisco will be fine.
Please confirm you reservation at Schroeder's in San Francisco for 2 at 1:30 pm on the March 14th.
That sounds great to me!
Your reservation has been made.
Thank you so much!
Do you require any further assistance?
No, that is all I need. Really appreciate it!
No worries, have a great day!
I am in a nice mood and I like to listen some nice songs. Can you search for me the best one?
Yes, what about your opinion on Nixta Ginontai Ta Thavmata by Malou Kyriakopoulou from the album Ores Aixmis. Hope you will like it.
Let me know the type of this song and also check whether it is from '16?
No, it is from the year 2019 and it is a Pop type song.
That's great and I like the same.
Shall I play it for you now?
Yes, do it for me.
Please confirm to play the song Nixta Ginontai Ta Thavmata in Living Room.
That is confirmed to proceed.
Song started playing. Enjoy the same.
Thanks & that's all.
Have a good day.
Find me some music okay?
I came up with 10 so far. Would you like to hear a song from the Miley Cyrus album Younger Now? It's called Malibu.
What year was that in?
2017 is the release date.
Okay play that one.
Play that song?
Yes if you would please.
So I will play Malibu in the Living Room right?
That is right.
Have a pleasant listening experience.
I appreciate that.
Can I be of further assistance?
Not right now thanks.
Have a most wonderful day!
Can you recommend a song to listen to?
I'd be happy to help. May I suggest Roller Coaster from the album Crash My Party by Luke Bryan.
Perfect! I love that song.
Do you want me to play it now?
Yes, I'd like to listen to it now.
You'd like to hear Roller Coaster played in the Living room. Is that correct?
Yes, that will be perfect.
Your selection has begun streaming.
Great! Thank you for the help.
You're welcome. Have a wonderful day.
Please find me any of the songs that I've played the most this week.
How about Strangers by Sigrid, from her album Sucker Punch?
Cool! That's the song I'd like you to play.
Sure! Please confirm that you'd like to play Strangers in the Living room.
You got that right.
Do enjoy listening to your music.
Thank you very much. That will be all.
Do have yourself a great day!
Can you search for some songs from 2015?
I found 10 songs for you. What about Back It Up by Prince Royce, from the album Double Vision?
What genre of music is that song?
It is a Pop song.
That sounds good.
Would you like to listen to the song now?
Yeah, play it on the kitchen device, please.
You would like to play the song Back It Up in on the device in the Kitchen, is this correct?
Yes, go ahead.
Enjoy the music!
Thank you!
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, I'm fine for now, thank you!
Have a great day!
I am looking for some nice songs.
How about Black Widow by Iggy Azalea from the album The New Classic?
Yes, That is music I am looking for.
Do you want me to play the song for you?
Yes, Play the song on my living room.
Please confirm: You want me to play Black Widow in Living room.
Yes, That sounds perfect.
Your music is playing. Enjoy!
Can you confirm whether it came out three years back and find the type of the music?
The type is Pop song and it came out in 2014.
That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day!
I'm in the mood for some music and would like to play some songs.
Okay, what about Masterpiece by Jessie J from the Sweet Talker album?
Did that song come out six years ago?
The song came out in 2014.
What kind of music is it?
This is a Pop song.
Yes, that's the one I'm thinking of.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
Yes, please play that song on any device.
Okay, let's confirm: Playing the song Masterpiece in the Living room.
Yes, thanks.
Okay, enjoy your music.
Thank you!
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, that's all thanks.
Have a great day!
I am interested in listening to some music. Would you search for some songs?
There are 10 songs I found that you may enjoy. Would you like to hear The Way I am by Charlie Puth? This is from the Voicenotes album.
Was this the one published in 2012?
No, it came out in 2018.
Oh yes, that is the one I wanted to hear. Please play the song on any device.
Please confirm you would like to hear The way I Am in the Living Room.
No, please play it on the speaker in patio.
Please confirm you wish to hear the song The way I Am in the Patio.
Yes, that is right.
Here you go and enjoy your music!
Would you tell me the genre of this music?
This is considered a Pop song.
Great, thank you for your help!
Do you need assistance with anything today?
No, that is all for now. Thanks again!
Enjoy and have a great day!
Hey, I feel like listening to some tunes right now. Can you find me something from two years ago?
Sure! What about the song Airplane Mode from the album Holo by Limbo?
I love it.
Should I play it?
Please do. Cast it on the living room device.
So you want the song the song Airplane Mode on the Living room device?
Actually, cast it on the patio device.
So you want me to play the song Airplane Mode on the Patio?
Yes, that's it. What kind of music is it?
Enjoy! It's a pop song.
Thanks! That's all.
Have a great day!
I'd like to look for music right now.
What is your opinion regarding Medicine by Jennifer Lopez from her album Medicine Remixes?
Do you have something else? I enjoy music by Greta Van Fleet.
I discovered 1 music for you. What is your opinion regarding Highway Tune by Greta Van Fleet from the album Black Smoke Rising?
Yeah, that's perfect for me.
Do you wish to cast this music?
Yup. Play it on patio speaker.
Please verify the following information: cast the music Highway Tune in Patio.
Nope; play it on speaker in kitchen.
Please verify the following information: cast the music Highway Tune in Kitchen.
Yeah, that's the right one.
Have fun with your song.
Thank you for your help; that's all.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
Hey, I need some songs. I want some from the album This Is Acting, and I like songs by Sia, and also Popular genre songs.
There are 5 songs in this selection. I have found Alive by Sia from the album This Is Acting.
Which year was that released anyway?
Its release date is from the year 2013.
Okay, give me that. I want it to play on the patio speaker.
Please confirm the following details: Play Alive in Patio via speaker. Correct?
Yes, that's it!
Enjoy your selection.
Thank you so much!!
Of course. Have a wonderful day.
Hello, I want to find songs please, ones like on the album The New Classic. Or tunes from, say, six years back.
How about the Iggy Azalea song Bounce, which is from The New Classic album?
What other popular songs can you suggest? Those are the ones I like.
There are 2 options you might like. One of them is Change Your Life, which is also from the Iggy Azalea album, The New Classic.
Anything else that you think is good?
Another good Iggy Azalea track from The New Classic is the song Work.
Okay, I like that one the best.
Shall I play that song for you at this time?
Yes, and please do it in the Living room.
Confirming playback of Work on the Living room speaker.
Sorry, no, do it on the speaker in kitchen instead.
Certainly. Confirming kitchen speaker playback of the track Work.
Right, that's what I'd like.
Please enjoy your selection.
Thanks, I'm sure I will.
You're very welcome. Have a lovely day.
I would like to search for songs at this time.
What do you think about Where Have You Been by Rihanna from the Talk That Talk album?
What year did it come out?
It was from 2011.
Yes, that's the one I'd like to play songs so cast it on the speaker outside.
Please confirm playing the song Where Have You Been in Patio.
Yes, that is the one.
Enjoy the music.
Thanks so much. That is it.
Have a great day.
I am interested in finding songs.
Well how about houdini by Foster The People from their album Torches?
Yes sounds good.
Shall I play it?
Please in the living room.
So I am playing the song Houdini in the living room.
No actually play it on the kitchen speaker.
To confirm them that is Houdini song playing in the kitchen.
Yes thanks. What genre of music is it and when was it released?
It is indie music, released in 2011, I hope you like it.
thanks so much.
Anything else I can assist you with?
No that is all thanks.
Enjoy your day.
I am looking for some songs from the album High Expectations from '19.
I found 3 songs. The first song I found is Bad Behaviour by Mabel from the album High Expectations.
Yes, that would be great.
Should I play this song for you?
Yes, please play it in my kitchen, thanks.
You would like me to play the song Bad Behaviour in the Kitchen?
Yes, please do.
Enjoy the music!
Thank you, I'm all set.
Have a great day!
I want to find a song now, and I know that there are some really good songs in the album called We Are Not Your Kind, also I enjoy Rock-and-roll songs which are from the '19.
There is 1 song which you might like. How would you like listening to the Birth Of The Cruel by Slipknot from the album called We Are Not Your Kind?
Yes, that is the song I want.
Do you want this song to start playing now?
Yes, I do. Play the song on the patio speaker.
Can you please confirm that you want to play the son Birth Of The Cruel on the Patio?
That is not right, because I changed my mind and I want it to be played in my living room.
Can you please once again confirm that you want the song Birth Of The Cruel to be played in your Living Room?
Yes, that is what I want.
Have a good time listening to the music
I appreciate it! That would be all.
Have a wonderful day!
I am in a nice mood and I like to listen to nice songs. How do you think about the album Overthinking which contains many good songs and also I like the songs by Shy Martin. Can you search for something from two years ago?
Yes, of-course, what about the song Good Together by Shy Martin from the album Overthinking? Do you like it to listen now?
Yes, I think I may like to hear this song now. Thanks.
Shall I play it now for you?
Yes, play it on Speaker in Kitchen.
Please confirm to play the song Good Together in Kitchen.
Sorry, please play it for me in the Living room device.
give me your confirmation to play the song Good Together in Living room.
Yes, proceed and also let know the type of song.
It is a Pop song and the same was started playing for you now.
Thanks and that's all for now.
Have a great day.
Can you help me search for some songs?
I found 10 songs you may like. How about Touch from the Glory Days album by Little Mix?
What kind of music is it and from what year?
Its a pop song from 2016.
Okay, I'd like that one.
Shall I play it now?
Yes, that would be great.
To verify: you would like to hear the song Touch in the Living room.
No, play it on the patio speaker.
To confirm: you would like to hear the song Touch on the Patio.
You got it.
Enjoy the song.
I will, thanks.
Is there anything else you need?
No thanks, I'm good.
Have a great day.
I would like to hear some music.
Would you like to hear Die Young from the album Warrior by Kesha? I have 10 other songs in mind, also.
Yes, I'd like to hear Die Young by Kesha.
Okay. Please confirm that you want to hear Die Young in the Living room.
Yes, I want to hear it in the living room. Did that song come out in 2010 or 2011? Is it hip-hop?
It is a pop song from 2012. Enjoy your music.
Great. Thanks very much.
Would you like me to play an additional song?
No. That's all, thanks.
You're welcome. Enjoy your music.
I want to find some songs please. What have you got?
Would you like to hear the Charlie Puth song The Way I Am, which is from his Voicenotes album.
I would, thanks so much.
My pleasure. How else may I help you today?
I'd like to hear the song and can you do it on the kitchen speaker?
Certainly. Confirming playback of The Way I Am on the Kitchen speaker location.
Great, thanks! Let me ask you, did that come out four years ago? And what music type is it?
The track is from 2018 and it's in the pop genre. Enjoy the song.
Thanks, I will!
Do you need help with anything else right now?
Nope, thanks again.
I'm happy to help. Have a nice day.
Hello, I am hoping you can help me find some songs.
I have found 10 songs for you. What do you think about Cool Girl by Tove Lo from the album Lady Wood?
What year did it come out and what genre of music is it?
It is an electropop song from 2016.
Can you give me some other options? I do enjoy the Lady Gaga album Joanne.
What do you think about Million Reasons by Lady Gaga from her album Joanne?
Yes, that is the one.
Would you like to play this song now?
Yes, please cast it in my living room.
I will now play the song Million Reasons in the living room.
Thank you! What genre of music is it and when did the song release?
Enjoy your music. It is a pop song and she released this song in 2016.
Thank you!
Is there anything else I can help you with today?
No, that will be all, thank you!
Have a good rest of your day!
I would like to find some songs at this time.
The album King of Everything has a song named Pisces by Jinjer. What about it?
can you tell me some others?
What is your opinion about the song Final Masquerade from the album The Hunting Party and singer Linkin Park.
Can you tell me the music genre and if it was released in 2019?
The song is Metal and was released in 2014.
Okay, that's what I want.
Do you want me to play the song?
Please. Would you let it play on the kitchen device.
Turn on the song Final Masquerade in the kitchen. Is that correct?
No, go ahead and play it on the patio speaker.
Turn the song Final Masquerade on in the patio. Is that right?
Yes, you got it.
I hope you like your music.
Thanks, I hope so.
Would you like my assistance with something else?
No, that's all and thanks.
Please have a great day.
I want to find some songs from five years back, I'm feeling a little nostalgic
How about the song Addicted by Popcaan from their album Where we come from
Yes, that's a great song!
Do you want me to play it?
Yes please do
Want me to play Addicted in your Living Room
Yes please, that's right
I hope you enjoy your music
What kind of genre is this again?
It's a Reggae track
Thanks for the information
Can I do something else?
For now it's all good
Enjoy the music!
I want to hear a Reggaeton song.
How about Addicted from the Where We Come From album by Popcaan?
That's the one I wanted. Thanks!
Shall I play it now?
Yes, please do.
To verify: you would like to listen to the song Addicted in the Living room.
No I'd like to hear it on the speaker in kitchen.
To confirm: you would like me to play the song Addicted in the kitchen.
On second thought make it the patio speaker.
Okay, you would like me to play Addicted on the patio.
You got it.
Enjoy! Do you need anything else?
No thank you.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you help me find some songs?
Found 10 songs that you may like. Would you be interested in Hate Me from the album Arcadia by Eurielle?
Yes, that's the one I was looking for.
Shall I play this song for you?
Yes, please do.
Please confirm that you would like to play the song Hate Me in the Living room.
Can you play it on the kitchen speaker instead?
Sure. Playing the song Hate Me in the Kitchen. Shall I proceed?
Yes, please go ahead and play it.
Song is playing now. Enjoy your music.
What genre is it?
It's a Pop song.
Thank you. That's all I need.
Have a great day!
I'm looking for a restaurant, can you help?
Where would you like me to look and what kind of food would you prefer?
Check in the San Jose area. I'd like to find a place that serves Diner style food.
71 Saint Peter is a nice diner style restaurant in San Jose.
Great! can you make a reservation for one on Saturday this week?
For what time?
For lunch at 12 in the afternoon.
To verify: You would like a reservation at 71 Saint Peter in San Jose for 1 person at 12 pm on March 2nd.
On second thought, make it for Tuesday next week.
So that would be a reservation at 71 Saint Peter on March 5th.
Yes. Also see if they have outdoor seating and what their rating is.
There user rating is around 4.0 and they do have outdoor seating. Your reservation has been made.
Great! Thank you.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you. I'm good for now.
Have a wonderful day!
Can you help me find a place to eat?
Yes, which location are you interested in?
I'm interested in Napa.
Do you have a preference in food?
Yes, I'm interested in Japanese.
There is a nice restaurant in Napa called Kenzo.
Are there any others you can recommend?
There is another one in Napa called Miminashi that is very nice.
Can you give me their phone number please?
Yes, there phone number is 707-254-9464.
Can you give me their user rating and tell me if they have any outdoor seating?
Their user rating is around 4.5 but they do not have any outdoor seating.
Are there any other restaurants you can recommend that have vegetarian options?
Yes, there is one in Napa called Morimoto Napa that is very nice.
That sounds good! I am looking to book a table on the 3rd.
What time would you like the reservation for?
I am thinking evening 4:45.
Please confirm that you would like to book at table on March 3rd at 4:45 pm for 2 people at Morimoto Napa in Napa.
Yes, that is correct!
Ok, I have booked your reservation.
Thank you, that is all I need for now.
Have a beautiful day!
Think you could find me a place to eat?
I think so. What kind of food are you looking for? Also in what area would you like me to look?
Find me a place that serves burgers in San Jose and you will be my hero.
I've found 9 restaurants that serve burgers in San Jose. How about Black Angus Steakhouse?
Wow, that sounds delicious. What's their phone number?
Their phone number is 408-266-6602.
Great, thanks.
Would you like to reserve a table here?
Yes, I would.
What time would you like the reservation to be for?
Make the reservation for 3. No, actually, make it for a quarter past 5 in the evening.
You would like to make a reservation for 2 at Black Angus Steakhouse in San Jose. The time of this reservation will be 5:15 pm on March 1st. Is that all correct?
Yes that is all correct. Can you tell me the restaurants user rating and address?
The reservation has successfully been made. Their average user rating is 4.1 and the street address is listed as 1011 Blossom Hill Road.
Great. Thank you very much for your help.
I'm always glad to be of assistance. Will that be all you need?
For now, yes. I'll let you know if I need anything further.
Okay, until then.
I'm looking for a restaurant that serves Oriental food.
What area do you want me to look in?
Find a restaurant in SFO.
How about 8 Immortals Restaurant in San Francisco?
Yes, that sounds good. I'd like to make a reservation for 3 people today at 1 pm.
Okay, I have a reservation for 3 people at 8 Immortals Restaurant in San Francisco on March 1st at 1 pm, correct?
Yes, that is right.
I have successfully confirmed the reservation.
Thank you!
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you.
Have a great day.
I need help searching for a place to eat.
Is there a type of food you prefer? And where do you want to search.
I want to look for Korean Barbeque in SFO.
There are 10 restaurants I've found. Aato is a nice spot in San Francisco.
Is there outdoor seating? And what's their user rating?
There is not outdoor seating. Their user rating is 3.6.
Okay, that can work. Please book me a table.
What time do you want the table?
I want it for half past 10 in the morning.
I'll book you a table for 2 at Aato in San Francisco for March 1st at 10:30 am. Is that right?
That is right.
I'm sorry, but that time is all booked. Do you need anything else?
Can we try for a table at 7 pm?
I'll book you a table for 2 at Aato in San Francisco for March 1st at 7 pm. Is that right?
That is right.
I have made the reservation.
Thanks a lot.
What else can I assist you with?
Nothing else, thanks a lot.
Have a pleasant day.
Will you please help me find a good, reasonably priced place to eat in San Jose?
I sure will. What type of food do you prefer?
I think I'm in the mood for Cantonese.
In San Jose, I recommend the Chef Li restaurant.
Okay. How about some other suggestions?
Certainly. Also in San Jose, I recommend China Delight.
That's possible. But what else is there?
China Station Restaurant is also a good San Jose option.
Can you let me know what their user rating is? I'm also wondering if they have seating outdoors.
No, they have no outdoor seating, sorry. Their rating is 4.1.
Okay, sounds good. Let's book a table for 4 please in the evening 5:30.
Confirming a table for 4 on March 1st at 5:30 pm at the China Station Restaurant in San Jose.
Okay, sounds like you got it all!
Great. The table has been booked.
Thanks for all your help today.
My pleasure. May I do anything else for you?
I don't think so. Thanks again.
You are very welcome, of course.
I need help finding somewhere to eat.
What area are you interested in and what kind of food do you like?
I want a Barbecue place in San Fran.
1760 is a good place in San Francisco.
What else is there?
25 Lusk is a good place in San Francisco.
Can you give me their phone number?
You can reach them at 415-495-5875.
And what is their user rating?
They have 4.4 user rating.
Alright, that seems good.
Do you want me to book you a table?
Yes, please do that.
What time do you want the table?
I want it for 7:15 pm.
I'll book you a table for 2 at 25 Lusk in San Francisco for March 1st at 7:15 pm. Does that work for you?
No, it should be a table for 4 and for seven pm.
So a table for 4 at 7 pm. Are these the changes you wanted?
Yes. And can you tell me their address?
They are located at 25 Lusk Street. I have booked you table.
Thanks a lot.
Do you need me to help with anything else?
No, thanks again.
Have a fine day.
Can you find me a Ramen restaurant?
Where would you like me to search?
I'd like something in Belmont.
I found 2 options for you. How about Sushi Kuu in Belmont?
That sounds great. Can you reserve me a table? How about the 9th of March at 5:30 in the evening?
Please confirm: a table for 2 on March 9th at 5:30 pm at Sushi Kuu in Belmont.
That's correct. Do you have their address?
Your reservation is confirmed. They're located at 1001 Alameda de las Pulgas.
Thank you very much!
Do you need anything else today?
No, that'll be all, thanks!
Have a great day!
Please locate a nice restaurant in Petaluma for me.
Is there a food type you prefer?
Yes. A Light meal would be perfect.
Petaluma has a nice restaurant called Speakeasy.
Sounds like a good choice.
Shall I make a reservation for you?
Please make a reservation.
Is there a time you prefer the reservation to be made at?
I would like to book a table at 6:15 in the evening.
I will book a table at Speakeasy in Petaluma at 6:15 pm for 2 this March 1st if that is what you want.
That is exactly what I want, thanks.
The table for 2 has been booked.
Thanks a million.
My pleasure. What else can I do for you?
Nothing right now, thanks.
Enjoy dinner tonight.
Can you find me some Cambodian restaurants that serve vegetarian food?
What location should I search?
Search around Fairfax.
Siam Lotus is a nice restaurant located in Fairfax.
Can you recommend me some Barbecue restaurants in SF?
25 Lusk is a nice restaurant in San Francisco.
That sounds good. I need to book a table.
For what time?
Make it for evening 7:30.
Confirming that you want a reservation for 2 at 25 Lusk in San Francisco. You want a table for March 1st at 7:30 pm.
Yes. How expensive is the restaurant?
The restaurant is pricey. Your reservation is successful.
Thank you very much.
Is there anything else that you need?
No. Thank you.
You're welcome. Have a good day.
Can you please help me find a place to eat?
What location should I search in?
Please find restaurants in Santa Clara.
What type of food are you looking for?
Please find something serving Latin American food.
El Amigo Burrito is a nice restaurant in Santa Clara.
What is there phone number?
The phone number is 408-248-3113.
Yes, that sounds good.
Would you like me to book a table there?
Yes please, reserve a table.
What time should I try to reserve for?
Please make the reservation at 5:30 in the evening.
Please confirm the following details: Booking a table at El Amigo Burrito in Santa Clara for 5:30 pm on March 1st. The reservation is for 2 people.
Yes, that is correct. Do they have vegetarian options on the menu, and what is their user rating?
The rating is around 4.3 stars and they have good options for vegetarians. Sorry, I was unable to make the reservations at El Amigo Burrito at that time. Shall I try again for 2 people on March 1st at 5 pm?
Yes, that works.
Your reservation was successful.
Thank you very much, that is all I need for now.
Okay, have a good day.
I want to find a restaurant please. I don't care about the price range.
Certainly. What kind of cuisine would you like and where shall I search for you?
See if there's anything in Danville please with Southern food.
How about Blackhawk Grille, which is in Danville?
What kind of a customer rating do they have there?
They're rated 4.1.
Okay, how about the address and phone number?
Of course. They are located at 3540 Blackhawk Plaza Circle and the contact number is 925-736-4295.
May I get some other recommendations from you? Maybe a place with patio dining, if possible, and somewhere that's reasonably priced.
I have 2 options to tell you about. Perhaps you'd like Dana's in Danville.
Oh, I think I would.
Shall I make reservations for you?
I think you should, yes.
What time would you like?
Let's shoot for 5:30 pm.
Confirming a table for 2 at Dana's in Danville on March 1st. The booking will be for 5:30 pm.
Actually can you make it for a party of 3 please?
Yes, confirming a booking for 3 at Dana's.
Sorry, I also need to move that to the 14th please.
Not a problem. Confirming your March 14th booking at Dana's.
Great, thanks. What is the address of the restaurant?
It's 416 Sycamore Valley Road. Oh, your reservation is confirmed.
Thanks for taking care of that.
My pleasure. May I do anything else for you?
No, I think I'm good.
Thank you very much.
I need a place to eat.
Where should I search? What type of cuisine do you like?
Find me a Neapolitan restaurant in Cupertino.
I found you 1 restaurant. How about Doppio Zero? It is a nice restaurant located in Cupertino.
Can you get me the address and phone number?
The address is 10088 North Wolfe Road #120. The phone number is 408-863-0308.
Yes, that's good.
Would you like a reservation?
Yes, please. Reserve a table for four people.
What time should I make the reservation for?
Make it for morning 11:15 for 3 people.
Please confirm the following: you want a reservation for March 1st at Doppio Zero in Cupertino. You want to book a table for 3 for 11:15 am.
Yes, that will work.
Sorry, but I was unable to make your reservation at Doppio Zero. Should I attempt to make a reservation for 3 for March 1st at 11 am instead?
No, that's alright.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. Thank you very much.
You're welcome. Have a good day.
I'm really hungry, but on a budget. Could you please help me find restaurants with moderate prices, in Palo Alto?
What type of cuisine did you have in mind?
Anything that serves Diner type food will do.
Okay, I found Bazille, a nice restaurant in Palo Alto.
Great! I really like the sound of that. Please reserve me a table for 1 at that restaurant.
For what time should I make the reservation?
Let it be a 12:30 in the afternoon reservation, please.
Okay. Please confirm that you'd like to reserve a table for 1 at Bazille in Palo Alto, for 12:30 pm on March 1st.
Yes, that is correct.
I have successfully made your reservation.
Thank you very much. You've been very helpful. That will be all.
Do have yourself a great day!
Hello, I am looking for a place to eat. I am hoping to get take-out and for the restaurant to have vegetarian options.
Hello! Yes, I can help you with that. What city are you looking in?
Please find restaurants in San Jose.
I have found 4 restaurants that match. 4th St Pizza Co has good ratings and is located in San Jose.
How is the pricing? Cheap or expensive?
They seem to be a moderate restaurant.
Do they have outdoor seating?
They do not have outdoor seating.
Are there any other restaurants you can recommend?
There is a Mimi's Cafe in San Jose and also had good reviews.
Yes, that will work. Can you please book a reservation for me? It will be for half past 11 in the morning.
Please confirm the reservation details: It will be for Mimi's Cafe in San Jose on March 1st at 11:30 am. The reservation is for 2 people.
Yes, that is correct. Are they not very costly?
You reservation is set. They have moderate pricing.
Thank you for your help!
You're welcome. Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that will be all. Thank you!
Have a good rest of your day.
I'm searching for location to dine at, preferably ones not very costly for cost. Get me one in San Mateo.
What sort of cuisine are you searching for?
Get me one that offers Oriental cuisine.
I discovered 5 diners you may enjoy. There is a lovely diner called Izakaya Ginji in San Mateo.
Yeah, that's fine with me.
Do you wish to book a spot there?
Yeah, I'd like to book a spot there.
When ought I attempt to book for?
Book it for quarter to 2 in the afternoon.
Please verify the following information: reserve a spot for 2 people at the Izakaya Ginji in San Mateo for March 1st, 1:45 pm.
Yeah, that's fine with me.
I apologize, but I could not make the booking. There is a lovely diner called Izakaya Ginji; should I try to book for 2 people on 1:30 pm, March 1st?
Yeah, that's fine with me.
Your booking is complete.
Does the diner offer outdoor seating? What is the contact number?
They don't offer outdoor seating, and the contact number is 925-408-4891.
Thank you for your help; that's all.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
I have a plan to eat outside once and I need a nice restaurant for me. Can you search for the one in San Ramon?
Yes, what is your favorite food? If you tell me the same then I can search for the best restaurants.
I want to eat some Pakistani food and search it accordingly.
That's easy. I found 1 restaurant named Cafe Tandoor which is in San Ramon. Do you like to go there?
Let me know their address to decide further.
They are located at 420 Market Place.
That is okay for me. Can I get a table there?. Please book it for me now.
Sure, I will book it and let me know your convenient time to book the same.
Make it at evening 4:30.
Okay. Please confirm to book a table for 2 at Cafe Tandoor in San Ramon on March 1st for the time at 4:30 pm.
That is confirmed and you can go ahead.
I am so sorry that I was not able to book it at that time. Shall I try for something else?
Please check it for another time that is 1:30 pm.
Please confirm to book a table for 2 at Cafe Tandoor in San Ramon on March 1st for the time at 1:30 pm.
That is confirmed. Please proceed.
I have successfully booked the table as you requested.
That is nice and thank you so much.
Anything else you need?
No, nothing for now.
Have a great day.
I'm trying to find a place to eat in Sunnyvale. Can you find me any afforadable Spicy Indian restaurants in the area?
Sure thing. I've found 3 restaurants for you in Sunnyvale. How about the Arka Indian Restaurant? I hear it is really nice.
Is this a good restaurant for vegetarians? What is their rating?
They have great vegetarian options. They are rated at 3.8 stars.
Okay, this place sounds great. Let's go ahead and start booking a table.
Sure thing. What time would like to make the reservation for?
I need a table for 2 on March 14th at 12:00.
Okay, first confirm the following details for me. Booking a table for 2 at the Arka Indian Restaurant in Sunnyvale for 12 pm on March 14th. Is this right?
Yes, that's perfect. Also can I get their number?
Okay, your table is booked! Their phone number is 408-774-1540.
You you so much! I appreciate your help.
Anything else I can help you with today?
No thanks. That's all. Thanks again.
My pleasure. You have a nice day now.
Can you find a place for me to eat in Los Gatos?
Sure, anything in particular you want to eat?
Yes, try searching for Chinese.
There are 2 places. How about Jasmine Chinese Cuisine in Los Gatos?
Great, can you make a reservation there next Tuesday at morning 11:30.
Sure, please confirm you'd like a reservation for 2 at Jasmine Chinese Cuisine in Los Gatos for March 5th at 11:30 am.
Yup, that's great. What's their rating an do they have outdoor seating?
I've successfully made your reservation. They don't have outdoor seating and their rating is 3.7.
Thanks, that's all for now.
My pleasure.
Find for me please a restaurant tagged affordable for price that have outdoor seating.I would like that Steakhouse to be served.
On which location you want to be?
In Livermore will be okay.
Located in Livermore is a nice restaurant called Castle Rock Restaurant.
Sounds very good.Book a table for 3 people.
At what time you want me to try to reserve?
Try to make it at half past 1 in the afternoon.
Book a table for 3 people on March 1st at 1:30 pm in city Livermore at Castle Rock Restaurant.Is that correct?
Yes, very good.Tell me the user rating for this restaurant.
The reservation was made successfully.User rating is around 3.7.
Thank you for all.
With something else can I help you?
No.Thanks.
Have a great day!
Can you find me some place to eat?
Where should I search?
Look for restaurants in Moraga.
What type of cuisine do you prefer?
I want some Take-out.
I found 1 restaurant that you may like. How about Mountain Mike's Pizza? It is a nice restaurant located in Moraga.
Is it a cheap restaurant?
They are a moderate priced restaurant.
Okay, that sounds good. I need to book a table for 1. How about on the 12th at 5 in the evening?
Confirming that you need a table for 1 for March 12th at Mountain Mike's Pizza in Moraga. You want the reservation for 5 pm.
Yes that works. Does the restaurant have vegetarian options?
You're reservation is confirmed. Yes, they do have good options for vegetarians.
Thank you very much.
Can I help you with anything else?
No. Thank you.
My pleasure. Have a good day.
Can you help me find a place to eat with outdoor seating?
What type of food do you prefer and in what city please?
Check restaurants in Bolinas that serve Veggie.
Coast Cafe is located in Bolinas and is very nice.
Do they have vegetarians options on the menu? Can you get me their phone number please?
Their phone number is 415-868-2298. I'm sorry, they don't have vegetarian options.
Yes, that is good.
Would you like to reserve a table here?
Yes please, at 5 o"clock in the evening on 11th of this month.
Please confirm the following details: You wish to book a table at Coast Cafe in Bolinas on March 11th at 5 pm for 2 people.
Please change that to half past 6 in the evening on 14th of March.
Please confirm the following details: The reservation change to 6:30 pm on March 14th.
Yes that is correct.
Your reservation is successful.
Thank you so much. That is all.
Have a good day.
I'd like to find a nice reasonably priced restaurant.
What sort of food do you want to eat?
How about Seafood?
What location do you want me to look in?
Find Walnut Creek restaurants.
I have 4 restaurants that may work. What about Andy's Sushi in Walnut Creek?
Do you have something else, with vegetarian options? How about Greek food?
I have 1 restaurant called Opa Authentic Greek Cuisine Walnut Creek. It's in Walnut Creek.
Sounds fabulous.
Would you like to make a reservation?
Yes, reserve a table. I am interested in a table for 3rd of March. Make the reservation for 19:15.
Could you confirm that you want to book a table at Opa Authentic Greek Cuisine Walnut Creek in Walnut Creek? Your reservtion is at 7:15 pm on March 3rd for 2 people
Sounds good. Tell me the restaurant's user rating.
They have a user rating of about 4.2. Sorry, but I could not make a reservation. Should I try to make the reservation fo 2 people at Opa Opa Authentic Greek Cuisine Walnut Creek for March 3rd at 7 pm?
No, thanks.
Could I assist with anything further?
No, but thank you.
Have a nice day.
Hi I'm hungry and want to go out to eat. Preferably something with vegetarian options that serves Pizza and Pasta.
In what location would you like it to be in?
Please find me restaurants in Palo Alto.
I would recommend Italico Restaurant located in Palo Alto.
Are the prices cheap? What is the average rating?
The restaurant is pretty pricey. They have an average rating of 4.4.
Is there anything else you can recommend me?
I would suggest Vina Enoteca in Palo Alto.
That sounds good.
Would you like me to book you a table here?
Yes that would be great, book me a table.
What time would you like the reservation to be?
I would like to make a reservation for 4:30 in the evening.
So you'd like a table at Vina Enoteca in Palo Alto at 4:30 pm on March 1st for 2 people. Is this correct?
Yes, that is wonderful.
I'm sorry I was unable to make the reservation. Is there anything else I can help you with?
Please try booking the table for half past 12 in the afternoon.
So you'd like a table for 2 at Vina Enoteca in Palo Alto at 12:30 pm on March 1st. Is this correct?
That works for me.
Your table has been successfully booked.
What is their contact number and address?
You can call them at 650-646-3477 and their address is 700 Welch Road.
Thank you very much.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
No, that will be all. Thank you.
Have a wonderful day.
Hey, do you think you could help me find a nice place to eat?
Sure thing. What city would you like me to search in? Do you have any particular type of food you were thinking about?
Yeah, I could really go for some Punjabi right now. Can you find me something in San Carlos?
I hear Kamakshi's Kitchen Restaurant is really nice. They have a location right in San Carlos
Awesome! That sounds great.
Would you like to reserve a table there?
Yes I would. Can you reserve a table for three at eleven AM on the 13th of this month?
I will see what I can do but first please confirm the following for me. You are booking a table for 3 at Kamakshi's Kitchen Restaurant in San Carlos for 11 am on March 13th. Is this correct?
Yes, that's right.
Okay your reservation was a success. Anything else?
Yeah, can you get their address for me?
No problem. Their address is 601 Old County Road.
Okay, thank you so much!
Anything else I can help you with today?
No that is all. Thank you very much.
My pleasure, have a good day.
I can't figure out where to go to eat. Can you help?
Sure. In which location would you like to find a place to eat? Also what kind of food are you looking for?
Find me a place in the San Jose area, maybe something Asian.
How about the China Garden Restaurant in San Jose?
That sounds good to me.
Will that be all you need?
Uh, can you book me a table for one at that restaurant?
Sure. When would you like me to make the reservation for?
Make it for 5:45 in the evening, please.
You would like me to make a reservation at China Garden Restaurant in San Jose for 1 people. The reservation will be for March 1st at 5:45 pm. Is that correct?
Yes that works for me. Confirmed.
I'm sorry but I was unable to make the reservation. What would you like to do?
Can you try booking another table for two at 6 in the evening?
You would like me to make a reservation at China Garden Restaurant in San Jose for 2 people. The reservation will be for March 1st at 6 pm. Is that correct?
Yes that is all correct.
I'm sorry I was unable to make the reservation. What would you like to do?
Just forget about it, I'll call them directly. Thank you for trying.
You're welcome. Good luck.
I'm hungry, where should I go?
Hmm, which location should I check? What type food are you in the mood for?
How about some pasta in San Mateo?
Why not try Capellini Restaurant in San Mateo?
Nah, what about some Barbecue?
What about Central Park Bistro? It's in San Mateo?
Do they have vegetarian options? How much will this cost me?
They have moderate pricing but no Barbequed Vegetables.
I guess I can eat meat once. Get me a table.
When would you like to go?
Make it for 7:15 pm.
Ok, I have: 2 for dinner at Central Park Bistro in San Mateo. It is for 7:15 pm on March 1st.
Ok, You twisted my arm. Do they have outdoor cafe style seating? What's their user rating?
You have a table and you can sit outdoors. Their rating is 4.3
Cool, thanks.
Can I help with another thing?
Not just yet.
Have a pleasant meal.
I'm looking for a classy restaurant in SF. Please help me find one.
I can certainly help you with that. What type of cuisine are you searching for?
I'm craving something like Japanese. Find something like Izakaya.
There are 10 restaurants you may enjoy. A top rated restaurant is 2g Japanese Brasserie in San Francisco.
That sounds like just what I'm looking for.
I can reserve a table for you. Do you wish for me to proceed?
I sure do. Book it for me.
What time would you like the reservation to be?
Please make the reservation for 7:45 pm.
At 7:45 pm on March 1st, you will be going to 2g Japanese Brasserie in San Francisco. The reservation is for 2 people. Is that acceptable?
That works just fine for me. I can't wait to go.
Okay. I have booked your reservation at 2g Japanese Brasserie.
Is there outdoor seating available? I need their phone number as well.
I am sorry but there is no outdoor seating.However, the phone number to 2g Japanese Brasserie is 415-292-9997.
No outdoor seating? That's okay. Anyway, thank you for your help.
Do you require any other assistance?
No that's all. Thank you for your help.
You are welcome. Have a great day.
I want to find a place where I can have a meal.
Is there some specific kind of food you are interested in? Do you have a preferred location that I can look into?
The place should have vegetarian alternatives, more specifically some place that serves Sushi in Berkeley.
There are 3 restaurants which match what you want, with one of the restaurants being Iyasare which is a good restaurant in Berkeley.
Alright, this seems nice.
Do you want to have a table booked for you at this restaurant?
Yes, I want to have a table booked for me at this restaurant. I want to have the table to be reserved for two people on the 11th, as for the time, it should be for 2 pm.
Can you please confirm that you want to have a table booked for 2 people at 2 pm on March 11th at the Iyasare restaurant in Berkeley?
Yes, that is what I want.
I apologize but I could not complete the reservation you asked for. Is there something else I can help you with?
Would you mind trying again to book a table, but make it for four people at 7:15 pm
Can you confirm that you want to have a table for 4 people booked for March 11th at 7:15 pm at Iyasare restaurant in Berkeley?
Alright, that suits me well. Can you check if they have places to sit outside since I like fresh air.
I can confirm that they can provide you with outdoor seats, though I could not make the reservation you asked for. Iyasare is really a good restaurant so do you want to have the reservation for 4 people on March 11th at 7:30 pm?
I do not want that. That would be all.
Have a wonderful time!
Can you help me find a restaurant to eat dinner?
What city would you like to search in? Is there a particular cuisine you prefer?
Yes, I am looking for Greek food in Los Altos.
I found 1 restaurant in Los Altos, Opa! Los Altos.
That one is good.
Would you like to reserve a table there?
Yes, please reserve a table.
What time would you like to make reservations for?
Make the reservations for half past 7 in the evening.
You would like to book a table for 2 at Opa! Los Altos in Los Altos at 7:30 pm on March 1st, is that correct?
No, let me make that for March 7th at two pm.
You would like the reservations for 2 pm on March 7th, is that correct?
You got it, thank you.
Sorry, reservations were not available for that time. Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that's OK, thank you.
Have a great day!
Help me find somewhere to eat.
Sure, where and what kind of food?
Find an Italian restaurant in Belmont.
There's 3 you may like. How about Caprinos in Belmont?
What's the phone number?
They're at 650-591-4156.
Great, thank you.
Should I reserve a table?
Yeah, reserve a table for 2 for the 14th of this month at morning 11:30.
Sure, please confirm you'd like a table for 2 at Caprinos in Belmont at 11:30 am on March 14th.
Correct, is it cheap and what's their address?
I've reserved your table. They are moderate and at 1000 6th Avenue.
Thank you again.
Need anything else?
Nope, thank you!
My pleasure, enjoy your day.
I'm searching for a location to dine at.
what place ought I look in, and what sort of cuisine are you searching for?
Get me a diner in San Francisco that offers Asian cuisine.
There is a lovely diner called 8 Immortals Restaurant in San Francisco.
Yeah, that's fine with me.
Do you wish to book a spot there?
Yeah, I'd like to make a reservation on March 5th.
When should I book for?
Make the booking for 12:30 pm.
Please verify the following information: reserve a spot for 2 people at 8 Immortals Restaurant in San Francisco, with the date being March 5th 12:30 pm.
Yeah, that's fine. Is the diner cheap? Where is it located?
Your booking is complete, and yes - it is a cheap diner. The location is 1433 Taraval.
Thank you for your assistance.
Could I assist you with something else?
Nope; thank you for your help.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
Can you find me a place to eat around the SFO area?
Sure, what kind of grub?
I want some Ramen, that sounds good right now
I found 10 ramen places in San Francisco including 2g Japanese Brasserie which is a nice place
Where are they located?
They are at 601 Van Ness Avenue
What else can you recommend to me?
In San Francisco? How about Ace Wasabi Rock-n-roll Sushi?
Is it pricey there? And what's their rating
They are in the moderate range and have an average 4.4 rating
What about cheap restaurants that you can recommend?
I found 4 places like that in San Francisco including Fujiyama-ya
Oh that sounds good, book me a table please!
For what time?
Dinner time, around 18:30
Confirming you want a table for 2 at 6:30 pm on March 1st at Fujiyama-ya in San Francisco?
Yes please, also what's their rating?
It has been booked! And it's around 4.4
Great, thanks for that
Can I do anything else?
No, that's all for now, thank you
Alright take care!
Hello, I was wondering if you could help me find a place to eat?
Yes, I can certainly do that. Is there a city you would like to focus on? And what type of cuisine?
I would like to eat at a barbecue restaurant. Preferably somewhere in Emeryville.
I have found 1 restaurant that matches your inquiry. The Bureau 510 is a barbecue restaurant located in Emeryville.
Yes, that works for me. Can you help me book a table there? It will be a reservation for one person on March 10th at 11:45 am.
Please confirm the reservation details: A table for 1 at The Bureau 510 in Emeryville for March 10th at 11:45 am.
Yes, that is correct.
Sorry, it seems as though the 11:45 am time slot is unavailable. Would you be fine with a reservation for 1 at The Bureau 510 on March 10th at 12 pm instead?
Yes, I can do that.
Your reservation has been booked.
Thank you for your help!
Is there anything else I can do for you today?
No, that will be all. Thank you again.
Have a good day, goodbye!
Its boring to eat at home for a change i wish to eat outside. Will you find me a restaurant tagged intermediate priced for price?
At which location should i search in? What type of food you like it most?
Please find something like Lobster and find restaurants in Belmont.
I found 1 restaurant as per your taste. it is CHina VIllage Seafood Restaurant which is a nice restaurant and it is located in Belmont.
ok thats great. it sound good to me.
Whether i need to reserve a table over there?
Yes I need to reserve a table.
At what time should i confirm the reservation ?
Make the reservation at afternoon 12:30
Please review the details so that i will confirm. Table need to book at China Village Seafood Restaurant. The city is Belmont and the reservation timing is at 12:30 Pm. The date is March 1st and the reservation is for 2 people.
ok thats great. please fix it. DO they have vegetarians options on the menu?
Your reservation is successful. THey don't have vegetarian options.
THanks a lot and thats all i need.
have a wonderful day.
I'm new in town and would like to find a place to get something to eat.
What is the name of the area you would like me to look in?
Somewhere close by, so Mountain View would be great.
Is there a specific type of cuisine you would like?
I really enjoy French food, if you can find a place that serves it.
There are 2 that I was able to find. The first is Chez Tj and it is located in Mountain View.
That sounds great!
Should I proceed with booking you a table?
Yes, please. I need to book a table for 4 and prefer it to be in the morning 11:45.
Let's just make sure I have everything in order before I make the reservation for you. You would like a table for 4, at Chez Tj, located in Mountain View, on March 1st, at 11:45 am.
That sounds great! Can you provide me with their location?
The restaurant I was successfully able to book you a table at is located at 938 Villa Street.
Can you give ma an idea of how pricey the establishment is?
This restaurant has been rated on the ultra high-end regarding cost.
Thanks a lot!
Is there anything else I can do for you?
Nope, that's all I need at the moment.
Happy to help, have a great day!
Can you find me a Filipino place to eat.
In which city?
I'm looking for something in Geyserville serving pasta outdoors.
There is 1 option. Diavola Pizzeria & Salumeria is in Geyserville.
That one sounds okay.
Should I book a table?
Yes. Please book.
For what time?
Please reserve for 1 in the afternoon.
Please confirm you want me to reserve a table for 2 at 1 pm at Diavola Pizzeria & Salumeria in Geyserville on March 1st.
Yes. That's correct.
Your reservation was a success.
Thanks. That will be all.
Okay. Have a great day. Goodbye.
I have friends visiting and would like to find a place to eat.
In what area would you like to eat and is there a particular type of cusine you are wanting to eat?
I enjoy freshwater fish and would like to dine in San Fran.
There are 10 restaurants meeting your criteria in San Francisco. A very nice restaurant is Akiko's sushi Bar.
Is this an ultra high-end restaurant? I will also need their address.
This restaurant is considered pricey and their address is 542 A Mason Street.
This place sounds great. Please reserve a table here.
What time would you like you reservation?
Please make a reservation for 12:30 on March 2nd.
Please confirm you would like a table for 2 at Akiko's Sushi Bar in San Francisco. The reservation will be for March 2nd at 12:30 pm.
That is exactly right.
Your reservation is confirmed.
Thank you for your help! That is all I need at the moment.
Enjoy your day!
I'm planning to dine out soon. Can you help me select a restaurant in Mountain View?
Do you have a specific type of cuisine in mind?
Sure, search for restaurants that have Ramen.
There are 9 such places in Mountain View that may suit your tastes. One such restaurant is Bushido
Can you tell me if they have seating available outside?
This restaurant does not have seating outside.
What is the average user rating for this establishment? Also, can you give me their contact number?
The restaurant has an average user rating of 4.1 and they can be reached at: 650-386-6821
Great, thanks!
Do you want to make a reservation for this restaurant?
Sure, I'd like to make a reservation for 1 person at eleven in the morning on the 4th.
So you would like to reserve a table for 1 at 11 am on March 4th at Bushido in Mountain View. Is this correct?
That is correct. Can you tell me the price range of this restaurant?
Your table has been booked. The price range is moderate for this restaurant.
Great, thanks for your help! That's it for me.
Enjoy your day!
Can you help me find a place to eat?
Sure. Where would you like me to look, and what kind of food are you interested in?
I feel like Thai food. Find me something in San Fran.
I've found 10 restaurants that match that criteria. How about Baan Thai House & Wine Bar in San Francisco?
Depends. What's their rating? Also do they have vegetarian options?
They have a user rating of 4.3 and good options for vegetarians.
Awesome. That sounds good to me.
Would you like to make a reservation?
Yes, I do.
What time would you like to make the reservation for?
Make it for 11:30 in the morning.
Please confirm the following details: Book a table for 2 at Baan Thai House & Wine Bar in San Francisco for 11:30 am on March 1st.
Yes, confirmed.
Your reservation has successfully been made.
Great. Thank you.
You're welcome. Enjoy the rest of your day.
I am planning on going out for a meal with friends. Can you find me a place in Healdsburg?
Are you looking for any specific type of cuisine?
Sure. I'm interested in restaurants that serve Diner food.
There are 5 such restaurants in Healdsburg. One such place you might enjoy is called Bear Republic Brewing Co.
Can you tell me the user rating for this establishment? Also, is outdoor seating available?
There is no outdoor seating at this restaurant. They are rated at approximately 4.4 by users.
Great, that sounds perfect! I would like to go ahead and make a reservation here.
And for what time would you like your reservation?
I would like a reservation for 6:30 in the evening, please.
So, you would like to make a 6:30 pm reservation for 2 at Bear Republic Brewing Co in Healdsburg for March 1st, correct?
Yes, that's perfect! Can you tell me if the price range is affordable? And also, are there menu items for vegetarians?
Your table has been confirmed. The restaurant is in the moderate price range. Unfortunately, there are no vegetarian menu items.
Excellent. Thanks for you help. That's everything for me!
Take care
I need weather info for the 1st of March.
What is the desired city for weather information?
The city is Palo Alto, and weather info for March 2nd.
The average temperature is predicted to be around 83 degrees Farenheit. There is also a 9 percent chance of rain.
Alright then, thanks a billion.
Of course. Have a safe day.
What's the weather like in Stinson Beach today?
It should be around 80 degrees Fahrenheit with a 16 percent chance of rain.
Alright. That's all. Thank you.
Have a nice day.
Can you get me the condition of weather in Palo Alto on today?
It is said 79 degrees Fahrenheit of average temperature and 4 percent chance of rain.
Great, thats helpful
Do you need any other service?
Thats all. thank you.
Good day sir.
I would like to know about the weather
Okay, just tell me the city where you want me to look.
The place is Walnut Creek.
Temperature is 72 degrees Fahrenheit with a 13 percent probability of rain.
Got it.
What can I do for you now?
Nothing. Thank you.
Bye
I'd like to know the weather forecast please.
For what city please?
I'd like to know the Woodside forecast for the 10th.
Certainly, Woodside will have an average temperature of 86 degrees Fahrenheit and a 24 percent chance of rain on that day.
Could you also tell me the forecast for Bodega Bay this Sunday?
Yes, the temperature will average 77 degrees Fahrenheit that day and there will be an 8 percent possibility of precipitation.
Terrific, that's all I need. Bye now.
Goodbye, thank you very much.
Find me the weather in Berkeley on this Saturday.
The expected average temperature through the day is 83 degrees Fahrenheit with 26 percent chance of rain.
And how windy is it gonna be?
The expected average speed of the wind is 6 mph.
Okay! That sounds good.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day!
Hey I need to check the weather on March 7th in Danville so I can see what it's like that day
It seems like it will be around 73 degrees Fahrenheit on average with a low 15 percent chance of rain
What about the wind?
It'll be around 7 miles per hour wind speed averages
Oh great, that's it for now, thanks so much it was really helpful
I am glad I could be of service!
I want to check about the weather condition in Fremont. I need your help to check the same on the 1st. Do you help me?
Yes, Please note that the average temperature will be 84 degrees Fahrenheit and the chance for rain will be 0 percent on that day.
Also let me know about the Wind and Humidity.
The average wind speed will be 1 miles per hour and the humidity is around 15 percent. Hope this information was useful to you.
Yes, that was useful and thanks. That's all for now.
Have a great day.
Hi, could you check the weather on the 10th of this month please.
Sure, which city are you interested in?
Calistoga, please.
The average temperature is 84 degress on that day with a 13 percent chance of rain.
How about the expected humidity on that day?
It should be averaging around 28 percent.
Sure, that is all I need for now. Thank you for your kind assistance!
No worries, have a pleasant day ahead!
Can you check the weather for the 11th of March?
In what city?
look in Millbrae
It is expected to be about 91 degrees with a 25 percent chance of rain.
Okay. Thank you.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No thank you.
Have a good day.
I want updates about the weather.
Where exactly?
Orinda.
Temperature is 81 degrees Fahrenheit and the chance of rain is 3 percent.
Can you also tell me about humidity and wind speed please?
Humidity is 16 percent and the wind will blow at 9 miles per hour.
Got it.
What can I help you with now?
Nothing, I'm fine. Goodbye.
Have a great day.
Find me the weather in Discovery Bay on 7th of March.
The expected average temperature for the day is 85 degrees Fahrenheit with 28 percent chance of rain.
Can you tell me how humid is it gonna be?
The expected humidity is 56 percent.
Okay! That is all I need for now. Bye!
I am glad I could help. Bye!
Give me a weather report for tomorrow.
Easy enough, where shall I check for you?
Moraga please.
Well, the temp will be 76 degrees and there is only a 4 % chance of rain.
Will there be wind to muss my hair?
No, only 2 mph wind.
Will it be humid?
No, not relatively. 23 percent.
Fine, I guess that's good.
What more can I help with.
Nothing, I'm good.
Good bye, thanks.
I want to check the weather please
What place are you interested in checking?
I wanna see what it's like in Las Vegas
Well right now it's 84 degrees Fahrenheit with a rough 18 percent chance of rain
How about in San Pablo on March 12th?
The temperature there is around 81 degrees with a 28 percent chance of it raining
Is it expected to be humid and windy?
Wind speeds are pretty low at 2 miles per hour, and humidity is at around 15 percent
OK, thanks for all of that information
Anything else you want me to check?
No that's it for now
Cheers, have a good one
I want to know how the weather is going to be on March 8th.
Can you tell me the city you are interested that I check the weather at?
I am interested in Millbrae.
For your requested location the average temperature for the day should be 92 degrees Fahrenheit, and with a chance of raining at 0 percent.
Alright, can you also tell me about it in San Anselmo on Wednesday next week?
In the location you are interested the temperature for the day should be at 91 degrees Fahrenheit, and there will be a raining chance of 15 percent.
Fine, right. Got what I wanted. Bye for now!
Enjoy.
Can you check the weather in South San Francisco on the 13th of this month?
Sure. The average temperature for that day is expected to be 91 degrees Fahrenheit, and there is a 12 percent chance of rain.
Hmm, alright. How windy do they say it will be?
The average wind speed is expected to be 10 miles per hour.
And how humid is it expected to be?
Around 31 percent.
Awesome, thank you. That will be all.
Anytime, let me know if you need anything further.
I want to check the weather for Marshall on the 5th.
The temperature on average for the day is 76 degrees F. with a 25 percent chance of rain.
Okay what about in San Leandro.
The average temperature for the day is 91 degrees F with an 18 percent chance of rain.
Sure that is fine.
Is there anything else you would like?
No. Thanks so much!
To success.
I would like to check the weather.
Which city would you like me to check the weather for?
I would like to check the weather in Duncans Mills on the 6th.
The average temperature for the day should be 70 degrees Fahrenheit with 12 percent chance of rainfall.
Okay! Thanks for the help. That is all I need for now. Bye!
I am glad I could help. Bye!
I need weather info now, please.
In which city would you like weather info?
I need it for Daly City.
The forecasted temperature is set to be about 77 degrees Fahrenheit, and there is a 6 percent chance of precipitation.
Wind speed info, please?
The average wind speed is forecasted to be around 6 MPH.
Okay, that's all!
Of course. Have a safe day.
I have a plan to go out . please check the weather on March 7th.
At which city do you wish to check the weather for?
Please check the weather at cloverdale.
The average temperature for the day should be 88 degrees Fahrenheit. And there is a 22 percent chance of rain.
How windy going to be on that day?
the average wind speed should be 3 miles per hour.
Ok sure. thats all i need.
Whether anything else i need to do?
no thanks a lot for your help
have a wonderful day.bye for now
I must verify the climate.
What metropolis would you like to verify the climate for?
The city is St. Helena, and on this Saturday.
The mean temperature for that day ought to be 76 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 1 percent probability of raining.
Okay, I understand.
Is there something else you require help with?
No, thank you for your assistance.
Have a good day.
Hi, could you help me check the weather in the District of Columbia please?
Sure, the average temperature is 75 degrees on that day with a 13 percent chance of rain.
I see, may I know the humidity and windiness too
The average wind speed is 6 miles per hour with an expected humidity around 36 percent.
I see, thanks alot!
Do you need any other assistance?
No, that is all I need. Thank you!
No worries, have a great day ahead!
What's the weather like in San Anselmo on the 1st?
It should be around 89 degrees Fahrenheit with a 28 percent chance of rain.
What about on the 10th of this month?
It should be around 87 degrees Fahrenheit with a 28 percent chance of rain.
Alright. That's all. Thanks.
Have a nice day.
How will the weather be in Pacifica on the 11th?
The average temperature should be 82 degrees Fahrenheit with a 16 percent chance of rain on the 11th.
Is it going to be very humid?
Humidity is expected to be around 21 percent.
Thank you. And how about the weather in Martinez on the 12th of March?
The average temperature should be 85 degrees Fahrenheit with a 27 percent chance of rain on the 12th.
Okay, thank you.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No. Thanks a bunch!
Have a great day! Bye!
I want to check about the weather condition in NY. Can you do it for me?
Yes please note that the average temperature will be 66 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 37 percent for rain.
That is okay. Also check about the same in Santa Clara on 3rd of March.
the average temperature will be 84 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 24 percent for rain.
I also need to know the Wind speed and Humidity.
Wind speed will be 4 miles per hour in average and Humidity is around 38 percent.
Thanks. Please check the same on March 12th too.
the average temperature will be 85 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 21 percent for rain.
Thank you for your information.
How can I help you further?
Nothing for now. Thanks.
Have a good day.
Im looking for weather in Rutherford
It is 86 degree Fahrenheit for the day and there is a 28 percent chance to rain
What about the humidity
It is about 41 percent
What about Its wind
The average speed is 10 miles per hour
Great
Anything else should I assist for
No thank you for it
Warm regards
I would like to check the weather in Alamo for next Wednesday.
The temperature should be around 75 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 7 percent chance of rain.
How will the humidity be?
The humidity will be around 20 percent.
How will Mountain View be on the 9th of March?
The temperature should be around 77 degrees and there is a 27 percent chance of rain.
That is all I needed.
Have a good day.
I must verify the weather in Foster City later today.
The mean temperature for today ought to be 80 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 22 percent possibility of raining.
How wet will it be, and how much wind will there be?
The mean wind speed ought to be 8 miles per hour, and the wetness is near 38 percent.
Alright, what about Valley Ford?
The mean temperature for today ought to be 72 degrees Fahrenheit, along with a 6 percent probability of raining.
Okay, that's all; see ya!
Goodbye.
Check for me please the weather on March 10th in Vallejo.
For the day the average temperature should be 76 degree Fahrenheit and 10 percent chance of rain.
Tell me how humid is it expected to be.
Around 27 percent is the humidity.
Windy how will be?
Should be 11 miles per hour the average wind speed.
Okay,I understand you.
Can I help you with anything else?
No.Thank you very much!
Bye!
What is the weather going to be on the 4th of March?
What city would you like to know the weather.
I need to know the weather on the 6th of this month in Sausalito please.
There is a 15 percent chance of rain and a temp of 89 degrees Fahrenheit expected.
Can you tell me the expected humidity?
Yes The humidity is expected to bee 22 percent.
Thanks. I am all set.
Have a great day.
Could you please inform me about the weather?
Where should I look?
The city is Toronto, Canada
The temperature is 58 degrees Fahrenheit with a chance of rain of 13 percent.
What about humidity?
It should be around 25 percent
I see.
Do you need more info?
No, that's okay.
Enjoy your time.
What is the weather going to be like on the 1st of March?
For which city?
For Oakley on March 10th.
It should be 83 degrees Fahrenheit with a 20 percent chance of rainfall.
What about in Brentwood?
It should be 71 degrees Fahrenheit with a 21 percent chance of rainfall.
How humid would it be?
Around 29 percent.
Well, that would be all. Thank you.
Ok, take care.
Will you check the weather?
Weather for which city?
Chi-town on 14th of March please.
Average temperature is 68 degrees Fahrenheit with a 24 percent chance of rain.
What's the humdity?
Humidity should be around 26 percent.
What's the weather like in Phoenix on next Thursday?
Average temperature is 86 degrees Fahrenheit with 19 percent chance of rain.
What's the humidity? How windy?
Average wind speed is at 11 miles per hour with humidity at 36 percent.
Great. That's all.
Have a nice day.
I want to check weather on the 13th
For which city you want
Make it in Newark
The average temperature should be 82 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 9 percent chance to rain
What about humidity windy
The average wind speed is 2 miles per hour and humidity around 25 Percent
How about in foster city
It is 94 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 23 percent chance to rain
Sure great
Shall I assist anything more
Thanks a lot
Cheers have a nice day
Can you tell me the weather in Campbell on the 4th?
Sure thing. The average temperature for the day will be around 72 degrees Fahrenheit with a 29 percent chance of rain.
How windy will it be that day?
The average wind speed will be around 5 miles per hour.
What's the humidity?
The humidity will be around 44 percent.
Okay thanks. Tell me the weather in Yountville on March 3rd.
The average temperature will be around 75 degrees fahrenheit that day with a 16 percent chance of rain.
Thanks. That's all for now. Appreciate the help.
My pleasure! Goodbye.
I would like weather information.
Which city would you like?
Montara on March 10th.
The average temperature should be 72 degrees with a 20 percent chance of rain.
What about the wind?
The average wind speed should be around 6 miles per hour.
And the humidity percentage?
Humidity is about 22 percent.
Great, thank you.
Cheers.
I want to check the weather condition in Vancouver and I need to check it on 5th of this month. Can you help me to find the one?
Please note that the average temperature will be 62 degrees Fahrenheit and there will be a chance of 56 percent for rain on that day.
Thanks for the information and also check the Weather condition in American Canyon on March 6th.
Please note that the average temperature will be 83 degrees Fahrenheit and there will be a chance of 19 percent for rain on that day.
Let me know the Humidity also.
It will be around 40 percent.
And the Wind condition will be?
the wind speed will be around 3 miles per hour in average
That's okay. Thanks for all.
Have a good day.
Can you tell me what the weather will be in Alameda next Wednesday?
The average temperature on that day is forecast at 88 degrees Fahrenheit, and there is a 27 percent chance of rain.
What about the humidity, that can make a big difference. What is the humidity forecast for that day?
It is projected to be around 27 percent humidity.
How windy will it be?
The average wind speed is expected to be about 12 miles per hour.
And what will the weather be like in Washington on the 14th?
The average temperature is expected to be 90 degrees Fahrenheit, and a 2 percent chance of rain is forecast.
OK, I have all I need, thank you!
Have a great day!
What is the weather in New York going to be like on the 11th?
The average temperature in New York on the 11th should be around 65 degrees Fahrenheit with a 34 percent chance of rain.
What about in Stinson Beach?
The average temperature in Stinson Beach on the 11th should be around 78 degrees Fahrenheit with a 15 percent change of rain.
What about on March 5th?
The average temperature in Stinson Beach on March 5th should be around 90 degrees Fahrenheit with a 18 percent chance of rain.
How windy and humid will it be?
The average wind speed should be around 7 miles per hour with a 28 percent humidity.
Okay, thanks.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you.
Have a great day.
Hi, what is the weather in London, England on the 5th of this month?
The weather on that day is about 94 degrees Fahrenheit with a 28 percent chance of rain.
May I know the windiness and humidity on that day too?
Thea average wind speed is expected to be 12 miles per hour with an average humidity of 23 percent.
Sure, how about at Novato on the 3rd of this month?
The average temperature there should be 82 degrees with a 15 percent chance of rain.
I see, thank you!
Do you need any further assistance?
No, that is all I need. Thank you!
Have a great day ahead!
I'm visiting Martinez soon and would like the check the weather there please
After checking it shows that it'll be around 80 degrees Fahrenheit with a 24 percent chance of it raining
I see, can you check on the 5th of March to be more specific
It'll be a little hotter at 83 degrees, but less chance of rain at 22 percent
How humid do you expect it to be?
Right around 29 percent humidity
OK got it, now I know, thanks!
Let me know if you need more help!
Can you check the weather for the 14th?
What city should I check in?
Morgan Hill, make it March 3rd instead.
It should average around 70 degrees with a 23 percent chance of rain.
Is it supposed to be humid?
The humidity should be around 43 percent.
And the wind?
Should be around 7 miles per hour.
Okay, thanks. That's all I needed.
You're welcome. Bye.
I want to see what the weather will be on Sunday this week.
Which city do you want to know the weather for?
That would be Rio Vista on 10th of March.
The temperature on that day looks like it will average 77 degrees Fahrenheit and there will be a 26 percent chance of rain.
What will the wind be like that day?
The wind speed on that day is forecast to be 9 miles per hour.
What is the humidity level going to be that day?
The humidity is predicted to be about 32 percent.
Okay, how about the weather in Newark that day.
The temperature on that day will average 92 degrees Fahrenheit and there will be a 16 percent chance of rain.
Okay, thank you. Good bye for now!
Have a fine day.
Can you help me check the weather?
In which city would you like me to check the weather?
Please check the weather for Anaheim, CA.
There is a 29 percent chance of rain, with an expected temp of 78 degrees Fahrenheit.
What is the humidity expected to be?
The humidity is expected to be 45 percent.
Thanks, can you tell me the weather for March 12th?
There is a 16 percent chance of rain and the temp should be 71 degrees Fahrenheit.
Okay. Thanks I am all set. Goodbye.
Have a great day.
I would like to check the weather.
Where would you like to know the weather.
In Albany, please.
The average temperature should be around 92 degrees with a 19 percent chance of rain.
Is is humid?
The humidity is 29 percent.
What about the wind?
Average speed of 8 miler per hour.
OK, thank you.
You are welcome.
I am thinking of traveling to Healdsburg and would like to know the weather for the 2nd of this month.
On that day the temperature averages 91 degrees Farenheit and there is usually a 21 percent chance of rain.
Thank you. What about on the 10th?
On that day the average temperature is 79 degrees farenheit with the chance of rain at 22 percent.
Is it usually humid and what is it typically?
The humidity averages around 47 percent.
What about the wind? Does it get windy?
The wind speed averages around 3 miles per hour.
Great, thank you for that information.
Do you need further assistance?
No, not at the moment. Thanks again for your help!
Your welcome! Enjoy your day!
I'm gonna be in Clayton on the 12th of March and need to check the weather please
Sure thing, it looks like on that date it's gonna be around 92 degrees Fahrenheit with a 17 percent chance of it raining
How windy do you expect it to be?
It's gonna be around 8 mile per hour winds going that day
What about in the Hercules area if I pass by that way
It's a little cooler than Clayton at 84 degrees and a very low 3 percent chance of rain
Good to know, okay!
Anything else you need from out end?
For now this is all good, thanks
Alright, take care then!
I want to check weather in Sacramento
The average temperature should be 82 Fahrenheit and it has a 26 percent chance to rain
What about humidity
It's around 27 percent
What about Portland on 12th of march
The average temperature is 72 degrees Fahrenheit with a 16 percent chance to rain
How windy it's gonna be in there
It's 11 miles per hour
Great. Thanks that's all for now
Cheers and regards
Can you please search pop songs for me now?
I found 10 songs for you. What about Acapella by Karmin off of the album Pulses?
What year did it come out?
The song is from 2013.
Yes, that is the one.
Would you like to play this song?
Can you please play the song you just found?
Please confirm the following details: playing the song Acapella in the Living Room.
Yes, that is correct.
Enjoy your music
Thank you, that is all I need.
Okay, have a great day.
Help me find some entertaining music.
Here are 10 songs that may peak your interest. A popular song right now is Paradise by Bazzi. It's from their album Soul Searching.
Go ahead and play the song Paradise that you found a moment ago.
You want me to play the song Paradise in the Living Room correct?
Yes please do.
Now playing Paradise. Please enjoy your song.
Awesome. Thank you for helping me find this song. I love it. That's all I need for now.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
I fancy listening to some music.
There is a song called Rockabye by Caitlin De Ville and the album is called Covers Collection.
To confirm I will play Rockabye in the Living Room.
Yes that is right.
Enjoy the song.
When did it come out? 2010?
It was 2018.
thanks for that.
Anything else I can assist you with?
no thank you.
have a lovely day.
Can you find songs for me?
I pulled up 10 right off one is by Shawn Mendes off the album Illuminate and is called Treat You Better. How does that sound?
Sounds good.
Wold you like to listen to it now?
Not right this minute.
Would you like assistance with another task?
Would you like me to cast Treat you Better to the Living Room?
No I want it to go to the speaker in patio.
Alright your requesting that I cast Treat You Better to the Patio right?
That would be correct.
May you experience audio enjoyment as you listen.
Thanks, you can go now.
Have a nice day.
I would like to listen to a song
I suggest you The Night We Met by Lord Huron from the album Strange Trails
I like it! Thanks!
Do you want to listen to the song now?
Not now, thanks. I'll listen to it later
You need anything else?
Playing the song The night we Met in Patio: do you confirm?
No, I prefer to listen it on the living room
Playing The Night We Met in Living room: is It correct?
Yes, now It's correct. Is it a pop song?
No, It's a Rock song. Good listening!
Was this song released in '16?
This song was released in 2015
Thanks for the information
Can I help you again?
No, It's all for now, thanks
Have a nice day
I want to listen to Sia songs.
Alive by Sia from This Is Acting is very good.
Yes, that is it!
Do you want to listen to it now?
Please play the song you found it the kitchen.
Please confirm, playing Alive in the kitchen.
Yes, that kind of music is it? What year did it come out?
It is a pop song from 2013.
Thanks, that is all!
Have a nice day.
I want to find some popular music. If you can, find some music by Pitbull. I really like their music.
I can play Celebrate by Pitbull. It's from his album Globalization.
I do like Pitbull but I don't want that song. Try finding music by Passenger. The album All The Little Lights is extremely popular.
There is 1 song that matches your criteria. The song Let Her Go by Passenger is from their album All The Little Lights. Is that the song you are looking for?
That's it! That's the song I wanted.
Can I help you with anything else at the moment?
I can. Please confirm the information. Now playing the song Let Her Go in the Living Room. Proceed?
That's right. Please play it for me.
Now playing. Please enjoy your song.
Did this song come out two years back by any chance?
It is actually from the year 2012 to be precise.
Ah okay. Thank you for that information!
Did you require assistance with anything else?
No. That's all I need for now. Thanks a lot.
My pleasure. Have a wonderful day.
I'd like to listen a song
There're 10 songs for you. Do you like Taylor Swift? I propose you You Need To Calm Down from the album Lover
Do you want to play You Need To Calm Down in Living Room?
No, I want to play it on kitchen speaker
Playing You Need To Calm Down in Kitchen: do you confirm?
Yes, I confirm! Is it a pop song? Was it published nine years ago?
Yes, It's a pop song. No, It was published in 2019. Good listening!
Thanks! It's all for now!
Have a great day!
Can you please help me find some Hillbilly songs. I'd particularly enjoy something from the album Chief by Eric Church.
There's 1 song matching your criteria - Springsteen from the album Chief by Eric Church.
Yes, that's perfect.
Do you want me to play it for you?
Can you please confirm that you want me to play Springsteen in the Living Room?
Yes, please do. And also, please tell me when did it came out.
The song came out in 2011. I've started playing it. Enjoy!
Thanks a lot. That will be all for now!
My pleasure! Have a nice day!
I want to search for me songs.I would like something from one years back by Insideeus.
How about album Ecstacy by Insideeus with song called Ecstasy?
What kind of music is that?
It is part of Reggae category.
Yes,I like this one.
You want to to listen to the song?
No.Not now.
Something else I can do for you?
Play the song Ecstasy in Kitchen.Is that correct?
No.I changed my mind cast it on speaker in patio.
Play the song Ecstasy in Patio.Is okay?
Yes is very good.
Enjoy the music!
Thank you very much.That's all that I wanted.
Have a great day!
I want to find some nice songs. Can you find the one which is from one years ago?
yes, I got 10 songs. Do you like the song African Beauty by Diamond Platnumz from the album A Boy From Tandale?
Let me decide, before I need to know the type of this song.
It is Pop type song and hope you like it.
Okay. I need your confirmation to play the song African Beauty in Living Room.
That is correct. Please go ahead.
Enjoy your music and the same was started now.
Thanks and that's all for now.
Have a great day.
Can you find me a pop song by Meghan Trainor from five years ago?
How about All about That Bass by Meghan Trainor from the album Title?
Can you show me some other songs?
Sorry, But there are no other song which meets your requirements. Can I assist you with anything else?
Can you search again for songs by Redfoo from the album Party Rock Mansion?
There is 1 song called New Thang by Redfoo from the album Party Rock Mansion.
Play me the song you just found on speaker in patio.
Please confirm: You want me to play New Thang in Patio.
No. Play it on my living room.
Please confirm: you want me to play New Thang in Living room.
Yes, That works for me.
Your music is playing. Enjoy!
Okay. That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day!
Search for me some songs by Ariana Grande because I really like.
I have 10 options for you.What is your opinion about album Yours Truly by Ariana Grande with song Baby I.
Something else you have?
What is your opinion about album Dangerous Woman by Ariana Grande with song Be Alright?
This song come out in seven years ago?
It is from 2016.
What type of music is ?
Is a Pop song.
I like this one.
You want to play this song?
Play the song that you just found.
Play the song Be Alright in Living room.Is okay?
Yes that's good for me.
Enjoy the music.
Thank you very much.
Can I still be useful?
No.Thank you a lot.
Have a nice day!
i want to look for some songs.
how about ecstasy by insideeus off the ecstacy album?
can you play that song you mentioned earlier on the patio?
you want me to play ecstasy on the patio?
yes.
enjoy the song!
thanks, that's it.
have a great day.
I fancy listening to some music, I have been told an album called Prequelle is fab.
What about Dance Macabre by Ghost from Prequelle.
To confirm then I will play Dance Macabre in the Living Room.
That is right, what genre would you say it is?
It is Metal, I hope you enjoy.
That is all for now, thanks for your help.
have a lovely day.
I need to listen to songs maybe by Enrique Iglesias as he is my favourite singer. Look for something from the Euphoria album.
You can choose from these 2 songs. What about heartbeat by Enrique Iglesias that was in the Euphoria album?
Do you have something else?
Would you like to listen to I Like it in the album Euphoria by Enrique Iglesias?
What genre of music is it and was it seven years back that it came out?
The song is Pop and it came out in the year 2010.
Yeah I was thinking of the same one.
Shall I do anything else for you?
So do you confirm that you want the song I like it played in Living room.
Nope. Play it on speaker in patio.
So confirm that you want to play I like it in Patio?
Yeah sure that is right.
I hope you have fun listening to the music.
Thanks very much.
Shall I help you with any other thing?
Nope thanks a lot
Have a wonderful day!
I want to find a rock-and-roll song please
Sure, I found 10 tracks including Be Somebody by Thousand Foot Krutch off the album The End is Where We Begin that fits your taste
Sure, that's a good one
Want me to play it?
Sure, confirming you want to play Be Somebody in the Living room right?
That is right!
Enjoy the song
Thanks for doing that, that's it
OK, have a great rest of your day
I need to search for songs.
I have 10 songs including sick like me by In This Moment buy Black widow.
Yes that is it.
Do you want to play this song?
Please confirm the details that were playing sick like me in the living room
No I'd like it cast on the kitchen speaker
Please confirm details Play the song sick like me in the kitchen
Yes that would be it
Enjoy the music
What type of music is it
It would be a metalcore song
What year did it come out
The year is 2014 that it came out
Thanks that will be it
Have a nice day
Help me find some pop songs. Maybe Madonna song, I like her.
How about Batuka by Madonna from the album Madame X?
Do you have other songs?
How about God Control by Madonna from the album Madame X?
Was it released in '19?
Yes, it is from 2019.
I'll play God Control in the kitchen, is that right?
Yes, please play it.
Enjoy the song.
Thanks, that's all I need.
Have a great time listening to the song.
Help me look for Pop songs from 2013. Maybe something by Justin Bieber.
Would you like to listen to All That Matters by Justin Bieber from the album Journals.
Yeah, that would be nice.
What else can I do for you?
I'll play All That Matters in the Kitchen, is that right?
Yeah, that's right.
Enjoy the song.
Thanks, that's all I need.
Have a pleasant day.
I'm in the mood for some music. Assistant, search for songs.
From the Album Cloud Nine, the song Carry Me by Kygo is a top choice.
I'm not sure what kind of music that is. Please tell me.
It is classified as Downtempo music.
And in what year did this song debut?
The song debuted in the year 2016.
Oh really? That's a good one then.
Shall I begin playing this song for you?
Not at the moment. Maybe later on.
What can I assist you with then?
Confirm that this is the correct song. Preparing to play Carry Me in the Living Room.
No. Please play the song Carry Me in the Kitchen.
Preparing to play Carry Me in the Kitchen. Shall I proceed?
Yep. Please play the song for me.
The song is now playing in the Kitchen. Enjoy!
Thank you so much! I won't be needing anything else right now.
Please enjoy your music and have a great day.
I want to search for some songs.
How about the song Khuc Hat Mung Sinh Nhat by Phan Dinh Tung from the album Hat Nhan?
Do you have any metal songs?
I found 10 songs. How about A Ghost in the Trenches from the album The Great War by Sabaton?
What else do you have ? I love Pop Songs and heard that album Wake Up Dreaming is good.
How about the song The Zombie Song from the album Wake Up Dreaming by Stephanie Mabey?
Did that come out eight years ago?
It is from 2012.
Please confirm you want to play The Zombie Song on the Patio.
Yes.
Enjoy!
Thank you!
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
No thanks.
Have a great day!
Can you find some songs for me?
Are you interested in The Trip by Still Corners from the album Strange Pleasures?
Yes, I like that one!
Would you like to hear the song now?
I'd like to hear the song you just found on my kitchen speaker.
Please confirm that you would like me to play the song The Trip in the Kitchen.
Yes, that would be great!
I hope you enjoy it!
Thanks!
Can I assist you with anything else?
No, that will be all for now!
Okay, have a great day!
Can you find some pop songs from 2014? Find something from the album Globalization. I've heard it's pretty great and has gotten rave reviews.
I've found 3 songs you may like. How about Celebrate by Pitbull off the album Globalization?
Yeah, that sounds good.
Would you like to play the song now?
No problem, just confirm the following for me. Playing the song Celebrate by Pitbull in the Living room. Correct?
Yeah, that's right.
Now playing. Enjoy your music.
Thank you! I appreciate it.
Anything else I can do for you today?
No, that's it. Thanks!
My pleasure. Have a good day!
I wanna search for a song from around two years back
How about the song Airplane Mode by Limbo off of their album Holo
Confirming you want Airplane Mode played on your patio?
Yes that's right
Enjoy the song!
Thanks for that
Can I do anything else for you?
No that's all thanks!
You're very welcome
Find me some Pop songs from '19 on the Ores Aixmis album.
Do you like Nixta Ginontai Ta Thavmata by Malou Kyriakopoulou on the Ores Aixmis album?
Cast that song from before to the speaker outside.
You wish to cast the song Nixta Ginontai Ta Thavmata to the Patio, correct?
That is right.
Your song has started.
Thanks a bunch. That is everything for now.
Have a great day.
Could you assist me to find some songs? I love Popular songs, song by Kesha and I have been told an album called Rainbow is fab.
There is 1 song called Praying by Kesha from the album Rainbow.
Was it out about five years ago?
it was released in 2017.
Will you play that song by Kesha?
To confirm then Praying will play in the Living Room.
yes that is right.
Enjoy the song.
that is all I need, thanks.
have a lovely day.
I'm in the mood for music. Can you find me some songs?
How about Judas from the album Born This Way by Lady Gaga?
What other songs can you find?
There's Honeymoon Avenue by Ariana Grande from the Yours Truly album.
That sounds good.
Shall I play it now?
Not just yet.
Is there anything else you need?
To confirm: You would like to hear Honeymoon Avenue on the patio.
That's right. What genre is that considered?
It's considered a pop song.
Great. Thanks. That's all I need for now.
Have a wonderful day and enjoy the music.
Would you search me some songs from the album Joanne
What is your opinion about Million Reasons from the album Joanne by Lady Gaga.
I want you to play the song you just found for me.
Please give confirmation details: Running the song Million Reasons in Living Room.
Sorry..run it on Patio.
Please give confirmation details: Running the song Million Reasons in Patio
Sorry...play it on my Kitchen
Please give confirmation details:Running the song Million Reasons in Kitchen.
This is fine..Can i know the type of music? Is it come out in one years ago?
This song is a pop song from the year 2016. Have fun with your music.
Thanks a lot.
Any other help you want?
No, thank you so much.
Have a great day.
I'm about to do my workout and I'd like to play some songs. I'm really into House music and I heard that The Martin Garrix Experience album is great.
Okay, what about No Sleep by Martin Garrix from The Martin Garrix Experience album?
Did that come out in '16?
It was released in 2019.
Okay, that's the one I want.
Would you like me to play the song?
Okay, let's confirm: I'm playing the song No Sleep in the living room.
Yes, sounds good.
Enjoy your music!
Thanks a lot!
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, thank you!
Have a great day!
Can you search for some songs?
I found 10 songs. How about A Ghost In The Trenches by Sabaton? It is from the album The Great War.
Yes, that sounds like the one.
Do you need help with anything else?
Confirming that you want me to play the song A Ghost In The Trenches in the Living room?
Yes, that's correct. Can you tell me what year the song came out?
The song is from the year 2019. Enjoy your music.
Thank you!
Anything else I can help you with?
No. Thanks a lot!
You're welcome. Have a good day.
life will be fun if we hear some good songs. Please find me some good songs for me now?
What do you think about Under your scars by Godsmack from the album When Legends Rise?
Whether this song come out in six years back?
no, it is from the year 2018.
please check and review the following details. Playing the song under your scars in Living room.
ok thats great. thats all i need.
Enjoy your music
thanks a lot.
whether i need to do anything else?
no, thanks for now.
bye , take care have a wonderful day
Are there songs like Reggae by Vybz Kartel of 2019?
1 song is there from Sexability by Vybz Kartel, the Fuckability.
I like that.
Shall I play it now.
Please confirm, you want to hear Fuckability in Living Room.
Fine, thats all.
Please listen to the song.
Thank you very much.
Any other service?
No thats all.
Great day, see later.
Can you find me Metal songs by Jinjer?
How about Pisces by Jinjer from album King Of Everything?
Can you tell me the year it came out?
I was launched in the year 2016.
Yes, That is the song I am looking for.
Do you want me to play the song for you?
Please confirm: You want me to play the song Pisces in Living room.
No, Please play it on the speaker outside.
Please confirm: You want me to play the song Pisces in Patio.
Yes, That sounds good.
Your music is playing. Enjoy!
Okay. That will be all. Thank you so much!
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day!
I need to search for songs now and I love pop ones. Please find me something from seven years ago maybe the album Halcyon because it is great.
I found 1 song. What are your thoughts on Burn by Ellie Goulding from the album Halcyon?
Please confirm the details for the playing the song Burn in Living Room.
No, please cast it on patio device.
Please confirm details about playing the song Burn in Patio.
Yes, that is the one.
Please enjoy the music.
Thanks so much. That is it.
Have a nice day.
I am in a nice mood and I like to listen to some nice songs. Can you search for something best for me?
Yes, what about your opinion on Carry Me by Kygo from the album Cloud Nine?
Yes, I want you to play the song that I have selected before.
Please confirm to play the song Carry Me in the Living room speaker.
Yes, confirmed, go ahead.
The song was started playing now and you can enjoy it.
Thanks and that's all.
Have a great day.
I want to find a song to listen to
What about Neon Lights by Demi Lovato on her album Demi?
Alright, playing Neon Lights in your Living Room?
Yes please, that's right
Enjoy the song
What genre is this again?
It's a pop song
Good to know, that's all for now, thanks for your help
Glad to be of assistance
I need to hear some beautiful song. will you search for songs now? The songs should be from the year 2014.
I found 10 songs as per your need. What about the song Addicted by Popcaan from the album Where we come from?
Please confirm the following details: Playing the song Addicted in Living room.
Ok that sound good to me. What type of music is it?
It is a Reggae song . Enjoy the music Addicted.
THanks a lot . thats all i need.
whether i need to find anything else?
no , thanks for now.
have a wonderful day
I want to listen to some music, imagine dragons would be awesome, somebody told me about the night visions album
there's the song radioactive by imagine dragons and it's from the album night visions as you wished.
play the song you found earlier, play it on any device
Confirm me if this is what you asked. you want me to play the song radioactive in living room
exactly. an you tell me the genre it belongs to? do you also know if the song came out in '11?
it's a rock song from 2012
you're precious!
thank you. May I help you furthermore?
No, that would be all. cheers
Goodbye
Can you find me some songs?
Sure. I found 10 songs for you. How about Sick Love Red Hot Chili Peppers? It is from the album The Getaway.
What genre is this? What year was it released?
It is a Rock song from the year 2016.
I will play the song Sick Love in the Living room. Is this correct?
No. Cast it on the speaker in kitchen.
Confirming that you want me to play the song Sick Love in the Kitchen?
Yes, that is correct.
Enjoy your music!
Thank you. That's all for now.
You're welcome. Have a good day.
I would like to search for some songs please.
I found 10 songs for you. How about Tyrant by Kali Uchis from the album Isolation?
What kind of music is it?
It is a funk song.
Please confirm the following details: playing the song Tyrant in the Living Room.
Yes, that is correct. Did the song come out five years ago?
The song is from 2016. Enjoy your music.
Thank you, that is all for now.
Okay, have a good day!
I'd like to search for songs on the Holo album.
How about Airplane Mode by Limbo on the Holo album.
What kind of music and what year was it released?
It's a pop song from 2017.
Sure, please confirm you'd like me to play Airplane Mode in the Living room.
Yup, thank you.
Hope you enjoy!
That's all for now.
Enjoy your day!
Hey, I feel like listening to some tunes right now. Can you play me something by Carrie Underwood? Pop music is my jam.
What about the song Southbound from the album Cry Pretty? It's one of the Carrie Underwood classics.
So the song Southbound on the living room device?
Yes, that's it.
Enjoy the song!
Thanks a lot.
Can I help you some more?
No, thanks. That's it.
Have a great day!
Can you search for a popular song for me to listen to?
I've found 10 songs. Would you like to hear Acapella by Karmin from their album Pulses?
Maybe. Is that the song that came out seven years back?
The song came out in 2013.
Please confirm that you would like me to play the song Acapella in area Living room.
Yes, I confirm that.
Enjoy the music and let me know if you need anything else.
Thank you. That will be all for now. I'll talk to you later.
You're welcome. Good bye.
Can you help me find some good songs to listen to? I'm looking for music are '10. I hear that the album Speak Now is great. Can you find something off of there?
No problem. I've found 3 songs off the album Speak Now. How about Long Live by Taylor Swift?
Okay, that sounds great.
Would you like to play the song now?
Yeah, can you go ahead and play that Taylor Swift song you found earlier?
Sure thing, just confirm the following for me first. Playing song Long Live in the Living room. Correct?
Yes, that's correct. Can you tell me what genre it is?
No problem. It's a Pop song. Your music is now playing, enjoy!
Thanks! That's all for now.
My pleasure. Have a good day.
can you look for songs?
there's Salam Alaikum by Harris J off the Salam album.
when did it come out? what genre is it?
it's a pop song from 2015.
you want me to play salam alaikum in the living room?
yes.
enjoy the song!
thanks!
is there anything else?
no, thanks.
have a great day.
How's the weather in LA on March 9th?
The average temperature for the day is expected to be 94 degrees Fahrenheit with a 13 percent chance of rain.
I want to check about the weather condition in American canyon on 12th of March for which I need your help.
Please note that the average temperature on that day will be 75 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 15 percent for rain fall there on that day.
Please check the same on the 11th in London also.
Please note that the average temperature on that day will be 71 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 15 percent for rain fall there on that day.
And what about Humidity? Please check it in average.
It will be around 41 percent.
Then also check about wind speed.
It will be around 11 miles per hour in average. Anymore information you need to check?
What is the weather suppose to be on the 8th of this month in San Diego?
The average temperature is 93 degrees with a 6 percent chance of rain.
What is the average wind and humidity?
The wind is usually around 5 mph and the humidity averages 18 percent.
Can you check the weather for me?
In which city?
I want to see the weather in Mexico City on the 14th of this month.
The average temperature will be 92 degrees Fahrenheit with a 1 percent chance of rain.
What will the weather be in Marshall on the 1st of this month?
There will be a 5 percent change of rain with an average temperature of 86 degrees.
OK, What is the weather forecast for Delhi, India on the 10th of March?
It is expected to be 102 degrees on average that day with inly a 4 percent chance of rain.
Will it be very humid or windy?
The wind is predicted to be around 4 miles per hour and the humidity should be about 18 percent.
What will the weather in Portland be on the 14th?
The average temperature will be 57 Fahrenheit with a 13 percent chance of rain.
What about the wind speed?
There will be a wind speed of 6 miles per hour.
What about the humidity
The humidity will be approximately 20 percent.
Can I get the Portland, OR weather forecast for the 13th of this month?
Portland is going to have an average temperature of 58 degrees Fahrenheit on that day with the chance of rain at 24 percent.
How about the humidity?
On that day, it'll be 13 percent.
And what about the wind conditions?
It should be a 15 mile-per-hour wind speed that day.
Please check the weather forecast for me.
Ok what city should I check the forecast in?
Please check the weather in San Francisco on the 9th of March.
The weather on that day should be around 70 degrees Fahrenheit with a 2 percent chance of rain.
What is the humidity supposed to be?
The humidity on that day should be about 16 percent.
Is it going to be windy?
The wind speed on that day should be about 9 miles per hour.
I'd like to check the weather in Chicago.
The average temperature is 73 Fahrenheit with a 29 percent chance of rain.
I want to check the weather for Wednesday next week.
What city would you like to check?
I want the weather in Cotati
The average temperature should be 93 Fahrenheit with a 27 percent chance of rain.
What will the humidity be? Is it going to be windy?
The humidity is projected to be around 41 percent with a wind speed of 9 miles per hour.
What will the weather be in Chicago on Monday next week?
The average temperature should be 65 degrees Fahrenheit with a 35 percent chance of rain.
Can you show me the weather of New York on the 4th?
The expected temperature will be 59 degrees Fahrenheit with 22 percent chance of rain.
Can you check for the wind speed that day?
The expected average wind speed is 8 mph.
Whats the current weather at the moment?
Any particular city that you want to check the weather at the moment?
Check the current weather in Vallejo.
Average temperatures in Vallejo for today is 83 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 10 percent chance of rain.
How about the weather in SF on the 10th?
For SF on the 10th, the average temperatures is expected to be 93 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 12 percent chance of rain.
What about the humidity, whats that going to be like on that day?
Humidity is expected to be around 26 percent.
How about wind conditions, how windy is it going to be?
Wind speed should be on average about 6 miles per hour.
Thanks for all the info, I appreciate it.
Is there anything else you need assistance on?
Can you tell me what the weather in SF is expected to be today?
There is a 29 percent chance of rain and the average temperature will be 91 degrees Fahrenheit.
I am going to be outside. Let me know the weather forecast please.
I will check the weather but I need to know the city you need the weather checked in.
New Delhi is the place I need the weather checked for.
New Delhi has a forecast predicting a 4 percent chance of showers. You should expect the temperature during the day to be 99 degrees Fahrenheit.
I'd like to check the weather in toronto, canada
The average temp there will be 58 degrees with a 13 % chance of rain.
How humid and windy will it be?
The humidity will be around 25 %, with a wind speed of 9 mph.
Can you tell me what the weather will be like in Vancouver on the 4th?
It will be 58 degrees fahrenheit with a 49 % of rain.
will it be humid?
around 54 % humidity.
What's the weather like in LA?
It will be 76 degrees and there is a 28 % chance of rain.
What will be the humidity and how windy do you think it will be?
Humidity in LA will be about 75 % and winds are light at 4 MPH.
Can you help me check the weather please
What city are we looking at
I want to see what it's like in Vegas
It's gonna be 84 degrees with an 18 percent chance of rain
Can you provide the weather forecast in Chicago for me please?
Yes. The forecast predicts a 29 percent possibility of showers. The temperature throughout the day is predicted to average 73 degrees Fahrenheit.
How muggy is it predicted to be? Also check how breezy it is expected to be please.
The atmospheric moisture is expected to be 29 percent. The breezes are expected to average 15 miles an hour.
Tell me about the weather for the date of March 4th.
I can do that for you if you provide the city name.
I want information on weather in Tomales.
In Tomales, the average temperature is 85 degrees Fahrenheit. There is a 28 percent of there being rainfall.
Okay tell me about another city. This time, tell me the forecast for next Tuesday in Toronto.
There is a 55 percent chance of there being rain in Toronto. The temperature will hover around 66 degrees Fahrenheit.
What is the humidity and wind speed for that day?
The humidity is around 23 percent with a wind speed of 12 miles per hour.
Hey, check the weather in San Francisco for me.
Sure thing. The average temperature is 91 degrees Fahrenheit with a 29 percent chance of rain.
What's the wind speed and humidity like?
The humidity is around 49 percent and wind speed will be around 2 miles per hour.
What will the weather in San Diego be like.
The average temperature will be 90 degrees Fahrenheit with a 1 percent chance of rain.
Hello, could you help me check the weather on 7th of March in Los Angeles please?
The average temperature is 86 degrees Fahrenheit with a 5 percent chance of rain.
What will the weather be in Nairobi on March 9th?
The average temperature is 103 degrees with 0 chance of rain.
Okay, I see.
Do you need something else?
I want to check the weather condition in particular area. Do you help me?
Yes, in which area you want to check about the weather?
Check it in Toronto.
Please note that the temperature will be 58 degree Fahrenheit in average and the chance of rain will be at 13 percent.
Can you tell me the weather?
Where would you like to know the weather?
What's the weather in LA?
The average temperature should be 76 degree F, with a 28 percent chance of rain.
How windy and humid is it supposed to be?
The humidity for today is around 75 percent. The average wind is 4 miles an hour.
I want to check weather on March 13th in Portland
The average temperature for the day should be 58 degree Fahrenheit and there is a 24 percent chance to rain
I want the weather in SD for the 9th.
It will be averaging a day temperature of 83 degrees Fahrenheit with a 25 percent possibility of raining.
Can you check the weather forecast in Phoenix for me?
Yes. Phoenix shows a 15 Percent possibility of showers. The temperature throughout the day could average 89 degrees Fahrenheit.
Will there be a lot of wind?
The wind will blow aroubd 11 miles per hour.
How muggy is it expected to be?
There will be about a 23 percent concentration of water vapor in the air.
I need to see what the weather will be like in London, UK on the 12th of March
It looks like it's gonna be 87 degrees with a 21 percent chance of it raining there
Cool, now how windy and humid is it expected to be?
It's expected to be around 32 percent humidity with a 2 mile per hour wind speed
OK thanks for that
What else can I do for you?
I want to find someplace to eat. Please look for restaurants.
What kind of food would you like to look for?
I would like to find Latin American food.
What city would you like to search in?
Please find restaurants in San Jose.
Chacho's is a restaurant in San Jose matching the criteria you requested.
Yes, that would be good.
Would you like to reserve a table there?
Yes, I would like to reserve a table.
What time would you like the reservation for?
Please make it for eleven am.
You would like to book a table for 2 people at Chacho's in San Jose on March 1st at 11 am, is that right?
Yes, that's correct.
Your reservation is successful.
I need to find a place to eat.
Where would you like to search? Which type of cuisine?
I want somewhere in Santa Clara that serves a light meal.
I found 2 restaurants, one is Dae Bak in Santa Clara.
What is the rating? And the location?
The rating is around 4.1 and it is located at 3284 El Camino Real.
That sounds great thanks.
Would you like to reserve a table?
Yes, please make a reservation for 1 this Saturday at 6:30 in the evening.
You want a table for 1 at Dae Bak in Santa Clara at 6:30 pm on March 2nd, correct.
Yes that is great thanks. Is it pricey?
Your table is reserved. The restaurant's pricing is moderate.
Do they have outdoor seating or vegetarian options?
They do not have either.
Thank you for your help.
Can I do anything more for you?
Find me somewhere to eat at.
What type of food do you like?
I am looking for a place that serves Seafood.
What city shall I look in?
Search for places in Millbrae.
Little Whale Seafood is in Millbrae.
That is perfect. Book me a table there.
What time do you want to eat?
I wish to eat at 6:45 in the evening.
You want a table for 2 at Little Whale Seafood in Millbrae on March 1st at 6:45 pm, correct?
That is correct.
I can't book that time. Is a table for 2 at Little Whale Seafood on March 1st at 7 pm okay with you?
That is good too.
Your table is booked.
What is their average rating?
They have an average rating of 4.1.
I want to eat outside once and I need your help to search for the best place to eat.
Do you have any favorite kind of food in your mind. If so let me know the same to short list my search.
I like to have Ramen food and search for the place that have this kind of food.
Okay, Where do you want to eat, is there any best place in your option?
I think finding a restaurant in San Fran will be perfect for me.
What about 2g Japanese Brasserie restaurant which is the best place in San Francisco to enjoy your food. What do you think?
Yes, I think the same and I like this place.
Shall I reserve a table there for you now?
Yes, I need it and please book it for the date on the 12th and my convenient time is twelve in the afternoon.
I need your final confirmation to book a table for 2 at 2g Japanese Brasserie restaurant in San Francisco on March 12th for the time at 12 pm.
That is correct and you can proceed. Also get me their address for my reference. Is the price range cheap there?
They are having food at moderate prices and I have booked the table successfully. And please note their address is 601 Van Ness Avenue.
I want to find a place to eat.
Where are you looking? What kind of food do you want to eat?
I'm looking for a diner in Campbell.
I found 3 restaurants. Effie's Restaurant & Bar is located in Campbell.
Sounds good. I want to reserve a table.
What time would you like to make the reservation?
I want to make the reservation for 6:45 pm.
Please confirm: A table for 2 at Effie's Restaurant & Bar in Campbell on March 1st at 6:45 pm.
Yes, sounds good. What's the address?
The address is 331 West Hacienda Avenue. Sorry, I was unable to make the reservation at Effie's Restaurant & Bar. Should I try for March 1st at 7 pm for 2?
Yes, that's good.
Your reservation has been made.
Can you find me a place to eat?
Which type of food would you like to eat?
I am looking for a place which serves Burrito.
Which area do you want me to search in?
I am looking for a restaurant in Los Gatos.
There are 2 restaurants you may like. How about a nice restaurant called Pedro's located in Los Gatos?
Okay, That sounds good to me. Can you book me a table at the restaurant for 3 people at 6:30 pm?
Please confirm: You want me to book a table for 3 people at Pedro's located in Los Gatos for 6:30 pm on March 1st.
No, Book the table for 2 people.
Please confirm: You want me to book a table for 2 people at Pedro's located in Los Gatos for 6:30 pm on March 1st.
Yes, That is correct. Can you check whether they serves vegetarians?
I have successfully booked the table and they don't serve enough vegetation.
Can you check whether they have outdoor seating?
No, There is no outdoor seating.
I want you help to find somewhere to go for food.
What type of food do you prefer?
I fancy Chinese food.
Where are you?
In San Fran.
Well Alice's is a good restaurant in San Francisco.
Is it expensive and do they have tables outside?
They are considered a cheap restaurant and they do have tables outside.
Do you have any other restaurant suggestions?
There is a good restaurant called Bamboo Restaurant in San Francisco.
I like the sound of that so please book my a table there.
What time are you interested in going?
I think eleven in the morning.
To confirm then that is a booking for 2 people on March 1st at 11 am at Bamboo Restaurant, San Francisco.
great thanks. Do you know if they have a vegetarian menue or if there are tables outdoors?
Your booking is confirmed and I can confirm they have both vegetarian options and outdoor seating.
I would like to find a restaurant.
Which city are you located and what type of food?
I would like a bistro in berkeley.
La Note is located in Berkeley.
Do they have outdoor seating and a vegetarian menu.
They have vegetarian options and outdoor seating.
Yes, that sounds good.
Would you like to reserve a table there?
Yes, I would like to reserve a table.
What time would you like your reservation?
I would like to go quarter to 1 in the afternoon.
Booking a table for 2 at La Note in Berkeley for March 1st at 12:45 pm.
What is the rating of the restaurant?
The restaurant's rating is 4.4. Would you like to go to La Note restaurant at 1 pm on March 1st for 2 people.
Yes, 1 pm works for me.
Your reservation was made.
I want to find a place to eat in Occidental.
What kind of food do you want to eat?
I want to find Parisian cuisine.
I found 1 restaurant. Bistro Des Copains is a great restaurant in Occidental.
That sounds great.
Do you want to book a table?
Yes I want a table for 3.
What time would you like the reservation?
Make it for 11 o'clock in the morning.
Please confirm: a table for 3 at Bistro Des Copains in Occidental on March 1st at 11 am.
Yes, that's correct.
Your reservations have been made.
I want to find a restaurant in SFO that serves Izakaya and it needs to be cheap or fairly inexpensive.
There is 1 restaurant in San Francisco that is called Izakaya Kou.
That sounds right. What is their address and phone number?
The address is 1560 Fillmore Street and the phone number is 415-441-9294.
Could you book a table for me? So for one person on the 12th of this month for 1 o'clock in the afternoon at Izakaya Kou.
Please confirm the following for me: You want a table for 1 at Izakaya Kou in San Francisco at 1 pm on March 12th.
Yes, that's it. Could you tell me if they have a vegetarian selection?
No, they do not offer vegetarian selections. Your reservation has been confirmed.
I'm trying to find a restaurant please.
Of course, what type of cuisine are you interested in and in which location should I look?
I'd like to go someplace in the Belmont area and I love spicy noodles.
I have 1 possibility for you, which is Thai Tamarind Restaurant in Belmont.
OK, great. Would you please set a one pm reservation for me?
Confirming a table for 2 on March 1st at 1 PM at Thai Tamarind Restaurant in the city of Belmont.
Excellent, thank you. I'm wondering, are there vegetarian dishes on their menu? And I'd like the address please.
The reservation has been booked. Yes, they do have vegetarian meals and the address of the restaurant is 1316 El Camino Real.
I want to find a place to eat.
What kind of food would you like to eat?
I want to find Middle eastern food.
Where should I look for restaurants?
I want to find some Greek food in Oakland. Preferably with outdoor seating.
Ikaros Greek Restaurant is a popular spot located in Oakland.
What's the address? Is it ultra high-end?
The price range is moderate. The restaurant is located at 3268 Grand Avenue.
That sounds great.
Do you want to make a reservation?
Yes, I want to book a table.
What time would you like to make the reservation.
Make the reservation for 18:00, please.
Please confirm: A table for 2 at Ikaros Greek Restaurant in Oakland on March 1st at 6 pm.
Yes, sounds good.
Your reservation has been made.
Hello! Can you recommend at restaurant?
I'd be happy to help. What type of cuisine are you interested in?
I'd like to have some spicy Indian food.
Where would you like me to search?
Please find something near Mill Valley.
There is 1 restaurant that meets your criteria. Would you be interested in trying Prabh Indian Kitchen in Mill Valley?
Do they offer vegetarian dishes? Is it considered an ultra high-end restaurant?
It is considered a moderate restaurant with many vegetarian options.
That sounds nice. Can you reserve me a table for four on the 12th?
What time would work best for you?
13:00 would work best for me.
You'd like to reserve a table for 4 at Prabh Indian Kitchen in Mill Valley at 1 pm on March 12th. Is that correct?
I'm sorry, I need to make that for the 10th of this month.
You'd like to reserve a table for 4 on March 10th.
That is correct. Can you tell me if they offer al fresco dining and what the address is?
They are located at 24 Sunnyside Avenue and they do have outdoor seating. Your table has been confirmed.
I want to go out to eat at an average priced place in Oakland.
What kind of food would you like?
I'm needing some comfort food.
Bowl'd Bbq is a nice place in Oakland.
That will work. Can you book a table there for three people on the 9th?
What time would you like the reservation?
I need the reservation for 6 in the evening.
Please confirm: You want to book a table for 3 at Bowl'd Bbq in Oakland on March 9th at 6 pm?
Yes, that's right.
Your reservation has been confirmed.
Hey, can you find me some place to eat in Berkeley where I can get cheap vegetarian options?
What kind of food are you looking for?
I'm looking for an afforadable breakfast.
I found 1 nice restaurant in Berkeley, it's the Venus Restaurant.
Sounds good. Can you get me a table there for five pm please?
So a table for 2 at 5 pm on March 1st at the Venus Restaurant in Berkeley?
Yes. Do they have tables on the outside? What's their phone number?
Your reservation was successful. They don't have outdoor siting and their number is 510-540-5950.
Thanks a lot.
Can I help you further?
I'd like to find a place to eat.
What type of food?
I'd like something European.
Where did you want me to look?
I'd like a place in Berkeley.
I found 2 restaurants for you. One is Hs Lordships Restaurant in Berkeley.
That sounds good. I'd like to book a table.
What time did you want to book it?
I'd like a table for three on 9th of this month at quarter to 6 in the evening.
Please confirm you're booking a table for 3 at Hs Lordships Restaurant in Berkeley on March 9th at 5:45 pm.
Yes, that is correct.
Sorry, I was unable to book your reservation. How about a reservation for 3 at Hs Lordships Restaurant in Berkeley on March 9th at 6 pm.
Yes, that sounds good
Your reservation has been confirmed.
Can you find me a place to eat?
Which city do you want me to search in?
I am looking for restaurants in Half Moon Bay.
What type of food do you want to have?
I am looking for a restaurant that serves Fish.
There is a nice restaurant called Flying Fish Bar & Grill located in Half Moon Bay.
Okay, That sounds nice to me. Can you book me a table there?
What is your preferred timing for the booking?
I want to book the table for one pm.
Please confirm: You want me to book a table for 2 people at Flying Fish Bar & Grill located in Half Moon Bay on March 1st at 1 pm.
Yes, That is correct. Can you confirm whether they have outdoor seating and vegetarian options in the menu?
I have successfully booked the table for you and they neither have outdoor seating nor have vegetarian options in the menu.
I'd like to find a place to eat at.
Where should I search? What kind of food do you want?
Please find me something serving Burrito in Mountain View.
Agave Mexican Bistro is a nice restaurant in Mountain View.
That would be great. I'd like to book a table at morning 11 on the 14th of this month.
Please confirm the following: You want a table at Agave Mexican Bistro in Mountain View at 11 am on March 14th for 2 people.
Yes, that would work.
The table has been booked.
I need to get some dinner.
Where are you looking for?
I'll be in Mill valley at lunch time.
Do you have any preferences?
I could go for some Barbecue today.
I found a place in Mill Valley called Lighthouse Bar & Grill.
OK. Do you have any others?
There's a Mcdonald's in Mill Valley. You might like it.
All right. Let's go ahead and book a table for two next Tuesday at 1:15 in the afternoon.
to confirm: You want a table for 2 at Mcdonald's in Mill Valley at 1:15 pm on March 5th.
No. Let's make that 3 at 1:30 pm.
To confirm: There will be 3 people at 1:30 pm.
Actually I would like it on the 11th.
To confirm: You want Mcdonald's on March 11th.
That's it. thanks
You are now confirmed.
I am interested to know how the weather is going to be on 7th of March in San Diego.
For your requested location the temperature should be at an average of 90 degrees Fahrenheit, and with a chance of raining at 17 percent.
Show me the weather of Mexico City on March 13th.
The expected average temperature through the day is 91 degrees Fahrenheit with 8 percent chance of rain.
Can you check for the wind speed?
The expected average wind speed is 6 mph.
Okay, That sounds good.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Can you check the weather for me?
Sure thing. Which city would you like to check?
Can you tell me the weather in SFO?
The average temperature will be 91 degrees fahrenheit with a 29 percent chance of rain.
What's the weather gonna be like in Toronto, Ontario on Thursday next week?
In Toronto, Ontario, there is a 15 percent chance of rain with a temperature of 61 degrees.
I need to know the about the wind and humidity too.
Humidity will be roughly 25 percent with the wind blowing at 12 miles per hour.
Hi, i need a help, i want to check the weather on 8th of March in London
Okay, The average temperature for the day should be 93 degrees Fahrenheit and 24 percent chance of rain.
Okay, how humidity is it expected to be, and how windy is it gonna be?
The humidity is around 19 percent and the wind speed should be 4 miles per hour.
Can you check the weather for me?
Sure. For what city?
For London, please.
The average temperature should be around 81 degrees Fahrenheit. There is a 23 percent chance of rain.
How windy will it be?
The average wind speed should be around 10 miles per hour.
I want to know about the weather in Toronto, Canada on the 4th of this month.
The temperature average will be 70 degrees Fahrenheit and there will be a 38 percent chance for rain.
Okay, thanks for that.
Do you need me to do anything else?
Hey, can you tell me how's the weather gonna be in Chicago on Saturday this week please?
Sure! The average temperature should be 61 degrees Fahrenheit with a 33 percent chance of rain.
Update me about the weather please, the day is wednesday next week
Okay, just tell me which city you're interested in
los angeles
I checked and I have to inform you that the temperature should be around 78 degrees fahrenheit and the chance of rain is equal to 19 percent
Hello. What's the weather like in Atlanta, GA?
The weather is 86 degrees F with a 28 percent chance of rain.
Can you please check the weather for me for March 7th.
Sure, but first tell me for which city.
For London, UK please!
There's a 27 percent chance of rain with an average temperature of 71 degrees Fahrenheit.
Can you check the weather in SD next Tuesday please
It's gonna be 84 degrees with an 8 percent chance of rain
I need a weather update for Chi-town for 13th of this month.
The temperature will average 65 degrees Fahrenheit with a 37 percent chance that it would rain.
What is the expected humidity?
It's around 47 percent humid.
What is the wind situation like?
5 miles per hour will be the wind speed on average.
I need some information about how the weather will be on the 5th of March.
What city do you wish for me to find the forecast for?
Find the weather forecast for Cotati.
Cotati will have an average temperature of 86 degrees with an 18 percent chance of rain on March 5th.
Thank you. I need another weather forecast. This time for Nairobi.
There temperature for Nairobi is 90 degrees with a 9 percent chance of there being rain.
What is the weather in Toronto, Ontario.
The average temperature is 58 degrees with a 13 percent chance of rain.
I'm traveling soon and need to know the weather about my destination. Can you tell me the forecast for Phoenix, AZ on Friday next week?
Phoenix, AZ should have a temperature of 77 degrees Fahrenheit and a 15 percent chance of rain next Friday. Do you require more information?
I could use some information about the wind speed and humidity as well. Please.
Certainly. The humidity should be 21 percent and the wind speed will be 11 miles per hour.
I want to check about the weather condition on 13th of March and I need your help to do the same.
Where do you want to check for the Weather?
Check it in Toronto, Ontario.
Please note that the temperature will be 62 degrees Fahrenheit in average and there may be a 1 percent chance of rain.
What about the Humidity there?
It will be around 15 percent. What else do you need to know?
I want to check the same on March 8th.
Please note that the temperature will be 67 degrees Fahrenheit in average and there may be a 6 percent chance of rain.
Can you get me the weather for Phoenix for the 4th of March?
The average temperature for the day should be around 90 degrees Fahrenheit. There is a 29 percent chance of rain.
Tell me the weather in Portland on the 10th of March.
Portland has an average temperature of 58 degrees on March 10th. There is also a 25 percent chance of rain occurring.
What's the humidity going to be like that day?
The humidity will be about 39 percent that day.
Will it be windy on the 10th?
It should be only 4 miles per hour when it comes to wind speed.
I was wondering what the weather is like in Phoenix.
The temperature will average 89 degrees Fahrenheit for the day with a 15 percent possibility of raining.
Alright can you check for NY on March 9th?
The temperature must be 70 degrees for the day on average and I think it will have 38 percent possibility of raining.
What is the wind like?
The wind will average a speed of 7 miles per hour.
What is the humidity like?
About 47 percent should be the humidity.
What's the weather like on the 9th of March?
What's the location you want to check?
I want to check SF.
The temperature will be 70 degrees Fahrenheit on average with a 2 percent chance it will rain.
What is the weather going to be like Wednesday next week in Philly?
The forecasts are predicting average temperature to be 94 Fahrenheit with a 26 percent chance of precipitation.
Okay, got it.
Do you still need assistance?
I would like to check the weather today in Nairobi.
The temperature should be around 105 degrees and there is a 0 percent chance of rain.
How windy is the day going to be?
The wind should be around 7 miles per hour
Can you please check the weather for me for the 8th of March?
Sure, but first tell me for which city.
For Gilroy, please.
There's a 20 percent chance of rain with average temperatures around 85 degrees Fahrenheit.
Is it going to be humid or windy?
The average wind speed is forecast to be 9 miles per hour and the humidity should be around 40 percent.
OK, now let's check the weather for SFO.
There's a 13 percent change of rain with an average temperature of 70 degrees Fahrenheit.
OK, now let's see it for the 12th of this month.
There's a 23 percent change of rain with an average temperature of 76 degrees Fahrenheit.
I need to see what the weather is on the 5th of March.
What is the city you want to find out about the weather?
Let's look in Marshall.
There's a 25 percent chance of rain that day. The average temperature will be around 76 degrees Fahrenheit that day.
Right, what about checking San Fran for the 4th.
That day there will be about an average temp of 71 degrees and have a 16 percent rain chance.
Will it be humid or windy?
The average wind will have speeds of 8 miles per hour and a humidity of near 19 percent.
How will be the weather on the 9th of this month?
In which city are you interested?
I'm interested in the weather in San Diego.
The average temperature for the day is expected to be around 83 degrees Fahrenheit with a 25 percent chance of rain.
Is it going to be windy or humid?
The humidity is expected to be around 40 percent with an average wind speed of 7 miles per hour.
Tell me what the weather will be Monday next week.
What city do you want me to check?
Check in SD.
The normal temperature is 75 degrees with a 7 percent chance of precipitation.
What is the wind speed?
Winds average 9 miles an hour.
Please inform me about the weather in Portland, OR.
The temperature is found to be 75 degrees Fahrenheit. 9 percent chance of rain is forecast.
What about the condition on this Saturday.
The temperature is found to be 65 degrees and 15 percent chance for shower.
Can you find me a restaurant?
Sure. What type of cuisine would you like?
Find me a Barbecue restaurant.
What location should I search in?
Find me something in SF.
I have found 10 restaurants for you. You might like 1760. It is a nice restaurant in San Francisco.
Can you recommend any place else?
25 Lusk is a nice restaurant located in San Francisco.
Can you get me the phone number?
You can contact them at 415-495-5875.
Do they have outdoor seating? Can you get me the address?
The restaurant does not have outdoor seating. Their street address is 25 Lusk Street.
Any place else you find? How about something cheap?
I found 6 possible restaurants for you. How about Chaparral in San Francisco?
Yes, that would be good. I need to book a table for three people. Make it for the 6th at 10:45.
Confirming that you want a table for 3 at Chaparral in San Francisco. Your reservation will be for March 6th at 10:45 am. Is this information correct?
Yes, that will work.
Sorry, but I was unable to book your table for 3 at Chaparral. Should I try for March 6th at 11 am?
Yes, that will work.
Your reservation has been confirmed.
Thank you so much.
Is there anything else that I can help you with?
I need a place to eat.
What location and kind of food are you seeking?
Please find a restaurant in Berkeley serving barbecue.
B&b kitchen & Wine Bar is nice and is a restaurant in Berkeley.
What is the phone number and are they expensive in the restaurant?
The restaurant is moderate and has a phone number of 510-647-9329.
Yes, that is great.
Do you wish to reserve a table here?
Yes, I'd like to reserve a table for four people March 13th at 7 in the evening.
Please confirm details to book a table for 4 on March 13th at 7 pm at B&b kitchen & Wine Bar in Berkeley.
Yes, that will work and what is the address?
The reservation is a success and the street address is 2116 Shattuck Avenue.
Are there vegetarian options on the menu?
They have some good options that are vegetarian.
Find a place where I can get a bite to eat please. I really like Pho cuisine.
Is there an area you would like me to search?
A joint in San Fran is preferred.
One idea is eating at the Anh Hong restaurant. They are in the San Francisco area.
Is there patio type dining available at the location? I would also like a number to contact the restaurant please.
They only serve inside the building. You can call them by dialing 415-885-5180.
I see. Thanks.
I would be happy to make a reservation for you.
Thank you very much, please do. I would like table at 19:30.
I want to make sure I understand your request. One reservation is to be made at the Anh Hong joint in San Francisco. The table will be for 2. The time will be 7:30 pm this March 1st.
Thank you for checking. Everything is right.
Your table has been saved for you.
Is the price range expensive or cheap. Does the joint have a user rating?
Their prices fall in the moderate range. Their rating is 4.4.
I see. Once again I would like to express my gratitude for your excellent assistance.
My pleasure. I am able to assist you with other tasks if you like.
Hi! Can you help me find an economical Moroccan restaurant?
I'd be happy to help. Where would you like me to search?
I need to find something in San Francisco.
There are 3 that meet your criteria. May I suggest El Mansour in San Francisco?
That sounds nice. Can you reserve a table for me?
Of course. What time works best for you?
Please make it for 11:15 in the morning.
You'd like to reserve a table for 2 at El Mansour in San Francisco at 11:15 am on March 1st. Is this correct?
Yes, that's correct. Can you tell me the address of the restaurant?
They are located at 3119 Clement Street. Unfortunately, El Mansour does not have a table available at that time. Would you like me to try for a table for 2 on March 1st at 11:30 am instead?
That would be fine.
Great! Your table has been reserved.
I would like to look up some places to eat please.
Sure, I can help you with that. What city would you like to search? I will also need to know what type of food your interested in?
Let's pull Oriental restaurants that are moderate in price in the Mountain View area.
Sure, one moment. I've located a great one for you in Mountain View called Hangen Szechuan. How does this sound?
Perfect, I appreciate that!
No problem! Should we book a table at this time?
Yes, Let's reserve the table now.
Ok, what time should we reserve for?
I would prefer twelve in the afternoon if possible.
Sure thing, please go ahead and confirm we are booking a table for 2 people on March 1st at 12 pm at the Hangen Szechuan restaurant in Mountain View. Is this correct?
Yes, that is perfect!
Great, your reservation was created successfully.
I want to find a restaurant. Can you find me something serving Sandwich, with vegetarian options? Something in Los Gatos.
I found 1 nice restaurant. How about McDonald's in Los Gatos?
Yes, that sounds good. I want to book a table.
Sure. For what time?
Make it for half past 12 in the afternoon.
Can you confirm that you want to book a table for 2 at McDonald's in Los Gatos on March 1st at 12:30 pm?
Yes, that works. Can you give me the address and user rating?
I'm sorry but I was unable to make your reservation. Can I help you with anything else?
Try booking it again for 11:30.
Confirming that you want to book a table for 2 at McDonald's in Los Gatos for March 1st at 11:30 am?
Yes,that is correct.
Your reservation is confirmed.
I'd like to find a place to eat.
Where did you want me to look in?
I'd like to find something in San Mateo.
What type of food were you trying to find?
I'd like to find a Burger place.
I found 4 restaurants for you. One nice place is Central Park Bistro in San Mateo.
Did you have any other recommendations?
I also found Poplar Creek Grill. It is a nice place located in San Mateo.
Does this restaurant have outdoor seating?
Yes, they do.
What is the price range?
It is a pricey restaurant.
Did you have any other recommendations?
Porterhouse is also a nice restaurant in San Mateo.
Yes, that sounds good. I'm trying to book a table for three at a restaurant.
What time would you like to book it?
I'd like it at seven in the evening.
Please confirm you're booking a table for 3 at Porterhouse in San Mateo on March 1st at 7 pm.
Yes, that is correct. Where is it located?
Your booking has been made. It is at 60 East 3rd Avenue.
Some friends will be in town soon and I'd really like to find a cool place with outdoor seating where we can meet for dinner.
In what area are you looking to dine? And do you have a cuisine preference?
Oh, I need a restaurant in San Francisco and Korean Barbeque would be nice.
There is a great restaurant in San Francisco that you might like; it's called Stone Korean Kitchen.
How many stars does it have? And is it a pricey place?
They have 3.8 stars and the price range is considered moderate
Perfect. That sounds wonderful!
Do you want to make a reservation for this restaurant now?
Yes please. I'd like to book a table for three at 1:30 in the afternoon on the 12th of this month.
So you would like me to make a reservation for 3 at Stone Korean Kitchen in San Francisco, for 1:30 pm on March 12th. Do I have this right?
Ye. That's it. Can you also give me their exact location as well as a contact number for the restaurant?
Your booking has been confirmed. The restaurant is located at 4 Embarcadero Center and their number is 415-839-4070
Can you help me find an Asian Fusion restaurant in Santa Clara.
Beijing Restaurant is a nice place to eat in Santa Clara.
Please give me their phone number. And do they have an outdoor seating area?
You can reach them at 408-423-0001. They do not have an outdoor seating area.
What other restaurants do you recommend? I want something that has a moderate price range.
Korean Spring in Santa Clara might be a good match.
Yeah, that sounds nice. Can you book me a table for quarter past 1 in the afternoon?
I'll book you a table for 2 at Korean Spring in Santa Clara for March 1st at 1:15 pm. Do you want to confirm?
I actually want the table for the 13th of March.
I'll book you a table for MArch 13th at 1:15 pm. Do you want to confirm?
Wait, no. It should be eleven am.
I'll book you a table for 11 am in Santa Clara. Do you want to confirm?
Yes, I confirm that. Are there vegetarian items there? And what's the user rating?
I've booked your table. There are no vegetarian items. They have a 4.2 user rating.
Can you search for me a intermediate priced restaurant?
Sure. What type of cuisine do you prefer?
I want something serving Barbecue.
Where should I search?
Find me a restaurant in Rohnert Park.
I found 2 restaurants that you might like. How about Bear Republic Brewing Co.? It is a nice restaurant located in Rohnert Park.
Can you give me their phone number and user rating?
The user rating is around 4.3. You can contact them at 707-585-2722.
Can you recommend me something else?
The Daily Grill is a nice restaurant located in Rohnert Park.
Yes, that sounds good.
Would you like to make a reservation?
Yes, please reserve me a table. I need a table for 1 person for the morning 10:30.
Confirming that you want to reserve a table for 1 at the Daily Grill in Rohnert Park. Your reservation is for March 1st at 10:30 am. Is this information correct?
Yes, that is correct.
Sorry, but I was unable to make a reservation. Can I assist you with something else?
Can you try again? Make the reservation for 12:15 pm.
Can you confirm the following: you want to book at table for 1 at the Daily Grill in Rohnert Park. Your reservation is for March 1st at 12:15 pm. Is this information correct?
Yes it is. Can you give me the restaurant's user rating?
They are rated at around 4.0. Sorry, but I was unable to make your reservation for 1 at the Daily Grill. Should I try for March 1st at 12 pm?
Yes, that works for me.
Your reservation is successful.
What's the address?
They are located at 630 Park Court.
What are some good restaurants?
What kind of cuisine do you prefer and where would you like to search?
I'm in the mood for European food in Concord.
There's 1 restaurant you might enjoy in Concord. It is D J's Bistro.
Please give me their address and phone number.
The address is 1825 Sutter Street #C and their phone number is 925-825-3277.
I like the sound of that.
Do you want to book a table?
Yes, please. Book a table for the 14th of March at 11:00
I'll book you a table for 2 at D J's Bistro in Concord for March 14th at 11 am. Is that correct?
No, I have some corrections. Make it for half past 7 in the evening and for a 3 person table.
I'll book the table for 3 for 7:30 pm. Is that correct?
Actually, the table should be for four and change the date to this Sunday.
I'll book the table for 4 for March 3rd. Is that correct?
Yes, that's correct. Do they have an outdoor seating area?
I've booked the table. There is no outdoor seating.
I want to get dinner. Can you find me a reasonably priced Coffeehouse, please?
What city would you like me to look in?
Look for restaurants in Oakland.
Paulista Brazilian Kitchen and Taproom is in Oakland.
That will be fine. I would like to reserve a table.
What time would you like the reservation for?
Make it for a quarter to 5 in the evening.
You would like a table for 2 at Paulista Brazilian Kitchen and Taproom in Oakland at 4:45 pm on March 1st, is that correct?
Yes, you got it. Do you they have outdoor seating? What is the phone number?
I'm sorry, I was not able to make a reservation for that time. Is there anything else I can help you with?
Can you try to book the table at half past 6 in the evening instead?
You would like a table for 2 at Paulista Brazilian Kitchen and Taproom in Oakland at 6:30 pm on March 1st, is that correct?
Yes, that's right.
Your reservation is successful.
I'm searching for a location to dine. I'm searching for a diner with an average priced tag.
What type of cuisine are you searching for?
Get me one that offers burger.
What place ought I look in?
Look for diners in San Jose.
71 Saint Peter is a lovely diner, and is located in San Jose.
Could you recommend alternative diners? Get me one that offers pasta.
Al Castello Ristorante is a lovely diner, and is placed in San Jose.
Yeah, that's lovely.
Do you wish to book a spot there?
Yeah, I'd like to book a spot.
When ought I attempt to book for?
Book it on half past 12 in the afternoon.
Please verify the following information: reserve a spot at Al Castello Ristorante in San Jose for March 1st, 12:30 pm. The booking is for 2 people.
Yeah, that's fine with me.
Your booking is complete.
I'd like to find a place to eat.
What type of food would you like?
Chinese.
Where should I search?
San Fran.
I found 10 options for chinese in San Francisco. How about Alice's?
What else is there? I'd like something affordable priced.
There's Beijing Restaurant in San Francisco.
What's their number? Do they have outdoor seating?
They do not. BUt their number is 415-333-8182.
That works.
Would you like a table?
Yes please, on march 6th at 6:30 in the evening.
Please confirm: YOu want a reservation at beijing restaurant in san francisco for 2 on march 6th at 6:30 pm.
Exactly, what's their rating?
Your reservation was successful. The rating is 4.1
I want to find some restaurants that have been tagged as intermediate priced for cost. Please include outdoor seating areas.
What is your preferred location search?
Look in Calistoga for restaurants.
What is your desired kind of food?
Search for places that serve Gastropub.
I was able to locate 1 restaurant in Calistoga that you may enjoy. Johnny's is a lovely restaurant.
Okay, sounds nice.
Do you want me to book a table there?
Yep, go ahead and book a table for 1 person. I'd like a reservation at 1 o'clock in the afternoon on the 9th of March.
Making a reservation for 1 person on March 9th at 1 pm at the restaurant Johnny's in Calistoga. Is that right?
Yep, that's it. Can you tell me their user rating and where they are located?
They have a user rating that is close to 4.2 and are located at 1457 Lincoln Avenue. The reservation has been completed.
I want to find a place to eat that serves Southern in Mountain View and has outdoor seating.
I have located 4 restaurants that fit your preferences. One is called Michaels at Shoreline and it is located in Mountain View and really nice.
Yes, that sounds fine.
Do you want to make a reservation for a table there?
Yes, I would like to reserve a table there.
What time do you want to make the reservation for?
Make the reservation for 5:45 in the evening.
Okay, confirm these details for me: You want to book a table for Michaels At Shoreline in Mountain View for 2 people at 5:45 pm on March 1st.
Yes, that is good.
My apologies, but I couldn't make the reservation for you. Another good restaurant is Michaels at Shoreline. Would you like me to try to make a reservation at 5:30 pm on March 1st for 2 people?
Yes, that is good for me.
Your reservation has been successfully made.
Can you help me find a restaurant in SFO that serves Pizza and Pasta? Don't worry about the price range.
There are 10 such restaurants in San Francisco. One great restaurant that may you suit your needs is 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano
Are there others that may be good?
Sure. A16 is another lovely one that is also in San Francisco
Can you tell me their exact location? As well as the number where they can be reached?
Sure thing. They are located at 2355 Chestnut Street and you can contact them by calling 415-771-2216
Perfect. That sounds great
Are you looking to make a reservation at this restaurant?
Yes please. I'd like to make a reservation for two
And what time would you prefer?
Let's make it for 1:30 in the afternoon
Okay, so that's a reservation for 2 at 1:30 pm on March 1st at A16 restaurant in San Francisco, right?
Actually, let's change the time to afternoon 12:15
So that's a 12:15 pm reservation for the restaurant located in San Francisco. Correct?
Yes. That is exactly what I'd like. By the way, can you tell me the user rating for this restaurant?
The restaurant has a user rating of 4.3. That reservation for A16 restaurant was not successful, unfortunately. Would you like me to try for a reservation for 2 at the restaurant on March 1st at 12 pm instead?
Sure thing, that would be great.
That booking has been confirmed.
I want to find a place to eat.
What kind of food do you want to eat? Where are you looking in?
I want to find Filipino restaurants in San Fran.
Pampalasa is a nice Filipino restaurant in San Francisco.
Is it expensive?
No, they are cheap.
Okay, sounds good. I want to book a table for 1 person.
What time would you like the reservation for?
I want to make the reservation for 12:30 pm.
Please confirm: A table at Pampalasa in San Francisco at 12:30 pm for 1 person on March 1st.
Yes, that sounds great.
Your reservation has been made.
Can you help me find somewhere good to eat?
What type of food are you interested in eating, and where did you want to dine?
Can you look up Taiwanese restaurants in SFO.
I have located Alice's in San Francisco.
That would be fine. Can you see do they have one table available on the 9th for half past 7 in the evening.
Okay, I will reserve a table for 1 at Alice's in San Francisco for 7:30 pm on March 9th, is that correct?
Yes that is perfect. Can I have the address please, and do you know if this place serves vegetarian meals?
Yes this restaurant have vegetarian dishes. The address is 1599 Sanchez Street, and your reservation is complete.
What's the weather going to be like in vancouver on March 10th?
The forecast average is 68 degrees with a 25 per cent chance of rain.
I need to check the weather on March 2nd in Long Beach, CA.
The average temperature is 77 degrees F with a 15 percent chance of rain.
How humid is it and windy?
The average wind speed should be 8 mph and humidity 35 %.
What is the weather like in London, UK on the 3rd?
The average temperature should be around 88 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 29 percent chance of rain.
How windy and humid will it be during the day?
The mile should be around 2 miles per hour and the humidity should be around 66 percent.
I need to find out the weather.
What city would you like to check the weather in?
Let's check Anaheim, CA.
The average temperature for the day is expected to be 78 degrees Fahrenheit, and there is a 29 percent chance of rain.
Will you see what the weather is on March 9th?
In what city would you like me to find this?
Please look in Fresno, CA.
The day should have an average temperature of 93 degrees Fahrenheit. The chance of rain is 25 percent.
Can you tell me the humidity and how windy it will be that day?
The humidity will have a level of 27 percent and the wind will have average speeds of 5 miles per hour.
Tell me what the weather is like in Ciudad de Mexico.
It averages a temperature of 102 degrees Fahrenheit with a 0 percent chance of rain.
I must verify the climate on the 3rd.
What metropolis would you like to verify the climate for?
It should be in Sydney, NSW.
The mean temperature for that day ought to be 101 degrees Fahrenheit. There is a 4 percent probability of raining.
What will the wind speed be like?
The mean wind speed ought to be 2 mile per hour.
How much humidity will there be?
the humidity is expected to be near 17 percent.
I need to find out what the weather will be on the day after tomorrow.
What city would you like the weather report for?
Please check Portland.
The average temperature for that day is expected to be 70 degrees Fahrenheit. There is a 22 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy? And what is the humidity forecast?
The average wind speed is expected to be 5 miles per hour. The humidity is 10 percent.
OK, thank you.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Hi I'm hoping the weather is good in New Delhi on Wednesday next week. Can you check it for me?
It looks like the temperature that day should be around 93 degrees Fahrenheit with a 0 percent chance of rain.
What is the humidity expected to be?
The humidity should be about 15 percent.
I need to check weather for the 10th of this month.
In which city would you like to check in?
I wanna see for Portland, OR.
The average temp is expected to be 58 degrees Fahrenheit with a 25 percent chance of rain.
How windy is it gonna be?
The average wind speed is expected to be 4 MPH.
Humidity information for that day?
It is expected to have a humidity of 39 percent.
Thanks for that.
Yes, is there anything else to help with?
I want to search weather on 4th of this month in Seattle, wa
The average temperature for the day should be 69 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 43 percent chance to rain
I need to check weather in Cloverdale on the 4th of march.
It'll be 71 degrees with a 24 % chance of rain.
How windy and humid will it be?
The wind speed will be 1 mph with a 26 % humidity.
How about Fresno, CA on the 10th?
It'll be 90 degrees with a 13 % chanc eof rain.
I want to know what the weather would be like in Sydney, Australia on the 2nd.
The estimated temperature for that day is 101 degrees Fahrenheit with a 2 percent chance of rainfall.
Could you tell me what the weather will be on March 9th?
And what location are you interested in?
For Seattle, Wa
The average for today is 64 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 14 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy?
The wind should be about 5 miles per hour.
Will it be humid?
Expect it to be 13 percent.
I'd like to know the weather forecast for the 4th of this month.
What city do you need the forecast for?
The forecast for Seattle Washington.
The average temperature for Seattle for the 4th of this month will be 69 degree Fahrenheit with a 43 percent chance of precipitation.
Tell me what the weather is.
What city shall I search for?
Tell me the weather in New Delhi.
Today's average temperature is 99 degrees with a 4 percent chance of precipitation.
What is the humidity level?
The average humidity is 21 perent.
I would like to know what the weather in Vancouver, BC is like today.
It will be around 75 degrees Fahrenheit with a 15 % chance of rain.
Will it be windy?
around 8 miles per hour.
I want to check about the weather condition in Atlanta. Do you check for me?
Yes, Please note that the temperature will be 86 degree Fahrenheit in average and the chance of rain will be at 28 percent.
Also let me know about the Wind speed and Humidity.
45 percent of Humidity and wind speed is will be 11 miles per hour in average. Hope this information useful to you.
Tell me what the weather is in Phoenix, AZ.
The average temperature is 89 degrees with a 15 percent chance of precipitation.
I have to check the weather on next Wednesday.
What city do you wish to check the weather for?
I need for NYC.
The average temperature for the day is 64 degrees F with a 26 % chance of rain.
I need to know something about the weather. Give me the forecast for March 8th in Chi-town please.
There is a warm temperature of 72 degrees Fahrenheit with a 23 percent chance of rain.
Okay. Can you also tell me about how humid and windy it will be that day?
There humidity will hover around 31 percent on March 8th. The wind speed is estimated to be 8 miles per hour.
I need a weather check
What city?
Vancouver please
Today's average is 75 degrees with a 15 per cent chance of rain.
Could you show me the weather for Philadelphia on the 13th of this month?
It'll be 86 degrees in Philadelphia with a 3 percent chance of rain.
What's the weather forecast for Mexico City on March 1st?
The expected average temperature for the day is 102 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 0 percent chance of rain.
What about the expected wind speed?
12 miles per hour winds are expected.
And the expected humidity?
15 percent humidity is expected.
Okay, thanks. Could you also check the forecast for 7th of March?
Sure. The expected average temperature for the day is 93 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 6 percent chance of rain.
Will you check the weather in ATL on 7th of March?
Average temperature is 83 degrees Fahrenheit with 26 percent chance of rain.
Humidity and wind speed?
Average wind speed is 9 miles per hour with humidity around 45 percent.
I want to check the weather on March 1st in NY.
The average temperature for the day is 66 degrees F with a 37 % chance of rain.
How windy will it be and humid?
The average wind speed will be 12 mph and humidity 41 %.
Hey, can you check for me how's the weather gonna be in Washington D.C. on Thursday next week?
It should be 81 degrees Fahrenheit with a 20 percent chance of rain.
And how humid?
At around 27 percent.
And how windy?
The wind speed should be around 2 miles per hour.
Good to know.
Anything else I can do for you?
Check for me the weather on 13th of March in Pinole.
For the day the average temperature should be 84 degrees Fahrenheit and 18 percent of rain.
Tell me how windy will be?
Average wind speed should be 9 miles per hour.
How much humidity will be?
Around 29 percent.
Good.In Ciudad de Mexico how will be?
For the day the average temperature should be 91 degrees Fahrenheit and 8 percent of rain.
Can you get me the weather for the 11th of March?
Sure. For what city?
For the ATL.
The average temperature should be around 87 degrees Fahrenheit. There is a 0 percent chance of rain.
I need to check the weather in Portland please
It's gonna be 75 degrees with a 9 percent chance of rain
I need to check weather for tomorrow please.
In which city?
In Oakley please.
The average temp is set to be 93 degrees Fahrenheit. There is a 3 percent chance of rain.
he What about on the 9th of this month in Sacramento?
The temp is to be 92 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 23 percent chance of rain.
How windy is it?
The average wind speed is 9 MPH.
How humid is it to be?
The humidity is to be 31 percent.
Please update me on the weather.
Certainly. Name the city for which you wish to know the forecast.
Oh I forgot to say. I want to know about weather in Phoenix.
Phoenix will have an average temperature of 89 degrees Fahrenheit with a 15 percent chance of rain.
can you help me in finding new songs?
My search tells me that there's 10 songs for you. how do you feel about I apologize by five finger death punch from the album got your six?
I think I like this one
do you want me to play it?
not really
can I do something for you then?
tell me if I got this right. you want me to play the song I apologize in kitchen
do it please. can you tell me the genre of this particular song? do you know if it has been released two years ago?
it's a metal song from the year 2015
great, let me enjoy it quietly now
bye
Can you play music? I want to hear something from '17 , how about something from the Sucker Punch album?
I found 1 possible song, what about Strangers by Sigrid from the album Sucker Punch.
What's the genre?
It's a pop song.
Yup, that's the one.
Is there anything else I can help with?
Please confirm: play strangers in patio?
No actually, cast it in the my kitchen.
Please confirm: play strangers in kitchen?
Yes, that's right.
Enjoy the music!
Thanks for the help!
Can I help with anything else?
Nope, thank you!
Enjoy your day!
Can you help me find a specific song to stream? I think it's by Spice from their 2018 album Captured.
I have 1 song that matches that description. Would you like to hear Cool It by Spice? It's from the album Captured.
Would you like to stream Cool It in the Living room?
No, I'm sorry. Please play it in the kitchen.
You'd like me to stream Cool It in the kitchen. Is that right?
Yes, that would be great.
Your selection has started.
Thank you for the assistance.
You're welcome. Have a wonderful day!
I would like to hear a popular song by phan Dinh Tung from the album Hat Nhan.
I have found 1 song for you Would you like to listen to Khuc Hat Mung Sinh Nhat by phan Dinh Tung from the album Hat Nhan?
Is it from nine years back?
It is from 2011
You would like to listen to Khuc Hat Mung Sinh Nhat in the living room?
No, I want to hear it on the patio device.
You would like to listen to Khuc Hat Mung Sinh Nhat on the patio?
No, in my kitchen.
You would like to listen to Khuc Hat Mung Sinh Nhat in the kitchen?
Yes, that is right.
I hope you enjoy the music.
Thanks a lot.
Anything else you need>
Not at this time. Thank you.
Enjoy your day.
Hi, I'm in the mood for some good music. Can you help me find some tracks by Konshens? I really dig Reggaeton music.
There are 2 songs that you may like. One is by Konshens from the It Feel Good album called Bruk off Yuh Back.
What year was that song released?
This song was released in 2016.
You would like to hear the song Bruk Off Yuh Back in the Living Room?
Sure, that works for me.
Happy listening to your song!
Great, that's everything I needed. Thanks.
Enjoy your day.
I am in a nice mood and I would like to listen some nice songs, I need you to search for the good one.
What about a song name Planet Loop by Nayutalien from the Album Nayutan Sei Kara No Buttai Y?. How about your opinion?
Can you check whether this song is from '10? and what about the type of music of this song?
It is a Rock type song and the same was released in the year 2016.
That's great and I like this song.
Shall I play it now?
I need one more help. I want to hear the song that I have selected before. can you play it now?
Yes, please confirm to play the song Planet Loop in Living room speaker.
Yes, play it now.
Song started playing and you can enjoy it now.
Thanks for your help.
Anything else you need?
No, that's all.
Have a great day.
I am in a nice mood and I like to listen to some nice songs from two years ago. Search for something like Pop songs.
Do you like the song Airplane Mode by Limbo from the album Holo?
I need your confirmation to play the song Airplane Mode in living room.
confirmed. You can proceed now.
Song started playing and you can enjoy the same now.
Thanks and that's all for now.
Have a great day.
I want to hear a song. I'm in the mood for Hillbilly style from three years back. I had heard that the album Gotta Be Me is really good.
There's a song by Cody Johnson called With You I Am on the album Gotta Be Me
To confirm: you would like to hear the song With You I Am in the living room.
On second thought play it on the speaker outside.
To confirm: you would like to hear With You I Am on the patio.
That's right. Thanks
Enjoy the song.
Thank you for your help.
Is there anything else you need?
Not just now, thanks.
Have a great day.
Search the internet for some songs for me will ya? I'd like to find some Metal songs from 2019. I like songs by Sabaton.
I've found 8 songs that meet your criteria. How about A Ghost In The Trenches by Sabaton from their album The Great War?
You would like to play A Ghost In The Trenches in your Kitchen. Is that correct?
Yes that is correct.
The music will begin playing momentarily, enjoy.
Thanks, good bye.
You're welcome. Have a nice evening.
Find me a song to listen to that I might enjoy.
There are 10 songs available, how about The Message by Still Corners from their Slow Air album?
For that song, what genre is it classified under?
This song is considered a pop song.
Was the song released in 2010?
The song was actually released in 2018.
Any other songs you can find, perhaps one from Sia, I did hear the Everyday is Christmas album was a great one to listen to.
There are 1 song you may like, what about Snowman by Sia from Everyday is Christmas?
That song sounds perfect, thanks.
Shall I begin playing the song?
Not at the moment, maybe later.
Anything else I can help you with for today?
Snowman will now begin playing in the Living Room.
That is fine by me, thanks again.
The song is now playing, hope you enjoy it.
Thanks so much for the help.
Will that be all I can help you with for today.
Yes, that is all, thank you!
Your welcome, have a good day.
I'd like to search for songs, I like popular songs.
How about Acapella by Karmin on the album Pulses?
Please confirm: Playing the song Acapella in the living room.
Correct.
Enjoy your music
Thanks!
Do you need anything else?
No thanks
Have a great day.
Find me songs from four years back.
I have 10 songs for you. What about Back It Up by Prince Royce from the Double Vision album?
That sounds great.
Would you like me to play it?
Maybe in a little while.
Could I assist with something further?
Could you ocnfirm that I should play Back it Up on the living room?
Yes, that's it.
Enjoy the music.
Thanks.
Could I assist with something else?
No, thanks.
Have a great day.
I want to hear some music. I'd like something from 2019. Songs by Teodora. I heard the album Borbena is really good.
I found 2 songs that fit your request. What about Story by Teodora from the Borbena album.
What was the other one?
Tom Ford from the Borbena album by Teodora.
To confirm: you would like the song Tom Ford in the kitchen?
Yes, that's right.
Enjoy the song. Did you need anything else?
No, that's all I need. Thanks!
Have a great day!
Find me some Hillbilly songs by Shailesh Premi on the Maza Mar Liya Dhori Ke Niche album.
Do you like the song Lahnga Lasar Ke sung by Shailesh Premi on the Maza Mar Liya Dhori Ke Niche album?
What year was it released?
It was released in 2019.
You want to cast the song Lahnga Lasar Ke to the Living room, correct?
That is right.
Your music is now playing.
Thanks. That is everything for now.
Have a great day.
I'd like to look for some songs now.
I found 10 songs. One song is Adrenalize by In this Moment from the album Blood.
Please confirm you're playing Adrenalize in the Living room.
Yes, that is right.
Enjoy the song.
Thank you, that's all I need for now.
Have a great day.
I'm trying to find a song to listen to, preferably a pop song. I'm a big Taylor Swift fan.
I have 4 songs you might like. Would you be interested in hearing the Taylor Swift song Long Live from the Speak Now album?
I sure would, thanks.
How else may I help you today?
Confirming playback of the song Long Live on the living room speaker.
Sorry, no, my kitchen speaker please.
Confirming playback of Long Live on the speaker in the kitchen.
Yes, thanks. Could you tell me, is that song from six years back?
It is a 2010 song. Enjoy!
Thank you so much for all your help.
It's my pleasure. Anything else today?
No, I'm all set, thanks.
Thank you very much.
I want to listen to some songs. I am think of songs that used be one years back. I know that Cry Pretty album is really good.
There are 2 songs you might like. How would you like Southbound by Carrie Underwood which is from her album Cry Pretty?
What genre is that music?
It would be Pop.
Is there anything else you can suggest?
How about The Champion by Carrie Underwood from the Cry Pretty album?
What is the genre of that music?
That song would be Pop.
Yeah that is something I would choose.
Shall I play you that song?
Can you confirm that you want The Champion played in the kitchen?
Actually no. I want it cast on the living room device.
So you will confirm that the song The Champion should be played in the living room?
That is right.
I hope you have fun with the music.
Thank you very much. That is it.
Have a wonderful day.
Hey, I feel a little bored right now. Can you play me some metal songs by Sabaton? I love their album The Great War.
Would the song A Ghost in The Trenches from the album The Great War by Sabaton appeal to you?
Yes, sounds awesome.
Can I help you with anything else?
So play the song A Ghost in the Trenches in the kitchen device?
Yes, that's it.
Enjoy your song!
Thanks! That's all I need for now.
Have an amazing day.
I want to look for a song at this moment.
There are 10 songs which you might enjoy. How would you like listening to Masterpiece by Jessie J of the Sweet Talker album?
That is the song I want.
Do you want this song to start playing now?
Some other time maybe.
Can I do something else to help you?
Can you please confirm that that you want the song Masterpiece to start playing in your Living room?
Yes, that is right.
Have a good time listening to the music
I appreciate it very much!
Do you want me to help you with something else?
Nothing. I am grateful to you!
Have a wonderful time!
Find some music for me to listen to please.
I found 10 songs that may interest you. The first is Turn Me On by Konshens. This song is from their Album It Feel Good.
What year did that Album come out. Just asking.
The song was released in 2017 on the Album It Feel Good.
Find me another song please.
From the Album, King of Everything, the song Pisces by Jinjer may suit your tastes.
You wish for me to play Pisces in the Living Room for you? Please confirm.
No. No in the living room. Play it on the patio device.
Making that change. Playing Pisces on the Patio device. Is that right?
That is certainly correct. Thank you.
Please enjoy your song.
What kind of music does this classify as? Oh and did it come out in '16?
It is a Metal Song from the year 2016.
Okay. Thank you very much.
Can I help you with anything else right now?
I don't think so. Thank you again.
Have a great evening. Bye for now.
I'm in the mood for some Funk music. Can you find me songs from the Isolation album, I heard it's really good.
How about After the Storm by Kali Uchis from the Isolation album?
I'd like to hear the song now.
Okay, to confirm: You would like to listen to After The Storm in the living room.
No. Play it on the kitchen speaker.
To confirm: You would like to listen to After the Storm in the kitchen.
No wait. Make it on the patio device instead.
To confirm: You want to hear After The Storm on the patio.
That's right. When did it come out? Was it three years ago?
It came out in 2018. Enjoy the song.
Thanks. That's all I needed.
Have a great day.
I would like to find a song. I love Rock-and-roll and songs by Get Scared.
What about Sarcasm by Get Scared from their album called Best Kind of Mess.
Was it '16 it was released?
It was released in 2010.
To confirm then I will play the song Sarcasm in the Living Room.
Yes that would be great.
I hope you like it.
Thanks, that is all I need.
Enjoy your day.
Search for me some songs.
How about California King Bed by Rihanna from album Loud?
Something else you have.I would like something from three years back.The album Your Name I heard that is very good.
What is your opinion about Dream Lantern by Radwimps from album Your Name.
What music is this?
This is a Rock song.
Yes, I like this one.
You want to play the song now?
No, maybe later.
Can I do something else?
Play the song Dream Lantern in Living room.I'm right?
Yes is good for me.
Enjoy the music.
Thank you very much.
With something else I can help you?
No.Thank you for all.
Have a great day!
Hi can you help me find some songs to listen to?
I managed to find 10 songs that you may like. How about Dangerously by Charlie Puth from the album Nine Track Mind?
What genre is the song?
The genre of the song is pop.
When did it come out? Seven years back?
The song was released in 2015.
Ok, that sounds good.
Should I play the song for you?
So you'd like to play Dangerously in the living room, is this correct?
Yes please play the song.
I hope you enjoy the song!
Thank you so much!
Anything else I can assist you with?
No, that will be all. Thanks again.
Have a wonderful day!
Search me some songs, something Hillbilly like Rearview Town
I got 3 songs, would you like Girl Like You by Jason Aldean for the album Rearview Town
Is it from 2014
no, its from 2018
Please confirm: Playing the song Girl Like You in the living room
yes, thats right
enjoy the song
thanks a lot
any thing else
no, thats all
have a good time
would you be so kind to look for songs for me from 2015?
you have a pool of 10 songs, do you think that back it up by prince royce from the album double vision would be a wise choice?
absolutely!
do you want to listen to it now?
not now
do you have any other request for me to help you with?
confirm what you want me to do. you want to listen to the song back it up in living room
that's right. I also wish to learn the genre of the song
it's pop music
great
do you still need me?
no I don't
goodbye
I would like help searching for songs that were released two years ago.
I have 10 songs you may like. How about Airplane Mode by Limbo off the Holo album?
You want to hear Airplane Mode in the living room, right?
Yes please and thank you. What genre is the song?
This song belongs to the pop genre.
Great! That will be all, bye.
Bye.
I want to find some songs.
How about Bread Winner by Prince Swanny from the Breadwinner album?
Please confirm that you want to play Bread Winner in Living room.
Sounds good. What sort of music is it?
It's a Reggae song. Please enjoy.
Thanks. That's it.
Have a great day.
Search for me some songs.
I have 10 songs for you.How about the album All The Little Lights by Passenger with song Let Her Go.
What type of music is and in which year did it come out?
This is a Pop song from 2012.
Yes I like this one.
With something else I can help?
Play the song Let Her Go in Kitchen.Is okay?
Yes very good.
Enjoy your music.
Thank you for all.That's all that I wanted.
Have a great day!
I want to find songs from the albu King Of The Dancehall.
I have 1 song for you. How about Colouring This Life by Vybz Kartel from the King Of The Dancehall song?
Please confirm that you want me to play Colouring This Life in Living Room.
Sounds good. Was that the one that came out in 2017?
It actually came out in 2016. It's a Reggae Song. Hope you enjoy it.
Thanks so much. That's it for now.
Have a great day.
Search for me some Popular songs.
Search revealed 10 results. Do you like Acapella by Karmin on the Pulses album?
Was it released in '19?
It was released in 2013.
That is perfect.
Shall I cast the song for you?
You want to cast the song Acapella to the Living room, correct?
That is right.
Your song is now playing.
Thanks a bunch.
Do you need anything more?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a great day.
Find me songs.
Do you like Beautiful Now by Zedd from the True Colors album?
What sort of music is it?
It's a House song.
Could you confirm that you want to play the song Beautiful Now in Kitchen?
That's good. What year did it come out?
It's from 2015. Please enjoy.
Thanks!
Shall I assist with something else?
No, thanks.
Have a great day.
I need to search for songs from '19. I hear the album Reincarnation is nice. I like Reggaeton songs.
What are your thoughts on Top Shotta by Tommy Lee Sparta from the album Reincarnation?
Please confirm details to play the song Top Shotta in Living Room.
Yes, that is correct.
Enjoy the music.
Thanks so much.
What else can I assist you with?
No I don't need anything else thanks.
Have a nice day.
Find me some song please.
I found 10 options for you.What do you think about album Happiness Begins by Jonas Brothers with song Sucker?
Play the song Sucker in Kitchen.Is OK?
Yes,perfect.From '17 did it come out?
From 2019 it is.Enjoy!
Thank you for all.
Can I help you with something else?
No.Thank you very much.
Have a great day!
I want to hear some electronic musical songs. Could you give me some choices?
I have 3 electronic musical songs. Would you like to hear Gold from the album Built On Glass by Nick Murphy?
Did that album come out in '16?
No. That album came out in 2014.
Okay. Yes, that's the song I like.
Would you like me to play Gold?
Please confirm the following information. You want to hear the song Gold, to be played in the living room.
No, could you please cast on the speaker outside?
Please confirm the following information. Play the song Gold on the patio.
Sorry, no. I need to have it played on my kitchen speaker.
Please confirm the following information: play the song Gold in the kitchen.
Yes, play it in the kitchen.
Playing Gold in the kitchen.
Thanks for your assistance.
Do you need help with anything else?
No, that's all. Thanks.
Enjoy your music.
I'm looking for some new songs to listen to. I'd like to listen to something from the album Run.
I managed to find 1 song that you may like. It's called Running After You by Matthew Mole from the album Run.
Yes, that's just what I'm looking for.
Should I play this song for you?
Not at this time, no.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
So you'd like to play Running After You in the living room, is this correct?
Yes, that's perfect. What genre is the song?
The genre of the song is Pop. Enjoy!
Thanks, that's all I needed.
Have a wonderful day!
Can you look for some songs for me?
I found 10 you may like. What about Colder Weather from the Pass The Jar album by Zac Brown Band?
That would be great!
Shall I play it now?
To confirm: You would like to hear the song Colder Weather in the kitchen.
You got it.
Enjoy the song.
Thanks! That's all I need.
Have a great day!
I am in need of songs now, can you help?
You can choose from 10 songs. Do you like the Mountain by Three Days Grace from the album Outsider
That will be right choice.
Shall I play it now.
Please verify, you need The mountain played in Living room
Thats it, thank you.
Listen to it now.
Great service.
Any other help?
No, thats all.
See you later.
I want to search some songs now.
I got some 10 songs for you how about mine by Taylor Swift in the album speak now
What is the genre of thistmusic?
It's a pop genre.
Yeah that's perfect.
Wanna play this song?
Not now maybe later.
Is there something else so that I can help you with?
Can you play the song You just found out?
Please confirm the following details : playing mine songsin living room
No can you cast on Patio speaker.
Please confirm the following details : playing mine song in patio
Yes that's good can you tell me which year did it come out?
It come out in 2010 ,enjoy your music
Thank you
Anything else can I help you with?
No , thanks a lot
Have a great day
I want to hear some popular songs.
What about Acapella by Karmin from the Pulses album?
What else is there?
What about African Beauty by Diamond Platnumz from the A Boy from Tandale?
What else? Show me something from two years ago.
I found 10 songs. What about Airplane mode by Limbo from the Holo album?
That's a good one.
Do you want to hear it?
Not right now.
Do you need anything else?
Play Airplane Mode in your patio. Is this right?
No, play it in my living room device.
Play Airplane Mode iin your living room. Is this right?
Yes it is.
The song has begun.
Thank you.
Do you want anything else?
No, that's all.
Have a nice day.
I want to listen to music. Rumor has it Narrated For You by Alec Benjamin is awesome. I really like to listen to POP songs.
The album Narrated For You by Alec Benjamin has a song called Boy In The Bubble. Is that song a good choice?
I will play Boy In The Bubble on the Living room speaker for you if you like.
The song is right but I would like to listen to it on the speaker in kitchen.
I will play Boy In The Bubble in the Kitchen for you if that is right.
No that is not right. Play in on the Patio please.
The Patio speaker will be set to play Boy In The Bubble if my understanding is right.
That is exactly what I would like.
Hope you like the song.
What year was this song released?
The song came out in 2018.
You are so smart. I am finished needing your assistance now, thanks.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
I'm a big fan of Sara Evans but I haven't had a chance to listen to most of her songs. My cousin Vince is going on about a song on her Stronger album that he had on loop while house sitting for me last week. Could you please find me that song?
A Little Bit Stronger by Sara Evans from the Stronger album is the most frequently played song on last week's playlist.
Sure, no problem. Please confirm that you'd like to listen to A Little Bit Stronger in the Living room.
You got that right.
Do enjoy listening to your music.
Thank you very much.
Will there be anything else?
That will be all. Thank you very much.
Thank you, and have a wonderful day!
I would like to find some songs.
How about Faster from The Unforgiving album by Within Temptation.
That is good.
Would you like it to play?
Confirming playing Faster on the patio.
Great, thanks a lot.
Have a good time.
Thank you again.
Can I do anything else for you?
No, I am good.
Have a nice day.
Can you inform me of the weather in Benicia on March 6th?
The temperature on March 6th will be 85 degrees Fahrenheit in Benicia. There is a 24 percent chance of rainfall.
Can you tell me the weather on March 12th for the same city?
On March 12th in Benicia, the tempeature will be 73 degrees Fahrenheit with a 4 percent chance of rain.
Look up the weather forecast for the 11th would you?
The forecast for where?
Make that the 4th, in Lafayette for the weather.
There is a 15 percent chance of rain predicted and an average temperature of 91 Fahrenheit.
Can you tell me anything about the humidity or the wind speed?q
Of course I can humidity is expected to be about 29 percent and a 5 miles and hour wind speed.
Okay now for Bolinas please.
There it is expected to average 85 Fahrenheit with a 12 percent chance of showers.
I have a few errands to run outside. Can you check what the weather is for March 10th?
Sure, in what city?
It's San Anselmo, and can you actually check it for the 13th of March instead?
Sure, it looks like the average temperature will be 83 degrees Fahrenheit with a 2 percent chance of rain.
Ok, and how windy and humid will it be?
The average wind speed should be 1 mile per hour with a humidity of 16 percent.
I want to check the weather in Tomales for March 11th.
The average temperature on that day is expected to be 89 degrees Fahrenheit and the chance of rain is 23 percent.
What will the humidity level and wind be like?
The wind speed is expected to be 2 miles per hour and the humidity is around 25 percent.
I want to check the weather condition in Sunol for which I need your help.
The average temperature will be 92 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 12 percent for rain.
What is the weather in Sausalito?
The average temperature today will be 77 degrees Fahrenheit with a 1 percent chance of rain.
What will the weather in Alameda be on the 5th of this month?
The average temperature will be 79 degrees Fahrenheit with a 7 percent chance of rain.
I want to know the weather in San Pablo next Monday.
There will be an 18 percent chance of rain with an average temperature of 80.
i have a plan to travel , please check the weather in Antioch on next wednesday.
The average temperature for the day should be 72 degrees fahrenheit. there is a 7 percent chance of rain.
I am planning a visit to Larkspur on the 10th of this month. I need to know what the weather will be like so I can pack accordingly.
You probably will not need an umbrella as the rain chance is only 20 percent. Summer clothing will be fine as the temperature should average 85 degrees.
I'd like to know the weather in Burlingame.
The average temperature for that day is looking like 81 degrees F with a 2 percent chance of rain.
I want to check the weather in Lafayette on 1st of March.
The average day temperature is running at 87 degrees Fahrenheit and the chances of rain is 29 percent
What is the wind pressure there?
The wind speed is 11 miles per hour.
Okay..this is cool
Any other help you want?
I'd like to find out what the weather is going to be like on 2nd of March in Vancouver, BC.
The average temperature for the day will be about 67 degrees Fahrenheit and there's a 49 percent chance of rain.
How's the weather like in Lagunitas?
The average temperature for the day should be around 92 degrees Fahrenheit with an 18 percent chance of rain.
And how about the weather in Campbell on Wednesday next week?
The average temperature for the day is expected to be around 75 degrees Fahrenheit with an 8 percent chance of rain.
Is it going to be very humid?
Humidity will be close to 24 percent.
What would the weather be like this Saturday.
In which city.
In San Bruno.
The temperature should be around 77 degrees Fahrenheit with a 21 percent chance of rain.
How humid would it be?
It should be around 58 percent.
How is the weather in Pinole?
The temp there is 91 degrees Fahrenheit with 18 percent chance of rain
Can you get me the weather for San Jose?
The average temperature for the day should be around 78 degrees Fahrenheit. There is also a 19 percent chance of rain.
I want to know how the weather will be in Castro Valley for March 9th.
For your requested location the average temperature should be at 86 degrees Fahrenheit, and with a chance of raining at 7 percent.
I would like to check the weather in Bodega Bay.
The average temperature for the day should be around 80 degrees and there is a 28 percent chance of rain.
Can you tell me what the weather will be like in Santa Rosa on the 9th?
Yes, the average temperature should be 92 degrees, there is a 26 percent chance of rain that day.
What will the humidity level be?
The humidity will be around 41 percent that day.
Can you show me the weather?
What is the name of the city you want to know the weather of?
I want to know the weather of Brentwood on the 1st.
The expected average temperature for the day iis 77 degrees Fahrenheit with 3 percent chance of rain.
Can you tell me the weather?
In which city?
In Napa, please.
The average temperature is 85 degrees Fahrenheit with a 24 percent chance of rain.
Could you check the weather in Delhi India on the 11th of this month?
The average temp will be 103 degrees with a 7 % chance of rain.
Would you mind finding the Petaluma weather forecast for me please?
Certainly, the temperature will average 82 degrees Fahrenheit with a 29 percent possibility of precipitation.
Great, thank you.
How else may I help you?
I need the weather forecast for the 12th.
Do you want the weather forecast for your current location or some other place?
I need the weather forecast for Dixon.
The average temperature in Dixon on the 12th is expected to be 93 degrees Fahrenheit with a 21 percent chance of precipitation.
Is it supposed to be very humid?
The humidity level is expected to be around 28 percent.
Is it going to be very windy that day?
The average wind speed is predicted to be 4 miles per hour.
Could you find out what the weather will be in American Canyon on March 12th?
On that day, the expected average temperature is 75 degrees wwith a 15 percent chance of rain.
I need weather info for Sebastopol on the 11th of this month.
The average temp should be 75 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 6 percent rain chance.
What is the weather in San Mateo?
The average temperature is 80 degrees with a 13 percent chance of rain.
Can I also have the wind speed and humidity?
The wind speed will be around 11 miles per hour with the humidity approximately 18 percent.
What will the weather be on the 10th of March in Long Beach CA.
The temperature should be 75 degrees with a 20 percent for rain.
Will it be humid or windy?
The humidity should be 50 percent with wind at 11 miles per hour.
I want to check for the weather condition on the 7th. Can you help me to check the same?
Where to you want to check for the weather condition?
I need to check it in Petaluma and please check it for the date on March 1st.
Please note that the average temperature will be 82 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 29 percent for rain.
I would like to check the weather on the 10th.
What city would you like the weather forecast for?
Check Hayward.
The temperature for the day should be 80 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 14 percent chance that it will rain.
How humid will it be?
The humidity is about 30 percent.
How windy will it be?
The average wind speed should be about 8 miles per hour.
What is the weather like in New Delhi?
It should be 99 degrees Fahrenheit with a 4 percent chance of rainfall.
What's the weather like in San Mateo on the 11th of March?
It'll be around 91 degrees Fahrenheit with a 15 percent chance of rain.
Okay then.
What else do you need?
Hows the weather in Brentwood on march 8th
It will be 86 degrees Fahrenheit with a 19 % chance of rain
Whats the expected Humidity and the wind speed?
Humidity will be 29 percent and wind speed is 3 mph
What's the weather like on the 11th of this month?
What location are you interested in?
Sorry, the weather in Montara.
The temperature average will be 86 degrees Fahrenheit and the chance of rain is 17 percent.
Hi, could you help me check the weather in Phoenix on 11th of this month please?
The temperature is 86 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 8 percent chance of rain.
And how windy is it going to be?
The average wind speed is 11 miles per hour.
May I also know the expected humidity?>
It will be around 27 percent.
I want to check the weather in Novato on 4th of March.
The average temperature for the day will be 87 degree Fahrenheit and there is a chance of 7 percent rain.
How windy will it be and also how humid is it going to be?
The humidity is around 19 percent and average wind speed would be 5 miles per hour.
Okay. how about Atherton.
The average temperature would be 78 degrees Fahrenheit and there is 10 percent chance of rain.
I like to check the weather.
In which area you want me to check the weather?
I like to check the weather in woodside.
The average day temperature is 78 degrees Fahrenheit with 6 percent rain chance.
Can you check the weather in Moraga for the 9th of this month please?
There's a 3 percent chance of rain and an average temperature of 86.
I want to check the weather in Nairobi on the 2nd of March.
The average temperature should be 86 degrees Fahrenheit with a 6 percent chance of rain.
What about on the 11th of March?
The average temperature should be 89 degrees Fahrenheit with a 3 percent chance of rain.
Hi, could you help me check the weather in Walnut Creek on the 2nd of this month?
Sure, the average temperature is 76 degrees Fahrenheit with a 26 percent chance of rain.
Check the weather for Nairobi, Kenya for next Thursday.
For that day the average temperature should be 86 degrees Fahrenheit with a 8 percent chance of rain.
What's the weather like in Lagunitas this Saturday?
It should be around 87 degrees Fahrenheit with a 17 percent chance of rain.
How is the weather in Graton on the 9th of March?
The average temperature is looking like 89 degrees F with a 19 percent chance of rain.
What is the humidity looking like?
It should be about 38 percent.
How windy is it likely to be?
It is looking like 4 miles per hour.
Give me the weather forecast for the 1st of March please.
Which city are we checking for ?
Millbrae on this sunday please.
I show an average temperature for that day should be 73 degrees Fahrenheit with a 23 percent chance of rain.
What is the wind factor going to be?
The wind factor factor will be 7 miles per hour.
What is the expected humidity going to be?
The humidity should be around 20 percent.
I need to check weather in Menlo Park on the 11th of March.
The average temperature is set to be 71 degrees Fahrenheit. There is a 19 percent chance of rain.
Will you check the weather in Clayton on March 1st?
Average temperature is 70 degrees Fahrenheit with a 1 percent chance of rain.
Hey, can you check the weather for me? I need to know the weather in Oakland on March 7th.
Sure. The average temperature for the day is expected to be 80 degrees Fahrenheit, and there is a 19 percent chance of rain.
How windy is it going to be?
The average wind speed is predicted to be 4 miles per hour.
So far so good. How humid?
The humidity is 28 percent.
Okay how about on the day of March 14th?
The average temperature on that day should be 84 degrees Fahrenheit, and there is a 22 percent chance of rain.
Tell me about the weather on the 7th of March.
What is the location you want to check?
I want to check San Ramon.
It will be 74 degrees Fahrenheit on average. The chance of rain is 5 percent.
And what will the wind be like?
The wind speed will be 12 miles per hour on average.
And what about the humidity?
It will be around 17 percent for humidity.
Can you check the weather on the 1st for me
Sure, in what city
Let's look in San Lorenzo
It'll be 76 degrees with a low 3 percent chance of rain
How about in Chicago on the 5th of this month
It'll be 71 degrees with a higher 28 percent chance of it raining
I need weather in Valley Ford on the 12th of March.
The average temp is set to be 92 degrees Fahrenheit and there is an 11 percent chance of rain.
What will the weather be in Novato on the 9th of March?
The normal temperature is 80 degrees with only a 1 percent chance of precipitation.
That is nice.
Do you need something more?
Can you tell me the weather for next Wednesday?
In which city?
In Alamo, please.
The average temperature will be 75 degrees Fahrenheit with a 7 % chance of rain.
I would like to find songs from seven years ago. I heard the album Welcome To The Fishbowl was great.
How about Come Over by Kenny Chesney from the Welcome To the Fishbowl album?
Please confirm: play the song Come Over in the Living room.
That is correct. What kind of music is that?
Is is a Country song.
Can you find me some 2019 Madonna songs?
What is your opinion of the song Batuka that's by Madonna and from her album Madame X?
That's exactly the one I wanted.
Do you want to listen to the song?
Begin the song Batuka in Patio. Is that correct?
Yes, that would be right. What is the music genre?
It's pop genre and hope you like it.
I want to find some songs.
What about Options by Pitbull from the album Climate Change?
I want to play the song you found on the living room device.
Please confirm: playing Options in the living room.
Yes, that's right. Did it come out six years back? What's the genre?
The song is from 2017. It is a pop song.
I want to look for some good songs from 2012 that I can listen to. Halcyon is an album worth listening to, I'm told. Can you help me pick something?
There is 1 song that you might find cool. It's from the album Halcyon and it's called Burn. The artist is Ellie Goulding.
You want to listen to Burn in the Living Room, correct?
Perfect, that's it. What genre does this song fall under?
The song is considered Pop music. Happy listening!
I'm looking for some hillbilly songs.
I found 10 songs for you. How about A Little Bit Stronger by Sara Evans from the album Stronger?
Yes, that sounds great.
Do you want to play the song?
I'd like to play that song in the kitchen.
Okay, you want to play A Little Bit Stronger in the kitchen, right?
Yes, that is correct.
I have started playing the song.
Can you search for songs by Cody Johnson, maybe something three years back from the album Gotta Be Me?
I found With You I Am by Cody Johnson from the album Gotta Be Me.
Yes, perfect!
Would you like to hear it now?
No, not right now thanks!
Can I assist you with anything else?
Please confirm you would like to hear With You I Am in the Kitchen.
Yes, and what kind of music is that?
It is a Country song, enjoy!
I'd like to search for some Metal songs from the year '19. I've heard good things about the album The Nothing.
How about Cold by Korn from the album The Nothing?
Alright. You want me to play Cold in the Living room, right?
Yes, that's right.
Enjoy the song!
Can you put on some rock-and-roll music while I work? I've heard the Red Hot Chili Peppers album The Getaway is pretty good.
Sure, I could play Dark Necessities by the Red Hot Chili Peppers form the album The Getaway?
Is that from '13?
No, it's from 2016.
Yes, can you go back and play that song you found on the kitchen speaker?
Sure, to confirm, you'd like to play Dark Necessities on the Kitchen speaker, is that right?
Yes, that's right.
Your song is playing, enjoy!
I would like to find a rock song by Radwimps from the '16.
There is Dream Lantern by Radwimps from the album your name.
Yes, that is correct.
Would you like to play the song?
Maybe later not at the moment.
Can I help with something else?
Playing the song Dream Lantern in Patio.
Cast it in the living room speaker instead.
Playing Dream Lantern in living room.
Yes, that is good.
Enjoy your music.
I'm looking for a song.
I found 10 songs for you. How about the song Tough Lover by Christina Aguilera from the song Burlesque Original Motion Picture Soundtrack?
What type of song is it and when did it come out?
It is a soundtracks song and it came out in 2010.
I'd like to play that song now.
You want to play the song Tough Lover in the living room, right?
No, play it in my kitchen.
Okay, you want to play the song Tough Lover in the kitchen, correct?
Yes, that is right.
I have started playing the song.
Can you find me a song from the album High Expectations, I heard it was great, or a song that was released in '19.
There are 3 songs applicable to your preferences, would you be interested in Bad Behaviour by Mabel from the High Expectations album?
What genre is Bad Behaviour classified under?
Bad Behaviour is considered a pop song.
The song Bad Behaviour will now play in the Living Room.
Actually cast the song on the speaker in kitchen.
Understood, the song Bad Behaviour will now play in the Kitchen.
That is correct, thank you.
The song is now playing, please enjoy.
I would like to find songs. Could you look for songs from one years back? The album Slow Air by Still Corners is nice.
I have 2 songs that should wor. How about Black Lagoon by Still Corners from the Slow Air album?
What sort of music is it?
It's a pop song.
Yes, that's the right one.
Shall I play the song?
Would you play the song you just found?
Could you confirm the following details, like playing the song Black Lagoon in Living room?
No, cast it on the speaker in patio.
Would you confirm that I should play Black Lagoon in Patio?
Yes, that's right.
Please enjoy your music.
I need to search for songs now.
I found 10 songs including Boyfriend by Justin Bieber from the album Believe. What do you think?
Please confirm details to play the song Boyfriend in Living Room.
No, cast it on my kitchen.
Please confirm details to play the song Boyfriend in the Kitchen.
Yes, that would be correct.
Enjoy the music.
Hey, I want to find some tunes to listen to.
You might like If I Told You. It's by Darius Rucker from the album When Was The Last Time.
So you would like to hear If I Told You in your Living Room, right?
No. Actually let me hear it on my patio device please.
So again, you want to hear If I Told You on Patio, correct?
Yes, that's it exactly. Do you know what genre of music this song falls under and the year it was released?
The song is considered a Country song and it was released in 2017. Happy listening!
Could you search Country Songs for me now? I want songs by Little Big Town.
I have short listed 2 songs of your choice. What is your opinion about the song Girl Crush from the album Pain Killer by Little Big Town.
Can you tell me in which year it is released?
This song is from the year 2014.
please give the confirmation details:Run the song Girl Crush in Living Room.
Okay..this is perfect..
Have fun with your music..
Thanks a lot.
Any other help you want?
Let's search songs from five years back by Ariana Grande please.
Sure, How about Best Mistake by Ariana Grande from her album My Everything?
what kind of genre of music is this?
this is a pop album.
Yes that is the right album.
Great, should I play this now for you?
Sure, please confirm. you would like to play Best Mistake in the Living room. is that right?
Yes that is correct.
Enjoy your music.
Hi, could you find me some Pop songs from the Album Warrior in 2012?
How about Die Young by Kesha in her album Warrior?
Please confirm your request to play Die Young in the Living room.
Yes, that is correct!
Enjoy listening to your music.
I want to hear songs from Outsider.
Right Left Wrong by Three Days Grace from Outsider is really good.
Anything else? I do like Three Days Grace!
The Mountain is another great song by Three Days Grace from Outsider.
What year did it come out? '12?
It come out in 2018.
Yes, that is it!
Would you like to play the song?
Confirm, playing the Mountain in the living room.
No, play it on the speaker outside.
Confirming, playing the Mountain outside on the Patio.
Yes, what is the music genre?
It is a rock song.
Can you help me to find some songs?
There are 10 songs that you might like. Do you like the song Dance Macabre by Ghost from the album Prequelle?
What genre is it?
It is a Metal song.
Please confirm that you would like to listen to the song Dance Macabre in the Living room.
Yes, that's right. Please proceed.
Song is now playing. Enjoy the music!
I would like to search for a song to listen to.
I found 10 songs available, including Airplane Mode by Limbo from the album Holo.
What kind of music is that song?
It's a Pop song.
What other music do you have?
There is Ik Vaari Aa by Arijit Singh from the album Raabta.
What year did it come out?
It was released in 2017.
You would like to play the song Ik Vaari Aa in the Living room, is that correct?
Yes, that's right. What kind of music is it?
Your song is starting, enjoy the music! It is a song from South Asia.
I want to search for some nice songs to hear now and I need your help to find the one which should be a Rock-and-roll song.
I got 10 songs and what about the one named Be Somebody by Thousand Foot krutch from the Album The End is Where We Begin.
Now, I want to hear the song that I have selected before and can you play it now?
Yes, please confirm to play the song Be Somebody in Living room speaker.
Please continue to play.
Song started playing now and you can enjoy the same.
Can you help me look up some good tunes from one years ago. The album Narrated For You is definitely worth hearing, I've been informed.
There are 6 tunes that you may enjoy. One is Boy in The Bubble by Alec Benjamin and it is from the Narrated For You album.
Perfect. That's what I was looking for!
You want to listen to this track?
You want to listen to Boy In The Bubble in your Living Room, correct?
Yes, that would be awesome. What genre of music is this song?
The song is in the Pop music category. Hope you like it.
Hi, could you help me search for some songs please?
There are 10 songs you may like, how about Wolf Totem by The Hu in their album The Gereg?
May I know when was the song release and what is the genre of the song?
This is a rock song released in 2018.
Please confirm your request to play Wolf Totem in your living room.
That is fine with me.
Your song has been played, enjoy!
Help me search for some songs.
There are 10 song you might like. How about The Way I talk by Morgan Wallen from the album If I know Me?
What other songs are there. Do you have anything from California Sunrise by Jon Pardi, I like him.
How about Head Over Boots by Jon Pardi from the album California Sunrise?
When was it released?
It was released in 2015?
What other songs are there?
How about Night Shift by Jon Pardi from the album California Sunrise?
Okay, I like that one.
Do you want to listen to it?
Not right now.
What else can I do for you?
Night Shift will be played in the Living room, is that good for you?
Yes, that's good.
Enjoy listening to the song.
Thanks a lot!
What else can I do for you?
Would you please help me to find a songs now?
What is your opinion about the song Time Up from the album Big A Presents One Chance Riddim by Shenseea?
Okay..this is perfect.
Can i run the song for you?
Please confirm the following details: Running the song Time Up in Living Room.
This is perfect..Do you know the type of music and in which year it come out?
Have fun with your music..Its a Reggae song from the year 2017.
I am in a nice mood and I want to hear some nice songs. Can you search for the best one?
I searched and got 10 songs and what about the one called Time Up by Shenseea from the album Big A Presents One chance riddim?
This looks perfect for me. Thanks.
Shall I play it now?
No, please play the song that I have selected before and I want to hear the same in the living room.
Okay, once again confirm to play the song Time Up in your living room speaker.
Sorry, I want to hear it my Kitchen speaker as I have some work to do in the Kitchen.
That's okay. Give me your confirmation to play the song Time UP in your Kitchen speaker.
That is confirmed to proceed.
Song started playing and you can enjoy the same.
Fine me songs please.I have heard that album Everyday Is Christmas is really good.I enjoy Holiday songs and songs by Sia.
I have 1 song for you.How about Snowman by Sia from album Everyday Is Christmas?
The song did come out six years back?
The song it is from the year 2017.
Play the song Snowman in Living room.I'm right?
Yes that's correct.
Enjoy the music.
Find me a song
I got 10 songs for you. What's your opinion about Sick Like Me by In This Moment from the Black Widow album.
What year was it when it come out?
It's the year 2014
Yes, that is the one I am looking for.
Are you interested in to listen to this song?
Can you confirm the following details: playing the song Sick Like Me in Living room.
No. Please cast it on the Speaker outside.
Can you confirm the details below: playing the song Sick Like Me in Patio.
Yes, that's right.
Have fun with your music.
Find me a song to listen to.
Do you like Hey Hey Hey by Katy Perry on the Witness album?
That song is perfect.
Shall I cast the song for you?
You wish to cast the song Hey Hey Hey to the Living room, correct?
That is right. What music genre is it and what year was it released?
Your Pop song from 2017 has started playing.
I want you to scan for songs that I can listen.
Would you like to listen to Love Me Like You by Little Mix picked from the album Get Weird?
So you confirm that you want to play the song Love Me Like You in the Living room?
Sure. Was it released nine years ago?
It came out in 2015 and I hope you like the music.
I want to find music. Can you search for songs.
What about Real Friends by Camila Cabello from the album Camila?
Didn't that come out about eight years back? What genre of music is it?
It's a pop song from 2017.
Please confirm these details: play Real Friends in Living Room.
Yes, that's right.
Enjoy the music!
I'm in the mood for some good music. Find me a few songs please.
The Album Double Vision features a song called Back It UP by Prince Royce. Would you like to hear it?
You got a good one on the first try. That's the one I wanted to hear.
Do you want me to begin playing this song now?
Not right now. I'll listen to it later.
If not that, what else can I help you with?
How about playing the song you found for me earlier?
Would you like me to play Back It Up in the Living room?
Yeah start it up for me. What kind of music is Back It Up exactly?
It is a Pop song. Please enjoy your song.
Find some songs by Little Mix on the Get Weird album.
Black Magic by Little Mix is from the Get Weird album and is 1 of 2 songs that I found.
What music genre is it?
It is under the Pop genre.
What other result did you find?
Love Me Like You by Little Mix is also on the Get Weird album.
Was the song released in '19?
No, it was released in 2015.
That is perfect.
Do you need more help?
You wish to cast Love Me Like You to the Patio, correct?
That is right. What music genre is it?
Your Pop song has started.
I want to search popular songs from 2013 such as the This Is Acting album.
I found 1 song, Alive by Sia on This Is Acting.
You want to hear Alive in the Living Room, correct?
No on the speaker in kitchen please.
You want to hear Alive in the Kitchen, correct?
No on the speaker in patio.
You want to hear Alive in the patio, correct?
Yes thank you.
Enjoy the song.
I'm bored and I think some music might help. I'd like to find some songs.
There are 10 songs that I have found. How about a song called Fortunately I Met You by Witwisit Hiranyawongkul from the album called Quarter.
What genre of music is this?
It's a pop song.
Is it from 2012?
It was released in 2014.
Can you keep searching, It's not really my thing.
Sure, how about Soul Provider by Silly Walks Movement? It is from the album called Silly Walks Discotheque Presents Brighter Days Riddim.
This just isn't what I'm looking for. Can you find something more modern from at least '18?
How about African Beauty by Diamond Platnumz from their album called A Boy From Tandale?
Okay so you'd like to listen to African Beauty in the living room.
Yes that's correct. What genre of music is it?
It's a pop song. I hope you like it.
Find me some songs would you?
Would you enjoy a song from Wind Rose album Wintersaga it called Diggy Diggy Hole?
I love that song.
Should I play it now?
Would that be Diggy Diggy Hole and should I play it in the Living Room?
No I want to listen to it in the Kitchen.
So that will be Diggy Diggy Hole in the Kitchen?
Wait, sorry, actually I would like it sent to the speaker outside.
Okay Diggy Diggy Hole on the Patio it is right?
That's what I decided yes.
Have a pleasant listening experience.
Could you find some songs for me please.
I found 10. You may like Lost Within by Fivefold from The Story.
What type of music?
It's rock music.
YEs that would be great.
Would you like to play it?
Not right now thanks.
Can I do anything else for you?
You would like to hear Lost WIthin cast to the living room, correct?
Yes that is correct.
Enjoy your tune!
I want to find some songs right now.
I have found 10 songs for you. What is your opinion on Lost and Lonely off the album Sinner by Aaron Lewis?
Yes, that is the one.
Do you want this song to be played?
Not at the moment, perhaps later.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
Okay, confirm these details for me: playing the song Lost and Lonely in your living room.
Yes, that is right.
I hope you enjoy the music.
I want to find a song now, and more specifically I like songs from Harris J. I usually enjoy Pop songs, also some friends told me that Salam album is a good one.
There is 1 song which you might like. How would you like listening to Salam Alaikum by Harris J from the Salam album?
That is the song I want.
Do you want this song to be played now?
Can you please confirm that you want the song Salam Alaikum to be played in your Living room?
That is what I want. Can you tell me the year when the song came out?
Have a good time listening to the song. The song was released in the year 2015.
I have nothing to do for the next few hours. Can you put on some music for me?
Sure, I found 10 you might like. How about Fortunately I Met You by Witwisit Hiranyawongkul from the album Quarter?
What year is that from and what genre?
It's a pop song from 2014.
Ok, that sounds good.
Would you like me to play it?
No, not right now.
Ok, anything else I can do then?
Sure, to confirm, you want to play Fortunately I Met You in the Living Room, is that right?
Yes, that's right.
Your song is playing, enjoy!
Can you find me songs?
I found 10 options. How about Pyramid by Jake Zyrus from his album Charice?
Please confirm: play Pyramid in living room.
Actually, cast it on the patio device.
Please confirm: play Pyramid on the patio.
Yes, that's right. What's the genre?
It's a pop song.
I'd like to look for some songs.
I've found 10 that may interest you. First, there's Tough Lover by Christina Aguilera from her album Burlesque Original Motion Picture Soundtrack.
What genre of music is it and when did it come out?
It's a Soundtracks song from 2010.
Do you have anything else? I like Niykee Heaton and heard that Starting Over is good.
There's 1 song that matches. It's Mascara by Niykee Heaton from the album Starting Over.
Yes, that's it.
Do you want me to play it?
Can you play that song?
Okay. You want me to play Mascara in the Living room, right?
No, please put it on the speaker outside.
Alright. I'll play Mascara on the Patio.
Yes, that's right.
Okay. Enjoy it!
Please find some Popular songs preferably of Tyler Shaw.
Do you like With You , 1 of Tyler Shaw? It is from Intuition.
Do you know if its of eight years ago?
It is 2018 song.
the right one, thank you.
Shall I play it for you now.
Not now, thank you.
Do you need any other help?
Please ensure the request: playing With you in Living room.
Please play it on kitchen device.
Please confirm that you asked for With you to be played in Kitchen.
Yeah, thats it.
It started, make your heart relaxed.
Find me songs from three years ago from the album Starboy.
How about I Feel It Coming by The Weeknd from the Starboy album?
What sort of music is it?
It's a disco song.
Please confirm that you want to play the song I Feel It Coming in the Living Room.
No, it should be cast on the patio device.
Okay so you want to play I feel It Coming on Patio?
Yes, that's right.
Please enjoy.
Hi, could you help me search for some Country songs please?
Would you like to listen to A Little Bit Stronger by Sara Evans in her album Stronger?
Are there any alternatives? Preferably from the album Home State from 2017.
There are 2 songs which you might like, how about Singles You Up by Jordan Davis in his album Home State?
Are there any alternatives? Heard that Current Mood is great!
There is 1 you may like, how about Small Town Boy by Dustin Lynch in his album Current mood?
How about playing the song you found just now on any device?
Sure, please confirm your request to play Small Town Boy in the Living Room.
Could you play it on the speaker outside instead?
Sure, please confirm your request to play Small Town Boy in Patio.
That is correct. Thank you.
Your music has been played. Enjoy!
I'm in the mood to hear some music and dance, can you help me find some Pop songs?
The first song on my list of 10 that I think you may like is titled Acapella, from the albulm Pulses, and by the artist Karmin.
Was is released three years back.
The description says it was released in the year 2013.
Perfect, that sounds like just my style.
Should I go ahead and play the song for you?
Not yet, maybe in a little while.
Was there something else I can do for you?
Yes, would you please play the song you previously found on the speaker outside?
So you want to hear Acapella playing from the patio?
No, I changed my mind, play it from the living room instead please.
Okay, so you would like me to begin playing the song titled Acapella in the living room?
Yes, please and thank you!
Have fun.
I want you to find me Electropop songs by Tove Lo.
This one is off the album Lady Wood by Tove Lo called Cool Girl how about that one?
Yes, cast the song I wanted to Patio please.
Cast Cool Girl to Patio correct?
No wait play it on the kitchen speaker I changed my mind
Alright that's Cool Girl in the Kitchen correct?
Yes I am sure of that
May your listening bring you pleasure.
I want to hear rock-and-roll songs by Thousand Foot Krutch.
I have found 2 songs you may like by Thousand Foot Krutch of their The End Is Where We Begin album. Would you like to hear Be Somebody?
When was that album released?
The album was released in 2012.
You would like for me to play Be Somebody on your patio device correct?
Yes please and thank you.
I hope you enjoy the song.
Search for me some songs.
What is your opinion about the album The New Classic by Iggy Azalea with song Work.
What type of music is this.In four years back has came out?
From 2013 and is a Pop song.
Yes I like this one.
You want to play this song?
No.Not now maybe later.
With something else I can help you?
Play in any device the song that you have found.
Play the song Work in Living room.Is okay?
Yes that's good.
Enjoy the music.
I would like to search for some songs to listen to.
I found 10 songs for you, including Stay by Rihanna from the album Unapologetic.
What kind of music is it?
It is a Pop song.
OK, thank you for finding that.
Would you like to play the song now?
Not yet, thanks.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Yes, I'm ready to play the song you found. Please play it in the living room.
You would like to play the song Stay in the Living room, is this right?
Yes, that's right.
Enjoy the music!
I would like to find a song to listen to please, something from '19 in the Metal genre. The album The Great War is supposed to be good, I hear.
Would you like to hear the song A Ghost In The Trenches which is from the Sabaton album The Great War?
I would, thank you.
Shall I play that song for you now?
Confirming playback of A Ghost In The Trenches on the Living room speaker.
Sounds good, thank you.
My pleasure, enjoy the song.
I am looking for a song from '18 by Jess Glynne.
There is 1 song called Thursday by Jess Glynne from the album Always In Between.
Yes, That is the song I am looking for.
Do you want me to play it for you?
No, Not now. Maybe later.
Can I help you with anything else?
Please confirm: You want me to play Thursday in Living room.
Yes, That works for me.
Your music is playing. Enjoy!
Can you tell me type of this music?
The type of music is Pop.
Any songs you can recommend that I would enjoy listening to?
There are 10 songs you may like, how about Grow As We Go by Ben Platt, from his Sing To Me Instead album.
Sounds perfect, thanks for the recommendation.
Shall I begin playing the song?
Not right now, maybe later.
Will that be all that I can assist you for today?
The song Grow as We Go will now begin playing in the living room.
That is correct, thanks.
The song is now playing, hope you enjoy it.
Was this song by any chance released six years back?
The song was actually released this year, it is a 2019 song.
For this song, in which genre would it be classified as?
The song is considered a pop song.
Hi, could you help me search for some Rock-and-roll songs please?
How about Be Somebody by Thousand Foot Krutch from their album The End Is Where We Begin?
Yes, that was what I was looking for!
Would you like me to play the song for you?
Perhaps later on. Thanks.
Do you need any other help then?
Please confirm your request to play Be Somebody in the Living room.
Sorry, could you play it with the speaker in kitchen instead?
Please confirm your request to play Be Somebody in the kitchen.
Yes, that is right.
Your song has been played. Enjoy!
I would like to find songs. I heard Raees is good.
I found 1 called Laila Main Laila by Pavni Pandey from Raees.
Can you play that song on any device?
Confirming playing Laila Main Laila in the Living Room.
Actually, play it is the kitchen.
OK, confirming playing Laila Main Laila in the kitchen.
What kind of music is it an is it from 2014?
It is a South Asia song from 2017.
Hey, I'm in the mood to listen to some pop songs from 2015. Double Vision is supposed to be good.
How about Back It Up by Prince Royce from the album Double Vision?
Please play the song we just discussed on the speaker in patio.
So you'd like to listen to Back It Up in patio. Is this correct?
Yes, perfect.
Hope you enjoy your music.
